 enemy; horses and money provided relief, and even more
so, our growing triumphs vitiated the Turkish reputation for
fierceness.  After the victory, they cut off the heads of one hundred
of those who had fallen in battle, and hung them before the walls of
Antioch for the besieged Turks to look at.  It is, of course, the
custom of the Gentiles to keep the decapitated heads and to display
them as a sign of victory.  While these things were going on, the
Babylonian emperor sent ambassadors to the leaders of our army,
congratulating them for what they had done to the Turks; in addition,
he promised, although falsely, that he would become Christian, if our
people would grant and restore to him what the Turks had taken from
his kingdom.  We had said earlier that the Babylonian empire was far
more powerful than the other eastern kingdoms, but that the Turks,
more ferocious in arms and in spirits, had usurped much of their
territory.  Those who had remained to maintain the siege of the city
had fought bitterly with the inhabitants, not merely at one point,
but at every gate of the city.  This triumph occurred on the fifth
day before the Ides of February,[165] the day before the beginning of
the fast.  It was right that on the day before Christians were to
fast they grew fat on what they most desired, the blood of their evil
enemies.  The Franks, in their fervent victory celebrations, thanked
God for granting them so many of their prayers, and went back to
their camps, loaded with booty.  The Turks, on the other hand,
ashamed to be seen, would have made their way, if they could, through
secret passages, back to their native lands.

Then the leaders of the army, considering the many humiliations they
were suffering from the attacks of the besieged people, held a
meeting and decided, to prevent the chance of any diminution of their
forces, to build, at the gate of the city, where the pagan temple was
located, a fort by means of which they could restrain, to some extent,
the enemy's forays.  All the junior officers assented to this plan.
Then the count of Saint-Gilles was the first to speak: "I shall
provide for and protect the fort; you must help build it only."
Bohemund said, "If it please you, I promise to go with this count who
has offered his services, to the Gate of Saint Simeon, where we shall
both supervise those who do the work.  Let the others continue the
siege, and prevent the enemy from getting out of the city."  And so
the Count and Bohemund then proceeded to the Gate, as they had
proposed.  Those who had remained to build the castle began to work,
but the Turks made a sudden, violent attack on the beginnings of the
structure.  With their sudden attack they compelled our men to flee,
killing many of them, bringing a day of grief to the Franks.  The
next day the Turks learned that some of our leaders had left the
siege and gone to the Gate of Saint Simeon.  They prepared a large
force and quickly moved to encounter those who were returning from
the Gate.  When they saw the count and Bohemund, together with a
large military force, coming towards them, they began to shout and
utter hideous noises.  They surrounded our men on all sides,
inflicting terrible wounds on them, hurling spears, firing arrows,
and savagely killing them.  Their attack was so severe that our men
scarcely were able to escape into the nearby mountains, or wherever
else escape seemed possible.  Those who were, in manner of speaking,
swifter than winged horses, escaped; anyone whom the swift pagans
found slower, however, died.  In this disaster, as it was considered,
a thousand of our men perished; those who were found, because of
their proven faith, to be acceptable, received glorious rewards after
death for their sufferings.  For those who needed to expiate their
sins, the outpouring of blood alone was the most potent way to purge
their guilt.  In great anguish because of such a misfortune, and
separated from his companions because he had taken a shorter road,
Bohemund, with a few of his knights, whom he found banded together,
returned to the siege.  Driven to distraction by the death of so many
of their own men, sobbing bitterly, crying out to Christ, they moved
out against those who had inflicted such pain upon them, and reached
the field of battle.  Confident because of their recent victory, the
cohorts of the enemy stood firm, expecting to perform exactly as they
boasted they had performed against Bohemund and the count.  Against
these proponents of evil the loving God in his mercy arranged proper
remedy for his suffering people.  Therefore these famous men, moved
by grief and compassion for their dead brothers, with the sign of the
Lord's cross fixed on their foreheads and in their hearts, hurled
themselves with all their strength against the enemy.  As soon as
they saw this, the enemy fled towards the Pharphar river, intending
to cross the strait.  In their hasty flight the mass of men was
jammed together in the attempt to cross, and as the wedge of knights
and infantry piled up in a very small space, struggling to pass each
other, men knocked each other down.  Our men watched all this very
carefully, and when the crowd of fugitives seemed to thicken, a fall
was more effective than a wound.  If any man fell into the water and
tried to get out either by hanging on to the columns of the bridge,
or by swimming to dry land, our men located on the shore forced him
back into the water to drown.  The signs of carnage were so great
that the Pharphar seemed to flow with blood, not with water.  The
sounds made there by the vanquished and the victors, by the dying and
by those who were forcing them to die, were so terrible that the
highest vault of the heavens seemed to resound with their shrieks.
The air became clouded with arrows and other kinds of missiles, and
the brightness of the solar globe was covered by a shower of flying
spears.  The women of the city who were Christian stood on the
ramparts of the wall, feeding upon the sight; as they watched the
Turks perish and submit to calamity they groaned openly, but then
turned their faces away and secretly applauded the fortunate course
events had taken for the Franks.  The Armenians and Syrians, although
they were Christian, were compelled to fire arrows at us; some even
did so willingly.  Twelve of the principal enemy leaders, called
"satraps" in the Chaldean language, and "emirs" in the barbaric
tongue, fell in battle on this occasion, as well as many others,
amounting to perhaps 1500 of the wealthiest and most important people,
upon whom the entire defense of the city rested.  Those who survived
the carnage no longer hurled their customary insults at our men;
their boisterous, scurrilous chattering ceased.  On that day their
daily joy was turned into grief.

Then oncoming night separated the enemies; strength and arms dropped
from their agitated minds.[166]

This victory for us resulted in an apparent dimunition of their
strength and force, and their derisory remarks entirely ceased.
Moreover, the short supply of many things whose lack pressed our men
was amply replenished, thanks to God's benevolence.  At daylight the
next day, some of the Turks came forth from the city to collect the
bodies of their dead; they found some, but others had disappeared,
carried off in the bed of the river.  They buried those they found in
the temple called the Mahometry, on the other side of the Pharphar,
near the gate of Antioch.  In these tombs they buried cloaks, gold
besants, bows and arrows, and many other utensils that I shall
refrain from describing.  When they heard about these funeral
ceremonies, our men armed themselves and entered the cemetery, broke
open the tombs, took out the bodies, heaped them up and dropped them
into deep pit.  Then they decapitated them and had the heads brought
to their own tents, in order to calculate accurately the number they
had killed, with the exception of the bodies that the ambassadors of
the Babylonian emperor transported on the backs of four horses, as
evidence of the victory won over the Turks.  When the Turks saw this,
they suffered more bitterly from the uncovering of the bodies than
from the killings themselves.  Now they did not restrain their grief
with a few modest tears, but, putting aside all shame, they screamed
in public agony.  Three days later they began building the fort
mentioned above, with the very stones they had taken from the tombs
of the Gentiles that they had broken open.  When the fort was
finished, the besieged town began to suffer exceedingly, and their
discomfort became even greater.  Our own men were now free to go
where they wished, and even the mountain paths, which previously had
been treacherous, were now favorable for searching for food.  With
all the roads shut off to the Turks, one section near where the fort
and the temple next to the fort were located, seemed to offer the
possibility of entering and leaving the river.  If we properly
equipped this fort, which belonged to us, none of the enemy could
have hoped to have found a way out.  A meeting was held, and the
leaders decided that they would choose one of our men to guard the
fort, to fortify it carefully, and to defend it faithfully, so that
the pagans might be kept from wandering through the mountains and
fields, and might be cut off from entering or leaving the city.  When
they were looking for someone fit for such task, Tancred, who earned
and still deserves the title of wise young man in the Lord's wars,
unable to restrain himself, broke in at this point, saying:, "If I
were to know what future advantages for me might result from the
present hard task, then I might undertake, carefully and with the aid
of my retinue, to strengthen this fort, and I shall try to block our
enemies from moving along the roads they are accustomed to use."
Pleased with his generous offer, the leaders immediately promised to
give him 400 silver marks.  Displeased with the offer, which seemed
not to match the magnitude of the task, Tancred nevertheless agreed;
and so, lest he be considered cowardly if he refused, he gathered his
knights and clients quickly and resolutely, took charge of the fort,
and cut the enemy off from the possibility of getting out through the
city's gates.  By this means he inflicted upon them the greatest
scarcity of food for their horses, as well as a great dearth of wood
and other necessary items.  This outstanding man chose to remain
there resolutely, cutting off all traffic, and he set about
surrounding the city and setting up a vigilant blockade.  On the very
day on which he entered the fort, a large group of Armenians and
Syrians came through the mountains, bringing supplies of all sorts to
the besieged city.  This superb knight, to ensure that the task he
had begun would have positive outcome, intercepted them, compelled by
God more than by his own boldness, and seized a great amount of grain,
wine, oil, and other no less necessary supplies.  The good man could
no longer complain, that while he was carrying out such a holy task
God was forgetful of him, but he had learned, for the first time,
from this remarkable good fortune that he would never again lack
bodily necessities, and that he would not lack eternal reward from
God, after His earthly assistance.  The Turks were entirely prevented
from leaving the city or moving around outside the walls, but were
compelled to make do with what they could find within the city walls,
until Antioch was under siege.

In the course of this siege the strength of Christian law flourished
greatly, and, if anyone was convicted of a crime, he submitted to the
severe judgment of the leaders of the army.  Moreover, sexual crimes
were punished with particular severity, and this was just.  Those who
were surrounded by atrocious deprivations, who seemed to be exposed
to the swords of the enemy every day, if God were not protecting them,
should not have been at the mercy of lustful thoughts.  And how
could pleasure enter where the fear of death was ceaselessly present?
So it happened that merely speaking of a prostitute or of a brothel
was considered intolerable, and they feared dying beneath the swords
of the pagans if they committed such a crime.  If any of the
unmarried women was found to be pregnant, she and her pimp were
submitted to hideous punishments.  A certain monk of the most
prestigious monastery, who had fled from the cloister to go on the
expedition to Jerusalem, moved not by piety but by whim, was caught
with a certain woman, and convicted, if I am not mistaken, by a trial
by fire.  Then they were stripped naked and led, by order of the
bishop of Puy and others, through all the nearby camps, and beaten in
the cruellest fashion with whips, to the terror of the onlookers.

The above-mentioned bishop of Puy assiduously exhorted men to be more
patient in their sufferings and more careful about their vices; he
let no Sunday or holiday go by without preaching the authority of
holy writ through every corner of the camp.  He enjoined every priest,
bishop, abbot, and cleric whom he met and who seemed educated, to do
the same.

It seems to me worthwhile, since the word "abbot" has made its way
into my work, to tell about a certain abbot who, when this journey
was first proposed among our people, finding himself without
sufficient funds for the pilgrimage, cut into his forehead by I know
not what means the sign of the cross, which ordinarily was made out
of some kind of material and affixed to clothing.  It did not look as
though it had been painted on, but as though it had been inflicted,
like stigmata received in battle.  After he had done this, to make
the trick look authentic, he claimed that an angel had appeared to
him in a vision and placed it there.  His hopes were not disappointed;
when the restless crowd, always avid for novelty, heard this story,
the man was innundated with gifts, both from people in and from
people outside of his own region.  Such a trick, however, could not
be hidden from the eyes of those who looked at him carefully, because
a slimy liquid seemed very clearly to ooze from the forcefully
inscribed lines that formed the cross itself.  Finally he set out on
the crusade, was present at the siege of Antioch, displayed what he
had fabricated, although others had seen through it for some time,
and did not hide his intention to gain money.  He behaved well there,
and was very useful in instructing the Lord's army.  He wished to
emulate God, but he did not do this the way a wise man would.  He was
so outstanding that after the capture of Jerusalem he was made abbot
of the church of the blessed Mary in the vale of Josaphat,[167] and
later was made archbishop of Caesarea, metropolis of Palestine.  It
is an indubitable fact that had the solace of the divine Word not
been administered with great frequency to them, their patient
perseverance would never have survived the hunger and hardships of
war.  Therefore we may say that those among them who were circumspect
in their lives and endowed with wisdom were not less but more
valuable than those who fought the enemy in hand-to-hand combat.  He
who provides encouragement that strengthens a wavering mind certainly
is greater than the person to whom his exhortation provides strength,
especially when the advisers and the advisees share the same
suffering.

What shall I say finally about those who, on this same expedition,
were sanctified in various places by becoming martyrs?  They were not
only priests, learned men, but warriors, and ordinary people, who had
had no hope of confession, but were called to this glorious fate.  We
have heard of many who, captured by the pagans and ordered to deny
the sacraments of faith, preferred to expose their heads to the sword
than to betray the Christian faith in which they had once been
instructed.  Among them I shall select one, a knight and an
aristocrat, but more illustrious for his character than all others of
his family or social class I have ever known.  From the time he was a
child I knew him, and I watched his fine disposition develop.
Moreover, he and I came from the same region, and his parents held
benefices from my parents, and owed them homage, and we grew up
together, and his whole life and development were an open book to me.
Although he was already an outstanding knight, he was a singularly
expert warrior, but entirely free from sexual vice.  He was
well-known at the court of Alexis, the emperor of Constantinople, for
he often traveled in his service.  To consider his manner of living:
although he had been blessed with wealth by fortune, he was
considered to be unusually generous in giving alms; he attended
divine services so regularly that he seemed to lead a life more like
that of a bishop than a knight.  When I recall his steadfast prayer,
his pious words, and his generosity in giving gifts, I am extremely
pleased with his holy purpose, but also with my own good fortune in
having known him.  I witnessed him perform acts that entitled him to
nothing less than a martyr's death.  I certainly take pride, as all
those who were able to know him may take pride, in having known him,
since I do not presume to say that I was his friend.  Whoever saw him
knew without a doubt that he had seen martyr.  Captured by the pagans,
who demanded that he renounce the Christian faith, he asked these
unbelievers to delay until the sixth day of the week.  They readily
agreed, thinking that his stubbornness would be altered, and when the
day arrived, and the Gentiles in their madness pressed him to agree
to their demand, he is reported to have said, "If you think that I
have put off the sword hanging above my head because I wanted to
enjoy a few more days alive, and not because I wanted to die on the
day on which my Lord Jesus Christ was crucified, then it is fitting
that I give evidence of how a Christian mind thinks.  Get up, then,
and kill me for the example that you want, so that I may restore my
soul to him for whom I die, who on this day gave his own life for
mankind."  Having said this, he stretched his neck out to the sword
that hung over him, and when his head was cut off, he was carried to
God, whose death he had longed to imitate.  His name was Matthew, as
his name indicates, "given to God."



BOOK FIVE

In addition to the spiritual reward this little work of mine may
bring, my purpose in writing is to speak as I would wish someone else,
writing the same story, would speak to me.  For my mind loves what
is somewhat obscure, and detests a raw, unpolished style.  I savor
those things which are able to exercise my mind more than those
things which, too easily understood, are incapable of inscribing
themselves upon mind always avid for novelty.  In everything that I
have written and am writing, I have driven everyone from my mind,
instead thinking only of what is good for myself, with no concern for
pleasing anyone else.  Beyond worrying about the opinions of others,
calm or unconcerned about my own, I await the blows of whatever words
may fall upon me.  And so let us take up what we have begun, and
calmly bear the judgements that men bark at us.

We do not think it possible for anyone to tell what happened at the
siege of Antioch, because, among those who were there, no one can be
found who could have seen everything that happened everywhere in the
city, or who could have understood it entirely in the order in which
it happened.  Since we have already briefly touched upon the
privations and misfortunes of war that they suffered, it now seems
proper to pass on to how they managed to end the siege, and what the
fruits of such labor were.

One of the Turkish leaders in the city was called Pyrrus; having
become familiar with Bohemund by some means or other, he began
communicating with him by frequent messengers, and they often
informed each other about what was happening on both sides.  As their
friendship grew, kindled by their steady conversations, little by
little Bohemund began to propose that the city, over which the Turk
had significant power, be surrendered to the Christians, and that he
accept Christianity.  He promised him, if he did these two things,
that he would receive greater wealth, along with greater honor than
he had ever had.  After these offers had been made not once, but many
times, attracted by the reward, he consented, and wrote a letter like
this, "I am in charge of three towers: I shall hand them over to you;
at whatever hour you please, or whatever time is convenient, I shall
gladly permit either you or whomever you wish to enter them."  Hope
now began to lift Bohemund's spiritgreatly, and while he waited to
enter the city, his handsome face shone with inward pleasure.
Fearing that, at the moment the city was being betrayed, one of our
leaders might seize control of the whole city for himself he cleverly
called the leaders of the army together.

"It is no secret," he said, "O excellent peers, what starvation, what
cold, what harsh vigils you have had to endure while besieging this
city; clearly a deadly weariness, for which there is no known remedy,
has descended equally on all of our people, the highest, the lowest,
and those in between.  I ask you to hold a meeting among yourselves,
to consider whether you will give power over this city to one of us,
if he is able to obtain its surrender.  It seems to me right, if
someone, whether by force, or in secret, or by bribery, manages to
gain entrance, that everyone categorically agree to grant him rule
over the city."  The attitude of the leaders was very much at odds
with Bohemund's; with angry frowns they said, "It is not right that,
after the work and the fear have been shared by all, and undertaken
without seeking the honor of reward, and when danger has hung in an
equal balance over all, that rule over the city, struggled for so
long and through so much pain, by so many great men, should be
granted to any one man.  For who does not think it just, that, since
the struggle raged for everyone, the rest and his own share after the
victory rightly belongs to everyone."  Unhappy with these
developments, weighing in his troubled mind what he had heard,
Bohemund left.  Suddenly, news came to the leaders that an
innumerable army, formed from among the barbarous nations that were
their enemies, was forming to come to the aid of Antioch.  After a
swift change of mind, they called a meeting, and said to each other,
"Should Bohemund take the city by some trick, we might permit him to
possess it, with this one condition: if the emperor supplies the help
he has promised us, and carries out with matching generosity what he
has offered and sworn to give us, we must ourselves hand over the
city to the emperor's jurisdiction.  Should he fail us, the entire
city will be given over to Bohemund, as he requested."  When he found
out what they had said, the splendid man was reassured, and repeated
his imprecations to Pyrrus every day, seducing him with promises and
praise.  "Lo," he said, "fine Pyrrus, you see that opportunity smiles
in the working out of these matters.  Therefore, I say, do not delay,
lest you lose what we have labored together for, because it is
discovered, God forbid, by someone."  Pleased with Bohemund's message,
Pyrrus promised that his efforts would in no way be delayed.  And,
lest the effect of the daily delay create anxiety in the noble man,
Pyrrus secretly sent his own son to Bohemund, informing him that he
faithfully looked forward to the surrender of the city.  "Tomorrow,"
he said, "at the first light, collect the entire force of the Franks
army, with horns blowing, and order them to proceed some distance
from the encampment, as though they were going to make one of their
usual raids on Saracen territory; but then bring them back
immediately through the mountains on the right.  I shall wait inside
the city for your return, ready to admit immediately into the towers
which seem to be under my control those whom you choose to send.
Bohemund eagerly hastened to carry out the plan he had heard;
summoning one of his retainers, he ordered him to carry out the
office of herald, circulating throughout the Franks' camp, telling
them to prepare themselves with the greatest care, as though they
were proceeding into the land of the Saracens.  Without delay, the
wisdom of the servant carried out the command of the leader directly,
nor did the men of France refuse to comply.  At last Bohemund told
the joy in his heart to duke Godfrey, to the count of Flanders, to
the count of Saint-Gilles, and to the bishop of Puy; trusting the
promises of Pyrrus, he said that Antioch would be surrendered to him
that night.  Therefore, when the army was drawn up in the order we
have described, the knights were ordered to march through the plain;
the band of foot-soldiers marched through the mountains.  Throughout
the night they marched, and before dawn offered its first rays, they
stood before the towers over which the blessed traitor vigilantly
stood watch.

When Bohemund got down from his horse, he spoke to the Franks with a
tone of unusual authority, "Go forward, and breathe free of the
anxiety which you have long endured; climb the ladder built for you;
let me detain you no longer--seize the city you have been hoping for
so long.  Long under subjection to the Turks, it will now surrender,
God willing, to your custody."  The Franks reached the ladder, which
was attached and very firmly tied to the walls of the city, offering
a way to ascend to the sixty men who, when they reached the towers,
were given authority over them.  However, because so few Franks had
climbed up, Pyrrus, waiting, and anxious, not for our men but for
himself, as became very clear later, feared that the outcome of the
betrayal he had undertaken would lead to his own destruction, and he
cried out brusquely in Greek to those near him, "We have too few
Franks."  With these words he eagerly called upon Bohemund to proceed
quickly, before the inhabitants knew that the Franks were assembling.
But certain Lombard servant, understanding that Pyrrus was
complaining about the absence of Bohemund, hastened as quickly as he
could to the man who was being sought, "Why," he said, "are you
behaving so foolishly?  Why do you carry out such an arduous task so
slowly?  See how we now have obtained control of three towers; why do
you watch the doubtful outcome of this affair from a distance?  Wake
up, move your forces, place yourself in the midst of the action."
Very swiftly now he hastened with his men to the ladder, and he
revived the hopes both of the good traitor and of those who had
already climbed the wall.  Immediately those who already occupied
Pyrrus' towers, waiting for the Franks to assemble from all sides,
began to shout with great joy, "God wishes it!"  Those who were
standing before the walls, about to climb up, shouted the same thing
with all their might.  With great competitiveness each tried to climb
the wall first; once up the ladder, they took over the towers, and
others, as quickly as possible.  Whoever stood in their way was
put to death; among those who died was Pyrrus' brother.  Meanwhile a
ladder broke, and the great crowd of our men below, and those who had
preceded them, were sorely troubled; those on the top of the wall
feared that they were cut off from aid, and those at the bottom
feared that those who had climbed up could not receive support.  But
great effort quickly made a way.  There was a hidden gate to their
left; it was not remarkable that it could not be seen at night; even
during the day it was hardly ever seen, since it was located in a
place where there was little traffic.  By tapping the wall, however,
impelled by urgent need, they found it; immediately they ran up to it,
and opened it by breaking the hinges and locks, making an entry for
the Franks, who rushed in.

You would have heard the whole city shaken with terrible roar.  While
some rejoiced in the completion of such a task, others wept at the
unlooked-for destruction of their prospects.  Neither the victors nor
the vanquished showed any moderation or self-control.  Bohemund
ordered his standard, easily recognized by the Turks, to be placed on
top of a certain mountain, in full view of the citadel, which was
still resisting, to make the city aware of his presence.  Wailing and
shrieking filled the city; while throngs pressed through the narrow
streets, the brutal, bloody shouts of the victors, eager to kill,
resounded.  As they recalled the sufferings they had endured during
the siege, they thought that the blows that they were giving could
not match the starvations, more bitter than death, that they had
suffered.  The same punishment inflicted upon the hordes of pagans
was justly meted out to the treacherous Armenians and Syrians, who,
with the aid of the Turks, had eagerly and diligently pursued the
destruction of our men, and our men were, in turn, unwilling to spare
them painful punishment.  And yet I say that they would have spared
many of them, had they known how to make a distinction between the
natives pagans and those of our own faith.  In the confusion of the
moment and of the action (it was night, and eagerness to capture the
town and impatience with delay incited everyone), perhaps nothing
permitted distinguishing foreigners by their clothing or beards.  A
terrible neglect covered the thinness of the weary cheeks of our men,
who, continually prepared for battle, worn out by continual traveling,
had stopped shaving their beards in the Franks' manner.  The bishop
of Puy noticed this, and to prevent mutual slaughter in case they
confronted each other in battle, (each thinking the other a Turk
because of the beard), ordered them to shave often, and to hang on
their necks crosses made of silver or of some other material, so that
no one, mistaken for a foreigner, would be struck down by a comrade.
In the morning, those who had remained in the tents heard the tumult
in the city, and came out.  They saw Bohemund's standard fixed on the
lofty mountain, in front of the walls of the citadel, which had not
yet been captured.  They quickly ran towards the gates of the city
and broke in, cut down the Turks and Saracens whom they found there,
while those, however, who had fled into the citadel, escaped death.
Some of the Turks, having learned that the Franks had taken control
of the city, escaped through other gates of the city.  Within the
city, however, no one was spared because of sex; young children were
killed, and, since those weak with age were not spared, there can be
no doubt about the ferocity with which those who were young enough to
be fit for battle were killed.

Meanwhile, fearing capture by the Frankish forces, and wishing to
purchase his life by running away, Cassian, who was in charge of the
city of Antioch, together with several of his leaders, took refuge
not far from Antioch, in an are occupied by Tancred.  Exhausting
their horses by the speed of their flight, unable to proceed any
further, they turned aside and stopped at a small house.  When the
inhabitants of the mountains, Armenians and Syrians, found their
greatest enemy hidden, at the mercy of fortune, in a poor hut, they
recognized him at once, decapitated him, and brought the severed head
as a gift to Bohemund, expecting that they would obtain their freedom
from him in exchange for the unusual gift.  His baldric and the
scabbard of the sword they took from him were estimated to be worth
60 besants.  These events occurred on Thursday, the fifth of June.
Then you would have seen the city overflowing with bodies and with
intolerable stench.  Markets, public places, the porches and
vestibules of homes, which once were adorned with beautifully
polished marble surfaces, were now completely stained with gore.
Infinite numbers of corpses heaped up everywhere, a horrible
spectacle, and the savagery of the foul air, horribly infected both
the eyes and the ears.  The narrow streets were strewn with deep
piles of stinking bodies, and since there was no way to carry off so
many dead, and there was no escape from the smells, the constant
sight and stink made men used to the horror.  Thus habit led to
audacity, and no one feared to walk down the streets filled with
bodies.

Therefore Kherboga, the mayor of the palace or rather the leader of
the troops of the king of the Persians, whom they were accustomed to
call Sogdianus,[168] the name of previous king of the Persians (as
the Romans are accustomed to call their leaders Caesars), while he
was still within the kingdom of Persia, in the province called
Khorasan (some say that this land derives its name by corruption from
the name of the land around the Caucasus), was summoned by frequent
messengers from Cassianus, the ruler of the city of Antioch, to bring
help to him in his beleaguered position.  Cassianus promised that, if
he drove off the Franks, he would either turn over to him the
liberated city, or provide him with a gift equal to his great labor.
When the general, enticed by this promise, had put together a huge
army, and had asked for and received permission to kill the
Christians from the chief pontiff of their heresy (for even they have
their Pope, in the likeness of ours), he quickly set off to relieve
the siege of Antioch.  The prefect of Jerusalem (whom they call in
their barbaric language "emir") also immediately increased the
invading forces with his own army, which was, in turn, augmented by
the considerable forces of the king of Damascus.  The pagans
recruited by the infidel prince, in addition to the Turks, Saracens,
Arabs, and Persians (who are already familiar to historians), bore
new names: they were the Publicans, the Kurds, the Azimites, and the
Agulani, together with innumerable others, who were by no means human,
but monsters.  Three thousand of those who were called Agulani were
said to be present, and they were afraid neither of swords, lances,
arrows, nor any kind of arms, because they and their horses were
covered with armor everywhere.  In battles the only weapons they used
were their swords.  Kherboga therefore, with the great arrogance of
the pagans, strove to drive the Franks from Antioch.  As the prince
approached the city, the son of the dead Cassian, Sensadolus by name,
met him, and, with great sadness, said to him, "Since your strength
is widely renowned, and the victories of you and your people are
everywhere judged to be incomparable, certainly my hope for your aid
will not be disappointed, O most victorious of men.  No one denies
the worth of your judgements; because of the brilliance of your deeds,
your power is worshipped everywhere; therefore I need not be ashamed
of lamenting my misfortune in your presence.  I know for certain that
I am not begging in vain for the things for which I ask.  Your
excellency remembers that you received ambassadors from my father
when Antioch was being besieged, and that, while you were deciding to
come to his aid, you heard that the city had been captured by the
Franks.  Now my father is dead, and I am besieged in the citadel of
the city, undoubtedly awaiting the same fate that overtook my father.
If they have invaded Antioch, and have done the same to many cities
and towns of Armenia and Syria, they undoubtedly intend to do the
same thing to you and to others of our race.  May your excellency
carry out with all your force what you have undertaken against these
vicious men, so that the usurpations intended by these most wretched
of men may be thwarted.  For me, in this crisis, you remain the last
hope."  In response to these laments, Kherbog replied, "If you want
my help in these present dangers, turn over to me the city which you
are defending and for which you are pleading, and after I have put my
men in charge of the citadel, then you will find out what I shall do
on your behalf."  Sensadolus replied, "If you kill the Franks for me,
and bring me their severed heads, I shall let you into the city; then
I shall swear allegiance to you and as your liege rule the citadel."
Corboran said to him, "You will not behave like that towards me, but
will hand over the city immediately."  What more?  The demand of the
infidel ruler prevailed, and the young man, surrendered control of
the citadel to him who wrested it from him, but who would not long
enjoy his power.

On the third day after the Franks had broken into Antioch, the
vanguard of the Turks had appeared before the walls of the city,
while the rest of their vast army set up their tents at the Pharfar
bridge.  First they attacked the tower closest to the bridge, and
after they had captured it with very great effort, they killed
everyone they found within in it, sparing only the commander of the
tower, whom our men found, after a later battle against them, chained
in irons.  The next day the army hurried towards the city, chose a
spot between two rivers for their tents, and remained there for two
days.  After capturing the fort whose commander, as I said, was put
in chains, Kherboga summoned one of his officers, whom he knew to be
wise and trustworthy, and gave him the following orders, " Go and
defend the fort for me, with the fidelity that you owe me, and which
I expect of you."  He replied, "I shall have difficulty carrying out
your command in this matter, but I shall carry it out on the
condition that, if the Franks are victorious, you permit me to
surrender the citadel to the victors."  Kherboga replied, "I trust
your discretion and your faithfulness in this matter, and shall
firmly support whatever you choose to do."  After the fort had been
provisioned, the ill-fated prince returned to his camp, where some of
his Turks, having stripped a poor foot-soldier of his arms, brought
them to Kherboga to make sport of us.  The sword was filthy with rust,
the bow was black as soot, the dull lance was covered with the smoke
of many years.  Joking, they said to him, "Here are the weapons with
which the Frankish army will defeat us."  Smiling, Kherboga said to
them, "Will they depopulate the East with with these shining,
powerful arms?  Will the far reaches of the Caucasus submit to these
men?  Will the unarmed Franks be able to take away from us the lands
which the Amazons once held, and which our ancestors once claimed?"
He spoke, called scribe, and said, "Write as quickly as possible the
same letters on different pieces of parchment, so that they may be
sent throughout the provinces of Persia, to our Pope, to the lord and
king of our Persians, to the governors and to our military peers in
the different areas."  This is the tenor of what he wrote:

To the magnificent lord and king of the Persians, to the blessed Pope,
and to all of those sworn to fight a holy war against the Christians,
Kherboga, prince of his army, wishes health and victory.  Fathers
and lords, I am grateful that the supreme divinity continually
provides us with good fortune, and offers us victory everywhere over
the enemies of the people.  We are sending you three weapons which we
have taken from the Franks, so that you may see what with what
equipment those who wish to drive us from our country fight.  I would
like you to know that I am besieging the Franks, who intend to
destroy us, in the very city, Antioch, which they have just captured.
I am in possession of the lofty citadel in the heart of the city.
Since I can either put to death those who are shut up there, or place
them in abject captivity, I do not want you meanwhile to be tortured
with worry out of concern for us, but I want you to know that we are
completely in control.  Therefore give yourselves up to pleasures: in
greater security than that to which you are accustomed, eat the
finest foods; lie with multitudes of wives and concubines to
propagate the race, so that the increasing number of sons may oppose
the Christians, whose number now grows.  I swear by the high
Thunderer, that I, protected by the blessed Mahomet, will not appear
before the eyes of your majesty until I have subdued the royal city,
that is, Antioch, as well as neighboring Syria, the Greeks and the
Epirites, whom they call the Bulgars, and I have conquered the
Apulians and Calabrians as an additional ornament to your glory.
Farewell.

Kherboga's mother, who lived in the city of Aleppo, came to him at
this time, and sadly offered him counsel: "I would like to know
whether what is said of you is true."  Her son replied, "What is
that?"  She said, "They say that you are going to fight the Franks."
He replied, "Absolutely true."  She said, "Son, best of men, I dare
to appeal to your native nobility not to fight them, lest you mar
your reputation.  Since the brilliance of your arms gleams as far as
the furthest reaches of the Indian Ocean, and remote Thule resounds
with your praise, why would you soil your weapons with the blood of
poor men, whom it does not pay to attack, and from whose defeat you
can gain no glory?  Since you can compel distant kings to tremble,
why harm wretched foreigners?  My son, I say that you rightly despise
them as individuals, but you should know for a fact that the
authority of the Christian religion is superior.  Therefore I beg you
not to attempt something that you will later regret having undertaken."
When he heard what she had to say, he looked at her with anger in
his eyes and said, "Why do you weave these old wives' tales?  You are
raving, I suggest, insanely pouring forth words without understanding.
All the men in their army do not amount even to the number of noble
leaders from the cities who are fighting under my command.  And do
you, in your insanity, think that Christian presumption will obscure
my power?"  She said, "Oh most dearly beloved son, I place little
value on the names of the people about whom we are speaking, but
I beg you not to shun their leader, Christ.  Perhaps they themselves
do not have the power to fight you, but victory is certain for their
God, if he wishes to prevail.  He customarily defends his own men,
though they be weak and ignorant, purely for his own glory, and
watches over and protects them, whose shepherd, or rather redeemer,
he says he is.  Do you think that he who has looked after the empires
of his faith, who has thus far granted them victory over us, is
incapable at this very moment of easily overturning our efforts?  For
it was said to him by the Father, as though to a God about to rise
again from the dead, 'Arise God, and judge the earth, for you will
inherit it among the nations of men.'[169] Therefore, if he judges
the earth, he sees and sets apart some from the mass doomed to
destruction, while others he condemns, and he takes as his
inheritance not all nations, but only a portion of the whole.  May
your foresight hear, my son, how severely he punishes those whom he
permits to be ignorant of him.  The prophet David says, 'Pour forth
thy wrath against the nations that have not known thee, and against
the kingdoms that have not cried out thy name.'[170]  You do not
condemn these Franks because they are strangers and you are gentiles;
you do not reject them because their arms are humble or because they
are impoverished; but rather you hate in them the name of Christ.
Certainly He who is despised in them will fight for them, if
necessary, with overflowing anger.  If he has promised them with
prophetic mouth that 'the name of God will be praised from east to
west,'[171] for he is said to be exalted not over the Jews, but over
all nations, and by the mouth of God himself it was said that the
people who had not been his people were now his people, and those who
had not been loved were now loved,[172] and what had been among the
Jews was transferred to all nations by the grace of adoption, and
among the rest of them the face of the God of the Jews was provided,
then who except a madman would dare attack the sons of God?  I
predict that if you fight them, you will bring upon yourself great
discomfort and shame.  You will undergo certain military defeat,
enrich the Christians with booty taken from you, and you yourself
will run off in ignominious flight.  Even if death does not wait for
you in this battle, you may be certain that your life will end within
a year.  Their God does not take immediate vengeance when a crime is
done, but defers the punishment until the crime itself has come to
full fruition.  For this reason, my son, I fear that you may be
increasing the horror of your death by delaying it."  Stunned by his
mother's miraculous eloquence, pale and weakened by the announcement
of his impending death, Kherboga replied, "And you, I would like to
know how you came by this knowledge, how you have discovered that the
Christian people will use its strength against us, that they are
about to triumph in battle over us, that they will despoil us,
and that I shall die a sudden death within the year."  She said, "Son,
we know that nearly one hundred years have gone by since it was
discovered in certain secret books of a pagan sect that the Christian
people would rise up against us in battle and subjugate us entirely,
setting up their kingdom where we now exercise dominion, so that
pagans would be subject to those of the true faith.  But our
knowledge was not clear in this respect: we did not know whether it
would come about now or after a long time.  I then diligently studied
astronomy, examining innumerable possibilities, until, checking them
against each other, I learned that we would inevitably be conquered
by Christian men.  For this reason I grieve for you with all my heart,
because I have no doubt that I shall soon be deprived of you."  And
he replied, "mother, I would like you to explain some things about
which I am uncertain."  She said, "ask, so that you will not be in
doubt.  Whatever I know you will know immediately."  He said, "Tell
me whether Bohemund and Tancred should be considered gods or men, and
tell me whether they will bring victory in battle to the Franks."
She replied, "Son, Bohemund and Tancred are like us, subject to
mortality, but because they fight for their faith, they have merited
glorious renown, for God helps them.  They declare that God is the
Father, whose son, made into a human being, they worship in the same
manner, and they believe that both are the same in the unity of the
holy Spirit."  He replied, "Since you testify, O mother, that they
are not Gods, but merely human beings like us, no more doubt remains,
and we may try our strength in battle."

Therefore, understanding that her son, intent on fighting with the
Franks, was unwilling to heed her advice, the mother collected
whatever supplies she could gather and, spurned by her son, retired
to the above-mentioned city of Aleppo.  And so, three days later,
Kherboga took up arms, and a large group of Turks approached the city
with him on the side where the fort they had recently captured and
fortified was located.  Our men, however, judging that they could
resist them, set up lines of defense against them, but the number of
Turks was so great that our men did not have the force or boldness to
resist.  Therefore they were compelled to retreat into the city, but,
as they were entering the gate in crowded flight, the entrance proved
too narrow, and many were crushed to death.  It was the fifth day of
the week, and some outside the city were attacking the gate, while
others continued to battle the inhabitants inside the city until
evening.

But because Christ knew once and knows now whom he has chosen, some
men who, so to speak, were not of the kind by means of whom salvation
would come to Israel,[173] when they saw that they were surrounded by
the Turkish army,

and that the day's battle was scarcely ended when night came, they
grew fearful and panic-stricken, aware only of their imminent death.
Petrified, each saw his own life hanging before him, and in their
frightened minds the men saw Turks already before them, about to
strike them with deadly spears.  Each lost faith in his own ability
to fight, and therefore turned his mind to flight.  Those who gave up
hope in God made a filthy descent into the foul sewers, a worthy
place for those who were giving such a bad example to the troops.
The crawling cowards made their way to the sea, with the skin from
their hands and feet torn away, and their bones stripped of flesh by
the sharp rocks.  Like Paul the doctor, who escaped from Damascus by
means of a wall,[174] they showed that the sewers were fitting for
them.[175]

Among those who retreated were a certain William of Normandy, nobly
born, and his brother Alberic, sent to school early, who became a
cleric, and then, out of passion for fighting, dropped away from the
church and foully, like an apostate, became a knight.  I would name
the towns from which they came, were I not constrained by my close
friendship with some members of their family to limit my remarks,
thereby protecting them from shame.  A certain Guido Trossellus, well
known for his power and influence in cities across the Seine, and who
was considered remarkable by the whole race of Franks, was the
standard-bearer for the escape.  There were other deserters from the
holy army also, who, when they came back to their native land, were
held in contempt and denounced as infamous everywhere.  Some of them
we do not know; others we know very well, but we prefer not to
humiliate them.

They came to the port which is called the gate of Saint Simeon, where
they found boats and sailors, and they asked the sailors, "Why are
you waiting here, unhappy men?  You should know that all those to
whom you customarily bring food are about to die, for the city and
those within it are besieged by an army of Turks, and we scarcely
escaped from their onslaught with our naked bodies."  Stung by the
dire news, they hesitated, stunned for a long time, and then placed
all their hope in flight.

They got into the ships and sought the depths of the sea.[176]

Almost immediately afterwards, as their prows began to move through
the waves, the Turks arrived, killed everyone they found there,
burned the ships they found riding at anchor, and despoiled the
bodies of those whom they had killed.  After those base men, fleeing
from divine assistance, had escaped through the foul places we have
mentioned, those who had chosen to remain were no longer able to
withstand the enemies' weapons or onslaughts.  Therefore they built a
wall between themselves and their enemies, which they patrolled night
and day.  The suffering of our men was so great there that they were
compelled to eat the foulest food, the flesh of horses and donkeys.

One day, when the leaders of the army were standing before the
citadel they were besieging, and were gravely worried about the
misery they were suffering, a priest presented himself before them,
and said, "Leaders and elders, I shall relate a vision of your
excellence which, if you give it credence, may offer you some
consolation, as I hope.  While I was asleep one night in the church
of the blessed mother of God, the Lord Jesus Christ, together with
his most blessed mother and the blessed leader of the apostles, Peter,
appeared standing before me and said, 'Do you know who I am?' 'Not
at all,' I said.  He spoke, and lo in a cloud above his head a cross
appeared, like those one sees in paintings.  Again questioning me,
the image of the Savior repeated, 'Now do you know whom you see?' I
said, 'O lord, I can recognize your identity only because I see above
your neck the figure of the cross, which customarily represents your
image wherever it is painted.' He said, 'you are not wrong.  I am he.
' Aware of how much we have suffered, I threw myself immediately at
his feet and urgently begged him to relieve the suffering of those
who were fighting for our faith.  'I have seen what you have endured,
' he said, 'and I shall not now hesitate to bring you help.  At my
instigation you vowed to undertake this expedition; you have captured
the city of Nicea with my support; under my leadership you have won
many victories; having brought you this far, I have grieved for the
sufferings you endured in besieging the city of Antioch, and which
you are suffering even now within the city itself.  However, after I
raised you up with so much help and with so many victories, and I
granted you victory in the city, preserving you safe and unharmed,
you have behaved badly towards Christians, and have entered into
filthy relations with pagan women; you have raised a foul clamor to
heaven.' At this point the Virgin of unconquerable piety, always the
intercessor with God for the human race, and Peter, the heavenly
gatekeeper, and the patron bishop of Antioch, threw themselves at the
feet of the most merciful Lord, praying and asking that He grant
relief to his people.  The miraculous Peter himself said, 'Your
majesty remembers with what shameful things the pagans desecrated my
home in this city, insulting your divinity by filling your shrines
with disgraceful actions and with murder.  Since you at last showed
pity and expelled them, bringing joy to the heavenly kingdom, will
you now relent and permit their pride to regain its former position
against you yourself?' Moved by these words, God said to me, 'Go and
tell my people to return with all their hearts to me, and I shall
eagerly restore myself to them; within five days I shall provide the
greatest help.  Let them recite litanies, and let each man sing this
response from *Ecclesiastes*: Our enemies have joined against me,
and they rejoice in their strength; destroy their strength, O Lord,
and scatter them (add here the verse)."[177]  The priest then added,
"If you have any doubt about what I have said, I shall submit, in the
name of truth, to whatever trial you wish, gladly undergoing trial by
fire or by being thrown from a cliff.  If I am harmed in the test,
you may add to my injuries the worst punishment you can imagine."
The bishop of Puy, always attentive to church law, ordered the bible
and the Cross brought forward, so that the reliability of his words
might be tested by oath.

When this had been done, the leaders, after consultation, mutually
pledged that neither death nor life would compel them to abandon the
defense they had undertaken, no matter how difficult the
circumstances.  Therefore first Bohemund, then the count of Saint
Gilles, Hugh the Great, Robert of Normandy, duke Godfrey, and the
count of Flanders, swore with equal vigor that they would never
abandon the undertaking.  But Tancred swore on this condition, that
as long as he could rely on the support of forty knights he would not
only refuse to retreat from the siege under which they presently
labored, but he would not turn from the path to Jerusalem, unless
death intervened.  The news of these transactions fortified the
hearts of the multitude.

Before Antioch was captured, a vision of the apostle Andrew appeared
to one of the soldiers, whose name was Peter, and the vision said,
"What are you doing?"  Stunned, he did not reply, but asked who he
was.  He revealed that he was the apostle Andrew.  "You should know,
my son, that when the army of the Franks enters the city which God
will open for them, you will go to the church of the blessed Peter,
my brother and fellow apostle, and there in a certain place you will
find the lance with which it is said the side of our Savior Jesus
Christ was pierced."  Saying no more, he departed.  Peter wanted no
one to know about the vision, nor did he think that it was anything
more than one of those deceptive dreams to which we are all regularly
subjected.  But during his conversation with the apostle he had the
presence of mind to ask him, "Lord, if I tell to our people what you
have told me to do, what reliable evidence can I offer to overcome
their doubts and to convince them to believe me?"  In response, the
glorious apostle took him and carried him in spirit to the basilica
of his blessed brother, to the place in which the lance rested.
After the city had been captured, when the people of God were
subjected to the tribulations which we have described, the same
memorable apostle who had undertaken to preserve in every way the
elaborate beauty of the home of his famous brother again appeared to
the man Peter, and said, "Why have you delayed carrying out my
command?  Since you see your people undergoing terrible hardships,
attacked by the Turks, about to fall into the depths of despair, you
should tell them what you learned from me, since they certainly
should know that wherever they bear this same lance, they will have
certain victory."  After this second warning from the apostle, Peter
began to relate to our people what he had seen in the vision.
However, the people rejected his words, thinking them false, since
they were surrounded on all sides by misfortunes, and could in no way
conceive of any hope for their conditon.  Firmly relying on the
authority of what the apostle had said, Peter insisted that the
apostle had appeared to him and had said to him twice in a vision,
"Hurry, do not delay telling the imperilled army of God, as quickly
as possible, to set aside their fears and cling to their firm belief
in God, who will help them.  Within five days the Lord will reveal
things that will joyfully relieve their hearts.  If they go into
battle carrying this sign before them, their opposition will quickly
be defeated and will submit to them."  Peter's steady persuasiveness
began to have an effect, and the Christians began to urge each other
to have some hope, and they began to feel some relief.  They said,
"We should not be so stupid as to believe that God, who has thus far
given us so many victories, would now permit us, besieged while
defending the true faith, having placed our trust in Him, with our
souls eagerly groaning for him, to be cut down by Turkish swords.
Instead, we should certainly believe that, after our long suffering,
He will shine the light of pity on us, and will cast fear of Himself
upon the peoples who have not sought Him out."

Then the Turks who were guarding the citadel made sudden attack on
our men, trapping three of our knights at fortification facing the
citadel.  Then the pagans stormed out of the citadel against our men
with such force that they were unable to resist.  Two of the men
under attack were wounded and escaped, while the third continued to
defend himself vigorously against the enemy, killing two of them on
the top of the ramparts, having broken the shafts of their spears,
while the Turks themselves had shattered three spears in their hands.
The name of this knight was Hugh, nicknamed "the Madman," and he was
one of the servants of certain Godfrey of Mount-Scabieuse.

Famed Bohemund, however, scarcely able to persuade some men to attack
the citadel (for of those who hid in their homes, some suffered from
lack of bread, while others were frightened by the ferocity and
number of the pagans), driven by great anger, ordered that the part
of the city around the palace of the now dead Cassian be burned.
When they saw what was happening, they fled the conflagration, some
towards the citadel, some towards the gate guarded by the count of
Saint-Gilles, and some towards Godfrey; each fled towards the people
to whom he most closely connected.  Soon the suffering was increased
by a very powerful storm, and the power of the wind was such that
almost no one could walk upright.  Meanwhile, when Bohemund saw that
the city would be entirely destroyed by the conflagration, he was
seized with anxiety about the fate of the church of blessed Peter and
of the Holy Mother, and other churches as well.  From the third hour
until midnight the raging flames turned two thousand churches and
homes into dust.  In the middle of the night, the force of the raging
fire abated.

Meanwhile those in the citadel cruelly attacked our men, who turned
back into the city, worn out by hunger; they struck our men with
steady effort, and by day and by night the two sides were separated
only by the length of their swords and spears.  When our men saw that
they were caught in a non-stop battle, and had no opportunity at all
to eat or drink, even if they had had a great supply of food, they
built a wall out of cement and stone, and quickly surrounded it with
many machines, so that they would have a feeling of greater security.
In the citadel, a group of Turks remained who would, almost
continually, come out to harass our men in battle, while other Turks
remained in the field, facing the fortification.  On the following
night, a kind of fire appeared in the western sky, falling between
the enemy camps.  To both sides the sight of the falling fire seemed
miraculous.  In the morning, the Turks left the place in which the
celestial fire had fallen as quickly as possible, and set themselves
up in front of the gate that Bohemund was guarding.  The portent
which had appeared clearly before them announced the destruction that
was obviously approaching them, had they understood it.  The
inhabitants of the citadel, who made frequent, relentless sorties
against our army, their bows always stretched, inflicted wounds and
death upon our men.  The Turks who surrounded the city outside, and
who occupied all the territory near the walls, vigilantly blocked
every entrance to the city, so that the Christians were unable to
leave or to enter, except at night, and even then only secretly.  The
enemy had assembled here in such great numbers and with such wealth,
that everywhere one looked there were only men and tents, expensive
furnishings, the brilliance of variegated costumes, flocks of cattle
and sheep to be eaten, and women dressed as though they were, so to
speak, temples.  To add to this list of luxury, young women came with
quivers full of arrows, looking like a new form of the ancient Diana;
they seemed to have been brought here not to fight, but rather to
reproduce.  When the battle was over, those who were present asserted
that new-born babies, born by women brought for this purpose on the
expedition, were found thrown into the grass by these women, who, in
their urgent flight from the Franks, could not endure the burden, and,
more concerned for themselves than for the babies, heartlessly cast
them away.

In the way in which we have described, then, with Turks everywhere
preventing our men from getting out, and therefore unable to procure
provisions from outside, the dangers of famine took hold of nearly
the entire army, and the extraordinary lack of food particularly
weakened the courage of the poor people.  Since the Franks, at the
time that they were besieging Antioch, had prevented the inhabitants
from increasing their dwindling supply of food, when they captured
the city they found very little to eat.  After they had used up
everything they could find, a mere piece of bread cost a bezant.  The
scarcity of produce and of spices resulted in great hardship, and
many died, their bellies bloated with starvation.  About wine I shall
say nothing, since no one had any at all, and he who had nothing to
eat would certainly drink fruit juice.  Since there was no proper
meat to eat, no one finally refused to eat the flesh of horses, and
the small amount of donkey meat, sought for throughout the
marketplaces and purchased at exorbitant prices, was a bitter
resource for many crusaders.  A chicken sold for fifteen sous, an egg
for two sous, and a nut for penny.  If many men assemble in a place
where food is scarce, everything becomes expensive.  They ate a
mixture of figs, thistles, and grape leaves; fruit could no longer be
found on the trees; out of the leaves they made a substitute for
vegetables.  Wealthy men ate the flesh of horses, camels, cows, and
deer, but the poor prepared the dried skins of these animals, cut
them into slices, boiled them and then ate them.

Among the ancient stories of besieged cities, where might we find
people who, exiles from their native land, enduring such suffering,
were able to persevere as steadfastly as these men?  Even the
ten-year siege of Troy was often interrupted by mutually beneficial
truces, during which men might recover their strength, and the earth
and the se might offer them sustenance.  And even if any besieged men
had suffered similar dangers, certainly they suffered to preserve
their own freedom, and the defense of one's own life and country is
considered more important than all other things.  The crusaders,
however, were driven from their native soil by no desire for personal
gain, but by the intention of working for God.  To deliver the church
from harm, they endured the hardships of famine, rough sleeping
places, long watches during the night, cold, rain, and the torment of
ceaseless fear, which exceeded that endured by anyone whose
sufferings have ever been recorded.  What must be recognized as even
more of a miracle is the fact that these men, at home in their own
native lands, could scarcely endure setting up their tents as part of
the king's army for three days, even when they were not forced to
venture beyond the borders of their own regions.  In my opinion, none
of those who risked such danger could remember all of the anxieties
of mind and agonies of body they had been compelled to endure.  For
twenty-six straight days this punishment continued.

At that time, Count Stephen of Blois, formerly a man of great
discretion and wisdom, who had been chosen as leader by the entire
army, said that he was suffering from painful illness, and, before
the army had broken into Antioch, Stephen made his way to a certain
small town, which was called Alexandriola.[178]  When the city had
been captured and was again under siege, and he learned that the
Christian leaders were in dire straits, Stephen, either unable or
unwilling, delayed sending them aid, although they were awaiting his
help.  When he heard that an army of Turks had set up camp before the
city walls, he rode shrewdly to the mountains and observed the amount
the enemy had brought.  When he saw the fields covered with
innumerable tents, in understandably human fashion he retreated,
judging that no mortal power could help those shut up in the city.  A
man of the utmost probity, energetic, pre-eminent in his love of
truth, thinking himself unable to bring help to them, certain that
they would die, as all the evidence indicated, he decided to protect
himself, thinking that he would incur no shame by saving himself for
a opportune moment.  And I certainly think that his flight (if,
however, it should be called a flight, since the count was certainly
ill), after which the dishonorable act was rectified by martyrdom,
was superior to the return of those who, persevering in their pursuit
of foul pleasure, descended into the depths of criminal behavior.
Who could claim that count Stephen and Hugh the Great, who had always
been honorable, because they had seemed to retreat for this reason,
were comparable to those who had steadfastly behaved badly?  The
results of the action for which they are blamed were so splendid,
that surely one might praise them for what they did, while the
behavior of the others embarrasses all good men.  Let us look
carefully at those who take pride in having been present at the
capture of Jerusalem; we shall see that none permitted himself to be
second to anyone else in committing crimes, betrayals, and perjuries.
These two, however, were known for the nobility of their previous
and subsequent behavior.  The others, because they had seen Jerusalem
and the Holy Sepulchre, thought that they could safely commit any
crime, offering their own example as a reproach to holy men who had
retreated, without considering how much they themselves should be
blamed for the many stinking crimes they had committed.  But laying
these matters aside, let us continue in the direction in which we set
out.

When he left Alexandriola, his own town, the count went to the town
called Philomena.[179]  The capture of Antioch had been made known to
the tyrannical emperor, who had quickly set out in that direction
with many troops, thinking that he would undoubtedly be given the
town by the Franks.  When he had met the greedy emperor, who asked
him about the condition of the Christian army and of the betrayed
town, the count told him that the town had been captured, but he also
told him that the citadel was held by the Turks.  "Alas," he said, "a
second siege destroys the joy of winning the city, for those who had
at first besieged the Turks are now, in a wretched reversal,
surrounded by Turks.  I do not know what happened between them after
I left."  This is what the count said in secret to the prince.  When
the emperor heard this, he became discouraged, and summoned
Bohemund's brother Guido, a man conspicuous for his martial spirit,
together with some others, and described the situation to them,
although he exaggerated what the count had told him.  "What do you
think should be done?  The Franks are surrounded by a terrible
Turkish siege, and perhaps have already fallen before their swords,
or have been led away to different regions under the yoke of
perpetual slavery.  Since we do not have the ability or occasion to
provide them with aid, particularly since, if we went forward, we
would have to fear being killed by the Turks we might encounter, we
should turn back, if this is in accord with your judgement."  Having
said this, the traitor was undoubtedly pleased with himself, because
he had heard that those whom he hated no less than the Turks had been
killed.

But Guido, having heard of the danger in which his brother and the
Franks found themselves, together with the entire Norman household,
began to howl with grief, launching complaints self-righteously even
against God himself; they said, "All powerful God, whose judgement
never errs, who never permits the unjust to triumph over the just,
why have you betrayed those who, out of love for you, have given
themselves over to daily torment and death, who have left their
relatives, wives, sons, the greatest honors, their native land, and
why have you exposed them, without the aid of your protection, to be
cut down by the swords of abominable men?  If it becomes known that
you have permitted profane hands to deliver them to a horrible death,
whom will you find willing to obey your commands, since everyone will
judge you unable to defend your own people?  But so be it.  It may be
that you want them to die for you, and that you you will crown them
with glory and honor, yet even if you bestow land one hundred fold on
these people, you will have brought about eternal shame among nations
for the people of your own faith.  You have plunged the entire
Christian world into the depths of despair and incredulity, and you
have provoked the worst men to display relentless aggression against
your people.  From this day forth no man will expect anything great
from you, since those who believed themselves dearer to you than all
other mortals have been subjected to such an unworthy fate.
Therefore, O most gracious one, from now on why should they call upon
you, when your own people will expect such a death?"  Thus they
expressed their terrible grief and desperate anguish, so that for
several days none of the astonished bishops, abbots, clerics or
laymen in the entire army led by the tyrant dared to call upon God.
Guido, remembering his love for his noble brother, going over in his
mind the splendid qualities of the man, expressed his inmost anguish
with many a groan.

Ready to retreat, the emperor, fearing that, with the Frankish
bulwark broken, the Turks might now more freely move against him,
gave orders to his troops, "Go," he said, "and promulgate an imperial
edict throughout this region.  Lay waste the Bulgar's land, so that,
when the Turks attack to depopulate our lands, they will find no
useful supplies."  Willingly or not, the Christians who had been
eager to rejoin us were compelled to return with the emperor.  The
knights hastened to carry out the tyrant's orders, while the
conscripted foot-soldiers followed the army.  In their attempt to
follow the swift cavalry, they fell into inextricable problems
because of their weakness.  Therefore, wearied by the effort, they
continually dropped away, falling in their tracks, worn out by
exhaustion.  When the tyrant returned to the city of Constantinople,
the troops returned, by way of Greece, to the lands from which they
had come.  Let this book end here.




BOOK SIX

When we read in the authentic histories of the holy Fathers about the
wars waged under God's direction, and when we see that such things
were accomplished by inconsequential people of such little faith (we
do not place in this class the blessed Joshua, David, Samuel, but we
are speaking of the despicable vanity of the Jewish people, with the
exception of those whose radiance is now celebrated by the church of
God), then we might think, if reason did not intervene, that such
wretched men, serving God for their bellies only, were more pleasing
to God than those whose whole spirit was devoted to him.  For them,
whose only virtue perhaps was that they were not idolaters,
everything went well; they were frequently victorious, and had an
abundance of everything.  But for these Christians, victories came
about only with great difficulty, at great cost; they had little
wealth, and they lived in continual and great need, leading the lives
not of knights but of piously impoverished monks.  All of this is
explained, however, by the grace of reason, when we recall that "God
torments with whips every child whom he loves,"[180] and to those
whom he deprives of the things of this world out of the rigor of his
teaching, he gives spiritual gifts, out of the affection of his sweet
love.

Therefore, after Peter had told what the blessed Andrew had revealed
in a dream to him about the Lord's lance, the Christian people were
filled with joy, and, in anticipation of the marvelous event, emerged
out of the depths of despair.  Lead by this man,[181] everyone rushed
to the designated place, and a hole was dug beside the altar of the
Lord in the church of the blessed Peter.  After thirteen men had dug
up the earth from dawn to dusk, Peter himself found the Lance.  What
they saw before them corresponded in every way with the dream-vision
which had been reported to them; they all began to rejoice, and their
boldness against the enemy matched their joy.  They bore off the
lance with great exultation, and from that day forth they confidently
went about planning to wage war.  Then the leaders of the Christian
army met in council, considered together what action was needed, and
decided that the wisest thing to do before fighting was to meet first
with the Turks, to urge them not to occupy Christian territory, not
to drive the servants of Christ out of their lands, and not to kill
them, but instead to remain within their own territories, content
with their own lands.  Peter the Hermit, who had helped to initiate
the undertaking, was summoned, together with a man named Herluin, an
interpreter proficient in both languages, and they were both sent to
the pagan prince, with instructions about what to say.  When they
reached the tent of the pagan, and stood in the terrible presence of
the diabolical man, they delivered a speech like this: "You should
understand that our leaders are shocked to find that you have
profanely and wickedly undertaken to usurp a land firmly and freely
possessed since ancient times by Christians.  Since you have
undoubtedly learned by our relentless victories against you that
Christ's power has not declined, and you have found that your forces
have little power against Christ, our leaders think that you, having
been beaten so many times, will in no way dare to resume the madness
of war against God.  Therefore we unanimously judge that, in your
wisdom, you have come here for no other reason than to learn the
teaching of our faith from the Christian bishops who have come with
us.  For we are absolutely certain that you will hardly be able to
ensure your safety if you try to wage war against the Catholic belief.
Therefore, aware of your ignorance, we ask that you desist from
this presumption, for we know that God gave the blessed apostle Peter
authority over the city, and he who was its first bishop intends to
restore the worship of God, which he was the first to bring here,
using us, sinners that we are, as his instruments.  Our princes, in
their extreme generosity, will permit you to carry off everything
which you have brought here, nor, if you retreat peacefully, will any
of us do you any harm whatever."

But Kherboga was deeply stung by the words of Peter, and when the
arrogant Turks who accompanied him raged when they heard these things,
he said: "We shall demonstrate that we have every right to the land
which you say has belonged to your Christianity since ancient times,
particularly since we took it, by means of our remarkable strength,
from a nation scarcely better than women.  Moreover, we think that
you are mad to come from the ends of the earth, threatening with all
your might to drive us from our homes, when you have insufficient
supplies, too few arms, and too few men.  Not only do we refuse to
accept the name of Christians, but we spit upon it in disgust.  To
respond briefly to the message you have brought: return, you who form
this delegation, to your leaders swiftly and tell them that if they
are willing to become like us and renounce the Christ upon whom you
seem to rely, we shall give them not only this land, but land of
greater wealth and size.  After granting them castles and cities, we
shall allow none of them to remain foot-soldiers, but shall make them
all knights; and, when we have shared the same ceremonial rites, each
side will rejoice in mutual and close friendship.  But if they shall
decide not to accept this proposal, they will undoubtedly die
horribly, or endure the exile of eternal imprisonment, as slaves to
us and to our descendants."  He spoke, and the delegation quickly
returned and told the leaders of the Christian army everything that
had taken place.

The army was still in dire straits, suffering, on the one hand, from
extreme hunger, and, on the other hand, tormented by fear of the
pagans who surrounded them.  Finally, placing their faith in divine
assistance, they observed a three-day fast, instituted by the
splendid bishop of Puy.  In every church they poured forth suppliant
litanies, purifying themselves by sincere confession of sins; when
the bishop had granted them absolution, they faithfully took
communion of the body and blood of the Lord.  Each gave alms
according to his ability, and all prayed that divine offerings might
be made for them.  Finally, having derived some comfort from these
activities, they prepared to fight, drawing up six lines of battle
inside the city.

The first line of battle, which would bear the brunt of the Turkish
attack, was led by Hugh, who truly was, as his cognomen indicated,
great; he and his men were supported by the entire contingent of
Franks, led by the count of Flanders.  I have heard about this royal
man that, before the battle began, his quartermaster paid a
remarkable amount of money for a camel's foot, since he was unable to
find anything better for him to eat at that point.  The unusual
quality of this food had so weakened this man of God that he was
scarcely able to remain on his horse, and when someone suggested that
he not go into battle, but remain with those besieging the citadel,
he quickly replied, "No!  I certainly shall go; I only hope that I
find a blessed death there with those who are to die today!"

The noble duke Godfrey and his men formed the second line.  Count
Robert of Normandy and his men made up the third line, and the fourth
was led by the splendid bishop of Puy, carrying with him the recently
found Lance of the Savior.  This line was composed of the bishop's
men and those of Raymond, count of Saint-Gilles, who remained within
the city, blockading the citadel, so that the inhabitants might not
escape.  Tancred and his men made up the fifth line, and Bohemund
with his army made up the sixth.

Bishops, priests, clerics, monks, dressed in their ecclesiastical
garb, marched forward, holding their crosses before them, eager to
aid the soldiers with their tearful prayers, themselves awaiting the
gift of martyrdom, if they should happen to be cut down.  Others
looked out from the ramparts of the walls, to watch the outcome of
the battle, holding the sign of the Lord's cross in their hands,
faithfully making the sign of the cross over the army as it marched
forth.  In the order I have given, they marched out the gate in front
of the temple which our people call the Mahometry, walking so slowly
that even a weak old woman would not have asked for a slower pace.
God Almighty, with what heartfelt groans were you invoked; while
their frail, frightened bodies were being overcome by long hunger,
how rapidly did the grief of their wretched hearts reach your ears, O
most high one!  With what anguish were their minds still lingering in
their racked bodies!  When weakness was compelling them to despair of
victory, God alone remained steadfast in the minds of all in their
suffering for You.  Their hearts were shattered by long anguish;
desiccated by famine, their eyes were too dry to weep; since the
exterior man was almost without material substance, spiritual desires
struggled violently.  Good God, what could you have denied to such
devotion when you saw them, or rather made them burn in such agony?
When I consider how they maintained a military fierceness on their
faces, while their inmost hearts were preparing to undergo martyrdom,
I seriously think that no army ever equalled their constancy.  Indeed
I truly should have said that they raised a shout to heaven; but then
I say that they, who performed not with physical strength but with
unusual daring of soul, made the sacred trumpets sound.

Meanwhile Kherboga saw them leaving the city, moving slowly; he
laughed at the small size of the group, and said, "Let them leave,
the better that they may, when they have fled from battle, be shut
out of the city."  But when the entire army had passed through the
gates, and Kherbog noticed that the Frankish forces were mighty in
order and in number, then, at last, he trembled.  As he made
preparations to flee, he immediately ordered the master of his palace
to let it be known throughout the army, as soon as he saw flames
coming from the nearest tents, that the French troops had won the
victory.  Meanwhile Kherboga began to retreat, little by little,
heading for the mountains, while our men were pursuing him
relentlessly.  Then the Turks, uselessly clever, split their forces
into two parts, one of which moved along the shore of the sea, while
the other waited in place for the Franks to reach them, thinking that
in this manner they might surround our men.  When our men perceived
this, they turned audaciously towards the Turkish troops, separating
themselves from their fellows; because of this excessive boldness,
they were the only group of our army that suffered a loss, with only
a few knights and scarcely any foot-soldiers escaping alive.  The
instigator of this foray, together with some others, was Clairambaut
of Vandeuil, who, although reputable in his own lands, did nothing
useful in the East.  Meanwhile, to face the Turks at the edge of the
sea, a seventh group was formed out of the two armies led by duke
Godfrey and the count of Normandy, and a certain count Renaud was
placed in charge.  That day the battle was very bitter, and many of
our men were slaughtered by the arrows of the enemy.  The cavalry of
the enemy extended from the river Pharphar to the mountains, length
of two miles.  Squadrons of pagans attacked from both sides, and
struck with arrows and javelins the group of Franks whom our men had
placed in the vanguard as the strongest and most likely to resist the
Turkish attacks.  In charge of them was magnificent Hugh, regal in
mind, no less brave than his ancestors, who proudly called out to his
men, "Endure, and wait courageously for the second and third
discharge of missiles, because they will then flee more quickly than
speech."

And lo, innumerable forces began to come down from the mountains, and
their horses and standards shone brightly; our men, however, were
stunned even more now, fearing that these men were bringing
reinforcements for the Turks, until they discovered that this was aid,
now visible, sent by Christ.  After the battle, they thought that
these glorious leaders were, in particular, the martyrs George,
Mercurius, and Demetrius.  These things were seen by many of our men,
and when they told what they had seen to others, their words were
taken in good faith as true.[182]  And if celestial help appeared
long ago to the Maccabees fighting for circumcision and the meat of
swine, how much more did those who poured out their blood for Christ,
purifying the churches and propagating the faith, deserve such help.
Therefore, when the first line of the enemy at the shore were driven
back by our men, unable to bear our attack, they set fire to the
grass, thereby giving the agreed-upon signal to retreat to those who
were guarding the tents during the battle.  In response to the signal,
they snatched anything of any value, and fled.  But the Franks, when
they saw where the pagans greater forces were, raced to their tents.
Duke Godfrey, the count of Normandy, and Hugh the Great joined forces
to attack those who were riding along the shore.  These three,
together with their men, with the image of the son of God crucified
for their sake before their eyes, eagerly plunged into the thick of
the melee.  When our men saw this, they too drove forward vigorously.
The enemy, screaming like madmen, rushed to meet them.  For it was
their custom when they entered battle to make constant, terrible
noise with the metal shafts they used as spears, as well as with
cymbals and with their own horrifying voices, so that horses and men
could scarcely check their terror of such sound.  But their efforts
were entirely in vain; our men immediately overcame the enemy; once
the battle had been joined, they subdued the enemy in the first
attack, encouraging those who had for a long time been considering
flight to carry out their plan.  And even so, our men pursued them
through the middle of their encampment.  They were not carried away
by the desire for the booty lying about, but instead preferred to
feed only on the blood of the enemies of Christ, pursuing them to the
bridge over the Pharphar, and to the fortress of Tancred.  The
glorious spoils covered the ground of the enemy encampment; the tents,
though filled with gold, silver, and many kinds of equipment, stood
there abandoned; herds of sheep, cows, goats, horses, mules, asses
were spread about everywhere; there also was a great supply of wheat,
wine, and grain.  But, when the Syrian and Armenian colonists, who
were scattered throughout the region, learned that the Franks had won
an unexpected victory, they rushed into the mountains to face the
fleeing Turks, killing those whom they found.  Our own men, joyfully
shouting praises to Christ for his help, entered the city with the
honor of a heavenly victory.  The Turk in charge of the citadel,
however, seeing the leader of his own army fleeing with our men in
hot pursuit, became frightened.  Judging that he could no longer
defend the citadel, he immediately asked for the standard of one of
our leaders.  The count of Saint-Gilles, who was close to the spot
where the request was made, quickly ordered that his own standard be
offered to the man who made the request, who promptly affixed it to
the tower.  But the Lombards, striving to obtain the favor of their
leader Bohemund (for they relied upon hjis favor), cried out to the
man in charge of the citadel, "This is not Bohemund's standard."  He
asked to whom did it belong, and when he was told that it belonged to
the count of Saint Gilles, he took it down and gave it back to the
count.  Having asked for and received Bohemund's standard, he also
accepted the promise that those who were with him might, if any
wished to accept our religion, remain with Bohemund.  Those who did
not, might freely leave.  With this agreement, the citadel was
surrendered to Bohemund, who then chose men to guard it.  After a few
days, the man who surrendered the citadel received baptism, together
with the other pagans who decided to take communion in the name of
Christ.  Those who chose to remain pagan were free to do so, and they
were brought by Bohemund himself to Saracen territory.

On August 28, on the eve of their passion, Peter and Paul waged this
battle, out of compassion for their wretched city, unable to tolerate
the expulsion of the new citizens, who had driven out the pagans who
had contaminated the holy temple of God.  And it was right that they
took pity on the city which they had both instructed by their
preaching.  In the churches stables for horses had been set up, and
in part of the great basilica of saint Peter they had erected house
of their Mahomet.  While the defeated enemy was retreating in
different directions, the mountains and the vallies, the fields and
the forests, the roads and pathless places overflowed with the dead
and the dying, and with innumerable wounded men.  The objects of
God's sudden compassion, however, were relieved of the pain of daily
hunger; where an egg might have cost two sous, one might now come
away with a whole cow for less than twelve cents.  To sum up briefly,
where hunger had raged like a disease, there was now so much meat and
other food that great abundance seemed everywhere to pour in a sudden
eruption from the earth, and God seemed to have opened the cataracts
of heaven.[183]  There were so many tents that, after all of our
people had plundered one, they were so wealthy and sated with the
weight of their booty, that almost no one wanted to take any more.
If a poor man took something that he wanted, no wealthier man tried
to take it from him by force, but each permitted the other to take
what he wanted without fight.

Then our leaders, duke Godfrey, the count of Saint-Gilles, Bohemund,
the count of Normandy and Robert of Flanders, and all the others,
consulted with each other, and sent Hugh the Great and Baldwin, the
count of Mons, together with some others of great repute, to the
emperor, so that he might receive Antioch from them, according to
their agreement.  They departed, but afterwards were slow to return
to those who had sent them.  For, in a certain place, the Turks
attacked them; those who had horses nearby escaped; those who were
not close enough to their horses were carried away as captives, or
were slain by the sword.  We are not at all certain yet about the
unfortunate fate that befell the count of Mons.  According to some
people, this provided Hugh the Great with a reason to delay his
return; although capable in other matters, he showed himself less
concerned in obtaining those things which are thought to be fitting
for such a great man.  A man highly fastidious about honor, he was
afraid of being less well off among men to whom he was superior or in
no way way inferior, but who were either more tenacious or more eager
to acquire things.  However, no one should complain about the return
of a man who later died with the deserved repute of a martyr and fine
soldier.

Finally, a short time later, they began again to consider how to get
to Jerusalem, a task for which they had suffered so much, and how the
people who so greatly wanted to arrive might be governed until they
got there.  The leaders took into consideration the fact that there
would be very little water during the heat of summer, and therefore
decided that the journey would be put off until the calends of
November.  Meanwhile, after everyone had agreed to this plan, the
nobles of the army visited the various cities and towns they had
captured, and sent heralds among the conquered people, to tell them
that if anyone of them were in need, he could join them and receive
remuneration for his services.  Among them was a knight,
exceptionally skilled with weapons, among the leading followers of
the count of Saint-Gilles, named Raymond Pelet, to whom many knights
and foot-soldiers had affiliated themselves.  His generosity and
energy had attracted many men, and he set out with a large army into
Saracen territory, and the first place they reached was fortress
called Talamina.  The inhabitants, since they were Syrians,
immediately surrendered to him.  After staying in this town eight
days, he heard that not far away there was town filled with a large
group of Saracens.  He quickly launched an assault to enter the town;
God led the penetration, and the town was captured.  Those
inhabitants who agreed to become Christian were spared; those who
refused were killed.  Having finished this business, they gave thanks
to God and returned to Talamina.  On the third day they again went
out, this time to attack a village called Marrah, a fine city, well
fortified, where people of many different nations had assembled.
Close to the previously mentioned fortress, it attracted the refuse
of Saracens and Turks from nearby towns and cities, especially from
Aleph.  A force of pagans ready to fight approached our men, who
judged themselves able to fight in the usual manner, but who were
quickly deceived by the pagan's trickery.  The enemy, advancing in
great numbers, did great harm to our men.  All that day each side in
turn advanced and retreated.  Our men suffered from the intense heat,
and, their insides parched with unusual thirst, weary and unable to
find relief, they decided to pitch their tents near the city.  When
the inhabitants understood that our men were faltering somewhat (it
was the Syrians who first began to talk of flight more seriously),
they became more aggressive in response to their enemies' fears, and
no longer were afraid to attack.  Struck down in this attack, many of
our men piously delivered their souls to God; they died on the fifth
of July.  The remaining Franks returned to Talamina, remaining there
with their leader Raymond for several days.  Those who had remained
at Antioch enjoyed peace and prosperity.

For reasons hidden from us, God confounded their rest with a cloud.
He who had led them, and piously nourished both their internal and
external needs, a man admired by God and by the world, Adhemar,
bishop of Puy, fell ill; the Omnipotent in his generous compassion
permitted him to wipe away the sweat of his pious labor in a
sabbatical of eternal rest.  He died on the holy day of
Saint-Peter-in-Chains,[184] and he had earned absolution by him to
whom the keys to the Kingdom and the powers of absolution belonged,
and it was fitting that Peter greet him at the gates of the celestial
realm.  A great sadness and bitter grief arose throughout the entire
army of Christ; when each person, of whatever rank, sex, and age,
recalled how many benefits he had received from this most
compassionate of men, and understood that the bishop was past help,
he grieved inconsolably.  At his funeral the princes themselves let
out heartfelt groans fit for the death of the entire army.  Before he
was even buried, such offerings of money were made at the litter on
which his corpse was carried by the people over whom he had ruled
like a father, that I think no one had ever made such offerings in
such a short time at the altars of any nations.  These offerings were
immediately distributed to the poor, for the benefit of his soul.
While he was alive, he showed great care for the souls of the poor,
always teaching the rich to love the needy, to help them in their
need, insisting that they were the guardians of the poor.  He said:
"He will be judged mercilessly who has shown no mercy.  If you do not
show compassion for your inferiors, who are also by nature your
brothers, and if you do not share with them equally those things that
were created by God for you and them, which are now unfairly seized
from them by you, you will undoubtedly shut the gate of divine mercy
for yourselves.  Give them, I say, out of gratitude for these things,
some of your goods, certain that even as they cannot survive in this
world without you, so you cannot live eternally without them."  Of
these and similar matters the remarkable man often reminded them.

Then Raymond, count of Saint Gilles, enter the territory of the
Saracens, and led his army to a city called Albara, which he attacked
and quickly captured, putting to death all the Saracen men and women
he found there.  Once in control of the city, he filled it with
Christian colonists, and, on the advice of wise men, ordered that a
bishop be ordained for the city, who would gradually teach the
natives Christian doctrine, and who would carry out in their temples,
once they had been purified, the services of devotion, and the
mysteries of rebirth.  They chose a man of an appropriate age, who
was known for his learning, and they brought him to Antioch to be
ordained.  After he had been ordained a bishop, he did not neglect to
carry out the journey to Jerusalem, but he assigned the task of
guarding the city to someone who volunteered for the task, and set
out with the others, brave man, with little income, he who remained
behind set out to protect the citadel with the few people he could
afford to hire.  Because there were very few Saracens in the city,
those pagans who remained submitted to his authority, and in exchange
for their lives gave him part of their earned income.

Antioch was now flourishing with prosperity, and the holiday of All
Saints was approaching, at the end of which the expedition was
scheduled to begin again.  Mindful of this, the leaders assembled at
Antioch, and began to consult with each other about how they might
best expedite the journey for which they had come.  Before the army
of the Lord made a move, Bohemund brought up the matter of turning
the city over to him, according to the agreement which had been made.
But the count of Saint Gilles refused to assent, since he respected
the oath he had given to the emperor.  The bishops, who acted as
intermediaries between them, met frequently in the church of the
blessed Peter.  Bohemund said that after the city had been betrayed
by Pyrrus, parts of the city had been granted to him generously by
the leaders themselves.  The count of Saint Gilles replied that he
had given an oath to restore the city to the ruler of Constantinople,
unless their agreement was broken by the emperor, and that all this
was done on the advice of Bohemund.  Meanwhile, the bishops, who were
trying to bring the disagreement to an end, summoned duke Godfrey,
the counts of Flanders and Normandy, and other leaders, listened to
what each had to say, and then met separately to sift the arguments
and to come to a correct decision.  However, after having heard the
arguments, they remained undecided, and when they returned to the
assembled leaders, afraid to alienate such men, they postponed making
a decision.  When the count saw that this was done deliberately, he
said: "To prevent the present disagreement from generating discord
among those faithful to Christ, and thereby delaying the day on which
the tomb of the Savior will be set free, and to prevent us from being
tainted with the charge of greed, I agree to the decision of my peers,
the princes now present, as long as it does not contradict what you
know, brothers and leaders, I unwillingly promised to the prince of
Constantinople."  Bohemund immediately agreed to the count's proposal,
and they put aside their quarrel, placed their right hands in the
hands of the bishops as a sign of good faith, and swore solemnly that
the army of God in no way would be disturbed by their disagreements.
After consulting with the others, Bohemund then fortified his
fortress with men and food from the mountains.  The count of Saint
Gilles also consulted with his men, and fortified at great expense
the palace of Cassian, which the pagans called the Emir, as well as
the tower which guarded the gate of the bridge which led to the port
of Saint Simon.

The city of Antioch is incomparably beautiful, second to none in the
majesty of its buildings; it is pleasantly situated, with an
unequalled climate, and with fertile vines and rich fields.  To the
east it is surrounded by four high mountains; to the west its walls
are washed by a river renowned in the Bible,[185] the Pharphar, whose
waves are dense with fish.  At the top of one of the mountains
remarkable, impregnable fortification stands; below it stands the
city itself, filled with past glory and fiercely proud of the noble
monuments of its ancient splendor, with 360 churches within its
confines.  The pontiff of the city, by right of apostolic succession
honored with the title of patriarch, was in charge of 153 bishops.
The city was surrounded by a double wall, one of which was of normal
height, the other, however, remarkably broad and high, built out of
massive stones, surrounded by four hundred and fifty towers.  They
say that it was rebuilt from that ancient Antioch in testimony of
whose power many monuments have survived, and that such lofty
citadels and such a variety of buildings were erected by the efforts
of 50 subject kings and their subjects.[186]  This is false, since
Pompeius Trogus correctly said that it was founded by king Seleucus,
who named it after his father, and it was built up by him and by the
kings who succeeded him, even as he founded Laodicea, named after his
mother, and Seleucia, which he named after himself.  All sorts of
siege engines were of no avail against this city, and had Pyrrus not
betrayed it to the besiegers, or rather had God not aided those whom
he wished, French bravery would have endured famine and other
suffering in vain.  Our men had besieged the city for eight months
and one day.  Then they were themselves besieged for three weeks by
an uncountable horde of pagans; after they finally defeated them, the
Christians remained there five months and eight days, until the
people were urged by their leaders again to take up the journey to
Jerusalem.

But because it seems to me that I shall not have another chance to
report what happened to the Pyrrus whom I mentioned earlier, I should
do it now.  Having received the sacraments, he accepted Christianity,
taking, as his baptismal name, Bohemund.  He helped us out at the
siege of Jerusalem, and, when it was captured, returned to Antioch.
There he sent out a messenger to announce that any Christian in the
city or in the vicinity of the city might come with him to a far-off
land, where he had considerable land, and he offered to make everyone
rich.  He inspired a large group of people with this hope, and he is
said to have led this deceived group off to what he called his own
land.  When he had reached his own encampments, he betrayed some of
the knights who had accompanied him by killing them, and he exiled
others.  Had word of the betrayal not reached the others, who were
lodged outside of the encampment because of their great numbers, and
who therefore managed to hide or to escape wretchedly, the freedom of
all of them would have perished by the sword or in slavery.  There
Pyrrus deserted Christianity and returned to the filth of his old
lechery and paganism.  Nor was this unfitting, for the name Pyrrus in
Greek is Rufus[187] in Latin, and the mark of treachery is branded on
red-haired people; he is shown by no means to have been deprived of
his lineage.

Towards the end of November, Count Raymond of Saint-Gilles moved his
army out of Antioch; after passing the cities of Rugia and Albara, on
the fourth day, which was the last day of November, he reached the
city of Marrah.[188]  A large group of Saracens, Turks, and Arabs had
come together in that city, and the count prepared to attack with all
his forces on the day after he arrived.  Bohemund and his army
quickly followed the count, and set up his camp next to him on a
Sunday.  The next day they attacked the walls so vigorously that
their ladders clung to the walls, and they stepped on the walls
themselves as they went up.  The inhabitants resisted with such
energy that nothing could be gained by our men that day.  Then the
count of Saint-Gilles, seeing that his men were toiling in vain,
ordered that a very tall, strong wooden fort be built, placed on four
wheels, with room at at the top for a large group of soldiers.  This
armed group then moved the war-machine with great force against the
walls of the city, near one of the towers.  In response, the
inhabitants quickly built a ballistic machine, with which they tried
to bombard our fort with huge stones, threatening to destroy both our
machine and men.  They also hurled Greek fire at the machine, trying
to set the scaffolding afire, but God thwarted their plan.  The
machine stood high over the city wall, and, in the midst of the clash,
the sound of trumpets ringing stirred the combatants.  Meanwhile,
some of our soldiers who were in the upper part of the machine,
including William of Montpellier and some others, were hurling huge
stones against those who were defending the walls.  As a result, many
shields were pierced, and the shields and their owners, both now
useless, fell from the wall.  Others, with iron hooks at the tips of
their spears, tried to hook the Saracen defenders on the walls, to
pull them off.  The battle went back and forth, and was hardly over
by evening.  In the rear, priests, clerics, and monks, dressed in
sacred attire, each according to his rank, earnestly prayed that God
intervene by reducing the strength of the pagans, and by increasing
the strength of those who fought for the true faith.  On the other
side of the siege machine, other knights were climbing ladders that
had been set in place, while the wildly energetic pagans tried to
push them off the walls.  A certain Goufier, impatient with their
resistance, was the first to climb the wall, together with a very
small group of men.  The inhabitants fiercely attacked these brave
men, with spears and arrows, and some of them became frightened at
this resistance, and jumped from the wall.  Those who remained stood
up to the enemies' missiles, spurning flight, returning blow for blow,
while those who remained below continued to mine the wall.  Soon the
inhabitants saw that they were doomed by the mining of the wall, and,
intent only on the safety of flight, climbed back down into the city.
This happened on a Sunday, while the sun was already setting in the
West, when December had reached its eleventh day.  Bohemund quickly
sent an interpreter to the Saracen leaders, offering to conduct them,
together with their own knights, children, and wives, and with all
the goods and supplies they could gather, to a palace near the gate
of the city, promising to protect their lives, and to defend their
people and possessions.  Having taken the city in this manner, they
took possession of everything they found in the caves and in the
homes.  When night had ended and daylight began to appear, a crowd of
our people raced through the city, killing every pagan they found.
No gate of the city, no matter how small, was without a pile of dead
Saracens, and the narrow streets were impassable, because pagan
bodies obstructed the public ways.  Bohemund himself attacked those
whom he had commanded to shut themselves up in the palace mentioned
before, and took what they had from them.  Some he killed, others he
ordered brought to Antioch and sold.  The Franks remained there for a
whole month and four days, and the people suffered from great hunger.
Some of our men, entirely without resources, finding nothing in
nearby areas to satisfy their needs, desecrated the bellies of dead
Saracens, daring to probe their internal organs, because they had
heard that pagans in serious danger would try to preserve their gold
and silver by eating them.  Others, they say, cut pieces of flesh
from the corpses, cooked them and ate them, but this was done rarely
and in secret, so that no one could be sure whether they actually did
this.

Meanwhile, Bohemund had not forgotten the quarrel that had taken
place between him and the count of Saint-Gilles, but returned angrily
to Antioch when the count refused to yield to him.  The count quickly
sent men to Duke Godfrey, to the count of Flanders, to the count of
Normandy, and to Bohemund, summoning them to a conference in Rugia (a
city I mentioned above).  They hurried to the meeting to arrange for
an agreement, so that the journey to Jerusalem might be delayed no
longer.  Angry and proud, Bohemund resisted reconciliation unless the
count agreed to what Bohemund wanted, granting him the part of
Antioch over which he had control.  The count, however, was adamant,
insisting that he had given his word to the emperor.  Therefore,
divided against each other by bitterness of mind, the man from
Saint-Gilles, Bohemund, and the duke returned to Antioch.  The count
of Saint-Gilles, however, placed his knights in charge of the palace
and castle that looked down upon the gate at the bridge, and went off
to Marrah, which he had recently captured.  However, the count was
not entirely unreasonable; considering that everyone would suffer
because of his obstinacy, which would delay the liberation of the
Tomb of the Lord, the noble man went barefooted out of Marrah on the
thirteenth of January, and reached Capharda,[189] where he stayed
three days.  There he was joined by the count of Normandy, who gave
up his resistance.

The king of Caesarea had often sent ambassadors to the count of
Saint-Gilles, to persuade him to enter into a pact with him,
promising that he would offer aid to the Christians everywhere in his
kingdom, permitting them to purchase food, clothing, horses, and
whatever else they needed.  Pleased with this offer, our men chose to
set up their tents near the city, where the Pharphar river flowed
near the city walls.  But the king of the city, not overjoyed at the
prospect of such an army so close to him, took the move badly, and
forbade them to purchase supplies unless they quickly moved further
away.  The next day he sent two of his people together with our own
men, to show them a passage of shallows across the river, and to lead
them to where they might capture some booty.  Our men were led to a
valley below the encampment, where they found many animals, and they
took about five thousand of them; they also found abundant wheat and
other supplies, so that God's cavalry was ready again for action.
The fort was also surrendered to the count, giving him a considerable
amount of gold as well as horses.  They also promised that they would
not harm our men.  After remaining there five days, our men left, and
reached another fort which was held by Arabs.  When they had set up
their tents, the leader of the town came out and made an agreement
with the count.  After hastily packing their tents, the Christians
moved on to a beautiful, prosperous town called Kephalia,[190]
situated in a valley.  When the inhabitants heard that the Franks
were coming, they fled from the city, leaving homes filled with food,
and gardens overflowing with produce; all that was in their minds was
to save their lives.  Our men left this city after three days; they
climbed tall, jaggedly rocky mountains, then descended into a valley
no less fertile than the valley in which Kephali was situated, where
they stayed for fifteen days, rejoicing in the abundance, and resting.
The Franks then found out that there was a nearby fort, to which
many pagans had come.  Our men quickly laid siege to it, and were
about to win the town, when the inhabitants offered a plentiful
supply of cattle to them, together with some flattering words,
tricking them into delaying the siege for a while.  The next morning,
our men moved their tents closer to the city, preparing to undertake
the siege.  When the pagans perceived what was happening, they fled
quickly, leaving the town deserted.  The Christian army entered, and
found plentiful supplies of grain, wine, wheat, oil, and other useful
items.  They celebrated the holiday of the Purification of the
Blessed Mary there, and received the delegates sent by the king of
the city of Camela, who promised to give the count horses, gold and
silver, and to do no harm to the Christians, but to show them
appropriate respect.  The king of Tripoli[191] asked the count if he
wished to enter into an agreement with him, in exchange for ten
horses, four mules, and a large amount of gold.  The count said that
he would not consider a peaceful settlement with him, unless the king
became Christian.  Then they left the fertile valley, which I
mentioned above, and reached a place well fortified by nature, high
on a rock, called Archas, on the thirteenth of February, on the
second day of the week.  They set up their tents near the fortress,
which was filled with an innumerable multitude of pagans, Turks,
Saracens, and Arabs, whose numbers increased the original strength of
the locations.  At this point, fourteen knights from the Christian
army fighting at Tripoli, which was near to this fortress, happened
to come along, for no other reason, I think, than to find food.  The
fourteen of them came upon nearly sixty Turks, who were accompanied
by others, leading more than fifteen hundred men and animals whom
they had captured.  Those who were carrying out the Lord's promise
that two would make ten thousand flee before them, and one would make
a thousand flee, called to their pious minds the sign of the cross
and, with the aid of God, attacked them with unbelievable bravery,
killing six men and capturing as many horses.  From the retinue of
the count of Saint-Gilles, Raymond, to whom we have given the
additional name of Pelet, who deserves to be mentioned often in this
little book, man remarkable for sternness as well as for eagerness in
battle, together with another man whose surname I do not know, who
performed the duties of a vicount,[192] sought out the city of
Tortosa.  At their first attack, which they launched with great
ferocity, they terrified the inhabitants.  Like a swarm of flies, a
remarkably large crowd of pagans flocked to the fort.  The following
night, our men set up their tents at one end of the city, and lit
many beacon fires, giving the impression that the entire Frankish
army was there.  Desperately afraid, the pagans judged that they
could not protect their lives with their shields, and decided that
the only way to escape death was to flee on foot.  During the night
they slipped away silently, leaving the city filled with wealthy
treasure, and empty of inhabitants.  Thus they piously fulfilled
Scripture, which says that, "Skin for skin, yea, all that a man hath
he will give for his life."[193]  This city, situated on the sea, has
a fine port in one of its suburbs.  The next day our men prepared to
attack the city in full strength, but when they assembled to fight,
they found that the city was empty.  After entering, they remained
there only until they set off to besiege the city of Archas, which I
mentioned above.  However, there was another city nearby, which was
called Maraclea.  He who was in charge of it, whom they called the
emir, immediately prepared to enter into an agreement, and soon
accepted our men and their banners in the city.

Meanwhile duke Godfrey, Bohemund and the count of Flanders had
reached Laodicia.[194]  But Bohemund, impatient at being separated
from his beloved Antioch, left his companions and returned to her.
With equal desire, the others set out to besiege a city called Gibel.
[195]  Rumor reached count Raymond of Saint-Gilles that a huge force
of pagans had assembled to wage war against him.  He quickly called
all the leaders of his army together, and asked them what should be
done.  The group replied that there was nothing to be done in these
circumstances, except to call for help from their companions on the
Lord's journey.  He accepted and quickly carried out this plan.  When
the leaders, that is duke Godfrey and Robert of Flanders, found out
that their companions were in trouble, they made an agreement with
the ruler of the city of Gibel, who gave them magnificent gifts of
horses and gold, and they gave up the siege of the city, and went off
to bring help to the count.  Their expectation of waging war was
disappointed, however, and they all decided to go back to the siege
of the fort at Archas.  They gave themselves to the project
energetically, and a short time later undertook an expedition against
the inhabitants of Tripoli, whom they found ready for battle, with an
army of Turks, Saracens, and Arabs lined up in front of the walls of
the city.  Our men attacked them vigorously and compelled them to
take refuge in flight.  The result was not merely a carnage of the
nobles of the city, but wholesale slaughter, to the point that the
waves of the river that ran through the city were died red with their
blood, and the sewers were stained with this foulness.  From that
point on a day of no commerce[196] arose in the minds of the pagans,
and the hearts of those who survived were so riddled with fear that
none of them, for any reason whatsover, dared to go beyond the walls
of the city.  On the next day, our men went beyond the valley of Sem,
an are which had been reached by those mentioned above on the third
day after the capture of Kephalia.  They found that it was rich in
supplies, and stayed there fifteen days.  They happily returned with
what they had found there: cows, asses, sheep, with many other kinds
of animals, including three thousand camels.  They continued to lay
siege to the fort of Archas for three months less one day, and
celebrated Easter there on April 10. While they were engaged in the
siege, the fleet which usually brought them provisions reached a
nearby port, bringing a large amount of grain, wine, meat, cheese,
barley, and oil, which provided the Lord's army with abundant
supplies.  Although they had to suffer no privation in this place, it
seems to me foolish to have undertaken for such a long time such a
useless task for such a trivial result.

After the death of the noble bishop of Puy, who had managed, by a
combination of love for his flock and discipline, to bind them
together in harmony and unity, arguments and rude, arrogant behavior
began to arise among the leaders; in particular, the middle and lower
ranks began to behave badly, so that one might have thought that the
Old Testament statement, "There was no longer a king in Israel, but
each man did what seemed right in his own eyes,"[197] was being
fulfilled.  The bishops and others who remained, after the death of
that glorious man who had been assigned the office of father and
leader, did not have the same concern for them, particularly because
they knew that that had not been granted the same powers that had
been given to the bishop of Puy.  Therefore, since they had no single
ruler, and every man thought himself the equal of every other man,
justice diminished among them, and the will of the mob often
prevailed.  Therefore it happened that, after the discovery of the
Lance, which the late bishop had accepted devoutly, a shameful and
faithless rumor began to circulate; some said that the discovery had
been staged, and that he had exhibited not the Lord's Lance, but
merely lance.  Many people from the lower ranks began to grumble, and,
by relentlessly lying, they corrupted those who had believed truly
and had venerated the lance.  They demanded proof of the discovery;
they asked that the discoverer be tested by divine judgment.  The man
was compelled to pledge his word to those who were in doubt; he was
compelled to offer what they forced from him, merely to deal with
their lack of faith.  Two pyres were constructed, in accordance with
his orders, scarcely a cubit apart; many of the people, avid for
novelty, heaped up a mass of kindling material, and when they had
crowded together on both sides of the fire, only a narrow path
remained between the flames.  He then delivered a pitiful prayer, as
was fitting, to merciful God, who is the Truth, without whose
permission he knew he could do nothing about the situation, and
walked briskly across the dark path of the flames, and then returned
by the same path.  A large crowd of western soldiers, in their
war-gear, was present at this spectacle, awaiting, with different
expectations, the outcome of this unusually daring undertaking.  When
he had returned, as I said, a huge crowd welcomed him as he came
forth from the flames, and when they saw that he had escaped from the
fire safe and sound, they snatched at his body and at his clothes, as
though they were relics, and in the tumult of tearing and pushing,
they killed him.  Having barely escaped from the flames with his life,
frightened by the danger from which he would not have escaped
without God's help, trapped by people clutching at him from all sides,
exhausted by the terror he had undergone, he could hardly have
avoided being suffocated.  When the man died, the common people,
unreliable and fickle in their judgement, were disturbed by an even
worse form of confusion, arguing about the outcome of the trial by
fire.  Some said that he had come out of the flames burned, others
that he had escaped unharmed, and they reproached those who had
killed him for no reason.  However, whatever popular opinion may have
been, we know that the glorious bishop embraced the sacred Lance with
veneration, to the point that, in accordance with his directions, the
body of the bishop was buried in the place where the Lance was found.
So much for this matter.

While our men were unsuccessfully engaged in the lengthy siege of the
citadel of Archas, set atop a high mountain, and the army had pitched
their tents in a distant valley, Anselm of Ribemont, a rich and
powerful lord, exceedingly generous and remarkably capable at leading
an army, saw how difficult the siege had become, and, without delay,
advised our men to use machines for launching stones.  They had
already begun to undermine a lofty tower, digging a long tunnel which
they shored up with planks and posts; they dug and scraped steadily
every day with great energy, and women and the wives of the nobles,
even on holidays, in flowing robes or tunics, carried off the
material that had been dug up.  When those inside the citadel
discovered what our men were trying to do, they put up great
resistance to those carrying out the digging, doing them great harm.
When he saw that undermining the tower could not be accomplished,
Anselm undertook the task of urging our men to use the ballistic
machines.  When the machines were set in place, and had fired many
stones at the tower, the besieged put in place similar machine at the
same spot.  After it had been set in place, the machine hurled
massive rocks down, doing great damage to the entire Frankish army;
Anselm himself was the first, or among the first, to be struck down.
He, who had always behaved faithfully and steadfastly as a member of
the Lord's army, had shown other signs of his wisdom and strong faith;
one particular example, which is most pleasing to men of letters, is
brilliantly evident in the set of two letters he composed to Manassas,
the archbishop of Rheims, a man of pious memory, who died about two
years ago,[198] in which Anselm related everything which our men did
at the siege of Nicea, how they traveled through Romania and Armenia,
how they attacked, captured, and defended what they had captured at
Antioch, and how at the same time they had fought against the king of
Aleppo, against the king of Damascus, and against the king of
Jerusalem, whom he called the adulterer.  As testimony of his devoted
love towards the noble martyr, on the day of the anniversary of the
passion of the blessed Quintinus,[199] he held a celebration,
surrounded by a crowd of clergy whom he had assembled to honor the
saint, and he offered a fine ceremony for the celebrants.  On the
same day Anselm himself, together with many others, underwent joyous
martyrdom, earning the kingdom of heaven as their reward for a holy
death.




BOOK SEVEN

That the Eastern Church was restored by the labor of the Western
faithful offers no small stimulus for our faith.  We see the most
pious battles fought solely for God, an army burning with a passion
for martyrdom, without a king, without a prince, driven only by a
dedication to their own salvation.  We read of how the Gauls went off
into the distant East, eager for battle, and they searched the secret
places of Delphic Apollo, and we know that the treasures taken from
the sacred shrines were thrown into the swamps of Toulouse.  We know
that all these troops were summoned together by the princes in those
days; we have heard that, in this instance, not a single man was
compelled against his will, by any master, to go on the journey.
Here, weeping, confessing their sins, abandoning their possessions,
spurning their wives and fleeing from their children, they took up
arms.  Foremost in the minds of all of them was the desire for a
blessed death, for the love of God.  Here, I say, I wish to weigh
God's wonders: He who once strengthened the minds of the martyrs to
undergo torture out of a love for invisible things, again in our own
times, in an entirely unexpected way, which would have been
considered absurd had anyone said it, placed in the hearts of our men
such contempt for the things of this world, even in the hearts of the
most bloodthirsty and greedy men.  He accomplished so much with so
few men, that one must refrain from praising those who did it, since
it is clearly God who was responsible.  This is clearly demonstrated
by the fact that men who have won many victories often grow insolent,
and princes rise up against each other, or they become stained with
sin, and the Gentiles find them reduced, I might say, almost to the
level of animals.  However, if they were to grow aware of themselves,
and were motivated by penitence, they would immediately be restored
to their proper fortunes and pious successes.  Let us rejoice then in
the battles they won, undertaken purely out of spiritual desire,
granted by divine power, which had never before appeared, but was
made manifest in modern times; and let us not admire the fleshly wars
of Israel, which were waged merely to fill the belly.

The king of Tripoli ceaselessly petitioned our princes to remove
themselves from the town, and make an alliance with him.  In response,
the leaders of the army, that is, Duke Godfrey, Raymond the Count of
Saint-Gilles, Robert, Count of Flanders and Robert, Count of Normandy,
took into account the fact that the land was abundant with new
produce, that beans, sowed earlier, ripened by the middle of March,
and that barley could be harvested before the middle of April, and
they also considered the general condition of the land, and the great
quantities of supplies, and they decided to resume the journey to
Jerusalem.  They abandoned the siege of the town and reached Tripoli
on the sixth day of the week, on May 13, and they remained there
three days.  The king of Tripoli made an agreement with our leaders,
and immediately freed more than 300 captives whom he held in chains.
At their departure, as a sign of his gratitude, he gave them 15,000
besants, as well as fifteen costly horses.  In addition, he gave our
men a very good price on horses, donkeys, and other goods that would
prove useful for the army, as a result of which the Lord's expedition
was now fully restored to fighting condition.  After this agreement
had been made, he also added that if the Crusaders won the war which
he had been told they were preparing strenuously to wage against the
emperor of Babylon, and if they captured Jerusalem, then he would
immediately convert to Christianity and hand himself and his land
over to them.  When they left this city, on the second day of May,
they traveled over rough, narrow road all day and all night, and they
finally reached a fort named Betholon.[200]  Then they traveled on to
a city located on the sea, called Zabari,[201] at whose river, called
the Braim,[202] they quickly and opportunely relieved the great
thirst from which they had been suffering.  On the evening of the
Ascension of the Lord they ascended a mountain along a very narrow
road, in great fear that the narrowness of the path might prevent
them from evading any enemies they might meet at the end of the road.
But God's providence prevented anyone from daring to attack them.
Our soldiers formed a vanguard that kept the road free from hostile
attack.  At length they reached a city by the sea, which was called
Baruth; then they went on to Sarepta,[203] once inhabited by the
Sidonians, and made famous by Elijah's feeding of the widow;[204]
from there they went to Sur,[205] and then to Acre, once the capital
of Palestine.  Continuing on, they came to a castle called Caiphas,
finally reaching the renowned Caesarea of Palestine, where they
remained for three days after the end of May, celebrating Pentecost.
Then they went on to Ramathan,[206] famed as the birthplace of Samuel,
which some wiser men, more knowledgeable about topography, claim to
be Ramothgalaad, in the struggle for which the wicked Ahab was
defeated by Benadab, the king of the Syrians.[207]  When they heard
that the Franks were coming, the inhabitants fled.  This city, even
if it were not notable for any ancient monuments, would still seem to
me to overshadow all other cities because of the presence of the
brilliant martyr George, whose tomb they claim is there.  After the
inhabitants left, a large supply of every kind of food was found
there, which offered, for many days, ample provisions for our army.
The leaders, after consulting with and obtaining the approval of the
clerics and bishops were were able to be present, decided to choose a
bishop for this city.  They tithed themselves, enriching him with
gold and silver; they also supplied him with horses and other animals,
so that he and his household might live without the pain of
indigence, and in accordance with his rank.  Amid general rejoicing,
the bishop[208] settled in the city which had been entrusted to him,
to guard the people, to build cathedral as soon as possible, and to
install officials who would look after the church, ready to obey the
leaders who had vehemently sought this out of love and worship of the
martyr.

Finally they reached the place which had provoked so many hardships
for them, which had brought upon them so much thirst and hunger for
such a long time, which had stripped them, kept them sleepless, cold,
and ceaselessly frightened, the most intensely pleasurable place,
which had been the goal of the wretchedness they had undergone, and
which had lured them to seek death and wounds.  To this place, I say,
desired by so many thousands of thousands, which they had greeted
with such sadness and jubilation, they finally came, to Jerusalem.
As one reads that the sojourners ate and worshiped the Body of the
Lord,[209] so it may be said of these men that they adored Jerusalem
and took it by storm.  Tuesday, the sixth of June, the siege was
begun with remarkable energy, by a remarkable combination of forces.
From the north, Count Robert of Normandy laid siege to it, near the
church of the blessed Saint Stephen, who, because he said that he had
seen the Son of man standing at the right hand of God, was covered
with a rain of stones by the Jews.  From the west, Duke Godfrey, the
count of Flanders, and Tancred attacked.  From the south, the count
of Saint-Gilles laid siege, on the mount of Zion, near the church of
the blessed Mary, mother of God, where the Lord is said to have sat
at dinner with his disciples, the day before his Passion.  On the
third day after they had arrived at the city, Raymond, whose deeds on
the Lord's expedition were well known, this man, I say, whom they
called Pelet, together with another man who had the same name, and
several others, marched some distance from the place of siege, to see
if he could find any of the enemy wandering into our ambushes, as
they often did.  Suddenly a band of nearly 200 Arabs fell upon them;
as soon as Raymond saw them, he attacked as fiercely as a lion, and,
in spite of their boldness, with the aid of God, they were subdued.
After killing many of them, and capturing thirty horses, they brought
the victory back to the army, which took pleasure in their glorious
deed.  At dawn, on the second day of the next week, the outer,
smaller wall of the city was attacked with such force and with such
teamwork that both the city and its outskirts would have immediately
fallen to the Franks, if they had not lacked ladders.  After the
outer wall was broken, and a broad passage opened through its rubble,
the ladder they did have was extended towards the battlements of the
main wall.  Some of our knights climbed it quickly and began to fight
at long range.  And when the arrows ran out, they fought with lances
and swords; both the defenders of the city and the besiegers battled
hand-to-hand with steel.  Many of our men fell, but more of their men.

One should know that while Antioch was under siege, Jerusalem was
held by the Turks, under the authority of the king of Persia.
Moreover, the emperor of Babylon, as I mentioned previously, had sent
ambassadors to our army, for the sole purpose of determining the
condition of our enterprise.  When they saw the terrible need that
afflicted the Christian army, and when they discovered that the
nobles had become foot-soldiers because of a lack of horses, they
considered us valueless in a struggle against the Turks, whom they
hated intensely.  The king of Persia had taken great part of the
Babylonian empire, which was very large, for his people were wiser
and more energetic in military matters.  When the Babylonian prince
heard, however, that the Franks--that is, God working through the
Franks--had taken Antioch, and had defeated Kherboga himself,
together with the pride of Persia, before the walls of Antioch, he
quickly gathered his courage, bore arms against the Turks, and laid
siege to them in Jerusalem, which they occupied.  Then, I don't know
whether by force or by some agreement, they entered the town, and
placed many Turks, whether to guard it or to take charge of it I
don't know, in the tower bearing the name of David, which we think
more correctly should be called the tower of Zion.  In any case,
during the siege they harmed none of us, merely watching peacefully
over their assigned tower.  As a result, our men fought only with the
Saracens.

They were unable to buy bread during the siege, and for nearly ten
days food was difficult to find anywhere, until God brought help, and
our fleet reached the port of Jaffa.  In addition, the army also
suffered from thirst, and they not only were worn out by this great
discomfort, but they had to drive their horses and pack animals a
great distance, six miles, to find water, all the while fearful that
the enemy might attack them.  The fountain of Siloah, famous for
having cured the blind man in the Gospel,[210] which rises from
springs on mount Zion, supplied them with water, which was sold to
them at the highest prices.  After messengers had announced that the
fleet had arrived at Jaffa, the leaders held a meeting and decided to
send a group of knights to the harbor to guard the ships and the men
in them.  Early in the morning, at the crack of dawn, Raymond, of
whom we have spoken often, together with two other nobles, took 100
knights from the army of his lord, the count of Saint-Gilles, and set
out for the port, with his customary decisiveness.  Thirty of the
knights separated from the main group and came upon approximately 700
Turks, Arabs, and Saracens, whom the king of Babylon had sent to
watch our comings and goings.  Although greatly outnumbered, our men
forcefully attacked their troops, but the strength and ferocity of
the enemy was so great that we were threatened on all sides with
imminent death.  They killed one of the two leaders, whose name was
Achard, as well as some of the most respected among the poor and the
foot-soldiers.  As they were surrounding our men, pressing them with
arms on all sides, so that they were about to despair utterly, one
man came to the above-mentioned Raymond and told him of the plight of
his peers.  "Why do you and your men remain here?  See how your men,
who recently separated from you, are now fiercely surrounded by an
swarm of Saracens and Arabs.  Unless you bring them help very quickly,
you will undoubtedly soon find them dead, if they have not already
perished.  Therefore fly, hurry, I say, so that you may not be too
late."  Together with all of his nobles, Raymond quickly set off to
look at the place where the fighting was going on.  In preparing for
combat he placed his faith not in arms, not in strength, but in faith
in the Saviour.  When the Gentile troops saw the Christian army, they
swiftly broke up into two groups.  Calling upon the Most High for
support, our men attacked with such force that each man knocked the
opponent charging at him to the ground.  Judging themselves unable to
withstand the onslaught of the Christians, the pagans stopped, and,
driven by fear, fled swiftly.  Our men followed them quickly,
pursuing them for four miles.  After having killed many of them, they
brought back 103 horses as trophies of victory.  They refrained from
killing only one man, whom they brought back with them, and from whom
they learned everything that was going on among their enemies,
including what the prince of Babylon was planning against us.

Meanwhile the army was suffering from a terrible thirst, which
compelled them to sew together the hides of cattle and oxen, in which
they carried water from six miles away.  They used the water carried
in such bags, which were putrid with recent sweat, and multiplied the
great suffering caused by hunger, to make barley bread for the army.
How many jaws and throats of noble men were eaten away by the
roughness of this bread.  How terribly were their fine stomachs
revolted by the bitterness of the putrid liquid.  Good God, we think
that they must have suffered so, these men who remembered their high
social position in their native land, where they had been accustomed
to great ease and pleasure, and now could find no hope or solace in
any external comfort, as they burned in the terrible heat.[211]  Here
is what I and I alone think: never had so many noble men exposed
their own bodies to so much suffering for a purely spiritual benefit.
Although the hearts of the pilgrims burned for the dear, distant
pledges of their affections, for their sweet wives and for the
dignity of their possessions, nevertheless they remained steadfastly
in place there, and did not cease to pursue the battle for Christ.

The Saracens were always waiting in ambush around the springs and
rivers, eager to kill our men wherever they found them, strip their
bodies, and, if they happened to gain booty and horses, to hide them
in caves and caverns.  Terrible hunger and thirst raged through the
army surrounding the city, and the very great rage of the enemy
prowling here and there thundered against them as well.  But the
leaders of the sacred army, seeing that so many men of such different
capacities could scarcely endure such pain any longer, urged the use
of machines by means of which the city might be made more vulnerable,
so that, after all they had gone through, they might finally stand
before the monuments of the passion and burial of the Saviour.  In
addition to the many other instruments, like battering rams with
which they might tear down the walls, or catapults to topple the
towers and walls, they ordered two wooden castles to be built, which
we usually call "falas."  Duke Godfrey was the first to build his
castle, together with other machines; and Raymond, Count of
Saint-Gilles, who permitted himself to be second to no one, also
built his own.  When they saw the machines being built, the castles
being constructed, the missile launchers and equipment being moving
up to the towers, the Saracens began, with unusual speed, to extend
and to repair their walls and towers.  Working all night long, they
surprised our men by the speed with which they accomplished things.
Moreoever, the wood from which our men had built the castles and
other machines was brought from a distant region.  When the leaders
of the army of the Lord perceived which side of the city was most
vulnerable, on a certain Sunday night they brought the castle,
together with some other machines, to that place.  At dawn they set
up the machines on the eastern side, and on Monday, Tuesday, and
Wednesday they established them firmly in place.  The count of
Saint-Gilles, however, set up his machine on the southern side.  As
they burned with eagerness for the siege, their hearts were burning
with intolerable thirst, and a silver coin could not purchase enough
water to quench a man's thirst.  Finally, on the fourth and fifth day,
gathering all their forces, they started to attack the walled city.
But before the attack took place, the bishops and priests directed
the people who were their subjects to sing litanies, and to undertake
fasts, to pray, and to give alms.  The bishops remembered what had
once happened at Jericho, that the walls of the perfidious city had
fallen when the Israelites' trumpets sounded, and they marched seven
times around the city, carrying the sacred ark, and the walls of the
faithless city fell down.[212]  They too circled Jerusalem in their
bare feet, their spirits and bodies contrite, as they tearfully cried
out the names of the saints.  Both the leaders and the people came
together in this time of necessity, to implore divine assistance.
When this was accomplished with great humility, on the sixth day of
the week, after they had attacked the city with great forcefulness,
and their common effort had proved to be of no avail, such a great
torpor fell upon the whole army that their strength vanished, and the
steady misfortunes undermined the determination of the most
courageous men.  As God is my witness, I have heard, from men
renowned for their truthfulness, who were present in the divine army,
that after their unsuccessful assault upon the walls of the city, you
would have seen the best of the knights who had returned from the
walls striking their hands, shouting angrily, lamenting that God had
deserted them.  And I also learned, from sources no less reliable,
that Robert, count of Normandy, and the other Robert, prince of
Flanders, met and shared their mutual grief, weeping copiously, and
declaring themselves the most wretched of men, since the Lord Jesus
had judged them unworthy of worshipping His Cross, and of seeing, or
rather of adoring His tomb.  But as the hour drew near at which Jesus,
who for the second time delivered the people from the prison of
Egypt, is believed to have ascended the Cross, duke Godfrey and his
brother, count Eustace, who had not stopped battling from their
castle, steadily struck the lower walls with battering rams, while at
the same time attacking the Saracens, who were fighting to protect
their lives and country, with stones, with various other kinds of
missiles, and even with the points of their swords,

Meanwhile, Lietaud, one of the knights, who will be known for
generations to come for his daring and for his deeds, was the first
to leap onto the walls of the city, startling the Gentiles who
surrounded him, and robbing them of their confidence When he had
mounted the wall, several of the young Franks whose pious boldness
had made them preeminent rushed forward, unwilling to seem inferior
to him who had preceded them, and they climbed to the top of the wall.
I would insert their names on this page, were I not aware of the
fact that, after they returned, they became infamous for criminal
acts; therefore, according to the judgment of men who love the name
of God, my silence is not unjust.  Very soon, when the Saracens saw
the Franks breaching the walls, they quickly fled over the walls and
through the city.  While they were retreating, our entire army rushed
in, some through the breaches made by the battering rams, others by
jumping from the tops of their machines.  Their struggle to enter
resulted in harmful speed; with each man wanting to be perceived as
the first, they got in each other's way.  Moreover, near the entrance
to the gates to the city, the Saracens had built secret covered pits,
which injured many of our men, not to speak of the difficulties
caused by the narrowness of the entrance as our men rushed in.  The
Franks chased the fleeing pagans fiercely, killing everyone they came
upon, more in slaughter than in battle, through the streets, squares,
and crossroads, until they reached what was called the Temple of
Solomon.  So much human blood flowed that a wave of damp gore almost
covered the ankles of the advancing men.  That was the nature of
their success that day.

Raymond, the Count of Saint-Gilles, moved his army from the southern
flank and had a very large machine on wheels brought to the wall, but
between the machine, which was called the Castle, and the wall, was a
very deep pit.  The princes soon conferred about how to accomplish
the breaching of the wall quickly, and ordered a messenger to
announce throughout the army that anyone who carried three stones
into the ditch would certainly receive a penny.  In the space of
scarcely three days the moat was filled in, since night did not
prevent them from carrying out their project.  When the moat had been
filled in by this means, they pushed the machine against the walls.
However, those who had taken on the defense of the inner city
resisted us, not out of bravery I say, but out of obstinate madness,
hurling what they call Greek fire at our men, and damaging the wheels
of the machine with stones.  The Franks, however, with remarkable
skill, often managed to evade their blows and efforts.  Meanwhile, at
the eastern side of the city, the tumult of battle alone made the
aforementioned count think that the Franks had broken into the city,
and were racing though it, spreading death.  "Why," he said to his
men, "do we delay?  Don't you see that the Franks have taken the city,
and are now triumphantly seizing great booty?"  The count, together
with his men, then swiftly invaded the city.  When he learned that
some of the Franks had spread through the city's palaces, some into
the Temple of the Lord, and that many were fighting at the altars of
the Temple of Solomon, as it was formerly called, in order to retain
power in the captured city he spoke with the emir (as they called
him) in charge of the tower of David, which was called Zion,
demanding that he hand over the tower with which he had been
entrusted.  Thus the satrap, after a pact had been agreed upon
between them, opened for him the gate through which the pilgrims used
to pass when they entered Jerusalem, and where they were cruelly and
unfairly compelled to pay tribute, which was called *musellae*.
When the Provencals, that is, the army of the Count of Saint-Gilles,
and all the others had entered the city, a general slaughter of the
pagans took place.  No one was spared because of tender years, beauty,
dignity, or strength: one inescapable death awaited them all.  Those
who had retreated to the Temple of Solomon continued to battle
against us throughout the day, but our men, enraged at the feeble
arrogance of these desperate men, attacked them with united force,
and by means of their combined efforts penetrated to the depths of
the temple, where they inflicted such slaughter on the wretches
within the temple that the blood of the innumerable crowd of those
who were killed nearly submerged their boots.  An innumerable crowd,
of mingled sexes and ages, had poured into this Temple; the Franks
granted some of them a few moments of life, so that they might remove
from the Temple the bodies of the fallen, of whom a foul pile lay
scattered here and there.  After they had removed the bodies, they
were themselves put to the sword.  Those who had climbed to the top
of the Temple, a large crowd of the common people, received the
standards of Tancred and Gaston as a sign that peace had been granted
to them in the meantime.  However, whether Gaston, a famous and very
wealthy man, was a Gascon or a Basque, I don't exactly remember, but
I am certain that he was one or the other.[213]  The army then ran
amok, and the entire city was looted.  Palaces and other buildings
lay open, and silver, gold, and silken garments were seized as booty.
They found many horses and mules, and in the houses they found great
abundance of every kind of food.  This was right and proper for the
army of God, that the finest things that offered themselves to each
man, no matter how poor, became his by right, without doubt or
challenge, no matter the social class of the man who first came upon
them.  And then, putting these things aside, they ran, equally joyful
and sad, towards that which they had thirsted for so fervently.

They approached the sepulchre of the Lord and thanked Him for what
they had sought, the liberation of the Blessed Places; He had
performed such great deeds with them as his instruments, that neither
those who had performed them nor any other men could properly
evaluate these great deeds.  They kept in mind how much anguish they
had endured to achieve this, and how they had accomplished what they
could not have hoped for, and when they considered that they
themselves had done deeds which had been unknown for centuries, no
man could understand how blessed were the tears which they poured
forth.  Omnipotent God, what deep emotion, what joy, what grief they
felt, after unheard-of sufferings, never experienced by any army,
like the tortures of child-birth, when, like new-born children, they
saw that they had attained the fresh joys of the long-desired vision.
Therefore they were sad, and after they had joyfully wept tears
sweeter than any bread, they rejoiced, and with overflowing emotions
they embraced the most pious Jesus, the cause of their excruciating
daily labors, as though he had been hanging on the cross, or had been
held until that moment in the shelter of the tomb from time
immemorial.  Magnificent gifts of gold and silver were offered there,
but sincere devotion was more valuable than any gift.

At last the next day shone forth, and the Franks, sorry that they had
permitted those who had climbed to the top of the Temple (to whom
Tancred and Gaston had given their own standards, as we said earlier)
to remain alive, invaded the heights of the temple and cut the
Saracens to pieces, killing the women together with the men.  Some of
them, preferring suicide, threw themselves from the top of the Temple.
Tancred, however, because he and Gaston had given their pledges of
security, was much disturbed by this killing.  Then our men ordered
some of the Saracens to carry off the dead, because the foul stench
of the bodies was oppressive, and the city was filled with so many
corpses that the Franks were unable to move without stepping on dead
bodies.  Therefore the pagans, when they had carried the bodies from
the city, in front of the main gates piled up mountains of corpses,
and burned them in a huge pile.  We merely read about, and have never
seen such a killing of Gentiles anywhere; God repaid them who had
inflicted such pain and death upon the pilgrims--who had suffered for
such a long time in that land--by exacting a retribution equal to
their hideous crimes.  For no one except God himself can calculate
how much suffering, how many labors, how much destruction all of
those who sought the Holy Places endured at the hands of the arrogant
Gentiles.  God certainly must have grieved more over their suffering
than over the delivery of his Cross and Tomb into profane hands.  But
before we turn our stylus to other matters, it should be made clear
that the Temple of Solomon, to which we referred earlier, is not the
structure which Solomon himself built, which the Lord had predicted
would not continue to stand, "one stone upon another," and which was
destroyed, but an imitation of it, built by I don't know whom, as
tribute to the noble ancient House.  It certainly was a place of very
great beauty, built out of gold and silver, of immeasurable price,
and of incredible variety, with walls and gates plated with layers of
precious metals.  Count Raymond then had the prefect who had been in
charge of the citadel, to whom he had sent his banners, brought out
of the citadel that night, together with his entire retinue, and
given safe conduct to Ascalon.

Then, when the holy places had been liberated, the entire Christian
army was ordered to give alms and offerings, so that their souls
might be properly receptive to the divine grace that they needed to
choose the man who would rule the holy city as its king.  On the
eighth day after the taking of the city, they made an offer to the
count of Saint-Gilles, because of his excellence, but he, although
mindful of his high position, refused to take on such an onerous task,
for good reason (he was an old man, who had only one eye, but was
famous for his remarkable feats of arms and for his energy).  Finally,
they approached duke Godfrey, and, at the urgent insistence of
everyone, the labor rather than the honor of this task was imposed
upon him, for he would have to battle unremittingly against the great
strength of the Gentiles, and to show good will towards the
neighboring Christians.  Slender, relatively tall, eloquent, and
even-tempered, he had made himself known for his strength in battle
on the Lord's expedition.  According to reliable, accurate testimony,
the following story is told about a remarkable deed he did, when he
met at Antioch, on the bridge over the Pharphar, a Turk, wearing no
cuirass, but riding a horse.  Godfrey struck his guts so forcefully
with his sword that the trunk of his body fell to the earth, while
the legs remained seated as the horse moved on.  The men of
Lotharingia customarily had remarkable long as well as sharp swords.

We think that another of his deeds, no less glorious, and worthy to
be told, should be included.  They had taken Nicea, and since things
had gone well at Nicea, they hurried off to besiege Antioch; on the
way, from time to time, when the chance to relax their usual caution
occurred, they hunted beasts in the nearby forests (the fields in
this region were not as tall and thick as in our country).  On one
occasion, a bear of enormous size came out of the bushes; when the
army caught sight of him, they set out in pursuit.  Frightened by the
shouting crowd, the bear immediately sought out the woods from which
it had emerged.  While many men were surrounding it, one wretch
happened to reach the beast's lair.  Leaping forward, the bear
attacked the rash man, pinned him in his arms, and with his teeth
swiftly seized the leg of the man lying there.[214]

Then the Duke, separated from his men, went to help him; when the
wretched man, weeping with pain and fear, saw him, he called upon the
man's noble nature, and urged him to help him.  Nor did the Duke,
whose nature consisted almost entirely of virtue, delay helping him,
but he swiftly drew his sword from its scabbard and forcefully struck
the head of the beast.  More annoyed than wounded, because of the
hardness of its bones, the beast attacked the Duke, removing its
teeth from the leg of the unfortunate man whom he had first attacked
so fiercely.  The man quickly departed, without troubling himself
about the Duke's difficulty, but saving himself, leaving the man and
the beast to resolve their conflict between them.  The beast, angry
at the blow he had received, leapt up, seized the Duke with his claws,
threw him down, and pinned him under his terrible limbs.  With his
raging mouth he bit the Duke's leg,[215] but the noble-minded man
remained steadfast in spite of his fall, and tightly held onto the
sword he had drawn.[216]

As he lay there, and the beast continued to gnaw at the hip he had
seized, the Duke, fully aware of his predicament, placed his sword
between the head and arm of the beast, gathered all of his strength,
and drove the point of the blade into the depths of the beast's body.
When he felt the metal gliding through his viscera, the beast
finally relaxed the jaws that had sunk into the Duke's flesh.  When
the Duke saw that he had been released from the beast's mouth, and
noticed that the beast was not moving from its place, he pushed with
both feet, but in the act of pushing he received an almost mortal
wound in his leg from the sword that was stuck in the breast of the
beast above him.  He fell down in worse shape than when he had been
held by the beast, and now, weakened from loss of blood, after some
time he was found by his men.  The Duke was now sorry, although too
late, for having gone out by himself, since this adventure was costly
for his own warriors, and for the entire sacred army.  Until the
siege of Antioch was over, he had to be carried on a litter, and
since he could not look after himself or others, he quickly lost
almost 15,000 men of those who had belonged to him, but who abandoned
him when he became disabled.

Since we have dealt with the bear, we would also like to mention a
deed performed by his brother Baldwin, who is now still the ruler of
Jerusalem, since no other more fitting place for the story may occur.
He suffered a similarly severe wound in battle, in the course of
saving one of his foot-soldiers, who had supported him bravely.
Foresight led the doctor whom he summoned to resist covering the
wound with medicinal poultices, because he knew that the wound was
very deep, and while the skin could be made smooth, the wound would
fester deep within his body.  He proposed to conduct a remarkable
experiment.  He asked the king to order one of the Saracens whom they
held prisoner to be wounded in the same place and in the same manner
that Baldwin himself had been (for it was forbidden for him to ask
for Christian), and to have him killed thereafter, so that he might
look more freely into the corpse, and determine from this inspection
something about the king's own internal wounds.  The prince's piety
recoiled in horror at this suggestion, and he recalled the example of
ancient Constantine, declaring that he would not be the cause of the
death of any man, no matter how insignificant, for such insignificant
salvation, when it is ever doubtful.  The doctor then said to him,
"If you have decided that no man's life can be spent for your own
well-being, then at least give the order to bring forward a bear, an
animal useless except for show, and have it hung up by its front paws,
then struck with an iron blade, so that I may then examine his
entrails, and I shall be able to measure how far it went in, and
thereby determine the depth of your own wound."  The king answered
him, "The beast will be brought immediately, since it is necessary:
consider it a done deed."  When the doctor had finished his
experiment at the animal's expense, he found, as we mentioned above,
that harm would come to the king if the wound were quickly covered,
unless the pus was removed and the interior part of the wound would
heal.  To have said these things about the piety of the kings is
sufficient; they would have been deservedly famous had the choice of
a bishop, and the bishopric itself, not been defective.

Up to this point the careful Muse has proceeded through brambles,
along a narrow path.  A cloud obscures the traveller's path, and the
dawning of the late star scarcely grows warm.  Let the plague of
blood have run only thus far; let there be no further time for
slaughter and hunger.  If Fortune has sometimes smiled on our efforts,
the rapacious air of destruction has soon followed.  When the walls
of Nicea fell, and the city of Antioch was captured, what good was
produced?  The good that resulted from the sufferings, for each holy
martyr, when death was conquered.  For if grievous things had to be
suffered, bearing poverty and death at the same time, the grief
brought about future joys.  I shall use the voice of the writer of
the Psalms, "I was glad when they said to me, let us go into the
house of the Lord;"[217] our feet shall tread the halls of Solyme,
walking there joyfully.  Franks, take these rewards of labor; do not
grieve for the unhappiness you have endured.  Take pleasure in the
sight of the Sepulchre you had long hoped for, and in the restoration
of the tear-stained Cross, and all suffering will leave your hearts.
This city, often made the spoil of kings, was given over to utter
ruin.  O city made blessed by this capture, from now on you should
rule, drawing to you Christian kingdoms.  You will see the glories of
the earth come here, to show filial gratitude to you.  Not Ezra nor
Judas Machabee did as much, after your sufferings; Hadrian, whence
Elia gets its name, was not able, in reviving you, to give so much.
This world fights for you and yours; concern for you involves almost
the entire age.  Once Judea, when it was at its strongest, could
match this glory.  Why are knights sung of in battle?  I ask that you
be the ruin of Persia and not of yourself.  Attack the prince of
Babylon, and whatever stands in the way of Jerusalem, so that good
men may visit the Cross of Jesus, bowing their pious heads at the
Tomb.  I shall cry out that our times have learned what no future
annals will teach.[218]

While temporal activities, which are thought to be the concern of the
royal administration, were being taken care of, internal
ecclesiastical concerns were not to be neglected, and as soon as a
king was set up, they dealt with replacing the patriarch.  At that
time there was a cleric, of what rank I am not sure, named Arnulf.
He had some skill at logic, significant knowledge of grammatical
learning, and for some time had taught, in the subject mentioned
above, the daughter of the king of England, a nun.  The count of the
Normans, through his sister, had promised him as much as a bishop's
honors, if any of his bishops happened to die.  Meanwhile, when the
journey to Jerusalem was proposed, the bishop of Bayeux, whose name
was Odo, and who was very wealthy, vowed to undertake the journey.
Since he was the brother of William the elder, king of England, and,
in addition to the office of bishop, among the English he held the
county of Kent, with the expectation of great wealth, he seemed ready
to dare new enterprises, to the extent of plotting to take over the
kingdom from his brother.  When the king found out about his
intentions, he put him in prison, where he remained until the day the
king died.  At this time the bishop regained his freedom and office,
and, as I said earlier, when the pilgrimage was proclaimed, Odo,
accompanied by a large retinue and immense resources, set out on the
journey.  Arnulf enrolled himself in his retinue, and when death
overtook this bishop, within the borders of Romania if I am not
mistaken, Odo bequeathed, out of the fortune which he left behind, a
legacy to him, which consisted of almost all of his most precious
possessions.  Since he possessed a considerable amount of literary
knowledge, as well as native eloquence, and his increased wealth made
him more well known, he began to drive our men on with many speeches,
and to increase his fame in this way.  The fact that learned men were
in short supply made him even more illustrious, and since a man's
voice is of more concern than the life he has led, he was called to
the patriarchy of Jerusalem.  For some time, then, he presented
himself as the bishop, though in name only; he fulfilled his new
office by sermonizing.  Finally, after a short time, when news of his
election reached the Apostlic See, after the death of the bishop of
Puy, Pope Paschal decreed that Daimbert, the archbishop of Pisa,
should administer pastoral care to the Lord's army.  After Jerusalem
had been captured and the king had taken office, Daimbert arrived
with a large fleet; short while later he examined the process by
which Arnulf had been chosen, and decided that, in accordance with
canon law, it should be challenged.  After a thorough investigation
of the man's origin, he was found to be the son of a priest and
therefore one who should not only be barred from sacred office, but,
according to a decision by the council of Toledo, he should be
ordered to become an eternal slave of that church whose dignity had
been affronted by his engendering.  When he had been deposed, then,
in spite of his strenuous efforts to defend himself, the leaders
wanted to mitigate the shame that he felt at being rejected, and so
they asked him whom they should choose.  In accordance with his
depraved nature, which envied both his peers and juniors, he said,
"Choose the Pisan himself, who is carrying out his assignment."  The
leaders agreed with his words, seized the archbishop in the church
where he was sitting, almost without asking his consent, and escorted
him themselves to the cathedral to take up the see.  A short time
later, after the death of the glorious king Godfrey, during the reign
of his brother Baldwin, who had previously ruled over Edessa, they
accused Daimbert of treason.  Convicted of the crime, he who had
resigned his metropolitan see was deprived of the office of patriarch.
When another election was held to determine who would be bishop,
Arnulf shrewdly nominated one of his peers, whom he knew to be
submissive, a simple, illiterate man, named Ebremar, who would offer
no resistance to Arnold's power.  He, however, behaved in a religious
fashion, and I think that he did not carry out Arnulf's wishes in
every way.  As result, he soon was accused at the Apostolic See, but
the accusation failed miserably.  As a result, Arnulf, together with
those who had been his accomplices in the accusation against Ebremar,
incurred the wrath of the king, who deprived him of the guardianship
of the Sepulchre, and drove him from the city.  Reinstated by the
leaders of the Apostolic See, the bishop returned to Jerusalem, to
the great shame of his persecutors.  This is quite enough to have
said about the election and deposition of that would-be patriarch.
The election, which was null and void in the minds of all
right-thinking men, took place on the day of the festival of
Saint-Peter-in-chains, but since he had no help from a pious life, it
dissolved.  The city was captured by the Franks on the fifteenth day
of July, on the sixth day of the week, almost at the hour when Christ
was put on the cross.

A short time later, only a few days in fact, ambassadors[219] arrived
from the city of Naplouse,[220] which, unless I am mistaken, in
ancient times was called Emmaus.  They invited Tancred and count
Eustachius, the brother of the duke who was now king, both of whom
were brave, noteworthy men, to set out for the above mentioned city,
bringing with them a large army, to take control of it.  They set out,
bringing many men with them, including great number of foot-soldiers,
and reached the outskirts of the city.  The residents of the town,
of their own free will, then opened the fortifications and
surrendered to them.  Other messengers came to king Godfrey, bearing
the news that the emperor of Babylon was getting large numbers of
troops ready to wage war against him.  The king, made fiercer by what
he had just been told, dispatched messengers to his brother Eustace
and to Tancred, instructing and urging them to return to Jerusalem as
soon as possible.  The king also indicated that the battle would take
place at Ascalon.  When these most fearless men heard what had
happened, they hastily set off through the mountains, where they
found none of the Saracens they thought would be up in arms against
them; then they reached Caesarea in Palestine.  From there they
retraced their steps, proceeding to Ram, the town mentioned above,
made famous by the memory of Saint George, and situated on the shore
of the sea, where they met up with many Arabs, who were the vanguard
of the army they were to face.  Our men joined forces against them,
attacked them, and by their united efforts overwhelmed the enemy, who
were compelled to flee.  Many were captured alive, and they revealed
the enemies' plans for the battle about to take place: where the army
was going to assemble; what was its size; and where they planned to
stand and fight.  After he had gathered this information, Tancred
sent messengers directly to Godfrey, king of Jerusalem, to tell him
what he had learned.  He sent other messengers to Arnulf, the man
known as the patriarch, and to the other leaders, saying, "You should
know that a great battle awaits you, and since it is certainly about
to take place, come quickly to Ascalon, supported by as many fine
troops as you can quickly and carefully gather."  The king, than whom
no one was wiser in his faith in God, by the authority invested in
him proceeded to rouse the entire army of God to perform this task,
and designated Ascalon as the place to which they should proceed to
face the enemy.  He himself, together with the man called the
patriarch, and Robert, count of Flanders, left the city on the third
day of the week.

But the count of Saint-Gilles and the count of Normandy informed the
king that they were unwilling to proceed until they learned whether
the battle was certain to take place; they said that meanwhile they
would return to Jerusalem, offering to come quickly if needed.  The
king departed, and when he saw the enemy from afar, quickly sent news
of what he had found back to those who were in Jerusalem.  He
summoned a certain bishop,[221] and sent him to the city, to entreat
everyone to delay no longer, but, at this moment of need, to join him.
On Wednesday the leaders gathered together the Lord's expeditionary
forces and moved their camp outside the city.  The bishop who had
brought the king's words to those who had remained in Jerusalem was
captured by Saracens, as he was making his way back to the king.  It
is not clear whether he died or was led away captive.  Peter the
Hermit, the official in charge of work that to this point was pious,
together with clerics, both Greek and Latin, remained in the city,
organizing processions, supervising prayers, preaching sermons,
urging the giving of alms, so that God might deign to add this
supreme victory to the victories of his people.  The ecclesiastics
who could be present, dressed in their sacred vestments, as though
they were going to perform sacred offices, marched to the Lord's
Temple, where they led masses and delivered sermons that moved the
men and women deeply, asking God to end their exile.  But the man
with the name of patriarch, together with the other bishops who were
present, gathered with several of the leaders at the river which is
known to be on this side of Ascalon.  There, by the trickery of the
Gentiles, many thousands of animals, including herds of cows, camels,
and sheep, had been put in place.  When the leaders learned that they
had been placed there as booty to tempt our men, the order was
circulated throughout the encampment that none of this booty was to
be found in anyone's tent, unless he could show that it was necessary
for his food that day.[222]  Meanwhile, 300 Arabs rode into view, and
our men pursued them so effectively that they captured two of them as
they fled, and harassed the others by pursuing them to their
encampment.

Later on the same day, the man performing the function of patriarch
had the announcement made through the entire army that early the next
day everyone would prepare for battle, and he threatened to
excommunicate anyone who stopped during the battle to pillage; each
man was to suppress his desire for booty until the end of the battle.
He asked that they concentrate on killing the enemy, so that they
might not be diverted from the task by desire for shameful gain,
thereby permitting greed to stand in the way of the victory they had
in their grasp.  Friday morning our army entered a very lovely valley,
on a level with the nearby river, where they set up their separate
battle lines.  The Duke, who was now king, the count of Flanders, the
count of Normandy, the count of Saint-Gilles, Eustace of Bologne,
Tancred and Gaston together, in addition to others, both in single
and in shared commands, stood before their units.  Bowmen and lancers,
who customarily march in front of the troops of foot-soldiers, were
drawn up, and king Godfrey with his troops took up the left side,
while the count of Saint-Gilles took up a position near the sea, and
the counts of Flanders and Normandy rode on the right side.  Tancred
and others marched along in the center.  Our foot soldiers moved
against the enemy's forces; the Gentiles prepared themselves for
battle without moving.  You would have seen them carrying on their
shoulders vessels, which enabled them to hold the cool water in small
sacks,[223] from which they thought that they would drink while
pursuing us as we fled.  But God provided something other than the
enemy race was imagining, for meanwhile, Robert, the count of
Normandy, saw shining from afar the spear of the leader of the army;
it seemed to be covered with bright silver, and its top decorated
with thick gold.  Steadily spurring his swift horse on, he attacked
the prince, who was carrying spear as a standard, with great force,
wounding him with terrible blow.  On the other side, the count of
Flanders loosened his horse's reins and plunged into the thick of the
enemy.  Tancred rushed among the tents with a great company, and the
troops, along with their leaders, were revelling everywhere.[224]

The fields and plains became bloody with carnage.  The enemy was
unable to bear their losses, and soon fled in despair.  Even as the
number of pagans was great, so was the carnage great.  If the waves
of the sea were great, so the Lord shows himself much more marvelous
in the deeps.[225]  Then, so that it might be clear that the hand of
God only, and not that of man, was waging war, you would seen them
flee blindly, with their eyes open, and in their attempt to avoid our
weapons, they threw themselves on them.  There was no place of refuge:

tall trees offered no protection for many of them, nor were they able
to escape our arrows.  Swift blows created massive destruction.[226]

All those whom flight could not protect were dead or almost dead from
the blows of our arrows and swords, which cut them down like cattle.
The count of Saint-Gilles, near the shore, from which he had launched
his own army against the enemy, attacked them like a storm, with such
vehemence that many of them, trying to escape from the blades,
voluntarily plunged into the sea.

When the victory had been won, thanks to God's leadership, the prince
of the Babylonian army, who, in their language, is called an emir,
was confounded, and, unable to control his astonishment at what had
happened to him, lamented at great length.  He thought about the
great amount of supplies that he had brought, and the superb, strong,
fine-looking young men, the noble arms, the power of his allies, and,
I should have said, all the knights; in addition, he saw that they
had what would make the most sluggish of men secure, that is, they
had fought in front of their own city's gates, to which they could
surely retreat, and, what made it even safer, in their own land.  And
he looked upon the Franks, in every way inferior in military might,
whose young men had been weakened by long hunger, whose swords were
rusty, whose lances were darkened, whose few remaining troops were
worn out, all of whose leaders were exhausted by bitter suffering, as
they rode on horses racked with every kind of disease, and, to put it
briefly, he marveled that these poor wretches, a band of exiles, had
conquered the countless soldiers of his own nation, and that the
glory of the entire East had been brought down by the least of men.
Our victory was also aided by the fact that, when the cry for retreat
spread through the enemy's army, the emir in charge of Ascalon,
seeing the Babylonian prince turn to flee, ordered that all those who
fled should be prevented from entering his city.  The enemy was very
much astonished that the Franks had chosen not to fight before the
walls of Jerusalem, but had marched for nearly two days to meet them.

While the Franks were thanking God, as was right, for such a victory,
Robert, the count of Normandy, a man of remarkable generosity, even
in his impoverished exile, bought for twenty silver marks, from the
man who had captured it, the spear, which, as we have said, was
covered with silver, and which had stood before the prince of Babylon
as his standard.  He then gave it, to stand at the Tomb of the Lord,
as a symbol of such a victory, to Arnulf, who was called the
Patriarch.  They say that the sword which had belonged to this prince
was bought by someone for sixty besants.  In addition, a large fleet
had followed the army to Ascalon so that, after the Franks had been
defeated and made captives, they might buy them from the victors, and
carry them off to be sold throughout the furthest kingdoms of the
East.  However, when they saw the Egyptians shamefully fleeing, they
set sail instantly, and made their way into the interior by sea.
Finally, after having slaughtered the Saracens, and the Egyptians as
well, the Franks returned to the abandoned tents and collected booty
beyond count.  They brought out a horde of gold and silver, the
wealth of the Assyrian nobility, and whatever precious household
goods they had, as well as all kinds of animals, and a collection of
various arms.  They kept whatever could be used, and burned the rest.
Then they returned to Jerusalem, with overwhelming joy, pouring out
unnumbered tears of gratitude in memory of the passion and burial of
the Lord.  As a result of this fortunate turn of events, the Franks
were now so prosperous that those who had begun the journey in
poverty and without enough to sustain them on the pilgrimage, now
returned from it laden with gold, silver, horses, and mules.  They
won this glorious battle on August 13.

Since we offered, at the beginning of this volume, examples from
Scripture which we thought were relevant to such an enterprise, we
may now be able to find something in the words of the prophet
Zechariah that fits the siege of Jerusalem.  He says, "The Lord, who
stretches forth the heavens and lays the foundation of the earth, and
forms the spirit of man within him, speaks."  He stretches the skies
who spread (the influence of) the church, as he propagated his seed
from the East, according to Isaiah,[227] by means of the apostles,
even as he had to gather the church through them from the West.  He
lays the foundations, since he permits the pagans to persevere in
their heard-hearted falsehood.  He places the spirit within man when
he grants innate reason in the mind of every true believer.  "Behold
I shall make Jerusalem the lintel of intoxication unto all the people
roundabout."[228]  The lintel rises about the door; house is entered
through the door; drinking is harmful to the stomach.  If we call the
door faith in the Lord Jesus, through whom we come to the Father,
then the Church of Jerusalem, because both the Law and the Word of
the Lord came from it, we may correctly call the lintel, because it
gave rise to these things.  For Paul, after fourteen years, returned
to it, to confer with Peter and the others about the Gospel, "lest he
had run, or should run, in vain."[229]  But this is the lintel of
drunkenness unto all the people roundabout, since all nations were
disgusted and nauseated by those things in which the traces of our
faith resided.  "But Judah will be in the siege against Jerusalem.
"[230]  He says not only that it will be a terror to foreigners, but
that Judah, that is, the faithful people, will besiege Jerusalem,
acknowledging that it will be trodden by the nations.  "In that day I
shall place Jerusalem as a heavy rock upon all people."[231]  If I
may take the part for the whole, in accordance with the frequent
practice of Scripture, Jerusalem becomes a heavy weight for all the
people because it recently imposed upon all people who are called
Christian the weight of a very great labor for her liberation.  "All
that lift up Jerusalem will be cut in pieces, and all the kingdoms of
the earth will be gathered together against it"[232] Who are those
who will lift it up, if not those who, after the times of nations
have ended, lift it up from its own destruction?  The Lord says,
"Jerusalem will be trodden down by the Gentiles, until the times of
the Gentiles be fulfilled."[233]  They will be torn apart because no
one can say or even imagine how great the labor, the suffering, the
misery of hunger and thirst would be that they endured in the siege.
And, to speak like Ezekiel, "every head was made bald, and every
shoulder was peeled;"[234] that is, perhaps, either by the steady
attack of siege-machines, or by carrying heavy weights.  But after
Jerusalem has been raised, "all the kingdoms of the earth will gather
against her," which should not be taken allegorically, but, as the
story that has just been told, was offered as something visible to
heavenly eyes.  For what kingdom of the East did not send its men to
war, bringing every kind of siege-engine, which I did not mention
earlier, and everything necessary to besiege a city?  They brought,
in addition to soldiers, merchants to buy the Franks, since they
expected that the pagans would win because of the great size of their
forces, and perhaps they had heard that the number was greater than
Kherboga actually had.  "On that day, God says, I will smite every
horse with astonishment, and his rider with madness."[235]  If the
horse is taken to mean earthly honor, the rider of the horse is
undoubtedly to be understood as he who is preeminent in honor.  All
honor is astonished because every power or kingdom, stupified by
God's army, dares do nothing.  Every prince went mad, because he did
not know what to do, nor where to turn; deprived of force, each
learned what the strength of God's army was.  "And I will open my
eyes upon the house of Judah, and I will smite every horse of the
people with blindness."[236]  If Judah is the confessor, I may
certainly call them confessors who have never chosen to abandon the
origin of their faith, that is, the Franks, upon whom the entire
weight of the journey fell.  God opened his eyes upon them when he
showed the grace of his goodness to them by bringing about this
outcome.  He struck the horses of the people with blindness when he
punished the arrogance of the Gentiles by showing them his
displeasure.  In Sacred Scripture the horse often stands for pride.
For what greater blindness is there than to make war on the sons of
God?  What is more blameful than to fail to acknowledge God, to glory
in one's own ignorance, and to war against the faithful?  But why
exercise the license of allegory, piecing words together, when
historical truth prevents us from going astray in belief?  Didn't we
say earlier that the enemy was struck with blindness, and overcome
with astonishment at the swords which threatened them?  And I marvel
that the horse was able to see well enough to move when its rider had
clearly gone mad.  "And the leaders of Judah shall say in their heart:
The inhabitants of Jerusalem shall be my confident in the Lord of
hosts, their God."[237]  Whom should I call the leaders of Judah,
unless they be the leaders of that faithful army, who prayed that the
inhabitants of Jerusalem be confident, when they ardently desired to
restore the holy city by means of the strength of the Christian army,
so that Christianity might grow, the Lord's memory be honored, and
the Gentiles everywhere be attacked?  But their strength is said to
be in the Lord of armies, which can be seen today, when a small force
of men assembles against all of the pagan kingdoms.  Everything they
did was foreseen by Him who rules the heavenly powers.  At this point
one should add, "Their God," since their thoughts were not directed
to any but their own God, that is, the Christian God.  "In that day
will I make the governors of Judah like a fiery furnace among the
wood, and like a torch of fire in a sheaf; and they shall devour all
the people round about, on the right hand and on the left."[238]  On
this day, I say, of faith or of divine prosperity, the leaders who
govern the Christian people, either externally in arms, or internally
by means of spiritual doctrine, will become the furnace.  That is,
burning internally with heavenly love, they consume the wood of
sinners among the Gentiles, while externally, they consume the
evil-doers in battle as though they were straw.  We have no doubt
that God did not undertake this merely to liberate one city, but to
scatter the seeds that will grow long and far against the madness of
the Antichrist.  They devour all the people round about, on the left
and on the right, for they bring all those on the right into the
piety of Christianity, while they destroy the wicked, those who are
recognized as belonging to the left, and who are worthy of vengeful
destruction.  "And Jerusalem shall be inhabited again in her own
place, in Jerusalem."[239]  If Jerusalem is the Church, its place is
the faith of Christ, therefore Jerusalem inhabits Jerusalem, since
the terrestial city is restored so that she may long for a vision of
heavenly peace, since she she has a place, since she clings
steadfastly to Christ.  "The Lord also shall save the tents of Judah,
as in the beginning, that the glory of the house of David and the
glory of the inhabitants of Jerusalem do not magnify themselves
against Judah."[240]  The Lord saves the tents of Judah in the
beginning, since He, after having accomplished miracles for our
fathers, also granted glory to our own times, so that modern men seem
to have undergone pain and suffering greater than that of the Jews of
old, who, in the company of their wives and sons, and with full
bellies, were led by angels who made themselves visible to them.  I
say that today's men are the ones whom he more truly saves, because
he truly receives as his children those whose bodies he has allowed
to be slain, and whom he punishes in the temporal world.  He says,
"That the glory of the house of David may not glorify itself," that
is, that the ancients, who excelled in their victories in war, may
refrain from excessive pride, when they think of how modern men have
done better than they.  "The glory of the inhabitants of Jerusalem
may magnify itself against Judah," opposes to modern accomplishments
the pride of those who once reigned in Jerusalem and did famous
things.  By David, who was the most powerful, he expresses whatever
generates the greatest pride, as though he were saying that although
David had been the most celebrated in warfare, and some of the kings
who succeeded him sought glory, they could in no way equal what our
own men have done.  The word "to dwell" *(habitare)* however, we
say means "to dominate," since it is the frequentive of the word "to
have" *(habeo, habes)*.  David raising himself up in glory
against Judah, and the glory of the inhabitants of Jerusalem are
mentioned because they are the material in which those who wish to
make little of our deeds take pride.  "In that day shall the Lord
defend the inhabitants of Jerusalem."[241]  And did he not today also
protect that meager band whom he guarded in the midst of countless
pagans?  They make bold, armed attacks on the neighboring nations
every day, who have all they can do to protect themselves against
their attacks, without presuming to go on the attack themselves.
"And he who has offended among them in that day shall be as David,
and the house of David shall be as God, as the angel of the Lord
before them."[242]  Certainly David, whose punishment is not
described in the present passage, is not to be considered seriously
at fault.  Therefore whoever of us shall offend is like David, for
God does not permit his lechery or his pride to go unpunished, as the
deeds related above indicate.  And soon, in the course of their
sinning, he inflicted upon them the punishment that they very much
deserved, either hunger, or some other kind of torment.  Therefore
the house of David become like the house of God, because it was
returned to spiritual grace by means of divine censure.  Those like
David, upon whom God imposes his paternal correction, may still be
embraced by his spirit.  In the sight of God he becomes like an angel,
for when through imminent punishment man sees himself banished by
God's authority from his own affections, he then burns more ardently
to love God.  When he understands that he is being punished like a
child, he loves like an angel.  The sight of God is the pious emotion
of the inner man.  "And it shall come to pass in that day that I will
seek to destroy all the nations that come against Jerusalem."  We
generally seek for things that are not visible to us.  Why would God
seek unless to propose the things that should be done according to
eternal providence?  Therfore God seeks "to destroy all the nations
that come against Jerusalem,"[243] and, "in that day," because in his
fine judgment he foresees and ordains that those who resist the faith
are struck with eternal damnation, or are destroyed or diminished
according to the extent of their own weakness.  Therefore he says,
"thou shalt break them like potter's vessel,"[244] whom you shall
rule "with a rod of iron."[245]  But God does this by internal
illumination, which is certainly what is meant by "day," but this is
something which cannot be expressed in rational terms.  "And I will
pour upon the house of David, and upon the inhabitants of Jerusalem,
the spirit of grace and of supplications."[246]  I have said that the
inhabitants of Jerusalem were the house of David, whom omnipotent God,
although he has granted and still grants them many victories,
subdued and continues to subdue with frequent misfortunes.  While he
does not permit them to despair at their continual misfortunes, nor
does he allow them to grow prideful at their frequent good fortune,
the sacred distributor necessarily pours the spirit of grace and
prayers upon them, so that, while no prosperity, even the most
satisfying, seems to smile upon them without soon being followed by
adversity, the soul always filled with anxiety is compelled to place
its hope in Him who aids them in every circumstance.  Now, laying
aside all mystery, we may think how this material Jerusalem was so
often in doubt and fear, since she was, according to Ezekiel,[247]
"set in the midst of the nations, with nations around her," a tiny
city surrounded by countless nations.  And while they steadily fear
the attacks of barbarian nations, since they are not utterly stupid,
they are never without the grace of the fear and love of God, these
people who never lack matter for pious affection and prayers.  Of
course, iith the arrows of adversity the Omnipotent is accustomed to
compel his people to remember him; by stimulating the flesh he
customarily inflames their minds, and while they fear destruction
they are always ready to invoke the aid of God with their vows and
prayers.

We have said many times, and do not hesitate to repeat, that this had
never been accomplished in any age.  If some one cites the sons of
Israel and the miracles God performed for them, I shall offer
something more miraculous: an open sea filled with Gentiles; a cloud
of divine fear rising from a column among them; I shall point to the
light of divine hope offered to those whom Christ inspired, himself a
column of uprightness and strength, those who were comforted by the
food of the word of God only, like divine manna, when they had no
earthly hope.  Those men spurned the heavenly food that they were
offered, and looked back in their minds and with their voices to the
Egypt they had left behind, but our men never looked back, but
instead eagerly embraced whatever poverty and suffering came upon
them.  Certainly the steady, destructive starvation endured at
Antioch was also accompanied by noble scenes.  In the midst of every
kind of poverty, than which nothing more painful had ever been
endured by men, how bravely did those men who did not refrain from
participating in this Christian drama perform.  Those who were
present report that while the city was under siege, and the besiegers
and the inhabitants of the city were fighting hand-to-hand, it
frequently happened that, when the men withdrew on both sides, and
wisely and reasonably refrained from fighting, a contingent of boys,
some from the city, and some from our own camp, marched out and met
each other, to fight in a worthy manner.  As we said at the beginning
of this history, when the expedition to Jerusalem spread throughout
the Western lands, fathers set out on the journey together with their
little sons.  When it happened that the parents of some of them died,
the little boys continued to follow the army, and they grew
accustomed to the hardships.  Their ability to tolerate privation was
in no way inferior to that of their elders.  When they set up their
battle lines, they appointed leaders from among themselves, and they
called them Hugh the Great, Bohemund, the count of Flanders, the
count of Normandy, with different person playing each role.  Whenever
they saw that their subjects were suffering from lack of food, they
went off to ask for food from the princes after whom they were named,
and these princes gave them enough supplies to nourish them properly
in their need.  This remarkable army often challenged the city's
children, using long reeds as spears, weaving shields out of twigs,
and brandishing small arrows and missiles, according to what each
could do.  As their elders looked on, both from the city and from the
encampment, the city children came out of the gates of the wall, and
our children came from the tents, to face each other in the middle of
the field.  There one could see the shock of combat, the shouts on
both sides, and the bloody blows, delivered without mortal danger.
Often these preliminaries incited the hearts of the adults to go to
battle.  For when they watched the souls burn within those weak limbs,
and they saw such frail muscles eagerly wielding arms, the adults
groaned at the sight of children on both sides being wounded, and
moved the children off the battle field, rushing forward themselves
to renew their usual fighting.  Thus the Lord's army was scarcely
found at rest; every day some were practicing, while others were
fighting.

There was another kind of man in this army, who was bare-footed,
carried no arms, and was not permitted to have any money.  Dirty,
naked, and poor, he marched in front of everyone, feeding on the
roots of herbs, and on the most wretched things that grow.  A Norman,
well-born, said to have been formerly a knight, but now a
foot-soldier, he saw them wandering without a leader, and laid aside
his arms and the clothing he wore, wishing to declare himself their
king.  He had himself called Tafur, a term taken from the barbarian
language.  Among the pagans they are called Tafur whom we call, to
speak less literally, Trudennes, that is, men who kill time, that is,
who pass their time wandering aimlessly here and there.  It was the
Tafur's custom, whenever the people he was leading arrived at a
bridge to be crossed, or at a narrow pass to be traversed, to rush
forward to observe very carefully, and if he saw that anyone of his
men possessed two deniers, he would quickly separate him from the
general group, order him to purchase arms, and assign him to the
section of the army that bore weapons.  However, those in whom he saw
a love of the simple life, who had no impulse or desire to save money,
he made members of his inner circle.  Perhaps some might think that
these men were not useful for the general good, and that he could
have fed others what he was uselessly giving to them.  But no one can
describe how useful they were in carrying food, in collecting tribute,
in hurling stones during the sieges of cities.  They were better at
carrying heavy burdens than the asses and mules, and they were as
good at hurling projectiles as the machines and launchers.  Moreover,
when pieces of flesh were found among the pagan bodies at Marra, and
elsewhere, during a terrible famine, a hideous rumor (based on
something that had been done furtively and very rarely) circulated
widely among the pagans, that there were some men in the Frankish
army who eagerly fed upon the corpses of Saracens.  To circulate this
rumor among them even more vividly, the men carried the battered
corpse of a Turk out in full view of the other Turks, set it afire,
and roasted it as if the flesh was going to be eaten.  When they
learned what had happened, thinking that the charade was real, they
grew even more afraid of the fearlessness of the Tafurs than of our
other leaders.  Like the ancient pagans, the Turks were tormented
more by unburied bodies than any Christian seems to be concerned with
his soul or fears damnation.  To incite their wrath even more
fiercely, at the siege of Antioch the Bishop of Puy promulgated an
edict throughout the army, offering an immediate reward of twelve
deniers for every decapitated Turkish head brought to him.  When the
bishop received the heads, he ordered them placed on long poles,
before the walls of the city, where the enemy could see them.  When
they saw this, they squirmed in anguish.  The bishop also did
something there, after consulting with our leaders, that I should not
pass over silently; when the inhabitants of the city understood that
our men were struggling because of the scarcity of food, our men
proceeded to yoke bulls to the plow, to dig up and seed the ground in
sight of the city.  By this means the inhabitants of the city
understood that no cause could compel them to abandon the siege that
they had undertaken, since they were in the process of growing food
for the next year.  These and other remarkable things were done on
this expedition, which we think can be described in their entirety by
no one.  No one in any age has ever heard that any nation, without a
king, without a prince, departed from its own lands and that, under
God only, both the lowly and the great learned to carry the yoke, so
that the servant did not serve a master, nor did the lord claim
anything more than brotherhood from the servant.  Thus, I say, we
cannot offer examples from the past to match this, nor do we think
that anything like this will occur in the future.  Our argument is
based most of all on the fact that, after the capture of Jerusalem,
we saw so many Christian nations moving, so many people of great
dignity, so many battalions of noble knights, such a great number of
foot-soldiers setting out after those who had preceded them and
opened the way, that we understood that in wealth and in number we
might judge that this second movement was scarcely inferior to the
first.  For who could describe how great a crowd of nobles, burghers,
and peasants, from Frankish lands alone (of the others I say nothing)
accompanied count Stephen, whom we mentioned earlier, and Hugh the
Great, brother of king Philip, when, later on, they again undertook
the journey to the tomb of the Lord?  Not to speak of the count of
Burgundy, what shall I say of the count of Poitou, who brought not
only a large group of knights, but a crowd of young girls as well?
When his renown had been established everywhere, he came to
Constantinople and held a conference with the tyrant Alexis, the most
abominable of men.  This wretched traitor informed the Turks by
letters of his arrival, before the count had left the royal city.
"Lo," he said, "the fattest sheep from France are moving in your
direction, led by a foolish shepherd."  What more can I say?  The
count went beyond the borders of the tyrannical prince; suddenly
before him stood an army of Turks, who scattered, preyed upon, and
conquered the disorganized foreigners.  There Hugh the Great, struck
in the knee by an arrow, after a long illness died, and was buried at
Tharsa in Cilicia.  They say that these things were done in the
province called Satyria.[248]

But count Stephen, with certain bishops of our kingdom, among whom
were Hugh of Soissons, William of Paris, fine, noble men, who were
splendid, accomplished young rulers, and Enguerrand of Laon--would
that he had been as preeminent in his religious belief as he was in
appearance and eloquence--together with many dignitaries of all ranks,
entered the city of Constantinople.  The emperor summoned them into
his presence and rewarded their leaders with large gifts.  They
consulted with him on whether they should follow the route of the
previous army, or some other, and he truthfully told them that they
did not have enough horsemen to take a route different from that of
the first expedition.  However, thinking that they could do new
things and do them better than those who had preceded them, they
declared that they would go on to other regions.  They also asked the
emperor to give orders that they might purchase supplies anywhere in
Grecian territory.  He agreed, understanding that, in their insolence,
they were in effect bringing about their own ruin, which he foresaw
clearly, as he happily agreed to their error.  They went into
Paphligonia, province unknown not only to pilgrims, but scarcely
mentioned in Scripture, where for some unknown reason they were
persuaded to enter the desert.  The emperor urged them not to take
more than forty days worth of supplies, and discouraged them from
bringing more by promising that they could purchase supplies freely
anywhere for their entire journey through the land.  Therefore,
having marched into these solitary depths, the mob foolishly moved
forward, without supplies, hoping that the opportunity they had been
promised to make purchases would come about, and they began to suffer
from terrible hunger, swelling up and dying, and the army, which was
following behind them, began to be annoyed by the stench of corpses
lying everywhere.  At times, when the leaders of the starving
multitude castigated those in the rear for not more swiftly following
the knights in front of them, to avoid sudden attack by the Turks,
these men, driven by the pain of hunger, hoped and prayed that the
Turks would actually come.  Now they had almost reached the borders
of Armenia, and the men were exhausted, and the animals dying of
starvation, when thousands of Turks suddenly attacked.  But the
Franks, who seemed to be in charge of the front line, in spite of
their weariness, easily drove off the enemy forces.  The next day,
when the Turks saw that the Franks had moved out of the front line,
and the Lombards, Ligurians, and Italians had taken their places,
alas, the enemy sensed the sluggishness of those in the front line
and attacked fiercely.  Those who were in the vanguard and carried
the standards turned their backs shamefully, and the entire army,
already too weakened by hunger to flee, lay open to hideous slaughter.
Those who fled did not return in the direction whence they had come,
nor did they move in a single group, so that they might at least
form an organized retreat.  Instead each turned his steps in whatever
direction appealed to him, clearly going to his death.  This pursuit
and bloodshed continued steadily for almost eight days.  In the army
there was an archbishop of Milan, who had brought with him the cope,
that is, the chasuble and alb (I don't know if he brought anything
else) of Saint Ambrose.  It was adorned with gold and gems so
precious that nowhere on earth could anyone find its equal.  The
Turks took it and carried it off, and thus the foolish clerk was
punished for having been insane enough to bring so sacred an object
to barbarian lands.  Such a slaughter of Christians of both sexes
took place, so much money, clothing, gold and silver was taken, that
this one victory was enough to recompense the Turks for the losses
inflicted upon them by the first expedition.  Of the 200,00--or more,
as some argue--Christians who were there, hardly 7000 remained alive.
Count Stephen, together with several other leaders, including Harpin
of Bourges, a splendid man, and Count Stephen of Beyond-the-Saone,
finally reached Jerusalem.  When they arrived, the army of the
emperor of Babylon was at the city of Ramla, fighting Baldwin, who
was now the king.  The above-mentioned Harpin urged the king to delay
battle until he could collect as many men as possible.  The king said,
"If you are afraid, run back to Bourges."  Having spoken, he rushed
unwisely into battle, lost all of his troops, was driven from the
city of Ramla, and escaped alone.  Many of his men were captured, and
we still do not know what happened to many of them.  Harpin was led
away captive, was finally released, returned to France, and become a
monk.  Nothing certain is know about Stephen of Chartres, but he is
believed to have been killed, although we have no evidence.
Presumably he was shut up in a tower within Ramla, together with many
others, but we have not yet been able to determine from the sources
whether he was delivered into captivity or death, although we are
inclined to believe that he died, since he has never been found.
After victory, the Turks customarily decapitated the dead bodies, to
carry them as trophies of victory, and, with the heads removed, it is
difficult to recognize someone from his decapitated body.  The same
doubt exists today about the fate of other great men.  Meanwhile, the
king himself, who, as we said, was the only one to escape, was
mourned by his people, not only because they were threatened with
death themselves, but because his death had been announced mockingly
by the pagans.  He himself, however, making his way through
terrifying mountains known to very few men, two days later, if I am
not mistaken, finally reached Jerusalem, which was expecting great
dangers with justifiable grief.  When he had swiftly collected
whatever knights he could, together with the best foot-soldiers, he
prepared to fight against the temporarily triumphant pagans.
Therefore, at the moment that they thought the king was dead, he
suddenly appeared with new troops, and fought with greater authority
than before, driving them into flight, and piling up new carnage with
his sword.

Since we have not described the death of king Godfrey, Baldwin's
brother, because other material took precedence in the narrative, it
is fitting that we briefly tell how his life came to an end, and
where he is buried.  They say that a certain neighboring pagan prince
sent him gifts dipped, as became clear, in deadly poisons.  He
carelessly made use of them, thinking that he who had sent them was a
friend; he fell ill suddenly, and died very soon afterwards.  Some
people, however, reject this opinion, and say that he died natural
death.  He was, however, buried in accordance with the eternal
redemption that his faith and life testified he had deserved, next to
the very place of the Lord's Passion, thereby obtaining the monument
which he had liberated, and which he had defended from being trampled
and destroyed by the pagans.  His remarkable humility and modesty,
worthy to be imitated by monks, added glory to his already exemplary
reign, for he would never wear the royal crown in the city of
Jerusalem, out of consideration for the fact that the general author
of all men's salvation, our Lord Jesus Christ, provoked human
laughter by wearing a crown of thorns.  As we said earlier, he died,
and, believing him to be no less temperate and wise than his brother,
they brought Baldwin from Edessa, and set him up as king of the new
sacred Christian colony.  In the brilliant nature of these men they
recognized and loved the peaceful and modest behavior, the relentless
courage, the fearlessness in the face of death, which exceeded what
might be expected of royal majesty, as well as the great self-control,
and an extreme generosity that exceeded their resources.  Baldwin's
loyalty towards his people and disregard of himself can be inferred
from one event: in an expedition he was conducting against the
enemies, to save a certain foot-soldier, he put himself in great
peril, received a serious wound, and narrowly escaped death.

Meanwhile, there was something which very much frightened the many
people who surrounded them about attacking our small group, and it
frightens them no less today.  The study of the stars, in which
Westerners have only the mildest interest, is know to burn more
brightly, because of its steady use and constant study, among the
Easterners, where it had its origin.  The pagans admit that they had
received prophecy, and a long time before the present misfortune they
had predicted that they would be subjugated by the Christian people,
but they were unable, because of their limited skill, to determine at
what time the prophecies would be fulfilled.

Approximately twelve years before our leaders had gone on the journey
to Jerusalem, Robert of Flanders, the elder count, about whom we
spoke in the first book of this work, went to Jerusalem, with much
wealth, to pray.  He remained in the city for some days, wishing to
see the holy places, and his generosity enabled him to learn
much--even about what went on among the pagans.  One day, as I
learned from those who had accompanied the count, nearly all the
inhabitants of the city assembled at the temple of Solomon; they held
meeting throughout the entire day, and finally returned home in the
evening.  The count was then received as a guest by an old, wise man,
who had led a virtuous life by Saracen standards, for which reason
they usually called him, "the Servant of God."  When they returned to
his house, he asked him why they had sat so long in the temple, and
what was the nature of the difficult issues they had been disputing.
The man replied, "We have seen unusual signs in the comings and
goings of the stars, from which we have inferred that men of the
Christian belief would come to these regions and would conquer us by
means of steady and frequent victories in battle.  Whether this
should happen in a later time or closer to our own time, is
profoundly uncertain.  From this astronomical portent, however, it is
very clear that these men, whom celestial judgment has permitted to
conquer our people, and to drive us from our native shores, will, at
later time, be conquered by us, and will be driven by military force
from the lands which they usurped.  This celestial sign is in accord
with a thorough and regular reading of the ancient texts of our faith,
which openly state what the celestial brightness has indicated in
veiled manner."  The words of this noble man are in harmony with the
words of Kherboga's mother, which were given earlier.  Nor do we at
all doubt that for the same reason that she discouraged her son from
fighting against the Christians, those who burned with desire to
destroy Jerusalem restrained themselves, lest they oppose what was
clearly a fatal decree by entering a battle.  If at first they seemed
to attack us in many battles, now they fought less eagerly, since
they understood that they were not fighting against us, but against
God, who was exerting himself and fighting for us.  However, if it
seems unbelievable to anyone that someone might be able to learn the
future through the art of astrology, this argument seems clear
evidence to us: the emperor Heraclius, through this kind of study,
foresaw that a circumcised race would rise up against the Roman
empire, but he was unable through this method to foresee that it
would not be the Jews, but the Saracens who would do this.  Let us
also consider the Magi who, when they discerned by a swift inspection
of a star that a king would be born, and that he would be both God
and man, also knew over whom he would rule, although they could not
have known, by means of the method mentioned, had divine light not
pointed the way.

In this new battle of God against diabolical men, it will be
worthwhile considering the many apparent resemblances between what
happened and what happened to Gideon[249] Although everyone
considered the infinite number of our men sufficient for the
undertaking, they were tested by the waters, that is, pleasures and
delights.  That is, those who loved following God did not yield to
the tortures of hunger and thirst, nor to the fear of various forms
of death.  But those who placed God after the interest of their
bodies weakly submitted themselves to desires, symbolized by bent
knees.  Those who drank by bringing their hands to their mouths are
those who, like Diogenes, heedless of all pleasures, intent on
serving God, satisfied nature in whatever way was available.  Three
hundred were proven under Gideon, so that externally and internally
they carried the cross, which, by means of the letter Tau, signifies
the three hundred who were honored for their perseverance.  Why did
many of our men depart like wretches from the Lord's army, if not
because they were in the grip of great, steady hunger, and because,
"Without bread and wine, Venus is cold."[250]  Because their bodies
were so weak, none of them had the ability to perform sexually, and
even if they wanted to, no opportunity presented itself.  Therefore
those who were found to be wise held trumpets in their hands, because
they offered divine speech, the only solace among so many hardships,
in their works.  They hold vessels because, continually preparing for
battle, they restrained themselves from all the foulness of carnality.
Within the vessels they hold lamps, because, in the vessels of the
bodies the brilliant treasures of pious intention shine more brightly
than any light.  That Gideon divided them into three parts may be
interpreted in the following ways: Christ draws some of them to the
crown when they pour out their own blood; others he brings to guard
the sacred city, to preserve the promised land, and through these few
men today, he resists the entire empire of the East; still others he
permitted to return to their native land as testimony to such a
victory, and to urge others to emulate their own pious exile.
Therefore when the vessels are broken the lamps shine forth, because,
when their bodies died, the spirits burning with divine love
emigrated directly to God.  The frightened enemies were defeated,
because they rightly feared those men who, brave with the spirit of
eternity, embraced death more dearly than life.  As the Apostle says,
[251] "For the bodies of those beasts whose blood is brought into the
sanctuary by the high priest are burned without the camp."  Therefore
God suffered beyond the gate.  Thus they went out of the camp to him,
that is, beyond the desires of the flesh, by carrying his shame, the
mortification of the cross, in the midst of sinful desires.

The value of taking up this great task, along with the emotion of
good will can be inferred from considering the one example that we
have offered on this topic, which we think clearly demonstrates how
much those who devoutly undertook the pilgrimage, after confession
and sincere repentance, profitted, if it did such great good for
those who were almost without penitence and confession, and if it
even struck terror into the heart of the devil.

A man of knightly rank, living on the shore of the sea, lost his
brother in the fighting.  Hardly able to bear his death, he wore
himself out in inconsolable grief, since the man who had killed him
seemed so strong that the grieving man's hope of vengeance had been
entirely extinguished.  Worn out by intolerable grief, his mind
dwelling at every moment and in every place upon his brother, the
pain of his irreparable loss increased each day; without hope of
solace, the poor man was tortured by the inescapable memory, until
the difficulty of obtaining vengeance increased his distress so
greatly that the devil, whose long experience had made him crafty,
shrewder by nature than any mortal, on the lookout everywhere for
occasions and motivations, smiled at the opportunity provided by his
excessive grief.  Therefore, on a certain day, worn out by putrifying
internal anguish, gasping with the deepest weariness, he mounted his
horse and brought it to drink at a river, where he saw the devil
standing on the other side.  He appeared in the guise of man with
crooked legs, whom he often used to see.  He seemed to be a knight,
holding a sparrow-hawk in his hand, wearing his usual orange-yellow
tunic.  After watching him from afar, and remembering the weakness
and the look of the man whom he thought he had known, he was struck
by the unexpected change, when the evil spirit, mindful of its
ancient effrontery, spoke first: "I am not who you think I am: know
that I am a Devil, sent to offer a remedy for the torment you undergo
every day.  My master, who compassionately deigns to help all those
who suffer, if they submit to him, sent me to you.  If you obey him,
just as I say, your relief will not be delayed.  For since he is
generous, and possesses an infinite treasure of things to be
distributed to those with a desire for riches, he gives lavish and
incalculable gifts; to those in need he provides assistance beyond
their wildest hopes.  Therefore you, who bitterly bewail an old
misfortune that remains ever new, if you have a complaint, share it,
certain in the knowledge that you will receive far more than you
might dare to ask for.  In the case of your dead brother, you can
certainly hasten to take vengeance; if you want increased wealth, you
will be amazed to see your wish granted.  Therefore ask for what you
want, and your ability will be equal to your wish."  He had been
watching this truly unusual creature, stunned that the devil was
speaking, both attracted by the alluring offer and frightened by the
enormity of the one making the offer.  However, finally carried away
by his desire for what he was being promissed, he said that he would
gratefully accept the Devil's offerings.  "However," the Devil said,
"if the fruits of my offerings appeal to you, and the freely given
benevolence of my prince, who sent me to you, captivates you, when
you have truly experienced the results of what I have said, both
about avenging your brother and adding to your wealth, then my master
requires that you offer him homage, by promising to transfer your
allegiance from the Christian faith to cling indivisibly to him, and
by abstaining from those things that he forbids.  There are certain
things that he wishes you to agree never to do: never enter a church,
or accept baptism from a sacred font."  He also forbad a third thing,
which escaped the memory of the person who told me about this.  The
man replied to him: "I can adhere to these prohibitions easily and
without delay, but I ask for a short delay on the subject of offering
homage."  Since he had the free use of his rational faculty, the man
very much abhorred the execrable change of faith that was being
demanded of him, but he thought that it was more tolerable to abstain
from Christian practices than to lose the foundation of his belief.
Finally, without delay, the opportunity for taking vengeance for his
brother, following the suggestions of the Devil, was offered to him,
in such a way that the fondest wishes of the man were far surpassed
by his increasing good fortune.  In this way, as the remedy grew more
effective, the bitterness of his grief gradually diminished, but
meanwhile he did not dare violate any of the Devil's prohibitions.
The ancient enemy of mankind continued to appear to him regularly,
not only, as he used to do, when he was alone, or in out of the way
places, but in the midst of a crowd of people he would suddenly make
an unexpected appearance, point out the benefits he had already
received, offer him better ones in the future, and insistently urge
him to transfer his faith to him.  The man, however, extremely
grateful for the generosity he had received, promised eternal
obedience to the generosity of the prince, but in the matter of the
homage which was often demanded of him, he continually begged for
delays.  Therefore, while he was being pressed insistently by these
appearances, even invisible ones in the midst of large crowds, news
of the journey to Jerusalem spread, by the will of God, throughout
the Latin world.  Whoever felt that he was caught in sin was directed
thither, where God showed a new way to repent.  Among them this man
chose to set out, although he had not confessed the foul pact he had
already almost entirely concluded with the Devil.  Thus this man,
eager to emulate God, although not in keeping with doctrine, in that
he had not confessed his sins before beginning his good works, was
accompanied by such an abundance of the grace of God on the journey,
and his labor was so pleasing to God, even though his efforts were
not performed out of pure piety, that while traveling on this
expedition the grim overseer did not dare to harass him.  Moreover,
as though he had no memory of the pact he had made, he never in any
way appeared to him in a vision.  After the capture of Jerusalem,
when he was staying in the city with the others, one night, while he
was thought to be asleep, along with the other soldiers, he became
concerned about the horses that belonged to him and to his companions,
who were resting under the sky, as was the custom in that region,
and he went to look at them.  Seeing the figure of man standing among
them, and suspecting that he was a thief, he got up and asked, in a
disturbed voice, who he was.  In his usual manner, as though pious
and humble, he replied to him: "Don't you know me?"  And he, as
though reminded of his old shame, replied with great severity: "I
know you."  After this initial exchange, the one offered no further
questions, and the other added nothing to his reply.  Although this
apparition seems to have been idle, we know that it is of no idle
significance to us, by God's dispensation; the Devil had not
forgetfully passed him by, but had announced, by his appearance, what
he wanted, and had indicated, by his silence, what he was unable to
ask for.  What more should I say?  He went home, but on his way home
the Devil never showed himself, or made any trouble.  But a short
time after he arrived home, he who provides wretched men with wicked
counsel was aroused, so that the man had very few moments free from
admonishments of this kind; men may put some distance between
themselves and what they fear, and their rooms and walls may separate
them from their anxieties, but neither the presence of other people,
nor the locks on doors can protect them from their spiritual crimes,
no matter where they go.  One day, the man who had undergone
excruciating, deadly suffering at the hands of the indivisible thief
happened to meet a priest of Christ, distinguished for his learning,
gentleness, and pious cheerfulness, whose name was Conon.  When he
had described, in the little time available (each was concerned with
his journey), how much he had endured, the good man gave him whatever
comfort he was able to give, extracted the promise that he would
return, and sent him on his way.  However the cruel beast did not
remain silent, but persistently continued to offer enticements.  The
man soon grew weary of the burdensome and almost daily incursions,
and returned to the doctor, made a clean confession, eagerly
undertook penitence, and, once he had begun repentance, never again
saw his tormentor.  By this example we can understand how valuable
the pilgrimage must have been for the pure in heart, since it offered
so much defense and support for the impure.

It is also significant that for good reasons kings were excluded from
participating in the grace to be earned from this journey, lest the
visible royalty seem to arrogate to itself divine operations.[252]
Therefore praise should be offered to the heavenly Lord, and utter
silence to the human being.  No leader assembled so many soldiers, or
deserved so many triumphs.  Regulus deserved praise for beating the
Phoenician rebels.  Alexander, battling the Eastern kingdoms, worn
out with great battles, managed to acquire the name of the Great.
However, Count Stephen, who had been granted the leadership of the
holy army, like a man who had recklessly usurped those things that
properly belong to God alone, was rejected as though charged with
cowardice.  And Hugh the Great, in effect, a man of royal name, was
put aside.  Therefore, when the "shades of a great name"[253] were
rejected, and the power which had supported them was removed, the
little people remained, relying now on God's aid only.  And when
things were decided, not according to birth, but according to God's
choice, the unexpected one wore the crown.[254]  God, who makes
miracles, did not want the glory of his name given to another, for he
was the sole leader, he was the king, the chastiser, who brought
things from their beginnings to their conclusions, who extended his
kingdoms this far.  Therefore he gathered into His,not their arms,
the lambs whom he had made out of wolves, raised them, children
filled with the joy of pious hope, to the protection of his bosom,
and he carried them to what they had longed to see.

As we were about to put an end to the body of the present history, we
discovered, with the aid of the author of the world, that a certain
Fulker, a priest of Chartres, who had for a long time been the
chaplain for Baldwin at Edessa, had spread word, in a manner
different from ours, about a few other things that were unknown to us,
and these were erroneous and in rough language.  We decided to
include some, though certainly not all, of this material in these
pages.  Since this same man produces swollen, foot-and-a-half-long
words,[255] and pours forth the blaring colors of vapid rhetorical
schemes, I prefer to snatch the bare limbs of the deeds themselves,
with whatever sack-cloth of eloquence I have, rather than cover them
with learned weavings.  Unless I am in error, at the beginning of his
little work he says that some of those who set out on the journey to
Jerusalem arranged for boats and sailed across the sea that separates
Apulia and Epirus, and, whether because they committed themselves to
a sea that was unknown to them, or because the ships sank because
overloaded, it is reported that the ship carrying nearly 600 men was
dashed to pieces.  After they were drowned in the roaring sea during
storm, and quickly washed up on shore by the force of the waves,
signs of the cross which they all wore on their cloaks, tunics, and
mantles were found on the skin of their shoulders.  No one, that is,
of the faithful, doubted that the sacred stigma could have been
imprinted on their skin by God, to make their faith manifest, but the
man who wrote it, if he is still alive, had to think carefully about
whether it actually happened.  For when the beginning of this journey
was announced everywhere among the Christian people, and it was
proclaimed throughout the Roman Empire in accordance with God's will,
men of the lowest social class, and even worthless women, laid claim
to this miracle in every way, in every part of their bodies.  One man
scratched his cheeks, drew a cross with the flowing blood, and showed
it to everyone.  Another showed the spot in his eye, by means of
which he had been blinded, as a sign that a heavenly announcement had
urged him to undertake the journey.  Another, either by using the
juices of fresh fruits, or some other kind of dye, painted on some
little piece of his body the shape of a cross.  As they used to paint
the area below the eyes with antimony, so they now painted themselves
green or red, so that, by means of this fraudulent and deceitful
exhibition, they might claim that God had showed himself in them.
The reader will remember the abbot of whom I spoke above, who cut his
forehead with iron, and who I said was made the bishop of Caesarea in
Palestine.  I swear by God that I saw, when I was living in Beauvais,
in the middle of the day, clouds approach each other somewhat
obliquely, so that they scarcely seemed to form anything other then
the shape of a crane or a stork, when suddenly many voices from
everywhere in the city cried out that a cross had been sent to them
in the sky.  What I am about to say is ridiculous, but has been
testified to by authors who are not ridiculous.  A poor woman set out
on the journey, when a goose, filled with I do not know what
instructions, clearly exceeding the laws of her own dull nature,
followed her.  Lo, rumor, flying on Pegasean wings, filled the
castles and cities with the news that even geese had been sent by God
to liberate Jerusalem.  Not only did they deny that this wretched
woman was leading the goose, but they said that the goose led her.
At Cambrai they assert that, with people standing on all sides, the
woman walked through the middle of the church to the altar, and the
goose followed behind, in her footsteps, with no one urging it on.
Soon after, we have learned, the goose died in Lorraine; she
certainly would have gone more directly to Jerusalem if, the day
before she set out, she had made of herself a holiday meal for her
mistress.  We have attached this incident to the true history so that
men may know that they have been warned against permitting Christian
seriousness to be trivialized by belief in vulgar fables.

Finally, the same author claims that God appeared to Pyrrus, the man
who betrayed Antioch, and commanded him in vision to betray the city.
This was easy to do for him who made himself audible to Cain and
Hagar, and made an angel visible to an ass.  Certainly all those who
returned after the capture of the sacred city, and who sent to us
letters about the things that happened, particularly Anselm of
Ribemont, said no such thing.  Anselm makes no mention of Pyrrus, but
reveals that it was betrayed by three men.  According to the letter,
before the three leaders engaged in serious discussions about handing
over the city, they offered us a false peace, promising that they
would soon thereafter give up the city.  The mutual confidence that
resulted was so great that they sometimes welcomed Franks within the
walls of the city, and their men often mingled with ours.  But when
our army became less watchful and too comfortable, the Turks set
ambushes and killed some Franks, and themselves suffered losses.
There our men lost an excellent young man, who had been the constable
for the king of the Franks, and his name was Gualo.[256]

Fulcher denies the discovery of the Lord's Lance, claiming that the
man who discovered it was exposed as false, and punished by death in
the trial by fire which he undertook.  Not only do recent testimonies
contradict him on this event, but the most pious ancient writers
stipulate that long ago, when they visited the Holy Places, before
the Turks invaded the kingdoms of the East and of Syria, they used to
worship and kiss this same lance in that city.  Will the cleverness
of the priest Fulcher, who, while our men were suffering from
starvation at Antioch, was feasting at ease in Edessa, prevail over
the inspired work of the wise men who died at the time that it was
found?  Baldwin, who ruled this Edessa after the previous Baldwin, in
his letter to Archbishop Manassa said that it was found by means of
the revelation of Saint Andrew, and that it instilled bravery and
faithful confidence in our men to battle the attacking Turks.  Was
the worthy bishop of Puy so foolish as to have carried a lance of
questionable authenticity with such reverence when he went out to
fight Kherboga?  A certain memorable event occurred there: when
Kherboga ordered the grass to be burned, the bishop saw that the
dense smoke was pouring into the faces and eyes of the Franks as they
rushed into battle, and he held the holy Lance in front of him, while,
with his pious right hand, he made the image of the cross in the
face of the rising smoke, tearfully imploring the aid of all-powerful
Jesus; then, swifter than speech, his piety sent the round mass of
foul smoke right back at those who had sent it.  In addition, to
speak about the death of the man who found the Lance, who is said to
have died few days after undergoing the trial by fire, I shall say
how he died, although no one is certain whether he was harmed by the
flames, if they tell me why he who had received the gift of tongues
according to Gregory destroyed his limbs with his own teeth.

Furthermore, if I am not mistaken, he adds that, while they were
maintaining the siege of Antioch, a brilliant red light, like a fire,
shone in the night above the army, and it also unmistakably took the
form of a cross.  Some of the wise men there related the fire to
future battles, and said that the appearance of a cross was a sign of
certain salvation and victory to come.  We do not call this an error,
for many witnesses confirm this testimony.  About this, I say, leaky
Parmeno should be able to keep silent.[257]  Something like this
occurred at the beginning of the journey, which I happened to pass
over earlier[258] when I spoke of the movements of the eclipses and
shooting stars which were seen.  One day during the summer, towards
evening, such a great fire appeared in the Northern sky that many
people rushed from their homes to find out who was the enemy
destroying their lands with such flames.  All these events we firmly
believe to have been portents of the wars which were to come.  And
now, having put aside the things that we thought might be treated
separately, let us return to the order of the narrative.

No one can express how courageously Jerusalem was defended by its
inhabitants during the siege.  You would have seen how they had
learned to hurl stones at the ballistic machines, how to cover their
walls with timber and mats, and how to hurl what they called Greek
fire at the machines, since they knew that the greatest difficulty
for the besiegers was the lack of material.  But the Franks, known
for their cleverness, quenched the raging fire by sprinkling vinegar
on it; in addition, they struck with sharp scythes anything found
hanging over the walls.  The Saracens added iron hooks to their long
spears, with which they struck our men who, dressed in cuirasses,
were fighting from the tops of machines; drawing their swords, our
men made sticks out of their spears.  But what best showed the
vehement commitment of the Saracens was the fact that when one of
them was struck by one of our men, the shield of the man who had been
struck was snatched up, quicker than speech, by another man, who took
up the place from which the first had fallen, so that none of our men
could have known that his blows had wounded any of them.

When the city was fortunately captured, Bohemund, who had won the
right to rule, by means of the hunger, cold, and loss of blood
suffered by the Franks, preferred to remain there, rather to go on to
trouble about liberating the tomb of Jesus Christ.  And while he was
inappropriately fighting to win a house and small tower, he lost the
fruit and joy of all of his previous labor.  What good would it have
done him to run, when he was unwilling to understand in which
direction to go?  However, since he had until this time performed so
well for the army of the Lord, both in arms and in counsel, it is not
inappropriate to weave a few words into the text at this point, to
indicate how it came about that he went.  When he sent a messenger to
Baldwin at Edessa, asking him also to come with him to look at the
tomb of the Savior, Baldwin held back from rushing off to besiege the
city, not because he was greedy, but because he had to look after his
own city.  The city was filled with Christians, and often endured the
attacks of the surrounding Gentiles.  After the man had promised to
go on the journey, both men gathered large numbers of knights and
foot-soldiers, since they feared not only those, but nearly everyone
in the surrounding territory, and they set off for Jerusalem.  After
they had pitched their tents together, and nearly 20,000 men had
assembled, a terrible lack of food began to assail them, so that they
had nothing to put on their bread, and no bread on which to put
anything.  The supplies of the provinces, drained by the constant,
various sieges, and the extended and lengthy expeditions that had
passed through them, were in no way sufficient to maintain so many
animals and men.  Therefore the multitude, driven by the wretched
lack of food, again resorted to their earlier strategy of eating the
flesh of asses and horses, and they not desist from this practice
until they reached the longed-for city of Tiberias, famous for having
fed 5000 men under the Lord's guidance.  There for a little while
their mad hunger was relieved by a plentiful supply of food, and then
they went on at last to Jerusalem, where they found a huge number of
stinking bodies, hacked to pieces, so that they could not breathe
without the stench penetrating their noses and mouths.  They were
welcomed joyfully by king Godfrey, and they remained there because
Christmas was approaching.  They celebrated Christmas at Bethlehem,
as the judgement of reason would dictate, not only because they had
come together there with a mutual purpose, but also because of the
unexpected victory granted in their own time, which aroused
unbelievable celebration among the Franks.  After they left, each for
his own territory, Bohemund was attacked by a large Turkish force as
he was entering a certain city, and led away as a captive to a
distant region of Persia.  When news of this event reached the
illustrious Tancred, he hurried as quickly as he could to occupy
Antioch, and to fortify Laodicia, since both were under Bohemund's
control.  Robert, the count of Normandy, held Laodicea first, but
when the city's inhabitants could no longer bear the taxes levied by
this prodigal man, they drove the guards from the citadel, freed
themselves from his authority, and, out of hatred for him, abjured
the use of the coinage of Rouen.  After some years in prison,
Bohemund's release was finally obtained by a treaty and a ransom.

Since much has been said earlier, my praise of Godfrey's great
knightly prowess can be brought to a conclusion by using the words of
the Baldwin whom I just mentioned, the son of count Hugo of
Rethel[259] When king Baldwin came to the throne he was put in charge
of Edessa, but, alas, a band of Turks attacked him[260] and he was
imprisoned by the pagans, and if he is alive, he is still there.
This is what he said, although clothed in my words, about Godfrey:
"It happened on the holiday of Saint-Denis.  The king was returning
from a city called Morocoria, and 120 Turks lay in ambush, while he
was accompanied by only twenty knights.  Fearlessly we awaited their
attack, gripping our arms, while they, because they had attacked
suddenly, thought that we would flee because we were so few.  But we,
made more audacious by the aid we had continually experienced from
God, upon whom we relied spiritually, attacked the barbarians, and
wreaked such havoc upon them, that we killed eighty men and captured
ninety horses."  Then he remembered, with a mocking smile, those who
had fled from Antioch, and those who, after they had carried out
their mission in Constantinople, had put off returning, and, to
inspire the Franks who had remained in France, he added the following
about his own fortune: "We have a vast fortune, and, not counting the
treasures that belong to others, ten castles that belong to me alone,
and an abbey pay me annually total of 1500 marks.  And if God favors
my taking Aleppo, I shall soon have 100 castles under my command.  Do
not believe those who have retreated, claiming that we grow weary
with hunger, but rather trust in my words."

When this king left his noble life for a more blessed future life,
the inhabitants of Jerusalem, mindful of his temperance and mildness,
and afraid of losing his nobility of lineage, sent ambassadors to his
brother, the duke of Edessa, to take control of the kingdom.  He
lived in splendor in his realm; whenever he went out he had a gold
shield carried before him, which bore the image of an eagle, in the
Greek manner.  Like the pagans, he went about in a toga, let his
beard grow, accepted bows from his worshippers, and ate on rugs laid
on the ground.  If he entered one of his towns or cities, two knights
blew two trumpets before his chariot.  Baldwin then yielded to the
ambassadors and set off for Jerusalem.  But when the neighboring
pagans heard what he proposed to do, and saw him depart, they
embarked in their ships, with a favoring wind, although in vain,
since the duke was hurrying along the sandy banks of the sea,
accompanied by a small group of men, while they rowed furiously,
their prows plowing the waves, striving to intercept him, hurrying to
bring their ship to the shore.  But the duke, with all of his mortal
strength gone,[261] in his great anguish called upon the Most High,
promising that he would always obey Him and that he would rule the
kingdom in accordance with Christian faith.  And lo, the ships which
had been moving as though they had wings now stood still as though
stuck in mud, and the more each man struggled to sweep the sea with
his oars, the more the hope was ridiculed by the steady backward
movement of their boats.  Thus the efforts of the unjust were
confounded, and the duke remained deservedly free, seeing in this
auspicious event a sign that heaven favored his assuming the purple.
I have omitted mentioning the fact that Daimbert, the bishop of Pisa,
had already set out for Jerusalem, together with group of his people,
accompanied by the bishop of Apulia, by Bohemund, and by this very
Duke.

After he accepted the kingdom, it is said that his first expeditions
were undertaken against the Arabs.  When he reached the slopes of
Mount Sinai, he found a barbaric group of people, who resembled the
Ethiopeans.  He spared their lives because of their untamed behavior
and ugliness.  There, in the church which is called Saint Aaron,
where God had given his oracles to our fathers, he prayed, and the
army drank from the fountain of refutation, where, because Moses had
drawn a distinction with his lips, and did not sanctify the Lord in
the presence of the sons of Israel,[262] the Lord kept him from the
promised land.  Here the opinion of my priest has faltered, for it is
is known that not Sinai, but the mountain Or, which forms the border
of the ancient city of Petra in Arabia, was the place where Aaron
lost his life, and water emerged from the depths of the rock which he
struck.

In that holy city of Jerusalem, an ancient miracle renewed itself,
and I call it ancient because the Latin world does not know when it
begun.  Our conjecture is that it began when, after the city had
begun to be trampled by pagans, before our times, the Lord granted it
both to those who lived there, and to those who happened to be there
at that time.  Every year, on the Sabbath of Easter, the lamp of the
Lord's tomb seemed to be kindled by divine power; it was the custom
in that city that the pagans went through everyone's house,
extinguishing every fire, leaving only ashes in the hearths; the
pagans made such a search, because they thought that the miracle was
the product of the fraud, and not of the faith of the faithful.  When
Vulcan had been turned out by this means from the city, at the hour
at which our religion's law has determined that the Catholic people
are to be present at the service of the solemn resurrection and
baptism, you would have seen pagans moving throughout the basilica
with their swords drawn, threatening to kill our people.  You would
also have seen those natives who worshipped our faith entrusting
their profound grief to God, both those whose prayers had drawn them
from the furthest reaches of the world, and those who had come
because of the miracle, all to pray singlemindedly for the gift of
light.  Nor was there any unsuitable delay, but the passionate
request was granted swiftly.  I have heard from some old men who went
there that the papyrus or wick (I don't know which of them was used)
was once removed by a pagan's trick, and the metal remained empty,
but, by means of a miracle from heaven, when light shone from the
metal, he who wanted to defraud the heavenly powers learned that
natural forces fight even against their own natures for their God.

In the year that Baldwin accepted the sceptre from his predecessor,
it is said that the miracle was obtained with such difficulty that
night was almost upon them before their prayers and tears were
answered.  The priest mentioned above delivered a sermon to the
people, asking for sinners to confess; the king and the priest urged
them to make peace among themselves, and they promised to remedy
whatever was contrary to faith and to virtue.  Meanwhile, because of
the urgency of the matter, so many hideous crimes were confessed that
day, that if penitence did not follow, it would have seemed correct
for the sacred light to have been removed without delay; however,
soon after the reproof, the lamp was lit.  The next year, when the
time came for the celestial flame to make the tomb glorious, all men
lifted up their prayers from deep within.  Greeks and Syrians,
Armenians and Latins, each in his own language, called upon God and
his saints.  The king, the leaders, and the people, with penance and
grief in their hearts, marched behind the priests; all men were
racked with pain, because, since the day that the city was won by the
Christians, things had happened there that they had never heard of
happening under the pagans.  Fulker of Charters, however, taking with
him the chaplain of the patriarch Daimbert, went to the Mount of
Olives, where the lamp of God used to appear when it did not come to
Jerusalem.  When they returned, bringing nothing to please the ears
of the expectant Church, many sermons were delivered to the people,
which gave no solace to those who were suffering, but rather cause
for anguish.  That day, when the miracle did not happen, everyone
returned home; there was a double night, with bitter sadness
tormenting their breasts.  The next day they decided to make a
procession, with appropriate mourning, to the Temple of the Lord.
They went, without the joy of Easter, dressed no differently from the
day before, when suddenly, behind them, the keepers of the temple
proclaimed that the lamp of the sacred monument was lit.  Why do I
delay?  On that day such grace shone, augmented abundantly by the
delay, that the brilliance of God illuminated, although not
simulataneously, but sequentially, approximately fifty lamps.  Not
only during the sacred mysteries, but even when the king, after
services were over, ate in the palace, messengers came frequently to
summon him to leave the table to see the lights newly lit.  One
cannot describe how much grief was changed to relief when, on that
day, he agreed to what he never had consented to before, to be
crowned king in that city, in the house of the Lord, in
acknowledgement of the Lord's gift.

Then the Franks, who had redeemed the city with their blood, eager to
see their parents, sons, and wives, and perhaps confident in their
number and bravery, decided to return to their own sweet home by the
same land route they had taken when they came.  Although they thought
that they would be able to pass freely through the land surrounding
Nicea, which they had seized earlier, the Turks, who had been placed
there by the emperor once the city had been turned over to him to
impede the Franks when the occasion arose, put up strenuous
resistance to them.  Unless I am mistaken, my priest[263] says that
they cut to pieces 100,000 men, but I fear that the man is wrong in
offering such a number, because it is the case that he is eager to
offer such guesses elsewhere.  For example, he dares to estimate that
those who set out for Jerusalem numbered 6,000,000.[264]  I would be
surprised if all the land this side of the Alps, indeed if all the
kingdoms of the West, could supply so many men, since we know for a
fact that at the first battle before the walls of Nicea scarcely 100,
000 fully-equipped knights are reported to have been present.  And if
he was concerned with including all those who had gone on the journey,
but who died, on land and on the sea, of sickness or hunger, in the
various regions through which they passed, they still would not
amount to such a great number of men.  After the Franks, then, had
suffered hideous carnage, most of those who had survived returned to
Jerusalem, having lost what they owned.  The generous king genuinely
commiserated with them, gave them many gifts, and persuaded them to
return to their homeland by sea.

But the prince of Babylon, less concerned with the loss of Jerusalem
than with the proximity of the Frankish settlement, set out to launch
a heavy offensive against the new king, often striving to attack the
port city of Acre.  Count Robert of Normandy had besieged Acre when
the army of the Lord was advancing to besiege Jerusalem, but duke
Godfrey had brought him away, in expectation of a more successful
undertaking.  The Babylonian then gathered a vast army and challenged
the Christian king to battle.  He gathered his small band, to whom
the Lord said, "Fear not,"[265] and, setting his troops in order as
well as he could, he attacked the impious ones.  Killing them swiftly,
like brute beasts, he scattered them, like a hurricane driving dust.
A second time he sent his 9000 knights forward, supported by 20,000
Ethiopean common foot-soldiers.  The pious king assembled against him
scarcely 1000 knights and foot-soldiers, forming seven battalions out
of them, and he sent them with great confidence directly at the
thickest ranks of the enemy.  When the prince saw far off a pagan
knight, he rushed at him with such force that he drove his spear,
together with its standard, into the man's breast, and when he pulled
the spear from the wound, the standard remained in the man's breast.
Frightened by the courage of the prince and his men, the enemy
retreated at first, but their courage returned, because of the
strength of their numbers, and they united to attack our men,
compelling them to think of fleeing.  They said that this misfortune
had happened to them because, in their foolishness, they had not
brought the cross of the Lord to this battle.  They said that, guided
by a Syrian or some Armenian, they found this cross, which, like the
Lance, had lain buried somewhere.  They drew a lesson from this
incident, which was more blemish of a victory in the process of being
won than defeat, and when the army of the Babylonian prince, as
strong as the previous one, came forward to fight for the third time,
the splendid king, together with what forces he could gather,
deriving his confidence from God, went up against them.  After he had
drawn up his troops as well as he could, the clash of men was so
great that, although the armies were unequal, both sides suffered
severe losses, as 6000 pagan soldiers, and 100 Christians, lay dead.
And because they had no prideful concern for banners with eagles and
dragons, they raised aloft the sign of the humiliating Crucifixion,
the Cross, and as praiseworthy conquerors drove their enemies to
flight.

When they had been driven off, as was right, he assembled as much of
a larger army as he could, and surrounded the extraordinary city of
Palestinian Caesarea, with no concern for the number of men, but
instead for their might.  Siege engines were quickly built, many
ballistic machines were drawn up around the walls, and a beam with a
metal front, which was called a battering ram, was put in place.
Towers were prepared and moved forward at different times, whose
armed men not only rained down torrents of various kinds of missiles
on the Saracens who were standing on the battlements of the walls,
but who also struck and slew them with their swords.  There you would
have seen catapults with huge rocks not only striking the external
walls, but delivering the weight of harsh blows to the city's lofty
palaces.  As they smashed the building and walls, they also used
sling-shots to scatter sticks burning with liquid lead, to set the
town on fire.  Meanwhile the battering-ram crashed against the walls;
as it began to open a hole in the lower part of the wall, all the
surrounding structures began to crack.  Then, while the Franks
struggled to enter, and eagerness to attack drove the Saracens to
come forth, blood was shed on both sides.  When one of our machines
fell, killing many of our men, both sides became more courageous, for
the Saracens, who do not like fighting in open combat, were
remarkably competent when on the defensive.  On the twentieth day of
the siege, the king, supported by the best of his young knights,
attacked the inhabitants fiercely, suddenly leaping from an assault
tower, with one knight behind him, onto the wall, and driving the
enemy into flight.  The Franks swiftly followed the king,
annihilating multitudes throughout the city, sparing no one, except
the young women who could become slaves.  Treasure was sought
everywhere; they cut open not only chests, but the throats of the
silent Saracens.  When they were struck by a fist, their jaws yielded
the besants that had been poured into them.  They found pieces of
gold in the wombs of the women who had used these areas for purposes
other than the ones for which they were intended.  A contingent of
Franks was promptly left to guard the captive city, and shortly
thereafter the king marched to Acre, wore it down with daily attacks,
until it submitted to his authority.  He is known to have captured
many other cities, but since they were located in the middle of the
insane pagans, he could not be sure that our colonists would be safe
there.  The series of battles and victories made the Saracens
increasingly contemptible to the Christians; For example, here is
something that we learned happened last year.

A certain knight,[266] whom the king had made prefect of the city of
Tiberias, behaved insolently towards the king.  Angry at the man's
insolence, the king ordered him to leave the land he had been given.
He hastened to leave, taking with him as his retinue two armed
knights, and soon encountered a large troop of pagans.  Putting his
trust not in the number of his own men, but in God, he tore his shirt,
which they call an undertunic, placed it as a banner on his spear,
and commanded his companions to do the same.  They did so, cried out
loudly, spurred their horses forward, and charged headlong at their
enemies.  Frightened by the sudden attack, and thinking that a large
army was following these men, they fled, leaving themselves mortally
vulnerable to these three men.  Many were killed, and more booty was
taken than they could carry.  Returning after this event, grateful to
God, he was moved to prostrate himself before the king and he
promised that he would faithfully obey him from that point on.

Once, when the king was suffering from a great lack of money, and did
not have enough to pay the monthly stipend to his knights, divine
mercy suddenly and miraculously granted aid.  Things had become so
difficult that the servants and knights were thinking of leaving,
when the young men of Joppa, washing themselves, or rather enjoying a
swim in the sea, on a certain day found in the swirling sand and
water sacks filled with large amounts of gold, which the Venetians
had lost here in a shipwreck.  Brought to the king, they offered
solace to everyone, an amazing miracle, both to the king, who had
been close to despair, and to the new Christian community.

But since the charge has been spread about that the king repudiated
his wife, here is what is said about it.  His wife was descended from
the finest pagans in the land, and in obedience to him, she followed
her husband to Jerusalem, arriving by ship at the port of
Saint-Simeon.  There she was transferred to a faster ship, in an
attempt to make the trip more quickly, but she was brought by
unfavorable winds to certain island inhabited by Barbars.  The
islanders seized her, killed a bishop of her retinue, together with
some other officials, and, after holding her captive for some time,
finally released her.  When she reached her husband, the king,
suspicious, and not unreasonably, of the Barbars' sexual incontinence,
banished her from his bed, changed her mode of dress, and sent her
to live with other nuns in the monastery of Anne, the blessed mother
of the virgin mother of God.  He himself was glad to live the
celibate life, because, "his struggle was not against the flesh and
blood, but against the rulers of the world"[267]

Around the time of Easter last year, the knight I mentioned earlier,
whom we called the prefect of Tiberiad, and who had been victorious
in that battle, was involved in another encounter, less fortunate for
our men, in which he was captured, and brought alive by the pagans to
a city belonging to them.  During I don't know which one of their
sacrilegious celebrations, they brought this knight out and urged him
to renounce and to abjure his own belief.  Splendidly obdurate, he
rejected such criminal behavior, and was horrified even to hear such
a suggestion.  This praiseworthy man was immediately seized, tied, as
they say, to a tree that stood in the middle of a field, and was torn
by a hail of arrows from all sides.  The crown was then sawed from
his head, and the rest was made into the form of a cup, as though to
hold drinks for the king of Damascus, by whose orders these acts had
been done, to frighten our men.  By dying to preserve the confession
of his faith, this knight made himself a martyr who would be known
for ages to come.  His name was Gervais, of noble blood, from the
castle of Basilcas[268] in Soissons.

These are the things that, by the grace of God, we have found out
from entirely reliable men up to this day.  If, in following the
opinions of other men, we have said anything false, we have not done
so with the intention of deceiving anyone.  We are grateful to God,
the Redeemer of this holy City, through the efforts of our people.
For when the siege of the city began, He himself revealed, to an
anchorite living in Bethania, as the story has been reliably told to
us, that the city would be besieged furiously, but that it would be
entered on Easter day, at the hour at which Christ was brought to the
cross, to demonstrate that He again redeemed it from its afflictions
by the suffering of his own limbs.  This anchorite then called
together some of our leaders, and told them these things, which were
all proven true by the manner in which the city was actually captured.
We thank God for having composed these deeds with his own spirit,
through our mouth.  For the rest, if anyone thinks that we have not
laid things out as diligently as Julius Caesar and Hirtius Pansa[269]
did in the history of the Gauls, Spaniards, Pharsalians, Alexandrians,
and Numidians, he should carefully consider the fact that the same
people who waged the wars wrote them down.  As a result, nothing
general or particular that happened is omitted from their accounts.
They tell how many thousands of men there were, how many from each
region, who the princes were, to whom power was delegated, who the
leaders and princes were on the other side, what the cavalry, what
the lightly armed troops did, how many shields were pierced by
javelins, and, if I may use their own words, "after the consuls and
their officers had sounded the retreat," how many men were missing
and wounded at the end of the battle.  Since another profession
detains us who write this history, and our confidence is not
strengthened by what we saw, we have decided, in reporting what we
have heard, to exercise restraint.  Observing the discipline of the
Julian Quirites,[270] the officers of the legions, the troops of
cavalry, the common soldiers, and the cohorts were compelled to rally
around their banners, and if the locations were favorable, and in
suitable places they set up their encampments, as though they were
towns or cities, with moats and towers.  Before they set up battle
lines, they occupied the neighboring mountains, taking into account
the irregularities of the terrain, and they had large numbers of
servants, workers, and expensive baggage.  Since almost nothing like
these arrangements and activities existed among our men, their deeds
were due, I shall not say to Frankish courage, but rather to their
strength and their aroused faith.  Let those who wish say that I have
omitted more than I have written: I prefer being less to being more.
If anyone knows other things that were done, let him write what he
please.  We thank God and such victors, who, when they had no grain,
learned to feed upon roots that they dug up.  If anyone is in doubt
about the name of the Parthians, whom we have called Turks, or of the
Caucasus, let him read Solin on Wonders, Trogus-Pompeius on the
origin of the Parthians, and Jordanus the Goth on the Getae.  May God
stand watch as this pious work comes to an end.--


Endnotes

[1] A translation into French was done more than 170 years ago by F.
Guizot, in v. 9 of his *Collection des memoires relatifs a
l'histoire de France*, Paris, 1825.

[2] John Benton, *Self and Society in Medieval France*, New York,
1970; Guibert de Nogent, *Autobiographie*, edited and translated
by Edmond-Rene Labande, Paris, 1981; Paul J. Archambault, *A
Monk's Confessions*, University Park, 1995. The *Monodiae*,
however, was also not popular in its own time.  No medieval writer
mentions the work, and no manuscript has survived.  See Labande's
edition, pp. xxiii-xxviii, for a discussion of the editorial problems
that stem from being compelled to work from BN. f.l.  Baluze 42. For
recent discussion of Guibert, see M.D. Coupe, "The personality of
Guibert de Nogent reconsidered," *Journal of Medieval History* IX,
no. 4 [Dec. 1983], pp. 317-329, which supplies summary and judgement
of the work of J. Kantor, Benton, and others.  See also Jacques
Charaud, "La conception de l'histoire de Guibert de Nogent,"
*Cahiers de civilisation medievale* VIII (1965), pp.
381-395, and Klaus Schreiner, "Discrimen veri ac falsi," *Archive
fur Kulturgeschicht* XLVIII (1966), pp. 1-51. Both Charaud and
Schreiner are concerned to demonstrate the degree to which Guibert's
vision of history is ruled by theology, and tropology in particular;
both articles can be read as respectful corrections of Bernard Monod,
"De la methode historique chez Guibert de Nogent," *Revue
historique* 84 (1904), pp. 51-70. Unfortunately, Laetitia Boehm's
thesis, *Studien zur Geschichtschreibung des ersten Kreuzzuges
Guibert von Nogent*, Munich, 1954, has remained unpublished.  Georg
Misch also makes an attempt to characterize Guibert, for the most
part on the basis of Book One of the *Monodiae*, in
*Geschichte der Autobiographie*, vol. 3, part two, first half,
Frankfurt, 1959, pp. 108-162

[3] Early in the *Memoirs* Guibert says that his father died
eight months after his own birth; later he gives the time between his
birth and his father's death as scarcely six months; in both
instances he neglects to give the year.

[4] Characteristics at work also in his other writings; see Guibert's
*De pignoribus sanctorum* (Migne PL 156.607-684) for an extended
attack on those who believe in the wrong relics.

[5] *Journal of Medieval History* 2 (1976), p. 299 (of pp.
281-303).

[6] See Louis Brehier's edition and translation, *Histoire
anonyme de la premiere croisade*, Paris, 1924; for a later
edition, see Rosalind Hill, *Gesta Francorum*, London, New York,
1962.

[7] Baldric of Dole and Robert the Monk also insistently added to the
story of the First Crusade what Riley-Smith (pp. 135-153) calls
"theological refinement."

[8] Brehier 119-125.

[9] Brehier 155.

[10] Brehier 133-135.

[11] For a preliminary study of Guibert's diction, see Eitan Burstein,
"Quelques remarques a propos du vocabulaire de Guibert de Nogent,"
*Cahiers de civilisation medievale*, XXI (1978), pp.
247-263.

[12] *La tradition manuscrite de Guibert de Nogent*, The Hague,
1991, p. 20. Last year, however, in a note informing me of the
impending publication of his edition of the <Gesta Dei>, Professor
Huygens reported that he has changed his mind.  The latest modern
edition is more than 100 years old, *(Recueil des Historiens des
Croisades, Historiens Occidentaux* IV, Paris, 1879, pp. 115-263),
and Professor Huygens, the latest reader of the eight surviving
manuscripts of the *Gesta Dei per Francos*, finds the edition
pretentious, orthographically aberrant, and of no philological value
whatever.

[13] Guibert perhaps has some support for this preference: In Praeloq.
2.30 212A Rather of Verona quotes Ambrose on interpreting the
difficulties of scripture: *quod difficilius invenitur, dulcius
tenetur*."

[14] 339, n. 3

[15] 1973 613.

[16]p. 255.

[17] *De Moribus et Actis primorum Normanniae Ducum*, ed. Jules
Lair, Caen, 1865.

[18] (eds.) J. Olrik and H. Raeder, *Saxonis Gest Danorum*, 1931,
1957, Hauniae, 2 vols. *The History of the Danes*, translated by
Peter Fisher, ed. H.E. Davidson, Totowa, 1979, 1981, 2 vols.

[19] For the significance and influence of Martianus, see W.H. Stahl,
R. Johnson, and E.L. Burge, *Martianus Capella and the Seven
Liberal Arts*, NY, 1971; Danut Shanzer, *A philosophical and
literary commentary on Martianus Capella's De Nuptiis Philologiae et
Mercurri, book one*, Berkeley, 1986.

[20] For a densely compacted discussion of this hypothesis, see
Herbert Grundmann, *Geschichtsschreibung im Mittelalters*,
Gottingen, 1965. For a more extensive, lavishly detailed
discussion, see Bernard Guenee, *Histoire et culture historique
dans l'occident medieval*, Paris, 1980. In English, the
argument was popularized by R.G. Collingwood, *The Idea of
History*, Oxford, 1946; p. 258 gives a useful formulation.

[21] Aimon's early eleventh-century rewriting of both Gregory of
Tours sixth-century text and the eighth-century *Liber Historiae
Francorum* is only roughly comparable, since he was much further
removed in time from the authors whose work he was correcting.  See
Gregory of Tours, *Historiae Francorum*, edited by W. Arndt and
Bruno Krusch, *Monumenta Germaniae Historica, Scriptores Rerum
Merovingicarum*, vol.  I, Hanover, 1885; Aimon, *De Gestis
Francorum*, pp. 20-143 of *Recueil des historiens des Gaules et
de l France*, ed. M. Bouquet, vol.  III, 1869, pp. 20-143; Bruno
Krusch, *Fredegarii et Aliorum Chronica; Monumenta Germaniae
Historica*: Scriptorum Rerum Merovingicarum, Hanover, 1888.

[22] Two editions are available: *Recueil des Historiens des
Croisades, Historiens Occidentaux* III, Paris, 1866, pp. 319-585;
*Fulcheri Carnotensis Histori Hierosolymitana*, ed. Heinrich
Hagenmayer.  Heidelberg, 1913.

[23] A judgement contained within the less sardonic assessment,
almost nine hundred years later, by Ernest Baker, who called Fulcher,
"a kindly old pedant," in the *Encyclopaedia Britannica*, 11th
edition, Cambridge, 1910.

[24] Guibert decision to insert verses of his own composition, in a
variety of meters, some unusual, in his predominantly prose text,
also seems to be an attempt to outdo Fulker, who had chosen to
compose occasional verse for his predominantly prose text, although
he limited himself to hexameters and elegaics.

[25] Quod ego Fulcherus Carnotensis, cum ceteris iens peregrinis,
postea, sicut oculis meis perspexi, diligenter et sollicite in
memoriam posteris collegi.  (RHC.HO III.327) The case for the
*Gesta Francorum* as a text composed by an eye-witness is
inferential only.

[26] Isidore of Seville, *Etymologies*, I, XLI, ed. W.M Lindsay,
Oxford, 1911. See also Bernard Guenee on the topos of the
eye-witness, in *Histoire et culture historique dans l'occident
medieval*, Paris, 1980. For a paradigmatic example of the
difficulties generated by trying to determine whether a medieval text
of an historical nature is the product of an eyewitness, see Stubbs'
argument (Rolls Series 38.1) that the *Itinerarium Regis Ricardi*
is the product of an eyewitness of the Third Crusade, then Gaston
Paris' argument that *L'Estoire de la guerre sainte*, Paris, 1897
is the eye-witness account that the author of the *Itinerarium*
was translating, and then Hans Eberhard Mayer, *Das Itinerarium
peregrinorum*, Stuttgart, 1962, for the argument that neither is an
eye-witness account; see also the discussion in M.R. Morgan, *The
Chronicle of Ernoul and the Continuations of William of Tyre*,
Oxford, 1973, pp. 61 ff..

[27] See E.R. Curtius, *European Literature and the Latin Middle
Ages*, New York, 1953, pp. 83-85.

[28] Translation by Rosalind Hill, London, 1962, p. 44.

[29] Translated by H. Rushton Fairclough, *Horace*, London, 1966,
p. 465.

[30] Guibert's behavior in this respect suggests that the anxiety of
influence which Harold Bloom assigned primarily to the English
Romantic poets existed earlier and more extensively ( *Anxiety of
Influence*, Oxford, 1973).

[31] III Reg xii.10; II Par x.10.

[32] Book VII, p. 239.

[33] See Appendix A.

[34] Jeremiah III.27,28.

[35] A term Paul Zumthor introduced in "Roman et Gothique," in
*Studi in honore di Italo Siciliano*, Florence, 1966, vol.  II, p.
1227.

[36] For evidence that Guibert was remarkably fastidious in his
attitude towards his literary production, or at least towards three
of his theological compositions, see Monique-Cecile Garand, "Le
Scriptorium de Guibert de Nogent," *Scriptorium* 31 (1977), pp.
3-29.

[37] See Robert Levine, "Satiric Vulgarity in Guibert de Nogent's
*Gesta Dei per Francos," Rhetorica* 7 (1989), pp. 261-273.

[38] Although he calls the Pope a fine Latinist, instead of giving
Urban's words at Clermont, Guibert rewrites them, *etsi non verbis,
tamen intentionibus*, "not word for word, but according to what he
meant."  For an attempt, on the basis of the various surviving
representations of Urban's performance at Clermont, to determine what
the Pope actuually said, see D.C. Munro, "The Speech of Pope Urban II
at Clermont," *American Historical Review* XI (1906), pp. 231-242.
For objections to Munro's technique, see Paul Rousset, *Les
origines et les caracteres de la premiere croisade*, Geneva, 1945,
p. 58.

[39] See W. Porges, "The Clergy, the Poor, and the Non-Combatants on
the First Crusade," *Speculum* 21 (1946), pp. 1-20; Jean Flori,
"Faut-il rehabiliter Pierre l'Ermite?" *Cahier de civilisation
medievale* XXXVIII (1995), pp. 35-54.

[40] See Appendix A.

[41] Labande, I.xvii, pp. 135 ff..

[42] A task for which Heinrich Hagenmeyer's *Chronologie de la
premiere croisade*, Hildesheim, 1898-1901, provides a sound
basis.

[43] Whenever possible, the modern spellings are taken from the
Gazetteer provided in *A History of the Crusades*, ed. by
Kenneth M. Setton and M.W. Baldwin, Madison, 1969, vol.  I, pp.
626-666.

[44] *paregorizantis*, "curative," a rare word, used by Augustine.

[45] Horace AP 105.

[46] One of the names of Mars.

[47] Literally, never goes beyond Mercurial moderation.

[48] An area in northeast Persia, but used as a general term for the
Near East by the Western chroniclers of the First Crusade.

[49] Gnaeus Trogus Pompeius, a contemporary of Livy, wrote 44 books,
of which only an epitome by Justin survives.

[50] I Kings xii.10; II Chronicles x.10.

[51] Translation by J.D. Duff, *Lucan*, Cambridge, 1969. "of
one's own blood," is the more literal translation.

[52] Lucan I. 8,9,12.

[53] Albert of Aix uses the same comparison several times within one
paragraph to describe the joys of the Crusaders about to attack
Ascalon: they are *tanquam ad convivium pergentes laetati*, then
the pagan prefect of Ramna, noticing that the Christians are singing
and rejoicing, *tanquam ad epulas omnium deliciarum invitati
essent*, remarks: Miror, et sufficienter mirari nequeo unde populus
hic in tanta laetitia et voce exultationis glorietur, quasi ad
convivium iturus.  (RHC IV.492)

[54] That is, children.

[55] Proverbs xxx.27.

[56] The first printed edition offers *genuinae*, where MS A
offers *geminae*.

[57] That is, Helena.

[58] Psalm 63.7

[59] Genesis III.17,18.

[60] Died c. 336 A.D..

[61] Died c. 274 A.D.

[62] Ephesians 5.27.

[63] A.D. 249-251.

[64] buccella intinctio.

[65] Iznik (Turkish).

[66] abortivis? _________

[67] Jacob V.4.

[68] Psalm 80.13.

[69] Psalm 9.21

[70] Psalm 146 (147)20

[71] Robert I, count of Flanders, 1071-1093. The letter is printed in
*Epistulae et chartae ad historiam primi belli sacri sectantes*,
edited by Heinrich Hagenmayer, Innsbruck, 1901, pp. 129-136

[72] Michael VII Ducas, Parapinaces, 1071-1078.

[73] He was the son of Eucherius, master of Lageri.

[74] Elected abbot of Cluny in 1049.

[75] Odo, nephew of Urban II.

[76] Stephen II, 752-757; Zacharias, 741-752.

[77] Pepin compelled Astolphus to restore Ravenna and other cities to
Stephen in 755.

[78] Last Lombard king, 756-774.

[79] A reference to the struggle between Emperor Henry IV and Gregory
VII; see Uta-Renate Blumenthal, *The Investiture Controversy*
Philadelphia, 1988.

[80] Paschal came to France in 1107, with Philip I on the throne.
Isidore of Seville (IX.ii.101) offers two derivations for "Franks."
*Franci a quodam proprio duce vocari putantur.  Alii eos a feritate
morum nuncupatos existimant* The archdeacon of Mainz clearly was
referring to their animal-like behavior.

[81] Jeremiah III.27,28.

[82] An error by Guibert or by the scribe; the council of Clermont
began 18 November, 1095.

[83] Sidonius Apollinarus uses *piperata facundia* in Book VIII,
epistle xi, of the *Poems and Letters*, ed. W.B. Anderson,
Cambridge, 1984, vol I.

[84] Mathew 27.53.

[85] Isaiah 11.10.

[86] Eccl. 1.7

[87] II Thess. ii.4

[88] II Thess ii.3

[89] Luke xxi.24.

[90] John VII.6

[91] II Thess ii.3.

[92] Isaiah 43.5.

[93] Presumably Peter and Paul.

[94] Psalm 47.8.

[95] Psalm 77.7.

[96] These seven elegiacs are the first verses Guibert inserts in the
*Gesta Dei*.

[97] Rom X.2

[98] Classical Latin for a conical column.

[99] In French, *moisson* means "harvest."

[100] Izmit, on the sea of Marmara.  The *Gest Francorum* begins
here.  A more specific account of the difficulties that produced the
separation from the Franks can be found in Albert of Aix, RHC IV.284.

[101] Franci a quodam proprio duce vocari putantur.  Alii eos a
feritate morum nuncupatos existimant.  Sunt enim in illis mores
inconditi, naturalis ferocitas animorum.  The French are thought to
derive their name from one of their leaders.  Others think that they
derive their name from the ferocity of their behavior.  For they are
naturally fierce.  (Isidore of Seville, Etymologies, ____________ ed.
W.M. Lindsay, Oxford, 1962, vol. 2).

[102] Asia Minor, or the entire Byzantine empire.

[103] Xerigordo, according to Anna Comnena; today, Eski-Kaled.

[104] September 29, 1096.

[105] Guibert here rejects the perhaps more pathetic scene in the
*Gesta Francorum* (Brehier 8): *alii mingebant in pugillo
alterius et bibebant*.

[106] Eight elegiacs.

[107] Ten elegiacs.

[108] Sometimes given the epithet, *sine habere*, "the Penniless."

[109] Gemlik, now abandoned.

[110] Iznick, on the lake of the same name.

[111] Twelve Asclepiadeans.  At this point, the *Gest Francorum*
gives only *quemdam sacerdotem missam celebrantem, quem statim
super altare martirizaverunt*, "a priest celebrating mass, whom
they immediately martyred on the altar."

[112] Two dactyls, the second line borrowed from Horace, Sat I.97.

[113] Durazzo.

[114] This single elegiac may contain a scribal error, confusing
Alemannus with Lemanus (Lake Geneva).  The epitaph reads: Hic terror
mundi Guiscardus, hic expulit urbe Quem Ligures regem, Roma,
Alemannus habet.  Parthus, Arabs, Macedumque phalanx non texit Alexim,
At fuga; sed Venetum, nec fuga, nec pelagus.

[115] A single dactylic hexameter.

[116] In the Latin, *de prima civitate Richardum*, glossed (p.
152) as *Richardum de Principatu, vel Principem*.

[117] Edirne (Turkish) in Bulgaria.

[118] Today, the Vardar.

[119] Ash Wednesday.

[120] Today, Ruskujan.

[121] "outside of the city wall" is my version of *brugo*,
uninhabited land, a field not under cultivation.

[122] Suetoniuis, Caesar 80: Gallias Caesar subegit, Nicomedes
Caesarem.

[123] For whatever facts can be assembled about the siege, see R.
Rogers, *Latin Siege Warfare in the Twelfth Century*, Oxford,
1992, pp. 16-25.

[124] Four dactylic hexameters.

[125] Tomyris dips Cyrus' head in a bag of blood in Herodotus I CCV.
Tibullus (IV.i.143 ff.) alludes to the story, and Valerius Maximus
(IX.x) uses the story to illustrate vengeance.

[126] 99 Adonic verses kata stichon, followed by 13 dactylic
hexameters.

[127] Lamentations II.9

[128] Matthew XX.12.

[129] Two dactylic hexameters.

[130] Three dactylic hexameters.

[131] Fourteen elegiacs.

[132] The *Gesta Francorum* had given the number as 360,000,
Anselm of Ribemont as 260,000. (Brehier 49).

[133] An elegiac couplet.

[134] Deut XXXII.30.

[135] Kilidj-Arslan

[136] one hexameter.

[137] Spikes of cactus, perhaps, or making flour?

[138] Konya (Turkish).

[139] Ereghli (Turkish)

[140] One dactylic hexameter.

[141] Paul.

[142] Adana.

[143] Mamistra (medieval), Mopsuestia (classical), Msis (Armenian),
Misis (Turkish).

[144] Thoros.

[145] Selevgia (West Armenian), Silifke (Turkish).

[146] Horace *Ars Poetica* 180-181.

[147] John III.32

[148] Kayseri

[149] Placentia, or Comana.

[150] Goksun.

[151] Riha, perhaps.

[152] Rouveha, perhaps.

[153] Marash

[154] Oct 21, 1097

[155] Aregh

[156] Sallust, Jugurtha 85.

[157] Aleppo.

[158] Eleven stanzas of sapphics.

[159] Lucan I.135.

[160] i.e., become emaciated

[161] Fourteen heptameters.

[162] Juvenal 6.443.

[163] Fourteen dactylic hexameters."

[164] Seven dactylic hexameters.

[165] February 9.

[166] Two dactylic hexameters.

[167] Rom X.2.

[168] Sultan.

[169] Psalm 81.8.

[170] Psalm 78.6.

[171] Psalm 92.3.

[172] Romans 9.25

[173] I Mac. v.62.

[174] Acts IX.25; II Cor XI.33

[175] Sixteen dactylic hexameters.

[176] One dactylic hexameter.

[177] Scatter them that they may know that no other than you, our
Lord fights for us.  Scatter them by your power, and destroy them,
our protector, Lord.  (Eccl. xxxvi.1)

[178] Iskenderum.

[179] Aksehir.

[180] Hebrews XII.6.

[181] Or "miracle" in B.

[182] Miraculous intervention at this point is reported also in the
*Gesta Francorum*, (Brehier 154), and in a letter published by
Hagenmayer (*Epistulae et Chartae* 167), but neither Raymond nor
Fulcher mention it.

[183] Malach.III.10

[184] August 1, 1098.

[185] IV Kings.v.12

[186] At this point manuscript I adds: Jerome says, in the fifth book
of his explication of Isaiah, that Antioch was the city of Reblata,
in which king Nabugodonosor tore out the eyes of king Sedechia, and
killed his sons.

[187] Latin for "red."

[188] Ma'arrat-an-Nu'man.

[189] Kafartab.

[190] Rafaniya.

[191] Abou Ali Ibn Ammar.

[192] Raymond, vicount of Torena.

[193] Job 2.4

[194] Latakia.

[195] Djebali

[196] Among the Romans, *iustitium* was a day on which no
business can be undertaken due to natural disaster

[197] Judges XVII.6.

[198] Manassas II of Chatillon died in 1106. Anselm's letters have
survived and appear in *Epistulae et chartae ad historiam primi
belli sacri spectantes*, ed. Heinrich Hagenmeyer, Innsbruck, 1901,
pp. 144-146 and 156-160.

[199] October 31.

[200] Botron.

[201] Jubail.

[202] Nahir-Ibrahim.

[203] Saida.

[204] I Kings 17.9.

[205] Tyre.

[206] Ramla.

[207] I Kings I.

[208] Robert, a Norman cleric.

[209] Psalm 21.30.

[210] John IX.7.

[211] Guibert has elided the assertion in the *Gest Francorum*
that the Arabs had poisoned the wells, substituting instead these
remarks sympathetic to the class from which he sprung.

[212] Joshua VI.20.

[213] The author of the *Gesta Francorum* gives his name as
Gaston Bearn.

[214] Part of a dactylic hexameter couplet.

[215] Three elegiac lines.

[216] Two dactylic hexameters.

[217] Psalms 121.1.

[218] 48 iambic trimeters.

[219] Guibert multiplies the single *nuntius* of the *Gesta
Francorum* into *legati*.

[220] Sichem, then Flavia Neapolis, then Nabulus.

[221] Arnulf of Martirano.

[222] The *Gesta Francorum* reports the presence of the animals
without attributing them to any Arabian design.

[223] One dactylic hexameter.

[224] Two dactylic hexameters.

[225] Psalm 92.4.

[226] Three dactylic hexameters.

[227] Isaiah 43.5.

[228] Zech 12.2.

[229] Galatians 2.2.

[230] Zechariah 12.2.

[231] Zechariah 12.3.

[232] Zechariah 12.3.

[233] Luke 21.24.

[234] Ezekiel 29.18.

[235] Zechariah 12.4.

[236] Zechariah 12.4.

[237] Zechariah.12.5.

[238] Zechariah 12.6.

[239] Zechariah 12.6.

[240] Zechariah 12.7

[241] Zechariah 12.8.

[242] Zechariah 12.8.

[243] Zechariah 12.9.

[244] Psalm 2.8.

[245] Apoc 2.27; 19.15.

[246] Zecharia 12.10.

[247] 5.5.

[248] It is not clear what this province is.  The RHC editor
tentatively suggests "Isauria."

[249] Judges VI, VII, VIII.

[250] Terence *Eunuch* 4.6.6.

[251] Hebrews 13 II.

[252] Three times in the course of the last book of the *Gesta
Dei* Guibert finds something positive in the absence of Western
kings on the expedition to Jerusalem.  Among the practical reasons
for their absence: (1) Philip I and the Holy Roman Emperor were
excommunicate at the time; (2) William Rufus was anticlerical and
otherwise occupied; (3) the Italian rulers were absorbed with local
problems.

[253] Lucan I.135.

[254] Ecclesiasticus 11.5.

[255] Horace, Ars Poetica 97.

[256] Robert the Monk, RHC.HO III, p. 794, provides a longer passage
on Gualo.

[257] In Terence's *Eunuch* (I.ii.105), the slave Parmeno says he
can keep silent about the truth, but must immediately speak (or leak)
what is a lie.

[258] RHC IV 149F.

[259] 1066-1118.

[260] 1104.

[261] One dactylic hexameter.

[262] Numbers XX.2-13; XXIII.38.

[263] Fulker.

[264] In RHC, p. 333, Fulker mentions 600,000.

[265] Luke 12.32.

[266] The *Gesta Francorum* gives his name: Gervais de Bazoches.


The Deeds of God through the Franks
(C)1997  by Robert Levine






E-text Editor: Alfred J. Drake, Ph.D.





THE PICTURE OF DORIAN GRAY
1890, 13-CHAPTER VERSION



CONTENTS

Chapter I: 3-12
Chapter II: 12-22
Chapter III: 22-32
Chapter IV: 32-36
Chapter V: 36-43
Chapter VI: 43-52
Chapter VII: 52-58
Chapter VIII: 58-64
Chapter IX: 65-77
Chapter X: 77-81
Chapter XI: 81-86
Chapter XII: 86-93
Chapter XIII: 94-100



CHAPTER I

[3] The studio was filled with the rich odor of roses, and when the
light summer wind stirred amidst the trees of the garden there came
through the open door the heavy scent of the lilac, or the more
delicate perfume of the pink-flowering thorn.

From the corner of the divan of Persian saddle-bags on which he was
lying, smoking, as usual, innumerable cigarettes, Lord Henry Wotton
could just catch the gleam of the honey-sweet and honey-colored
blossoms of the laburnum, whose tremulous branches seemed hardly able
to bear the burden of a beauty so flame-like as theirs; and now and
then the fantastic shadows of birds in flight flitted across the long
tussore-silk curtains that were stretched in front of the huge
window, producing a kind of momentary Japanese effect, and making him
think of those pallid jade-faced painters who, in an art that is
necessarily immobile, seek to convey the sense of swiftness and
motion.  The sullen murmur of the bees shouldering their way through
the long unmown grass, or circling with monotonous insistence round
the black-crocketed spires of the early June hollyhocks, seemed to
make the stillness more oppressive, and the dim roar of London was
like the bourdon note of a distant organ.

In the centre of the room, clamped to an upright easel, stood the
full-length portrait of a young man of extraordinary personal beauty,
and in front of it, some little distance away, was sitting the artist
himself, Basil Hallward, whose sudden disappearance some years ago
caused, at the time, such public excitement, and gave rise to so many
strange conjectures.

As he looked at the gracious and comely form he had so skilfully
mirrored in his art, a smile of pleasure passed across his face, and
seemed about to linger there.  But he suddenly started up, and,
closing [4] his eyes, placed his fingers upon the lids, as though he
sought to imprison within his brain some curious dream from which he
feared he might awake.

"It is your best work, Basil, the best thing you have ever done,"
said Lord Henry, languidly.  "You must certainly send it next year to
the Grosvenor.  The Academy is too large and too vulgar.  The
Grosvenor is the only place."

"I don't think I will send it anywhere," he answered, tossing his
head back in that odd way that used to make his friends laugh at him
at Oxford.  "No: I won't send it anywhere."

Lord Henry elevated his eyebrows, and looked at him in amazement
through the thin blue wreaths of smoke that curled up in such
fanciful whorls from his heavy opium-tainted cigarette.  "Not send it
anywhere?  My dear fellow, why?  Have you any reason?  What odd chaps
you painters are!  You do anything in the world to gain a reputation.
As soon as you have one, you seem to want to throw it away.  It is
silly of you, for there is only one thing in the world worse than
being talked about, and that is not being talked about.  A portrait
like this would set you far above all the young men in England, and
make the old men quite jealous, if old men are ever capable of any
emotion."

"I know you will laugh at me," he replied, "but I really can't
exhibit it.  I have put too much of myself into it."

Lord Henry stretched his long legs out on the divan and shook with
laughter.

"Yes, I knew you would laugh; but it is quite true, all the same."

"Too much of yourself in it!  Upon my word, Basil, I didn't know you
were so vain; and I really can't see any resemblance between you,
with your rugged strong face and your coal-black hair, and this young
Adonis, who looks as if he was made of ivory and rose-leaves.  Why,
my dear Basil, he is a Narcissus, and you--well, of course you have
an intellectual expression, and all that.  But beauty, real beauty,
ends where an intellectual expression begins.  Intellect is in itself
an exaggeration, and destroys the harmony of any face.  The moment
one sits down to think, one becomes all nose, or all forehead, or
something horrid.  Look at the successful men in any of the learned
professions.  How perfectly hideous they are!  Except, of course, in
the Church.  But then in the Church they don't think.  A bishop keeps
on saying at the age of eighty what he was told to say when he was a
boy of eighteen, and consequently he always looks absolutely
delightful.  Your mysterious young friend, whose name you have never
told me, but whose picture really fascinates me, never thinks.  I
feel quite sure of that.  He is a brainless, beautiful thing, who
should be always here in winter when we have no flowers to look at,
and always here in summer when we want something to chill our
intelligence.  Don't flatter yourself, Basil: you are not in the
least like him."

"You don't understand me, Harry.  Of course I am not like him.  I
know that perfectly well.  Indeed, I should be sorry to look like
him.  You shrug your shoulders?  I am telling you the truth.  There
is a fatality about all physical and intellectual distinction, the
sort of fatality that [5] seems to dog through history the faltering
steps of kings.  It is better not to be different from one's fellows.
The ugly and the stupid have the best of it in this world.  They can
sit quietly and gape at the play.  If they know nothing of victory,
they are at least spared the knowledge of defeat.  They live as we
all should live, undisturbed, indifferent, and without disquiet.
They neither bring ruin upon others nor ever receive it from alien
hands.  Your rank and wealth, Harry; my brains, such as they are,--my
fame, whatever it may be worth; Dorian Gray's good looks,--we will
all suffer for what the gods have given us, suffer terribly."

"Dorian Gray? is that his name?" said Lord Henry, walking across the
studio towards Basil Hallward.

"Yes; that is his name.  I didn't intend to tell it to you."

"But why not?"

"Oh, I can't explain.  When I like people immensely I never tell
their names to any one.  It seems like surrendering a part of them.
You know how I love secrecy.  It is the only thing that can make
modern life wonderful or mysterious to us.  The commonest thing is
delightful if one only hides it.  When I leave town I never tell my
people where I am going.  If I did, I would lose all my pleasure.  It
is a silly habit, I dare say, but somehow it seems to bring a great
deal of romance into one's life.  I suppose you think me awfully
foolish about it?"

"Not at all," answered Lord Henry, laying his hand upon his shoulder;
"not at all, my dear Basil.  You seem to forget that I am married,
and the one charm of marriage is that it makes a life of deception
necessary for both parties.  I never know where my wife is, and my
wife never knows what I am doing.  When we meet,--we do meet
occasionally, when we dine out together, or go down to the duke's,--
we tell each other the most absurd stories with the most serious
faces.  My wife is very good at it,--much better, in fact, than I am.
She never gets confused over her dates, and I always do.  But when
she does find me out, she makes no row at all.  I sometimes wish she
would; but she merely laughs at me."

"I hate the way you talk about your married life, Harry," said Basil
Hallward, shaking his hand off, and strolling towards the door that
led into the garden.  "I believe that you are really a very good
husband, but that you are thoroughly ashamed of your own virtues.
You are an extraordinary fellow.  You never say a moral thing, and
you never do a wrong thing.  Your cynicism is simply a pose."

"Being natural is simply a pose, and the most irritating pose I
know," cried Lord Henry, laughing; and the two young men went out
into the garden together, and for a time they did not speak.

After a long pause Lord Henry pulled out his watch.  "I am afraid I
must be going, Basil," he murmured, "and before I go I insist on your
answering a question I put to you some time ago."

"What is that?" asked Basil Hallward, keeping his eyes fixed on the
ground.

"You know quite well."

"I do not, Harry."

[6] "Well, I will tell you what it is."

"Please don't."

"I must.  I want you to explain to me why you won't exhibit Dorian
Gray's picture.  I want the real reason."

"I told you the real reason."

"No, you did not.  You said it was because there was too much of
yourself in it.  Now, that is childish."

"Harry," said Basil Hallward, looking him straight in the face,
"every portrait that is painted with feeling is a portrait of the
artist, not of the sitter.  The sitter is merely the accident, the
occasion.  It is not he who is revealed by the painter; it is rather
the painter who, on the colored canvas, reveals himself.  The reason
I will not exhibit this picture is that I am afraid that I have shown
with it the secret of my own soul."

Lord Harry laughed.  "And what is that?" he asked.

"I will tell you," said Hallward; and an expression of perplexity
came over his face.

"I am all expectation, Basil," murmured his companion, looking at
him.

"Oh, there is really very little to tell, Harry," answered the young
painter; "and I am afraid you will hardly understand it.  Perhaps you
will hardly believe it."

Lord Henry smiled, and, leaning down, plucked a pink-petalled daisy
from the grass, and examined it.  "I am quite sure I shall understand
it," he replied, gazing intently at the little golden white-feathered
disk, "and I can believe anything, provided that it is incredible."

The wind shook some blossoms from the trees, and the heavy lilac
blooms, with their clustering stars, moved to and fro in the languid
air.  A grasshopper began to chirrup in the grass, and a long thin
dragon-fly floated by on its brown gauze wings.  Lord Henry felt as
if he could hear Basil Hallward's heart beating, and he wondered what
was coming.

"Well, this is incredible," repeated Hallward, rather bitterly,--
"incredible to me at times.  I don't know what it means.  The story
is simply this.  Two months ago I went to a crush at Lady Brandon's.
You know we poor painters have to show ourselves in society from time
to time, just to remind the public that we are not savages.  With an
evening coat and a white tie, as you told me once, anybody, even a
stock-broker, can gain a reputation for being civilized.  Well, after
I had been in the room about ten minutes, talking to huge overdressed
dowagers and tedious Academicians, I suddenly became conscious that
some one was looking at me.  I turned half-way round, and saw Dorian
Gray for the first time.  When our eyes met, I felt that I was
growing pale.  A curious instinct of terror came over me.  I knew
that I had come face to face with some one whose mere personality was
so fascinating that, if I allowed it to do so, it would absorb my
whole nature, my whole soul, my very art itself.  I did not want any
external influence in my life.  You know yourself, Harry, how
independent I am by nature.  My father destined me for the army.  I
insisted on [7] going to Oxford.  Then he made me enter my name at
the Middle Temple.  Before I had eaten half a dozen dinners I gave up
the Bar, and announced my intention of becoming a painter.  I have
always been my own master; had at least always been so, till I met
Dorian Gray.  Then--But I don't know how to explain it to you.
Something seemed to tell me that I was on the verge of a terrible
crisis in my life.  I had a strange feeling that Fate had in store
for me exquisite joys and exquisite sorrows.  I knew that if I spoke
to Dorian I would become absolutely devoted to him, and that I ought
not to speak to him.  I grew afraid, and turned to quit the room.  It
was not conscience that made me do so: it was cowardice.  I take no
credit to myself for trying to escape."

"Conscience and cowardice are really the same things, Basil.
Conscience is the trade-name of the firm.  That is all."

"I don't believe that, Harry.  However, whatever was my motive,-- and
it may have been pride, for I used to be very proud,--I certainly
struggled to the door.  There, of course, I stumbled against Lady
Brandon.  'You are not going to run away so soon, Mr. Hallward?' she
screamed out.  You know her shrill horrid voice?"

"Yes; she is a peacock in everything but beauty," said Lord Henry,
pulling the daisy to bits with his long, nervous fingers.

"I could not get rid of her.  She brought me up to Royalties, and
people with Stars and Garters, and elderly ladies with gigantic
tiaras and hooked noses.  She spoke of me as her dearest friend.  I
had only met her once before, but she took it into her head to
lionize me.  I believe some picture of mine had made a great success
at the time, at least had been chattered about in the penny
newspapers, which is the nineteenth-century standard of immortality.
Suddenly I found myself face to face with the young man whose
personality had so strangely stirred me.  We were quite close, almost
touching.  Our eyes met again.  It was mad of me, but I asked Lady
Brandon to introduce me to him.  Perhaps it was not so mad, after
all.  It was simply inevitable.  We would have spoken to each other
without any introduction.  I am sure of that.  Dorian told me so
afterwards.  He, too, felt that we were destined to know each other."

"And how did Lady Brandon describe this wonderful young man?  I know
she goes in for giving a rapid precis of all her guests.  I remember
her bringing me up to a most truculent and red-faced old gentleman
covered all over with orders and ribbons, and hissing into my ear, in
a tragic whisper which must have been perfectly audible to everybody
in the room, something like 'Sir Humpty Dumpty--you know--Afghan
frontier--Russian intrigues: very successful man--wife killed by an
elephant--quite inconsolable--wants to marry a beautiful American
widow--everybody does nowadays--hates Mr. Gladstone--but very much
interested in beetles: ask him what he thinks of Schouvaloff.'  I
simply fled.  I like to find out people for myself.  But poor Lady
Brandon treats her guests exactly as an auctioneer treats his goods.
She either explains them entirely away, or tells one everything about
them except what one wants to know.  But what did she say about Mr.
Dorian Gray?"

[8] "Oh, she murmured, 'Charming boy--poor dear mother and I quite
inseparable--engaged to be married to the same man--I mean married on
the same day--how very silly of me!  Quite forget what he does--
afraid he--doesn't do anything--oh, yes, plays the piano--or is it
the violin, dear Mr. Gray?'  We could neither of us help laughing,
and we became friends at once."

"Laughter is not a bad beginning for a friendship, and it is the best
ending for one," said Lord Henry, plucking another daisy.

Hallward buried his face in his hands.  "You don't understand what
friendship is, Harry," he murmured,--"or what enmity is, for that
matter.  You like every one; that is to say, you are indifferent to
every one."

"How horribly unjust of you!" cried Lord Henry, tilting his hat back,
and looking up at the little clouds that were drifting across the
hollowed turquoise of the summer sky, like ravelled skeins of glossy
white silk.  "Yes; horribly unjust of you.  I make a great difference
between people.  I choose my friends for their good looks, my
acquaintances for their characters, and my enemies for their brains.
A man can't be too careful in the choice of his enemies.  I have not
got one who is a fool.  They are all men of some intellectual power,
and consequently they all appreciate me.  Is that very vain of me?  I
think it is rather vain."

"I should think it was, Harry.  But according to your category I must
be merely an acquaintance."

"My dear old Basil, you are much more than an acquaintance."

"And much less than a friend.  A sort of brother, I suppose?"

"Oh, brothers!  I don't care for brothers.  My elder brother won't
die, and my younger brothers seem never to do anything else."

"Harry!"

"My dear fellow, I am not quite serious.  But I can't help detesting
my relations.  I suppose it comes from the fact that we can't stand
other people having the same faults as ourselves.  I quite sympathize
with the rage of the English democracy against what they call the
vices of the upper classes.  They feel that drunkenness, stupidity,
and immorality should be their own special property, and that if any
one of us makes an ass of himself he is poaching on their preserves.
When poor Southwark got into the Divorce Court, their indignation was
quite magnificent.  And yet I don't suppose that ten per cent of the
lower orders live correctly."

"I don't agree with a single word that you have said, and, what is
more, Harry, I don't believe you do either."

Lord Henry stroked his pointed brown beard, and tapped the toe of his
patent-leather boot with a tasselled malacca cane.  "How English you
are, Basil!  If one puts forward an idea to a real Englishman,--
always a rash thing to do,--he never dreams of considering whether
the idea is right or wrong.  The only thing he considers of any
importance is whether one believes it one's self.  Now, the value of
an idea has nothing whatsoever to do with the sincerity of the man
who expresses it.  Indeed, the probabilities are that the more
insincere the man is, the more purely intellectual will the idea be,
as in that case it [9] will not be colored by either his wants, his
desires, or his prejudices.  However, I don't propose to discuss
politics, sociology, or metaphysics with you.  I like persons better
than principles.  Tell me more about Dorian Gray.  How often do you
see him?"

"Every day.  I couldn't be happy if I didn't see him every day.  Of
course sometimes it is only for a few minutes.  But a few minutes
with somebody one worships mean a great deal."

"But you don't really worship him?"

"I do."

"How extraordinary!  I thought you would never care for anything but
your painting,--your art, I should say.  Art sounds better, doesn't
it?"

"He is all my art to me now.  I sometimes think, Harry, that there
are only two eras of any importance in the history of the world.  The
first is the appearance of a new medium for art, and the second is
the appearance of a new personality for art also.  What the invention
of oil-painting was to the Venetians, the face of Antinous was to
late Greek sculpture, and the face of Dorian Gray will some day be to
me.  It is not merely that I paint from him, draw from him, model
from him.  Of course I have done all that.  He has stood as Paris in
dainty armor, and as Adonis with huntsman's cloak and polished boar-
spear.  Crowned with heavy lotus-blossoms, he has sat on the prow of
Adrian's barge, looking into the green, turbid Nile.  He has leaned
over the still pool of some Greek woodland, and seen in the water's
silent silver the wonder of his own beauty.  But he is much more to
me than that.  I won't tell you that I am dissatisfied with what I
have done of him, or that his beauty is such that art cannot express
it.  There is nothing that art cannot express, and I know that the
work I have done since I met Dorian Gray is good work, is the best
work of my life.  But in some curious way--I wonder will you
understand me?--his personality has suggested to me an entirely new
manner in art, an entirely new mode of style.  I see things
differently, I think of them differently.  I can now re-create life
in a way that was hidden from me before.  'A dream of form in days of
thought,'--who is it who says that?  I forget; but it is what Dorian
Gray has been to me.  The merely visible presence of this lad, --for
he seems to me little more than a lad, though he is really over
twenty,--his merely visible presence,--ah!  I wonder can you realize
all that that means?  Unconsciously he defines for me the lines of a
fresh school, a school that is to have in itself all the passion of
the romantic spirit, all the perfection of the spirit that is Greek.
The harmony of soul and body,--how much that is!  We in our madness
have separated the two, and have invented a realism that is bestial,
an ideality that is void.  Harry!  Harry! if you only knew what
Dorian Gray is to me!  You remember that landscape of mine, for which
Agnew offered me such a huge price, but which I would not part with?
It is one of the best things I have ever done.  And why is it so?
Because, while I was painting it, Dorian Gray sat beside me."

"Basil, this is quite wonderful!  I must see Dorian Gray."  Hallward
got up from the seat, and walked up and down the [10] garden.  After
some time he came back.  "You don't understand, Harry," he said.
"Dorian Gray is merely to me a motive in art.  He is never more
present in my work than when no image of him is there.  He is simply
a suggestion, as I have said, of a new manner.  I see him in the
curves of certain lines, in the loveliness and the subtleties of
certain colors.  That is all."

"Then why won't you exhibit his portrait?"

"Because I have put into it all the extraordinary romance of which,
of course, I have never dared to speak to him.  He knows nothing
about it.  He will never know anything about it.  But the world might
guess it; and I will not bare my soul to their shallow, prying eyes.
My heart shall never be put under their microscope.  There is too
much of myself in the thing, Harry,--too much of myself!"

"Poets are not so scrupulous as you are.  They know how useful
passion is for publication.  Nowadays a broken heart will run to many
editions."

"I hate them for it.  An artist should create beautiful things, but
should put nothing of his own life into them.  We live in an age when
men treat art as if it were meant to be a form of autobiography.  We
have lost the abstract sense of beauty.  If I live, I will show the
world what it is; and for that reason the world shall never see my
portrait of Dorian Gray."

"I think you are wrong, Basil, but I won't argue with you.  It is
only the intellectually lost who ever argue.  Tell me, is Dorian Gray
very fond of you?"

Hallward considered for a few moments.  "He likes me," he answered,
after a pause; "I know he likes me.  Of course I flatter him
dreadfully.  I find a strange pleasure in saying things to him that I
know I shall be sorry for having said.  I give myself away.  As a
rule, he is charming to me, and we walk home together from the club
arm in arm, or sit in the studio and talk of a thousand things.  Now
and then, however, he is horribly thoughtless, and seems to take a
real delight in giving me pain.  Then I feel, Harry, that I have
given away my whole soul to some one who treats it as if it were a
flower to put in his coat, a bit of decoration to charm his vanity,
an ornament for a summer's day."

"Days in summer, Basil, are apt to linger.  Perhaps you will tire
sooner than he will.  It is a sad thing to think of, but there is no
doubt that Genius lasts longer than Beauty.  That accounts for the
fact that we all take such pains to over-educate ourselves.  In the
wild struggle for existence, we want to have something that endures,
and so we fill our minds with rubbish and facts, in the silly hope of
keeping our place.  The thoroughly well informed man,--that is the
modern ideal.  And the mind of the thoroughly well informed man is a
dreadful thing.  It is like a bric-a-brac shop, all monsters and
dust, and everything priced above its proper value.  I think you will
tire first, all the same.  Some day you will look at Gray, and he
will seem to you to be a little out of drawing, or you won't like his
tone of color, or something.  You will bitterly reproach him in your
own heart, and seriously think that he has behaved very badly to you.
The next time he calls, you will be [11] perfectly cold and
indifferent.  It will be a great pity, for it will alter you.  The
worst of having a romance is that it leaves one so unromantic."

"Harry, don't talk like that.  As long as I live, the personality of
Dorian Gray will dominate me.  You can't feel what I feel.  You
change too often."

"Ah, my dear Basil, that is exactly why I can feel it.  Those who are
faithful know only the pleasures of love: it is the faithless who
know love's tragedies."  And Lord Henry struck a light on a dainty
silver case, and began to smoke a cigarette with a self-conscious and
self-satisfied air, as if he had summed up life in a phrase.  There
was a rustle of chirruping sparrows in the ivy, and the blue cloud-
shadows chased themselves across the grass like swallows.  How
pleasant it was in the garden!  And how delightful other people's
emotions were!--much more delightful than their ideas, it seemed to
him.  One's own soul, and the passions of one's friends,--those were
the fascinating things in life.  He thought with pleasure of the
tedious luncheon that he had missed by staying so long with Basil
Hallward.  Had he gone to his aunt's, he would have been sure to meet
Lord Goodbody there, and the whole conversation would have been about
the housing of the poor, and the necessity for model lodging-houses.
It was charming to have escaped all that!  As he thought of his aunt,
an idea seemed to strike him.  He turned to Hallward, and said, "My
dear fellow, I have just remembered."

"Remembered what, Harry?"

"Where I heard the name of Dorian Gray."

"Where was it?" asked Hallward, with a slight frown.

"Don't look so angry, Basil.  It was at my aunt's, Lady Agatha's.
She told me she had discovered a wonderful young man, who was going
to help her in the East End, and that his name was Dorian Gray.  I am
bound to state that she never told me he was good-looking.  Women
have no appreciation of good looks.  At least, good women have not.
She said that he was very earnest, and had a beautiful nature.  I at
once pictured to myself a creature with spectacles and lank hair,
horridly freckled, and tramping about on huge feet.  I wish I had
known it was your friend."

"I am very glad you didn't, Harry."

"Why?"

"I don't want you to meet him."

"Mr. Dorian Gray is in the studio, sir," said the butler, coming into
the garden.

"You must introduce me now," cried Lord Henry, laughing.

Basil Hallward turned to the servant, who stood blinking in the
sunlight.  "Ask Mr. Gray to wait, Parker: I will be in in a few
moments."  The man bowed, and went up the walk.

Then he looked at Lord Henry.  "Dorian Gray is my dearest friend," he
said.  "He has a simple and a beautiful nature.  Your aunt was quite
right in what she said of him.  Don't spoil him for me.  Don't try to
influence him.  Your influence would be bad.  The world is wide, and
has many marvellous people in it.  Don't take [12] away from me the
one person that makes life absolutely lovely to me, and that gives to
my art whatever wonder or charm it possesses.  Mind, Harry, I trust
you."  He spoke very slowly, and the words seemed wrung out of him
almost against his will.

"What nonsense you talk!" said Lord Henry, smiling, and, taking
Hallward by the arm, he almost led him into the house.



CHAPTER II

[...12] As they entered they saw Dorian Gray.  He was seated at the
piano, with his back to them, turning over the pages of a volume of
Schumann's "Forest Scenes."  "You must lend me these, Basil," he
cried.  "I want to learn them.  They are perfectly charming."

"That entirely depends on how you sit to-day, Dorian."

"Oh, I am tired of sitting, and I don't want a life-sized portrait of
myself," answered the lad, swinging round on the music-stool, in a
wilful, petulant manner.  When he caught sight of Lord Henry, a faint
blush colored his cheeks for a moment, and he started up.  "I beg
your pardon, Basil, but I didn't know you had any one with you."

"This is Lord Henry Wotton, Dorian, an old Oxford friend of mine.  I
have just been telling him what a capital sitter you were, and now
you have spoiled everything."

"You have not spoiled my pleasure in meeting you, Mr. Gray," said
Lord Henry, stepping forward and shaking him by the hand.  "My aunt
has often spoken to me about you.  You are one of her favorites, and,
I am afraid, one of her victims also."

"I am in Lady Agatha's black books at present," answered Dorian, with
a funny look of penitence.  "I promised to go to her club in
Whitechapel with her last Tuesday, and I really forgot all about it.
We were to have played a duet together,--three duets, I believe.  I
don't know what she will say to me.  I am far too frightened to
call."

"Oh, I will make your peace with my aunt.  She is quite devoted to
you.  And I don't think it really matters about your not being there.
The audience probably thought it was a duet.  When Aunt Agatha sits
down to the piano she makes quite enough noise for two people."

"That is very horrid to her, and not very nice to me," answered
Dorian, laughing.

Lord Henry looked at him.  Yes, he was certainly wonderfully
handsome, with his finely-curved scarlet lips, his frank blue eyes,
his crisp gold hair.  There was something in his face that made one
trust him at once.  All the candor of youth was there, as well as all
youth's passionate purity.  One felt that he had kept himself
unspotted from the world.  No wonder Basil Hallward worshipped him.
He was made to be worshipped.

"You are too charming to go in for philanthropy, Mr. Gray,--far too
charming."  And Lord Henry flung himself down on the divan, and
opened his cigarette-case.

Hallward had been busy mixing his colors and getting his brushes
ready.  He was looking worried, and when he heard Lord Henry's last
[13] remark he glanced at him, hesitated for a moment, and then said,
"Harry, I want to finish this picture to-day.  Would you think it
awfully rude of me if I asked you to go away?"

Lord Henry smiled, and looked at Dorian Gray.  "Am I to go, Mr.
Gray?" he asked.

"Oh, please don't, Lord Henry.  I see that Basil is in one of his
sulky moods; and I can't bear him when he sulks.  Besides, I want you
to tell me why I should not go in for philanthropy."

"I don't know that I shall tell you that, Mr. Gray.  But I certainly
will not run away, now that you have asked me to stop.  You don't
really mind, Basil, do you?  You have often told me that you liked
your sitters to have some one to chat to."

Hallward bit his lip.  "If Dorian wishes it, of course you must stay.
Dorian's whims are laws to everybody, except himself."

Lord Henry took up his hat and gloves.  "You are very pressing,
Basil, but I am afraid I must go.  I have promised to meet a man at
the Orleans.--Good-by, Mr. Gray.  Come and see me some afternoon in
Curzon Street.  I am nearly always at home at five o'clock.  Write to
me when you are coming.  I should be sorry to miss you."

"Basil," cried Dorian Gray, "if Lord Henry goes I shall go too.  You
never open your lips while you are painting, and it is horribly dull
standing on a platform and trying to look pleasant.  Ask him to stay.
I insist upon it."

"Stay, Harry, to oblige Dorian, and to oblige me," said Hallward,
gazing intently at his picture.  "It is quite true, I never talk when
I am working, and never listen either, and it must be dreadfully
tedious for my unfortunate sitters.  I beg you to stay."

"But what about my man at the Orleans?"

Hallward laughed.  "I don't think there will be any difficulty about
that.  Sit down again, Harry.--And now, Dorian, get up on the
platform, and don't move about too much, or pay any attention to what
Lord Henry says.  He has a very bad influence over all his friends,
with the exception of myself."

Dorian stepped up on the dais, with the air of a young Greek martyr,
and made a little moue of discontent to Lord Henry, to whom he had
rather taken a fancy.  He was so unlike Hallward.  They made a
delightful contrast.  And he had such a beautiful voice.  After a few
moments he said to him, "Have you really a very bad influence, Lord
Henry?  As bad as Basil says?"

"There is no such thing as a good influence, Mr. Gray.  All influence
is immoral,--immoral from the scientific point of view."

"Why?"

"Because to influence a person is to give him one's own soul.  He
does not think his natural thoughts, or burn with his natural
passions.  His virtues are not real to him.  His sins, if there are
such things as sins, are borrowed.  He becomes an echo of some one
else's music, an actor of a part that has not been written for him.
The aim of life is self-development.  To realize one's nature
perfectly,--that is what each of us is here for.  People are afraid
of themselves, nowadays.  They have forgotten the highest of all
duties, the duty that one owes to one's [14] self.  Of course they
are charitable.  They feed the hungry, and clothe the beggar.  But
their own souls starve, and are naked.  Courage has gone out of our
race.  Perhaps we never really had it.  The terror of society, which
is the basis of morals, the terror of God, which is the secret of
religion,--these are the two things that govern us.  And yet--"

"Just turn your head a little more to the right, Dorian, like a good
boy," said Hallward, deep in his work, and conscious only that a look
had come into the lad's face that he had never seen there before.

"And yet," continued Lord Henry, in his low, musical voice, and with
that graceful wave of the hand that was always so characteristic of
him, and that he had even in his Eton days, "I believe that if one
man were to live his life out fully and completely, were to give form
to every feeling, expression to every thought, reality to every
dream,--I believe that the world would gain such a fresh impulse of
joy that we would forget all the maladies of mediaevalism, and return
to the Hellenic ideal,-- to something finer, richer, than the
Hellenic ideal, it may be.  But the bravest man among us is afraid of
himself.  The mutilation of the savage has its tragic survival in the
self-denial that mars our lives.  We are punished for our refusals.
Every impulse that we strive to strangle broods in the mind, and
poisons us.  The body sins once, and has done with its sin, for
action is a mode of purification.  Nothing remains then but the
recollection of a pleasure, or the luxury of a regret.  The only way
to get rid of a temptation is to yield to it.  Resist it, and your
soul grows sick with longing for the things it has forbidden to
itself, with desire for what its monstrous laws have made monstrous
and unlawful.  It has been said that the great events of the world
take place in the brain.  It is in the brain, and the brain only,
that the great sins of the world take place also.  You, Mr. Gray, you
yourself, with your rose-red youth and your rose-white boyhood, you
have had passions that have made you afraid, thoughts that have
filled you with terror, day-dreams and sleeping dreams whose mere
memory might stain your cheek with shame--"

"Stop!" murmured Dorian Gray, "stop! you bewilder me.  I don't know
what to say.  There is some answer to you, but I cannot find it.
Don't speak.  Let me think, or, rather, let me try not to think."

For nearly ten minutes he stood there motionless, with parted lips,
and eyes strangely bright.  He was dimly conscious that entirely
fresh impulses were at work within him, and they seemed to him to
have come really from himself.  The few words that Basil's friend had
said to him--words spoken by chance, no doubt, and with wilful
paradox in them--had yet touched some secret chord, that had never
been touched before, but that he felt was now vibrating and throbbing
to curious pulses.

Music had stirred him like that.  Music had troubled him many times.
But music was not articulate.  It was not a new world, but rather a
new chaos, that it created in us.  Words!  Mere words!  How terrible
they were!  How clear, and vivid, and cruel!  One could not escape
from them.  And yet what a subtle magic there was in them! [15] They
seemed to be able to give a plastic form to formless things, and to
have a music of their own as sweet as that of viol or of lute.  Mere
words!  Was there anything so real as words?

Yes; there had been things in his boyhood that he had not understood.
He understood them now.  Life suddenly became fiery-colored to him.
It seemed to him that he had been walking in fire.  Why had he not
known it?

Lord Henry watched him, with his sad smile.  He knew the precise
psychological moment when to say nothing.  He felt intensely
interested.  He was amazed at the sudden impression that his words
had produced, and, remembering a book that he had read when he was
sixteen, which had revealed to him much that he had not known before,
he wondered whether Dorian Gray was passing through the same
experience.  He had merely shot an arrow into the air.  Had it hit
the mark?  How fascinating the lad was!

Hallward painted away with that marvellous bold touch of his, that
had the true refinement and perfect delicacy that come only from
strength.  He was unconscious of the silence.

"Basil, I am tired of standing," cried Dorian Gray, suddenly.  "I
must go out and sit in the garden.  The air is stifling here."

"My dear fellow, I am so sorry.  When I am painting, I can't think of
anything else.  But you never sat better.  You were perfectly still.
And I have caught the effect I wanted,--the half-parted lips, and the
bright look in the eyes.  I don't know what Harry has been saying to
you, but he has certainly made you have the most wonderful
expression.  I suppose he has been paying you compliments.  You
mustn't believe a word that he says."

"He has certainly not been paying me compliments.  Perhaps that is
the reason I don't think I believe anything he has told me."

"You know you believe it all," said Lord Henry, looking at him with
his dreamy, heavy-lidded eyes.  "I will go out to the garden with
you.  It is horridly hot in the studio.--Basil, let us have something
iced to drink, something with strawberries in it."

"Certainly, Harry.  Just touch the bell, and when Parker comes I will
tell him what you want.  I have got to work up this background, so I
will join you later on.  Don't keep Dorian too long.  I have never
been in better form for painting than I am to-day.  This is going to
be my masterpiece.  It is my masterpiece as it stands."

Lord Henry went out to the garden, and found Dorian Gray burying his
face in the great cool lilac-blossoms, feverishly drinking in their
perfume as if it had been wine.  He came close to him, and put his
hand upon his shoulder.  "You are quite right to do that," he
murmured.  "Nothing can cure the soul but the senses, just as nothing
can cure the senses but the soul."

The lad started and drew back.  He was bareheaded, and the leaves had
tossed his rebellious curls and tangled all their gilded threads.
There was a look of fear in his eyes, such as people have when they
are suddenly awakened.  His finely-chiselled nostrils quivered, and
some hidden nerve shook the scarlet of his lips and left them
trembling.

[16] "Yes," continued Lord Henry, "that is one of the great secrets
of life,-- to cure the soul by means of the senses, and the senses by
means of the soul.  You are a wonderful creature.  You know more than
you think you know, just as you know less than you want to know."

Dorian Gray frowned and turned his head away.  He could not help
liking the tall, graceful young man who was standing by him.  His
romantic olive-colored face and worn expression interested him.
There was something in his low, languid voice that was absolutely
fascinating.  His cool, white, flower-like hands, even, had a curious
charm.  They moved, as he spoke, like music, and seemed to have a
language of their own.  But he felt afraid of him, and ashamed of
being afraid.  Why had it been left for a stranger to reveal him to
himself?  He had known Basil Hallward for months, but the friendship
between then had never altered him.  Suddenly there had come some one
across his life who seemed to have disclosed to him life's mystery.
And, yet, what was there to be afraid of?  He was not a school-boy,
or a girl.  It was absurd to be frightened.

"Let us go and sit in the shade," said Lord Henry.  "Parker has
brought out the drinks, and if you stay any longer in this glare you
will be quite spoiled, and Basil will never paint you again.  You
really must not let yourself become sunburnt.  It would be very
unbecoming to you."

"What does it matter?" cried Dorian, laughing, as he sat down on the
seat at the end of the garden.

"It should matter everything to you, Mr. Gray."

"Why?"

"Because you have now the most marvellous youth, and youth is the one
thing worth having."

"I don't feel that, Lord Henry."

"No, you don't feel it now.  Some day, when you are old and wrinkled
and ugly, when thought has seared your forehead with its lines, and
passion branded your lips with its hideous fires, you will feel it,
you will feel it terribly.  Now, wherever you go, you charm the
world.  Will it always be so?

"You have a wonderfully beautiful face, Mr. Gray.  Don't frown.  You
have.  And Beauty is a form of Genius,--is higher, indeed, than
Genius, as it needs no explanation.  It is one of the great facts of
the world, like sunlight, or spring-time, or the reflection in dark
waters of that silver shell we call the moon.  It cannot be
questioned.  It has its divine right of sovereignty.  It makes
princes of those who have it.  You smile?  Ah! when you have lost it
you won't smile.

"People say sometimes that Beauty is only superficial.  That may be
so.  But at least it is not so superficial as Thought.  To me, Beauty
is the wonder of wonders.  It is only shallow people who do not judge
by appearances.  The true mystery of the world is the visible, not
the invisible.

"Yes, Mr. Gray, the gods have been good to you.  But what the gods
give they quickly take away.  You have only a few years in which
really to live.  When your youth goes, your beauty will go with it,
and then you will suddenly discover that there are no triumphs left
[17] for you, or have to content yourself with those mean triumphs
that the memory of your past will make more bitter than defeats.
Every month as it wanes brings you nearer to something dreadful.
Time is jealous of you, and wars against your lilies and your roses.
You will become sallow, and hollow-cheeked, and dull-eyed.  You will
suffer horribly.

"Realize your youth while you have it.  Don't squander the gold of
your days, listening to the tedious, trying to improve the hopeless
failure, or giving away your life to the ignorant, the common, and
the vulgar, which are the aims, the false ideals, of our age.  Live!
Live the wonderful life that is in you!  Let nothing be lost upon
you.  Be always searching for new sensations.  Be afraid of nothing.

"A new hedonism,--that is what our century wants.  You might be its
visible symbol.  With your personality there is nothing you could not
do.  The world belongs to you for a season.

"The moment I met you I saw that you were quite unconscious of what
you really are, what you really might be.  There was so much about
you that charmed me that I felt I must tell you something about
yourself.  I thought how tragic it would be if you were wasted.  For
there is such a little time that your youth will last,--such a little
time.

"The common hill-flowers wither, but they blossom again.  The
laburnum will be as golden next June as it is now.  In a month there
will be purple stars on the clematis, and year after year the green
night of its leaves will have its purple stars.  But we never get
back our youth.  The pulse of joy that beats in us at twenty, becomes
sluggish.  Our limbs fail, our senses rot.  We degenerate into
hideous puppets, haunted by the memory of the passions of which we
were too much afraid, and the exquisite temptations that we did not
dare to yield to.  Youth!  Youth!  There is absolutely nothing in the
world but youth!"

Dorian Gray listened, open-eyed and wondering.  The spray of lilac
fell from his hand upon the gravel.  A furry bee came and buzzed
round it for a moment.  Then it began to scramble all over the
fretted purple of the tiny blossoms.  He watched it with that strange
interest in trivial things that we try to develop when things of high
import make us afraid, or when we are stirred by some new emotion,
for which we cannot find expression, or when some thought that
terrifies us lays sudden siege to the brain and calls on us to yield.
After a time it flew away.  He saw it creeping into the stained
trumpet of a Tyrian convolvulus.  The flower seemed to quiver, and
then swayed gently to and fro.

Suddenly Hallward appeared at the door of the studio, and made
frantic signs for them to come in.  They turned to each other, and
smiled.

"I am waiting," cried Hallward.  "Do come in.  The light is quite
perfect, and you can bring your drinks."

They rose up, and sauntered down the walk together.  Two green-and-
white butterflies fluttered past them, and in the pear-tree at the
end of the garden a thrush began to sing.

"You are glad you have met me, Mr. Gray," said Lord Henry, looking at
him.

"Yes, I am glad now.  I wonder shall I always be glad?"

[18] "Always!  That is a dreadful word.  It makes me shudder when I
hear it.  Women are so fond of using it.  They spoil every romance by
trying to make it last forever.  It is a meaningless word, too.  The
only difference between a caprice and a life-long passion is that the
caprice lasts a little longer."

As they entered the studio, Dorian Gray put his hand upon Lord
Henry's arm.  "In that case, let our friendship be a caprice," he
murmured, flushing at his own boldness, then stepped upon the
platform and resumed his pose.

Lord Henry flung himself into a large wicker arm-chair, and watched
him.  The sweep and dash of the brush on the canvas made the only
sound that broke the stillness, except when Hallward stepped back now
and then to look at his work from a distance.  In the slanting beams
that streamed through the open door-way the dust danced and was
golden.  The heavy scent of the roses seemed to brood over
everything.

After about a quarter of an hour, Hallward stopped painting, looked
for a long time at Dorian Gray, and then for a long time at the
picture, biting the end of one of his huge brushes, and smiling.  "It
is quite finished," he cried, at last, and stooping down he wrote his
name in thin vermilion letters on the left-hand corner of the canvas.

Lord Henry came over and examined the picture.  It was certainly a
wonderful work of art, and a wonderful likeness as well.

"My dear fellow, I congratulate you most warmly," he said.--"Mr.
Gray, come and look at yourself."

The lad started, as if awakened from some dream.  "Is it really
finished?" he murmured, stepping down from the platform.

"Quite finished," said Hallward.  "And you have sat splendidly to-
day.  I am awfully obliged to you."

"That is entirely due to me," broke in Lord Henry.  "Isn't it, Mr.
Gray?"

Dorian made no answer, but passed listlessly in front of his picture
and turned towards it.  When he saw it he drew back, and his cheeks
flushed for a moment with pleasure.  A look of joy came into his
eyes, as if he had recognized himself for the first time.  He stood
there motionless, and in wonder, dimly conscious that Hallward was
speaking to him, but not catching the meaning of his words.  The
sense of his own beauty came on him like a revelation.  He had never
felt it before.  Basil Hallward's compliments had seemed to him to be
merely the charming exaggerations of friendship.  He had listened to
them, laughed at them, forgotten them.  They had not influenced his
nature.  Then had come Lord Henry, with his strange panegyric on
youth, his terrible warning of its brevity.  That had stirred him at
the time, and now, as he stood gazing at the shadow of his own
loveliness, the full reality of the description flashed across him.
Yes, there would be a day when his face would be wrinkled and wizen,
his eyes dim and colorless, the grace of his figure broken and
deformed.  The scarlet would pass away from his lips, and the gold
steal from his hair.  The life that was to make his soul would mar
his body.  He would become ignoble, hideous, and uncouth.

[19] As he thought of it, a sharp pang of pain struck like a knife
across him, and made each delicate fibre of his nature quiver.  His
eyes deepened into amethyst, and a mist of tears came across them.
He felt as if a hand of ice had been laid upon his heart.

"Don't you like it?" cried Hallward at last, stung a little by the
lad's silence, and not understanding what it meant.

"Of course he likes it," said Lord Henry.  "Who wouldn't like it?  It
is one of the greatest things in modern art.  I will give you
anything you like to ask for it.  I must have it."

"It is not my property, Harry."

"Whose property is it?"

"Dorian's, of course."

"He is a very lucky fellow."

"How sad it is!" murmured Dorian Gray, with his eyes still fixed upon
his own portrait.  "How sad it is!  I shall grow old, and horrid, and
dreadful.  But this picture will remain always young.  It will never
be older than this particular day of June. . . . If it was only the
other way!  If it was I who were to be always young, and the picture
that were to grow old!  For this--for this--I would give everything!
Yes, there is nothing in the whole world I would not give!"

"You would hardly care for that arrangement, Basil," cried Lord
Henry, laughing.  "It would be rather hard lines on you."

"I should object very strongly, Harry."

Dorian Gray turned and looked at him.  "I believe you would, Basil.
You like your art better than your friends.  I am no more to you than
a green bronze figure.  Hardly as much, I dare say."

Hallward stared in amazement.  It was so unlike Dorian to speak like
that.  What had happened?  He seemed almost angry.  His face was
flushed and his cheeks burning.

"Yes," he continued, "I am less to you than your ivory Hermes or your
silver Faun.  You will like them always.  How long will you like me?
Till I have my first wrinkle, I suppose.  I know, now, that when one
loses one's good looks, whatever they may be, one loses everything.
Your picture has taught me that.  Lord Henry is perfectly right.
Youth is the only thing worth having.  When I find that I am growing
old, I will kill myself."

Hallward turned pale, and caught his hand.  "Dorian!  Dorian!" he
cried, "don't talk like that.  I have never had such a friend as you,
and I shall never have such another.  You are not jealous of material
things, are you?"

"I am jealous of everything whose beauty does not die.  I am jealous
of the portrait you have painted of me.  Why should it keep what I
must lose?  Every moment that passes takes something from me, and
gives something to it.  Oh, if it was only the other way!  If the
picture could change, and I could be always what I am now!  Why did
you paint it?  It will mock me some day,--mock me horribly!"  The hot
tears welled into his eyes; he tore his hand away, and, flinging
himself on the divan, he buried his face in the cushions, as if he
was praying.

"This is your doing, Harry," said Hallward, bitterly.

[20] "My doing?"

"Yes, yours, and you know it."

Lord Henry shrugged his shoulders.  "It is the real Dorian Gray,--
that is all," he answered.

"It is not."

"If it is not, what have I to do with it?"

"You should have gone away when I asked you."

"I stayed when you asked me."

"Harry, I can't quarrel with my two best friends at once, but between
you both you have made me hate the finest piece of work I have ever
done, and I will destroy it.  What is it but canvas and color?  I
will not let it come across our three lives and mar them."

Dorian Gray lifted his golden head from the pillow, and looked at him
with pallid face and tear-stained eyes, as he walked over to the deal
painting-table that was set beneath the large curtained window.  What
was he doing there?  His fingers were straying about among the litter
of tin tubes and dry brushes, seeking for something.  Yes, it was the
long palette-knife, with its thin blade of lithe steel.  He had found
it at last.  He was going to rip up the canvas.

With a stifled sob he leaped from the couch, and, rushing over to
Hallward, tore the knife out of his hand, and flung it to the end of
the studio.  "Don't, Basil, don't!" he cried.  "It would be murder!"

"I am glad you appreciate my work at last, Dorian," said Hallward,
coldly, when he had recovered from his surprise.  "I never thought
you would."

"Appreciate it?  I am in love with it, Basil.  It is part of myself,
I feel that."

"Well, as soon as you are dry, you shall be varnished, and framed,
and sent home.  Then you can do what you like with yourself."  And he
walked across the room and rang the bell for tea.  "You will have
tea, of course, Dorian?  And so will you, Harry?  Tea is the only
simple pleasure left to us."

"I don't like simple pleasures," said Lord Henry.  "And I don't like
scenes, except on the stage.  What absurd fellows you are, both of
you!  I wonder who it was defined man as a rational animal.  It was
the most premature definition ever given.  Man is many things, but he
is not rational.  I am glad he is not, after all: though I wish you
chaps would not squabble over the picture.  You had much better let
me have it, Basil.  This silly boy doesn't really want it, and I do."

"If you let any one have it but me, Basil, I will never forgive you!"
cried Dorian Gray.  "And I don't allow people to call me a silly
boy."

"You know the picture is yours, Dorian.  I gave it to you before it
existed."

"And you know you have been a little silly, Mr. Gray, and that you
don't really mind being called a boy."

"I should have minded very much this morning, Lord Henry."

"Ah! this morning!  You have lived since then."

There came a knock to the door, and the butler entered with the tea-
tray and set it down upon a small Japanese table.  There was a [21]
rattle of cups and saucers and the hissing of a fluted Georgian urn.
Two globe-shaped china dishes were brought in by a page.  Dorian Gray
went over and poured the tea out.  The two men sauntered languidly to
the table, and examined what was under the covers.

"Let us go to the theatre to-night," said Lord Henry.  "There is sure
to be something on, somewhere.  I have promised to dine at White's,
but it is only with an old friend, so I can send him a wire and say
that I am ill, or that I am prevented from coming in consequence of a
subsequent engagement.  I think that would be a rather nice excuse:
it would have the surprise of candor."

"It is such a bore putting on one's dress-clothes," muttered
Hallward.  "And, when one has them on, they are so horrid."

"Yes," answered Lord Henry, dreamily, "the costume of our day is
detestable.  It is so sombre, so depressing.  Sin is the only color-
element left in modern life."

"You really must not say things like that before Dorian, Harry."

"Before which Dorian?  The one who is pouring out tea for us, or the
one in the picture?"

"Before either."

"I should like to come to the theatre with you, Lord Henry," said the
lad.

"Then you shall come; and you will come too, Basil, won't you?"

"I can't, really.  I would sooner not.  I have a lot of work to do."

"Well, then, you and I will go alone, Mr. Gray."

"I should like that awfully."

Basil Hallward bit his lip and walked over, cup in hand, to the
picture.  "I will stay with the real Dorian," he said, sadly.

"Is it the real Dorian?" cried the original of the portrait, running
across to him.  "Am I really like that?"

"Yes; you are just like that."

"How wonderful, Basil!"

"At least you are like it in appearance.  But it will never alter,"
said Hallward.  "That is something."

"What a fuss people make about fidelity!" murmured Lord Henry.

"And, after all, it is purely a question for physiology.  It has
nothing to do with our own will.  It is either an unfortunate
accident, or an unpleasant result of temperament.  Young men want to
be faithful, and are not; old men want to be faithless, and cannot:
that is all one can say."

"Don't go to the theatre to-night, Dorian," said Hallward.  "Stop and
dine with me."

"I can't, really."

"Why?"

"Because I have promised Lord Henry to go with him."

"He won't like you better for keeping your promises.  He always
breaks his own.  I beg you not to go."

Dorian Gray laughed and shook his head.

"I entreat you."

The lad hesitated, and looked over at Lord Henry, who was watching
them from the tea-table with an amused smile.

[22] "I must go, Basil," he answered.

"Very well," said Hallward; and he walked over and laid his cup down
on the tray.  "It is rather late, and, as you have to dress, you had
better lose no time.  Good-by, Harry; good-by, Dorian.  Come and see
me soon.  Come to-morrow."

"Certainly."

"You won't forget?"

"No, of course not."

"And . . . Harry!"

"Yes, Basil?"

"Remember what I asked you, when in the garden this morning."

"I have forgotten it."

"I trust you."

"I wish I could trust myself," said Lord Henry, laughing.--"Come, Mr.
Gray, my hansom is outside, and I can drop you at your own place.--
Good-by, Basil.  It has been a most interesting afternoon."

As the door closed behind them, Hallward flung himself down on a
sofa, and a look of pain came into his face.



CHAPTER III

[...22] One afternoon, a month later, Dorian Gray was reclining in a
luxurious arm-chair, in the little library of Lord Henry's house in
Curzon Street.  It was, in its way, a very charming room, with its
high panelled wainscoting of olive-stained oak, its cream-colored
frieze and ceiling of raised plaster-work, and its brick-dust felt
carpet strewn with long-fringed silk Persian rugs.  On a tiny
satinwood table stood a statuette by Clodion, and beside it lay a
copy of "Les Cent Nouvelles," bound for Margaret of Valois by Clovis
Eve, and powdered with the gilt daisies that the queen had selected
for her device.  Some large blue china jars, filled with parrot-
tulips, were ranged on the mantel-shelf, and through the small leaded
panes of the window streamed the apricot-colored light of a summer's
day in London.

Lord Henry had not come in yet.  He was always late on principle, his
principle being that punctuality is the thief of time.  So the lad
was looking rather sulky, as with listless fingers he turned over the
pages of an elaborately-illustrated edition of "Manon Lescaut" that
he had found in one of the bookcases.  The formal monotonous ticking
of the Louis Quatorze clock annoyed him.  Once or twice he thought of
going away.

At last he heard a light step outside, and the door opened.  "How
late you are, Harry!" he murmured.

"I am afraid it is not Harry, Mr. Gray," said a woman's voice.

He glanced quickly round, and rose to his feet.  "I beg your pardon.
I thought--"

"You thought it was my husband.  It is only his wife.  You must let
me introduce myself.  I know you quite well by your photographs.  I
think my husband has got twenty-seven of them."

[23] "Not twenty-seven, Lady Henry?"

"Well, twenty-six, then.  And I saw you with him the other night at
the Opera."  She laughed nervously, as she spoke, and watched him
with her vague forget-me-not eyes.  She was a curious woman, whose
dresses always looked as if they had been designed in a rage and put
on in a tempest.  She was always in love with somebody, and, as her
passion was never returned, she had kept all her illusions.  She
tried to look picturesque, but only succeeded in being untidy.  Her
name was Victoria, and she had a perfect mania for going to church.

"That was at 'Lohengrin,' Lady Henry, I think?"

"Yes; it was at dear 'Lohengrin.'  I like Wagner's music better than
any other music.  It is so loud that one can talk the whole time,
without people hearing what one says.  That is a great advantage:
don't you think so, Mr. Gray?"

The same nervous staccato laugh broke from her thin lips, and her
fingers began to play with a long paper-knife.

Dorian smiled, and shook his head: "I am afraid I don't think so,
Lady Henry.  I never talk during music,--at least during good music.
If one hears bad music, it is one's duty to drown it by
conversation."

"Ah! that is one of Harry's views, isn't it, Mr. Gray?  But you must
not think I don't like good music.  I adore it, but I am afraid of
it.  It makes me too romantic.  I have simply worshipped pianists,--
two at a time, sometimes.  I don't know what it is about them.
Perhaps it is that they are foreigners.  They all are, aren't they?
Even those that are born in England become foreigners after a time,
don't they?  It is so clever of them, and such a compliment to art.
Makes it quite cosmopolitan, doesn't it?  You have never been to any
of my parties, have you, Mr. Gray?  You must come.  I can't afford
orchids, but I spare no expense in foreigners.  They make one's rooms
look so picturesque.  But here is Harry!--Harry, I came in to look
for you, to ask you something,--I forget what it was,--and I found
Mr. Gray here.  We have had such a pleasant chat about music.  We
have quite the same views.  No; I think our views are quite
different.  But he has been most pleasant.  I am so glad I've seen
him."

"I am charmed, my love, quite charmed," said Lord Henry, elevating
his dark crescent-shaped eyebrows and looking at them both with an
amused smile.--"So sorry I am late, Dorian.  I went to look after a
piece of old brocade in Wardour Street, and had to bargain for hours
for it.  Nowadays people know the price of everything, and the value
of nothing."

"I am afraid I must be going," exclaimed Lady Henry, after an awkward
silence, with her silly sudden laugh.  "I have promised to drive with
the duchess.--Good-by, Mr. Gray.--Good-by, Harry.  You are dining
out, I suppose?  So am I.  Perhaps I shall see you at Lady
Thornbury's."

"I dare say, my dear," said Lord Henry, shutting the door behind her,
as she flitted out of the room, looking like a bird-of-paradise that
had been out in the rain, and leaving a faint odor of patchouli
behind her.  Then he shook hands with Dorian Gray, lit a cigarette,
and flung himself down on the sofa.

[24] "Never marry a woman with straw-colored hair, Dorian," he said,
after a few puffs.

"Why, Harry?"

"Because they are so sentimental."

"But I like sentimental people."

"Never marry at all, Dorian.  Men marry because they are tired;
women, because they are curious: both are disappointed."

"I don't think I am likely to marry, Harry.  I am too much in love.
That is one of your aphorisms.  I am putting it into practice, as I
do everything you say."

"Whom are you in love with?" said Lord Henry, looking at him with a
curious smile.

"With an actress," said Dorian Gray, blushing.

Lord Henry shrugged his shoulders.  "That is a rather common-place
debut," he murmured.

"You would not say so if you saw her, Harry."

"Who is she?"

"Her name is Sibyl Vane."

"Never heard of her."

"No one has.  People will some day, however.  She is a genius."

"My dear boy, no woman is a genius: women are a decorative sex.  They
never have anything to say, but they say it charmingly.  They
represent the triumph of matter over mind, just as we men represent
the triumph of mind over morals.  There are only two kinds of women,
the plain and the colored.  The plain women are very useful.  If you
want to gain a reputation for respectability, you have merely to take
them down to supper.  The other women are very charming.  They commit
one mistake, however.  They paint in order to try to look young.  Our
grandmothers painted in order to try to talk brilliantly.  Rouge and
esprit used to go together.  That has all gone out now.  As long as a
woman can look ten years younger than her own daughter, she is
perfectly satisfied.  As for conversation, there are only five women
in London worth talking to, and two of these can't be admitted into
decent society.  However, tell me about your genius.  How long have
you known her?"

"About three weeks.  Not so much.  About two weeks and two days."

"How did you come across her?"

"I will tell you, Harry; but you mustn't be unsympathetic about it.
After all, it never would have happened if I had not met you.  You
filled me with a wild desire to know everything about life.  For days
after I met you, something seemed to throb in my veins.  As I lounged
in the Park, or strolled down Piccadilly, I used to look at every one
who passed me, and wonder with a mad curiosity what sort of lives
they led.  Some of them fascinated me.  Others filled me with terror.
There was an exquisite poison in the air.  I had a passion for
sensations.

"One evening about seven o'clock I determined to go out in search of
some adventure.  I felt that this gray, monstrous London of ours,
with its myriads of people, its splendid sinners, and its sordid
sins, as [25] you once said, must have something in store for me.  I
fancied a thousand things.

"The mere danger gave me a sense of delight.  I remembered what you
had said to me on that wonderful night when we first dined together,
about the search for beauty being the poisonous secret of life.  I
don't know what I expected, but I went out, and wandered eastward,
soon losing my way in a labyrinth of grimy streets and black,
grassless squares.  About half-past eight I passed by a little third-
rate theatre, with great flaring gas-jets and gaudy play-bills.  A
hideous Jew, in the most amazing waistcoat I ever beheld in my life,
was standing at the entrance, smoking a vile cigar.  He had greasy
ringlets, and an enormous diamond blazed in the centre of a soiled
shirt.  ''Ave a box, my lord?' he said, when he saw me, and he took
off his hat with an act of gorgeous servility.  There was something
about him, Harry, that amused me.  He was such a monster.  You will
laugh at me, I know, but I really went in and paid a whole guinea for
the stage-box.  To the present day I can't make out why I did so; and
yet if I hadn't!--my dear Harry, if I hadn't, I would have missed the
greatest romance of my life.  I see you are laughing.  It is horrid
of you!"

"I am not laughing, Dorian; at least I am not laughing at you.  But
you should not say the greatest romance of your life.  You should say
the first romance of your life.  You will always be loved, and you
will always be in love with love.  There are exquisite things in
store for you.  This is merely the beginning."

"Do you think my nature so shallow?" cried Dorian Gray, angrily.

"No; I think your nature so deep."

"How do you mean?"

"My dear boy, people who only love once in their lives are really
shallow people.  What they call their loyalty, and their fidelity, I
call either the lethargy of custom or the lack of imagination.
Faithlessness is to the emotional life what consistency is to the
intellectual life,--simply a confession of failure.  But I don't want
to interrupt you.  Go on with your story."

"Well, I found myself seated in a horrid little private box, with a
vulgar drop-scene staring me in the face.  I looked out behind the
curtain, and surveyed the house.  It was a tawdry affair, all Cupids
and cornucopias, like a third-rate wedding-cake.  The gallery and pit
were fairly full, but the two rows of dingy stalls were quite empty,
and there was hardly a person in what I suppose they called the
dress-circle.  Women went about with oranges and ginger-beer, and
there was a terrible consumption of nuts going on."

"It must have been just like the palmy days of the British Drama."

"Just like, I should fancy, and very horrid.  I began to wonder what
on earth I should do, when I caught sight of the play-bill.  What do
you think the play was, Harry?"

"I should think 'The Idiot Boy, or Dumb but Innocent.'  Our fathers
used to like that sort of piece, I believe.  The longer I live,
Dorian, the more keenly I feel that whatever was good enough for our
fathers is not good enough for us.  In art, as in politics, les grand
peres ont toujours tort."

[26] "This play was good enough for us, Harry.  It was 'Romeo and
Juliet.'  I must admit I was rather annoyed at the idea of seeing
Shakespeare done in such a wretched hole of a place.  Still, I felt
interested, in a sort of way.  At any rate, I determined to wait for
the first act.  There was a dreadful orchestra, presided over by a
young Jew who sat at a cracked piano, that nearly drove me away, but
at last the drop-scene was drawn up, and the play began.  Romeo was a
stout elderly gentleman, with corked eyebrows, a husky tragedy voice,
and a figure like a beer-barrel.  Mercutio was almost as bad.  He was
played by the low-comedian, who had introduced gags of his own and
was on most familiar terms with the pit.  They were as grotesque as
the scenery, and that looked as if it had come out of a pantomime of
fifty years ago.  But Juliet!  Harry, imagine a girl, hardly
seventeen years of age, with a little flower-like face, a small Greek
head with plaited coils of dark-brown hair, eyes that were violet
wells of passion, lips that were like the petals of a rose.  She was
the loveliest thing I had ever seen in my life.  You said to me once
that pathos left you unmoved, but that beauty, mere beauty, could
fill your eyes with tears.  I tell you, Harry, I could hardly see
this girl for the mist of tears that came across me.  And her voice,-
-I never heard such a voice.  It was very low at first, with deep
mellow notes, that seemed to fall singly upon one's ear.  Then it
became a little louder, and sounded like a flute or a distant
hautbois.  In the garden-scene it had all the tremulous ecstasy that
one hears just before dawn when nightingales are singing.  There were
moments, later on, when it had the wild passion of violins.  You know
how a voice can stir one.  Your voice and the voice of Sibyl Vane are
two things that I shall never forget.  When I close my eyes, I hear
them, and each of them says something different.  I don't know which
to follow.  Why should I not love her?  Harry, I do love her.  She is
everything to me in life.  Night after night I go to see her play.
One evening she is Rosalind, and the next evening she is Imogen.  I
have seen her die in the gloom of an Italian tomb, sucking the poison
from her lover's lips.  I have watched her wandering through the
forest of Arden, disguised as a pretty boy in hose and doublet and
dainty cap.  She has been mad, and has come into the presence of a
guilty king, and given him rue to wear, and bitter herbs to taste of.
She has been innocent, and the black hands of jealousy have crushed
her reed-like throat.  I have seen her in every age and in every
costume.  Ordinary women never appeal to one's imagination.  They are
limited to their century.  No glamour ever transfigures them.  One
knows their minds as easily as one knows their bonnets.  One can
always find them.  There is no mystery in one of them.  They ride in
the Park in the morning, and chatter at tea-parties in the afternoon.
They have their stereotyped smile, and their fashionable manner.
They are quite obvious.  But an actress!  How different an actress
is!  Why didn't you tell me that the only thing worth loving is an
actress?"

"Because I have loved so many of them, Dorian."

"Oh, yes, horrid people with dyed hair and painted faces."

"Don't run down dyed hair and painted faces.  There is an
extraordinary charm in them, sometimes."

[27] "I wish now I had not told you about Sibyl Vane."

"You could not have helped telling me, Dorian.  All through your life
you will tell me everything you do."

"Yes, Harry, I believe that is true.  I cannot help telling you
things.  You have a curious influence over me.  If I ever did a
crime, I would come and confide it to you.  You would understand me."

"People like you--the wilful sunbeams of life--don't commit crimes,
Dorian.  But I am much obliged for the compliment, all the same.  And
now tell me,--reach me the matches, like a good boy: thanks,--tell
me, what are your relations with Sibyl Vane?"

Dorian Gray leaped to his feet, with flushed cheeks and burning eyes.
"Harry, Sibyl Vane is sacred!"

"It is only the sacred things that are worth touching, Dorian," said
Lord Henry, with a strange touch of pathos in his voice.  "But why
should you be annoyed?  I suppose she will be yours some day.  When
one is in love, one always begins by deceiving one's self, and one
always ends by deceiving others.  That is what the world calls
romance.  You know her, at any rate, I suppose?"

"Of course I know her.  On the first night I was at the theatre, the
horrid old Jew came round to the box after the performance was over,
and offered to bring me behind the scenes and introduce me to her.  I
was furious with him, and told him that Juliet had been dead for
hundreds of years, and that her body was lying in a marble tomb in
Verona.  I think, from his blank look of amazement, that he thought I
had taken too much champagne, or something."

"I am not surprised."

"I was not surprised either.  Then he asked me if I wrote for any of
the newspapers.  I told him I never even read them.  He seemed
terribly disappointed at that, and confided to me that all the
dramatic critics were in a conspiracy against him, and that they were
all to be bought."

"I believe he was quite right there.  But, on the other hand, most of
them are not at all expensive."

"Well, he seemed to think they were beyond his means.  By this time
the lights were being put out in the theatre, and I had to go.  He
wanted me to try some cigars which he strongly recommended.  I
declined.  The next night, of course, I arrived at the theatre again.
When he saw me he made me a low bow, and assured me that I was a
patron of art.  He was a most offensive brute, though he had an
extraordinary passion for Shakespeare.  He told me once, with an air
of pride, that his three bankruptcies were entirely due to the poet,
whom he insisted on calling 'The Bard.'  He seemed to think it a
distinction."

"It was a distinction, my dear Dorian,--a great distinction.  But
when did you first speak to Miss Sibyl Vane?"

"The third night.  She had been playing Rosalind.  I could not help
going round.  I had thrown her some flowers, and she had looked at
me; at least I fancied that she had.  The old Jew was persistent.  He
seemed determined to bring me behind, so I consented.  It was curious
my not wanting to know her, wasn't it?"

[28] "No; I don't think so."

"My dear Harry, why?"

"I will tell you some other time.  Now I want to know about the
girl."

"Sibyl?  Oh, she was so shy, and so gentle.  There is something of a
child about her.  Her eyes opened wide in exquisite wonder when I
told her what I thought of her performance, and she seemed quite
unconscious of her power.  I think we were both rather nervous.  The
old Jew stood grinning at the door-way of the dusty greenroom, making
elaborate speeches about us both, while we stood looking at each
other like children.  He would insist on calling me 'My Lord,' so I
had to assure Sibyl that I was not anything of the kind.  She said
quite simply to me, 'You look more like a prince.'"

"Upon my word, Dorian, Miss Sibyl knows how to pay compliments."

"You don't understand her, Harry.  She regarded me merely as a person
in a play.  She knows nothing of life.  She lives with her mother, a
faded tired woman who played Lady Capulet in a sort of magenta
dressing-wrapper on the first night, and who looks as if she had seen
better days."

"I know that look.  It always depresses me."

"The Jew wanted to tell me her history, but I said it did not
interest me."

"You were quite right.  There is always something infinitely mean
about other people's tragedies."

"Sibyl is the only thing I care about.  What is it to me where she
came from?  From her little head to her little feet, she is
absolutely and entirely divine.  I go to see her act every night of
my life, and every night she is more marvellous."

"That is the reason, I suppose, that you will never dine with me now.
I thought you must have some curious romance on hand.  You have; but
it is not quite what I expected."

"My dear Harry, we either lunch or sup together every day, and I have
been to the Opera with you several times."

"You always come dreadfully late."

"Well, I can't help going to see Sibyl play, even if it is only for
an act.  I get hungry for her presence; and when I think of the
wonderful soul that is hidden away in that little ivory body, I am
filled with awe."

"You can dine with me to-night, Dorian, can't you?"

He shook his head.  "To-night she is Imogen," he answered, "and
tomorrow night she will be Juliet."

"When is she Sibyl Vane?"

"Never."

"I congratulate you."

"How horrid you are!  She is all the great heroines of the world in
one.  She is more than an individual.  You laugh, but I tell you she
has genius.  I love her, and I must make her love me.  You, who know
all the secrets of life, tell me how to charm Sibyl Vane to love me!
I want to make Romeo jealous.  I want the dead lovers of the [29]
world to hear our laughter, and grow sad.  I want a breath of our
passion to stir their dust into consciousness, to wake their ashes
into pain.  My God, Harry, how I worship her!"  He was walking up and
down the room as he spoke.  Hectic spots of red burned on his cheeks.
He was terribly excited.

Lord Henry watched him with a subtle sense of pleasure.  How
different he was now from the shy, frightened boy he had met in Basil
Hallward's studio!  His nature had developed like a flower, had borne
blossoms of scarlet flame.  Out of its secret hiding-place had crept
his Soul, and Desire had come to meet it on the way.

"And what do you propose to do?" said Lord Henry, at last.

"I want you and Basil to come with me some night and see her act.  I
have not the slightest fear of the result.  You won't be able to
refuse to recognize her genius.  Then we must get her out of the
Jew's hands.  She is bound to him for three years--at least for two
years and eight months--from the present time.  I will have to pay
him something, of course.  When all that is settled, I will take a
West-End theatre and bring her out properly.  She will make the world
as mad as she has made me."

"Impossible, my dear boy!"

"Yes, she will.  She has not merely art, consummate art-instinct, in
her, but she has personality also; and you have often told me that it
is personalities, not principles, that move the age."

"Well, what night shall we go?"

"Let me see.  To-day is Tuesday.  Let us fix to-morrow.  She plays
Juliet to-morrow."

"All right.  The Bristol at eight o'clock; and I will get Basil."

"Not eight, Harry, please.  Half-past six.  We must be there before
the curtain rises.  You must see her in the first act, where she
meets Romeo."

"Half-past six!  What an hour!  It will be like having a meat-tea.
However, just as you wish.  Shall you see Basil between this and
then?  Or shall I write to him?"

"Dear Basil!  I have not laid eyes on him for a week.  It is rather
horrid of me, as he has sent me my portrait in the most wonderful
frame, designed by himself, and, though I am a little jealous of it
for being a whole month younger than I am, I must admit that I
delight in it.  Perhaps you had better write to him.  I don't want to
see him alone.  He says things that annoy me."

Lord Henry smiled.  "He gives you good advice, I suppose.  People are
very fond of giving away what they need most themselves."

"You don't mean to say that Basil has got any passion or any romance
in him?"

"I don't know whether he has any passion, but he certainly has
romance," said Lord Henry, with an amused look in his eyes.  "Has he
never let you know that?"

"Never.  I must ask him about it.  I am rather surprised to hear it.
He is the best of fellows, but he seems to me to be just a bit of a
Philistine.  Since I have known you, Harry, I have discovered that."

"Basil, my dear boy, puts everything that is charming in him into
[30] his work.  The consequence is that he has nothing left for life
but his prejudices, his principles, and his common sense.  The only
artists I have ever known who are personally delightful are bad
artists.  Good artists give everything to their art, and consequently
are perfectly uninteresting in themselves.  A great poet, a really
great poet, is the most unpoetical of all creatures.  But inferior
poets are absolutely fascinating.  The worse their rhymes are, the
more picturesque they look.  The mere fact of having published a book
of second-rate sonnets makes a man quite irresistible.  He lives the
poetry that he cannot write.  The others write the poetry that they
dare not realize."

"I wonder is that really so, Harry?" said Dorian Gray, putting some
perfume on his handkerchief out of a large gold-topped bottle that
stood on the table.  "It must be, if you say so.  And now I must be
off.  Imogen is waiting for me.  Don't forget about to-morrow.  Good-
by."

As he left the room, Lord Henry's heavy eyelids drooped, and he began
to think.  Certainly few people had ever interested him so much as
Dorian Gray, and yet the lad's mad adoration of some one else caused
him not the slightest pang of annoyance or jealousy.  He was pleased
by it.  It made him a more interesting study.  He had been always
enthralled by the methods of science, but the ordinary subject-matter
of science had seemed to him trivial and of no import.  And so he had
begun by vivisecting himself, as he had ended by vivisecting others.
Human life,--that appeared to him the one thing worth investigating.
There was nothing else of any value, compared to it.  It was true
that as one watched life in its curious crucible of pain and
pleasure, one could not wear over one's face a mask of glass, or keep
the sulphurous fumes from troubling the brain and making the
imagination turbid with monstrous fancies and misshapen dreams.
There were poisons so subtle that to know their properties one had to
sicken of them.  There were maladies so strange that one had to pass
through them if one sought to understand their nature.  And, yet,
what a great reward one received!  How wonderful the whole world
became to one!  To note the curious hard logic of passion, and the
emotional colored life of the intellect,--to observe where they met,
and where they separated, at what point they became one, and at what
point they were at discord,--there was a delight in that!  What
matter what the cost was?  One could never pay too high a price for
any sensation.

He was conscious--and the thought brought a gleam of pleasure into
his brown agate eyes--that it was through certain words of his,
musical words said with musical utterance, that Dorian Gray's soul
had turned to this white girl and bowed in worship before her.  To a
large extent, the lad was his own creation.  He had made him
premature.  That was something.  Ordinary people waited till life
disclosed to them its secrets, but to the few, to the elect, the
mysteries of life were revealed before the veil was drawn away.
Sometimes this was the effect of art, and chiefly of the art of
literature, which dealt immediately with the passions and the
intellect.  But now and then a complex personality took the place and
assumed the office of art, was indeed, in its [31] way, a real work
of art, Life having its elaborate masterpieces, just as poetry has,
or sculpture, or painting.

Yes, the lad was premature.  He was gathering his harvest while it
was yet spring.  The pulse and passion of youth were in him, but he
was becoming self-conscious.  It was delightful to watch him.  With
his beautiful face, and his beautiful soul, he was a thing to wonder
at.  It was no matter how it all ended, or was destined to end.  He
was like one of those gracious figures in a pageant or a play, whose
joys seem to be remote from one, but whose sorrows stir one's sense
of beauty, and whose wounds are like red roses.

Soul and body, body and soul--how mysterious they were!  There was
animalism in the soul, and the body had its moments of spirituality.
The senses could refine, and the intellect could degrade.  Who could
say where the fleshly impulse ceased, or the psychical impulse began?
How shallow were the arbitrary definitions of ordinary psychologists!
And yet how difficult to decide between the claims of the various
schools!  Was the soul a shadow seated in the house of sin?  Or was
the body really in the soul, as Giordano Bruno thought?  The
separation of spirit from matter was a mystery, and the union of
spirit with matter was a mystery also.

He began to wonder whether we should ever make psychology so absolute
a science that each little spring of life would be revealed to us.
As it was, we always misunderstood ourselves, and rarely understood
others.  Experience was of no ethical value.  It was merely the name
we gave to our mistakes.  Men had, as a rule, regarded it as a mode
of warning, had claimed for it a certain moral efficacy in the
formation of character, had praised it as something that taught us
what to follow and showed us what to avoid.  But there was no motive
power in experience.  It was as little of an active cause as
conscience itself.  All that it really demonstrated was that our
future would be the same as our past, and that the sin we had done
once, and with loathing, we would do many times, and with joy.

It was clear to him that the experimental method was the only method
by which one could arrive at any scientific analysis of the passions;
and certainly Dorian Gray was a subject made to his hand, and seemed
to promise rich and fruitful results.  His sudden mad love for Sibyl
Vane was a psychological phenomenon of no small interest.  There was
no doubt that curiosity had much to do with it, curiosity and the
desire for new experiences; yet it was not a simple but rather a very
complex passion.  What there was in it of the purely sensuous
instinct of boyhood had been transformed by the workings of the
imagination, changed into something that seemed to the boy himself to
be remote from sense, and was for that very reason all the more
dangerous.  It was the passions about whose origin we deceived
ourselves that tyrannized most strongly over us.  Our weakest motives
were those of whose nature we were conscious.  It often happened that
when we thought we were experimenting on others we were really
experimenting on ourselves.

While Lord Henry sat dreaming on these things, a knock came to the
door, and his valet entered, and reminded him it was time to dress
[32] for dinner.  He got up and looked out into the street.  The
sunset had smitten into scarlet gold the upper windows of the houses
opposite.  The panes glowed like plates of heated metal.  The sky
above was like a faded rose.  He thought of Dorian Gray's young
fiery-colored life, and wondered how it was all going to end.

When he arrived home, about half-past twelve o'clock, he saw a
telegram lying on the hall-table.  He opened it and found it was from
Dorian.  It was to tell him that he was engaged to be married to
Sibyl Vane.



CHAPTER IV

[...32] "I suppose you have heard the news, Basil?" said Lord Henry
on the following evening, as Hallward was shown into a little private
room at the Bristol where dinner had been laid for three.

"No, Harry," answered Hallward, giving his hat and coat to the bowing
waiter.  "What is it?  Nothing about politics, I hope?  They don't
interest me.  There is hardly a single person in the House of Commons
worth painting; though many of them would be the better for a little
whitewashing."

"Dorian Gray is engaged to be married," said Lord Henry, watching him
as he spoke.

Hallward turned perfectly pale, and a curious look flashed for a
moment into his eyes, and then passed away, leaving them dull.
"Dorian engaged to be married!" he cried.  "Impossible!"

"It is perfectly true."

"To whom?"

"To some little actress or other."

"I can't believe it.  Dorian is far too sensible."

"Dorian is far too wise not to do foolish things now and then, my
dear Basil."

"Marriage is hardly a thing that one can do now and then, Harry,"
said Hallward, smiling.

"Except in America.  But I didn't say he was married.  I said he was
engaged to be married.  There is a great difference.  I have a
distinct remembrance of being married, but I have no recollection at
all of being engaged.  I am inclined to think that I never was
engaged."

"But think of Dorian's birth, and position, and wealth.  It would be
absurd for him to marry so much beneath him."

"If you want him to marry this girl, tell him that, Basil.  He is
sure to do it then.  Whenever a man does a thoroughly stupid thing,
it is always from the noblest motives."

"I hope the girl is good, Harry.  I don't want to see Dorian tied to
some vile creature, who might degrade his nature and ruin his
intellect."

"Oh, she is more than good--she is beautiful," murmured Lord Henry,
sipping a glass of vermouth and orange-bitters.  "Dorian says she is
beautiful; and he is not often wrong about things of that kind.  [33]
Your portrait of him has quickened his appreciation of the personal
appearance of other people.  It has had that excellent effect, among
others.  We are to see her to-night, if that boy doesn't forget his
appointment."

"But do you approve of it, Harry?" asked Hallward, walking up and
down the room, and biting his lip.  "You can't approve of it, really.
It is some silly infatuation."

"I never approve, or disapprove, of anything now.  It is an absurd
attitude to take towards life.  We are not sent into the world to air
our moral prejudices.  I never take any notice of what common people
say, and I never interfere with what charming people do.  If a
personality fascinates me, whatever the personality chooses to do is
absolutely delightful to me.  Dorian Gray falls in love with a
beautiful girl who acts Shakespeare, and proposes to marry her.  Why
not?  If he wedded Messalina he would be none the less interesting.
You know I am not a champion of marriage.  The real drawback to
marriage is that it makes one unselfish.  And unselfish people are
colorless.  They lack individuality.  Still, there are certain
temperaments that marriage makes more complex.  They retain their
egotism, and add to it many other egos.  They are forced to have more
than one life.  They become more highly organized.  Besides, every
experience is of value, and, whatever one may say against marriage,
it is certainly an experience.  I hope that Dorian Gray will make
this girl his wife, passionately adore her for six months, and then
suddenly become fascinated by some one else.  He would be a wonderful
study."

"You don't mean all that, Harry; you know you don't.  If Dorian
Gray's life were spoiled, no one would be sorrier than yourself.  You
are much better than you pretend to be."

Lord Henry laughed.  "The reason we all like to think so well of
others is that we are all afraid for ourselves.  The basis of
optimism is sheer terror.  We think that we are generous because we
credit our neighbor with those virtues that are likely to benefit
ourselves.  We praise the banker that we may overdraw our account,
and find good qualities in the highwayman in the hope that he may
spare our pockets.  I mean everything that I have said.  I have the
greatest contempt for optimism.  And as for a spoiled life, no life
is spoiled but one whose growth is arrested.  If you want to mar a
nature, you have merely to reform it.  But here is Dorian himself.
He will tell you more than I can."

"My dear Harry, my dear Basil, you must both congratulate me!" said
the boy, throwing off his evening cape with its satin-lined wings,
and shaking each of his friends by the hand in turn.  "I have never
been so happy.  Of course it is sudden: all really delightful things
are.  And yet it seems to me to be the one thing I have been looking
for all my life."  He was flushed with excitement and pleasure, and
looked extraordinarily handsome.

"I hope you will always be very happy, Dorian," said Hallward, "but I
don't quite forgive you for not having let me know of your
engagement.  You let Harry know."

"And I don't forgive you for being late for dinner," broke in Lord
[34] Henry, putting his hand on the lad's shoulder, and smiling as he
spoke.  "Come, let us sit down and try what the new chef here is
like, and then you will tell us how it all came about."

"There is really not much to tell," cried Dorian, as they took their
seats at the small round table.  "What happened was simply this.
After I left you yesterday evening, Harry, I had some dinner at that
curious little Italian restaurant in Rupert Street, you introduced me
to, and went down afterwards to the theatre.  Sibyl was playing
Rosalind.  Of course the scenery was dreadful, and the Orlando
absurd.  But Sibyl!  You should have seen her!  When she came on in
her boy's dress she was perfectly wonderful.  She wore a moss-colored
velvet jerkin with cinnamon sleeves, slim brown cross-gartered hose,
a dainty little green cap with a hawk's feather caught in a jewel,
and a hooded cloak lined with dull red.  She had never seemed to me
more exquisite.  She had all the delicate grace of that Tanagra
figurine that you have in your studio, Basil.  Her hair clustered
round her face like dark leaves round a pale rose.  As for her
acting--well, you will see her to-night.  She is simply a born
artist.  I sat in the dingy box absolutely enthralled.  I forgot that
I was in London and in the nineteenth century.  I was away with my
love in a forest that no man had ever seen.  After the performance
was over I went behind, and spoke to her.  As we were sitting
together, suddenly there came a look into her eyes that I had never
seen there before.  My lips moved towards hers.  We kissed each
other.  I can't describe to you what I felt at that moment.  It
seemed to me that all my life had been narrowed to one perfect point
of rose-colored joy.  She trembled all over, and shook like a white
narcissus.  Then she flung herself on her knees and kissed my hands.
I feel that I should not tell you all this, but I can't help it.  Of
course our engagement is a dead secret.  She has not even told her
own mother.  I don't know what my guardians will say.  Lord Radley is
sure to be furious.  I don't care.  I shall be of age in less than a
year, and then I can do what I like.  I have been right, Basil,
haven't I, to take my love out of poetry, and to find my wife in
Shakespeare's plays?  Lips that Shakespeare taught to speak have
whispered their secret in my ear.  I have had the arms of Rosalind
around me, and kissed Juliet on the mouth."

"Yes, Dorian, I suppose you were right," said Hallward, slowly.

"Have you seen her to-day?" asked Lord Henry.

Dorian Gray shook his head.  "I left her in the forest of Arden, I
shall find her in an orchard in Verona."

Lord Henry sipped his champagne in a meditative manner.  "At what
particular point did you mention the word marriage, Dorian? and what
did she say in answer?  Perhaps you forgot all about it."

"My dear Harry, I did not treat it as a business transaction, and I
did not make any formal proposal.  I told her that I loved her, and
she said she was not worthy to be my wife.  Not worthy!  Why, the
whole world is nothing to me compared to her."

"Women are wonderfully practical," murmured Lord Henry,--"much more
practical than we are.  In situations of that kind we often forget to
say anything about marriage, and they always remind us."

[35] Hallward laid his hand upon his arm.  "Don't, Harry.  You have
annoyed Dorian.  He is not like other men.  He would never bring
misery upon any one.  His nature is too fine for that."

Lord Henry looked across the table.  "Dorian is never annoyed with
me," he answered.  "I asked the question for the best reason
possible, for the only reason, indeed, that excuses one for asking
any question,--simple curiosity.  I have a theory that it is always
the women who propose to us, and not we who propose to the women,
except, of course, in middle-class life.  But then the middle classes
are not modern."

Dorian Gray laughed, and tossed his head.  "You are quite
incorrigible, Harry; but I don't mind.  It is impossible to be angry
with you.  When you see Sibyl Vane you will feel that the man who
could wrong her would be a beast without a heart.  I cannot
understand how any one can wish to shame what he loves.  I love Sibyl
Vane.  I wish to place her on a pedestal of gold, and to see the
world worship the woman who is mine.  What is marriage?  An
irrevocable vow.  And it is an irrevocable vow that I want to take.
Her trust makes me faithful, her belief makes me good.  When I am
with her, I regret all that you have taught me.  I become different
from what you have known me to be.  I am changed, and the mere touch
of Sibyl Vane's hand makes me forget you and all your wrong,
fascinating, poisonous, delightful theories."

"You will always like me, Dorian," said Lord Henry.  "Will you have
some coffee, you fellows?--Waiter, bring coffee, and fine-champagne,
and some cigarettes.  No: don't mind the cigarettes; I have some.--
Basil, I can't allow you to smoke cigars.  You must have a cigarette.
A cigarette is the perfect type of a perfect pleasure.  It is
exquisite, and it leaves one unsatisfied.  What more can you want?--
Yes, Dorian, you will always be fond of me.  I represent to you all
the sins you have never had the courage to commit."

"What nonsense you talk, Harry!" cried Dorian Gray, lighting his
cigarette from a fire-breathing silver dragon that the waiter had
placed on the table.  "Let us go down to the theatre.  When you see
Sibyl you will have a new ideal of life.  She will represent
something to you that you have never known."

"I have known everything," said Lord Henry, with a sad look in his
eyes, "but I am always ready for a new emotion.  I am afraid that
there is no such thing, for me at any rate.  Still, your wonderful
girl may thrill me.  I love acting.  It is so much more real than
life.  Let us go.  Dorian, you will come with me.--I am so sorry,
Basil, but there is only room for two in the brougham.  You must
follow us in a hansom."

They got up and put on their coats, sipping their coffee standing.
Hallward was silent and preoccupied.  There was a gloom over him.  He
could not bear this marriage, and yet it seemed to him to be better
than many other things that might have happened.  After a few
moments, they all passed down-stairs.  He drove off by himself, as
had been arranged, and watched the flashing lights of the little
brougham in front of him.  A strange sense of loss came over him.
[36] He felt that Dorian Gray would never again be to him all that he
had been in the past.  His eyes darkened, and the crowded flaring
streets became blurred to him.  When the cab drew up at the doors of
the theatre, it seemed to him that he had grown years older.



CHAPTER V

[...36] For some reason or other, the house was crowded that night,
and the fat Jew manager who met them at the door was beaming from ear
to ear with an oily, tremulous smile.  He escorted them to their box
with a sort of pompous humility, waving his fat jewelled hands, and
talking at the top of his voice.  Dorian Gray loathed him more than
ever.  He felt as if he had come to look for Miranda and had been met
by Caliban.  Lord Henry, upon the other hand, rather liked him.  At
least he declared he did, and insisted on shaking him by the hand,
and assured him that he was proud to meet a man who had discovered a
real genius and gone bankrupt over Shakespeare.  Hallward amused
himself with watching the faces in the pit.  The heat was terribly
oppressive, and the huge sunlight flamed like a monstrous dahlia with
petals of fire.  The youths in the gallery had taken off their coats
and waistcoats and hung them over the side.  They talked to each
other across the theatre, and shared their oranges with the tawdry
painted girls who sat by them.  Some women were laughing in the pit;
their voices were horribly shrill and discordant.  The sound of the
popping of corks came from the bar.

"What a place to find one's divinity in!" said Lord Henry.

"Yes!" answered Dorian Gray.  "It was here I found her, and she is
divine beyond all living things.  When she acts you will forget
everything.  These common people here, with their coarse faces and
brutal gestures, become quite different when she is on the stage.
They sit silently and watch her.  They weep and laugh as she wills
them to do.  She makes them as responsive as a violin.  She
spiritualizes them, and one feels that they are of the same flesh and
blood as one's self."

"Oh, I hope not!" murmured Lord Henry, who was scanning the occupants
of the gallery through his opera-glass.

"Don't pay any attention to him, Dorian," said Hallward.  "I
understand what you mean, and I believe in this girl.  Any one you
love must be marvellous, and any girl that has the effect you
describe must be fine and noble.  To spiritualize one's age,--that is
something worth doing.  If this girl can give a soul to those who
have lived without one, if she can create the sense of beauty in
people whose lives have been sordid and ugly, if she can strip them
of their selfishness and lend them tears for sorrows that are not
their own, she is worthy of all your adoration, worthy of the
adoration of the world.  This marriage is quite right.  I did not
think so at first, but I admit it now.  God made Sibyl Vane for you.
Without her you would have been incomplete."

"Thanks, Basil," answered Dorian Gray, pressing his hand.  "I [37]
knew that you would understand me.  Harry is so cynical, he terrifies
me.  But here is the orchestra.  It is quite dreadful, but it only
lasts for about five minutes.  Then the curtain rises, and you will
see the girl to whom I am going to give all my life, to whom I have
given everything that is good in me."

A quarter of an hour afterwards, amidst an extraordinary turmoil of
applause, Sibyl Vane stepped on to the stage.  Yes, she was certainly
lovely to look at,--one of the loveliest creatures, Lord Henry
thought, that he had ever seen.  There was something of the fawn in
her shy grace and startled eyes.  A faint blush, like the shadow of a
rose in a mirror of silver, came to her cheeks as she glanced at the
crowded, enthusiastic house.  She stepped back a few paces, and her
lips seemed to tremble.  Basil Hallward leaped to his feet and began
to applaud.  Dorian Gray sat motionless, gazing on her, like a man in
a dream.  Lord Henry peered through his opera-glass, murmuring,
"Charming! charming!"

The scene was the hall of Capulet's house, and Romeo in his pilgrim's
dress had entered with Mercutio and his friends.  The band, such as
it was, struck up a few bars of music, and the dance began.  Through
the crowd of ungainly, shabbily-dressed actors, Sibyl Vane moved like
a creature from a finer world.  Her body swayed, as she danced, as a
plant sways in the water.  The curves of her throat were like the
curves of a white lily.  Her hands seemed to be made of cool ivory.

Yet she was curiously listless.  She showed no sign of joy when her
eyes rested on Romeo.  The few lines she had to speak,--

     Good pilgrim, you do wrong your hand too much,
        Which mannerly devotion shows in this;
     For saints have hands that pilgrims' hands do touch,
        And palm to palm is holy palmers' kiss,--

with the brief dialogue that follows, were spoken in a thoroughly
artificial manner.  The voice was exquisite, but from the point of
view of tone it was absolutely false.  It was wrong in color.  It
took away all the life from the verse.  It made the passion unreal.

Dorian Gray grew pale as he watched her.  Neither of his friends
dared to say anything to him.  She seemed to them to be absolutely
incompetent.  They were horribly disappointed.

Yet they felt that the true test of any Juliet is the balcony scene
of the second act.  They waited for that.  If she failed there, there
was nothing in her.

She looked charming as she came out in the moonlight.  That could not
be denied.  But the staginess of her acting was unbearable, and grew
worse as she went on.  Her gestures became absurdly artificial.  She
over-emphasized everything that she had to say.  The beautiful
passage,--

     Thou knowest the mask of night is on my face,
     Else would a maiden blush bepaint my cheek
     For that which thou hast heard me speak to-night,--

[38] was declaimed with the painful precision of a school-girl who
has been taught to recite by some second-rate professor of elocution.
When she leaned over the balcony and came to those wonderful lines,--

                                Although I joy in thee,
     I have no joy of this contract to-night:
     It is too rash, too unadvised, too sudden;
     Too like the lightning, which doth cease to be
     Ere one can say, "It lightens."  Sweet, good-night!
     This bud of love by summer's ripening breath
     May prove a beauteous flower when next we meet,--

she spoke the words as if they conveyed no meaning to her.  It was
not nervousness.  Indeed, so far from being nervous, she seemed
absolutely self-contained.  It was simply bad art.  She was a
complete failure.

Even the common uneducated audience of the pit and gallery lost their
interest in the play.  They got restless, and began to talk loudly
and to whistle.  The Jew manager, who was standing at the back of the
dress-circle, stamped and swore with rage.  The only person unmoved
was the girl herself.

When the second act was over there came a storm of hisses, and Lord
Henry got up from his chair and put on his coat.  "She is quite
beautiful, Dorian," he said, "but she can't act.  Let us go."

"I am going to see the play through," answered the lad, in a hard,
bitter voice.  "I am awfully sorry that I have made you waste an
evening, Harry.  I apologize to both of you."

"My dear Dorian, I should think Miss Vane was ill," interrupted
Hallward.  "We will come some other night."

"I wish she was ill," he rejoined.  "But she seems to me to be simply
callous and cold.  She has entirely altered.  Last night she was a
great artist.  To-night she is merely a commonplace, mediocre
actress."

"Don't talk like that about any one you love, Dorian.  Love is a more
wonderful thing than art."

"They are both simply forms of imitation," murmured Lord Henry.  "But
do let us go.  Dorian, you must not stay here any longer.  It is not
good for one's morals to see bad acting.  Besides, I don't suppose
you will want your wife to act.  So what does it matter if she plays
Juliet like a wooden doll?  She is very lovely, and if she knows as
little about life as she does about acting, she will be a delightful
experience.  There are only two kinds of people who are really
fascinating,--people who know absolutely everything, and people who
know absolutely nothing.  Good heavens, my dear boy, don't look so
tragic!  The secret of remaining young is never to have an emotion
that is unbecoming.  Come to the club with Basil and myself.  We will
smoke cigarettes and drink to the beauty of Sibyl Vane.  She is
beautiful.  What more can you want?"

"Please go away, Harry," cried the lad.  "I really want to be alone.-
-Basil, you don't mind my asking you to go?  Ah! can't you see that
my heart is breaking?"  The hot tears came to his eyes.  His [39]
lips trembled, and, rushing to the back of the box, he leaned up
against the wall, hiding his face in his hands.

"Let us go, Basil," said Lord Henry, with a strange tenderness in his
voice; and the two young men passed out together.

A few moments afterwards the footlights flared up, and the curtain
rose on the third act.  Dorian Gray went back to his seat.  He looked
pale, and proud, and indifferent.  The play dragged on, and seemed
interminable.  Half of the audience went out, tramping in heavy
boots, and laughing.  The whole thing was a fiasco.  The last act was
played to almost empty benches.

As soon as it was over, Dorian Gray rushed behind the scenes into the
greenroom.  The girl was standing alone there, with a look of triumph
on her face.  Her eyes were lit with an exquisite fire.  There was a
radiance about her.  Her parted lips were smiling over some secret of
their own.

When he entered, she looked at him, and an expression of infinite joy
came over her.  "How badly I acted to-night, Dorian!" she cried.

"Horribly!" he answered, gazing at her in amazement,--"horribly!  It
was dreadful.  Are you ill?  You have no idea what it was.  You have
no idea what I suffered."

The girl smiled.  "Dorian," she answered, lingering over his name
with long-drawn music in her voice, as though it were sweeter than
honey to the red petals of her lips,--"Dorian, you should have
understood.  But you understand now, don't you?"

"Understand what?" he asked, angrily.

"Why I was so bad to-night.  Why I shall always be bad.  Why I shall
never act well again."

He shrugged his shoulders.  "You are ill, I suppose.  When you are
ill you shouldn't act.  You make yourself ridiculous.  My friends
were bored.  I was bored."

She seemed not to listen to him.  She was transfigured with joy.  An
ecstasy of happiness dominated her.

"Dorian, Dorian," she cried, "before I knew you, acting was the one
reality of my life.  It was only in the theatre that I lived.  I
thought that it was all true.  I was Rosalind one night, and Portia
the other.  The joy of Beatrice was my joy, and the sorrows of
Cordelia were mine also.  I believed in everything.  The common
people who acted with me seemed to me to be godlike.  The painted
scenes were my world.  I knew nothing but shadows, and I thought them
real.  You came,--oh, my beautiful love!--and you freed my soul from
prison.  You taught me what reality really is.  To-night, for the
first time in my life, I saw through the hollowness, the sham, the
silliness, of the empty pageant in which I had always played.  To-
night, for the first time, I became conscious that the Romeo was
hideous, and old, and painted, that the moonlight in the orchard was
false, that the scenery was vulgar, and that the words I had to speak
were unreal, were not my words, not what I wanted to say.  You had
brought me something higher, something of which all art is but a
reflection.  You have made me understand what love really is.  My
love! my love!  I am sick [40] of shadows.  You are more to me than
all art can ever be.  What have I to do with the puppets of a play?
When I came on to-night, I could not understand how it was that
everything had gone from me.  Suddenly it dawned on my soul what it
all meant.  The knowledge was exquisite to me.  I heard them hissing,
and I smiled.  What should they know of love?  Take me away, Dorian--
take me away with you, where we can be quite alone.  I hate the
stage.  I might mimic a passion that I do not feel, but I cannot
mimic one that burns me like fire.  Oh, Dorian, Dorian, you
understand now what it all means?  Even if I could do it, it would be
profanation for me to play at being in love.  You have made me see
that."

He flung himself down on the sofa, and turned away his face.  "You
have killed my love," he muttered.

She looked at him in wonder, and laughed.  He made no answer.  She
came across to him, and stroked his hair with her little fingers.
She knelt down and pressed his hands to her lips.  He drew them away,
and a shudder ran through him.

Then he leaped up, and went to the door.  "Yes," he cried, "you have
killed my love.  You used to stir my imagination.  Now you don't even
stir my curiosity.  You simply produce no effect.  I loved you
because you were wonderful, because you had genius and intellect,
because you realized the dreams of great poets and gave shape and
substance to the shadows of art.  You have thrown it all away.  You
are shallow and stupid.  My God! how mad I was to love you!  What a
fool I have been!  You are nothing to me now.  I will never see you
again.  I will never think of you.  I will never mention your name.
You don't know what you were to me, once.  Why, once . . . . Oh, I
can't bear to think of it!  I wish I had never laid eyes upon you!
You have spoiled the romance of my life.  How little you can know of
love, if you say it mars your art!  What are you without your art?
Nothing.  I would have made you famous, splendid, magnificent.  The
world would have worshipped you, and you would have belonged to me.
What are you now?  A third-rate actress with a pretty face."

The girl grew white, and trembled.  She clinched her hands together,
and her voice seemed to catch in her throat.  "You are not serious,
Dorian?" she murmured.  "You are acting."

"Acting!  I leave that to you.  You do it so well," he answered,
bitterly.

She rose from her knees, and, with a piteous expression of pain in
her face, came across the room to him.  She put her hand upon his
arm, and looked into his eyes.  He thrust her back.  "Don't touch
me!" he cried.

A low moan broke from her, and she flung herself at his feet, and lay
there like a trampled flower.  "Dorian, Dorian, don't leave me!" she
whispered.  "I am so sorry I didn't act well.  I was thinking of you
all the time.  But I will try,--indeed, I will try.  It came so
suddenly across me, my love for you.  I think I should never have
known it if you had not kissed me,--if we had not kissed each other.
Kiss me again, my love.  Don't go away from me.  I couldn't bear it.
Can't you forgive me for to-night?  I will work so hard, and try to
[41] improve.  Don't be cruel to me because I love you better than
anything in the world.  After all, it is only once that I have not
pleased you.  But you are quite right, Dorian.  I should have shown
myself more of an artist.  It was foolish of me; and yet I couldn't
help it.  Oh, don't leave me, don't leave me."  A fit of passionate
sobbing choked her.  She crouched on the floor like a wounded thing,
and Dorian Gray, with his beautiful eyes, looked down at her, and his
chiselled lips curled in exquisite disdain.  There is always
something ridiculous about the passions of people whom one has ceased
to love.  Sibyl Vane seemed to him to be absurdly melodramatic.  Her
tears and sobs annoyed him.

"I am going," he said at last, in his calm, clear voice.  "I don't
wish to be unkind, but I can't see you again.  You have disappointed
me."

She wept silently, and made no answer, but crept nearer to him.  Her
little hands stretched blindly out, and appeared to be seeking for
him.  He turned on his heel, and left the room.  In a few moments he
was out of the theatre.

Where he went to, he hardly knew.  He remembered wandering through
dimly-lit streets with gaunt black-shadowed archways and evil-looking
houses.  Women with hoarse voices and harsh laughter had called after
him.  Drunkards had reeled by cursing, and chattering to themselves
like monstrous apes.  He had seen grotesque children huddled upon
door-steps, and had heard shrieks and oaths from gloomy courts.

When the dawn was just breaking he found himself at Covent Garden.
Huge carts filled with nodding lilies rumbled slowly down the
polished empty street.  The air was heavy with the perfume of the
flowers, and their beauty seemed to bring him an anodyne for his
pain.  He followed into the market, and watched the men unloading
their wagons.  A white-smocked carter offered him some cherries.  He
thanked him, wondered why he refused to accept any money for them,
and began to eat them listlessly.  They had been plucked at midnight,
and the coldness of the moon had entered into them.  A long line of
boys carrying crates of striped tulips, and of yellow and red roses,
defiled in front of him, threading their way through the huge jade-
green piles of vegetables.  Under the portico, with its gray sun-
bleached pillars, loitered a troop of draggled bareheaded girls,
waiting for the auction to be over.  After some time he hailed a
hansom and drove home.  The sky was pure opal now, and the roofs of
the houses glistened like silver against it.  As he was passing
through the library towards the door of his bedroom, his eye fell
upon the portrait Basil Hallward had painted of him.  He started back
in surprise, and then went over to it and examined it.  In the dim
arrested light that struggled through the cream-colored silk blinds,
the face seemed to him to be a little changed.  The expression looked
different.  One would have said that there was a touch of cruelty in
the mouth.  It was certainly curious.

He turned round, and, walking to the window, drew the blinds up.  The
bright dawn flooded the room, and swept the fantastic shadows [42]
into dusky corners, where they lay shuddering.  But the strange
expression that he had noticed in the face of the portrait seemed to
linger there, to be more intensified even.  The quivering, ardent
sunlight showed him the lines of cruelty round the mouth as clearly
as if he had been looking into a mirror after he had done some
dreadful thing.

He winced, and, taking up from the table an oval glass framed in
ivory Cupids, that Lord Henry had given him, he glanced hurriedly
into it.  No line like that warped his red lips.  What did it mean?

He rubbed his eyes, and came close to the picture, and examined it
again.  There were no signs of any change when he looked into the
actual painting, and yet there was no doubt that the whole expression
had altered.  It was not a mere fancy of his own.  The thing was
horribly apparent.

He threw himself into a chair, and began to think.  Suddenly there
flashed across his mind what he had said in Basil Hallward's studio
the day the picture had been finished.  Yes, he remembered it
perfectly.  He had uttered a mad wish that he himself might remain
young, and the portrait grow old; that his own beauty might be
untarnished, and the face on the canvas bear the burden of his
passions and his sins; that the painted image might be seared with
the lines of suffering and thought, and that he might keep all the
delicate bloom and loveliness of his then just conscious boyhood.
Surely his prayer had not been answered?  Such things were
impossible.  It seemed monstrous even to think of them.  And, yet,
there was the picture before him, with the touch of cruelty in the
mouth.

Cruelty!  Had he been cruel?  It was the girl's fault, not his.  He
had dreamed of her as a great artist, had given his love to her
because he had thought her great.  Then she had disappointed him.
She had been shallow and unworthy.  And, yet, a feeling of infinite
regret came over him, as he thought of her lying at his feet sobbing
like a little child.  He remembered with what callousness he had
watched her.  Why had he been made like that?  Why had such a soul
been given to him?  But he had suffered also.  During the three
terrible hours that the play had lasted, he had lived centuries of
pain, aeon upon aeon of torture.  His life was well worth hers.  She
had marred him for a moment, if he had wounded her for an age.
Besides, women were better suited to bear sorrow than men.  They
lived on their emotions.  They only thought of their emotions.  When
they took lovers, it was merely to have some one with whom they could
have scenes.  Lord Henry had told him that, and Lord Henry knew what
women were.  Why should he trouble about Sibyl Vane?  She was nothing
to him now.

But the picture?  What was he to say of that?  It held the secret of
his life, and told his story.  It had taught him to love his own
beauty.  Would it teach him to loathe his own soul?  Would he ever
look at it again?

No; it was merely an illusion wrought on the troubled senses.  The
horrible night that he had passed had left phantoms behind it.
Suddenly there had fallen upon his brain that tiny scarlet speck that
[43] makes men mad.  The picture had not changed.  It was folly to
think so.

Yet it was watching him, with its beautiful marred face and its cruel
smile.  Its bright hair gleamed in the early sunlight.  Its blue eyes
met his own.  A sense of infinite pity, not for himself, but for the
painted image of himself, came over him.  It had altered already, and
would alter more.  Its gold would wither into gray.  Its red and
white roses would die.  For every sin that he committed, a stain
would fleck and wreck its fairness.  But he would not sin.  The
picture, changed or unchanged, would be to him the visible emblem of
conscience.  He would resist temptation.  He would not see Lord Henry
any more,--would not, at any rate, listen to those subtle poisonous
theories that in Basil Hallward's garden had first stirred within him
the passion for impossible things.  He would go back to Sibyl Vane,
make her amends, marry her, try to love her again.  Yes, it was his
duty to do so.  She must have suffered more than he had.  Poor child!
He had been selfish and cruel to her.  The fascination that she had
exercised over him would return.  They would be happy together.  His
life with her would be beautiful and pure.

He got up from his chair, and drew a large screen right in front of
the portrait, shuddering as he glanced at it.  "How horrible!" he
murmured to himself, and he walked across to the window and opened
it.  When he stepped out on the grass, he drew a deep breath.  The
fresh morning air seemed to drive away all his sombre passions.  He
thought only of Sibyl Vane.  A faint echo of his love came back to
him.  He repeated her name over and over again.  The birds that were
singing in the dew-drenched garden seemed to be telling the flowers
about her.



CHAPTER VI

[...43] It was long past noon when he awoke.  His valet had crept
several times into the room on tiptoe to see if he was stirring, and
had wondered what made his young master sleep so late.  Finally his
bell sounded, and Victor came in softly with a cup of tea, and a pile
of letters, on a small tray of old Sevres china, and drew back the
olive-satin curtains, with their shimmering blue lining, that hung in
front of the three tall windows.

"Monsieur has well slept this morning," he said, smiling.

"What o'clock is it, Victor?" asked Dorian Gray, sleepily.

"One hour and a quarter, monsieur."

How late it was!  He sat up, and, having sipped some tea, turned over
his letters.  One of them was from Lord Henry, and had been brought
by hand that morning.  He hesitated for a moment, and then put it
aside.  The others he opened listlessly.  They contained the usual
collection of cards, invitations to dinner, tickets for private
views, programmes of charity concerts, and the like, that are
showered on fashionable young men every morning during the season.
There was a [44] rather heavy bill, for a chased silver Louis-Quinze
toilet-set, that he had not yet had the courage to send on to his
guardians, who were extremely old-fashioned people and did not
realize that we live in an age when only unnecessary things are
absolutely necessary to us; and there were several very courteously
worded communications from Jermyn Street money-lenders offering to
advance any sum of money at a moment's notice and at the most
reasonable rates of interest.

After about ten minutes he got up, and, throwing on an elaborate
dressing-gown, passed into the onyx-paved bath-room.  The cool water
refreshed him after his long sleep.  He seemed to have forgotten all
that he had gone through.  A dim sense of having taken part in some
strange tragedy came to him once or twice, but there was the
unreality of a dream about it.

As soon as he was dressed, he went into the library and sat down to a
light French breakfast, that had been laid out for him on a small
round table close to an open window.  It was an exquisite day.  The
warm air seemed laden with spices.  A bee flew in, and buzzed round
the blue-dragon bowl, filled with sulphur-yellow roses, that stood in
front of him.  He felt perfectly happy.

Suddenly his eye fell on the screen that he had placed in front of
the portrait, and he started.

"Too cold for Monsieur?" asked his valet, putting an omelette on the
table.  "I shut the window?"

Dorian shook his head.  "I am not cold," he murmured.

Was it all true?  Had the portrait really changed?  Or had it been
simply his own imagination that had made him see a look of evil where
there had been a look of joy?  Surely a painted canvas could not
alter?  The thing was absurd.  It would serve as a tale to tell Basil
some day.  It would make him smile.

And, yet, how vivid was his recollection of the whole thing!  First
in the dim twilight, and then in the bright dawn, he had seen the
touch of cruelty in the warped lips.  He almost dreaded his valet
leaving the room.  He knew that when he was alone he would have to
examine the portrait.  He was afraid of certainty.  When the coffee
and cigarettes had been brought and the man turned to go, he felt a
mad desire to tell him to remain.  As the door closed behind him he
called him back.  The man stood waiting for his orders.  Dorian
looked at him for a moment.  "I am not at home to any one, Victor,"
he said, with a sigh.  The man bowed and retired.

He rose from the table, lit a cigarette, and flung himself down on a
luxuriously-cushioned couch that stood facing the screen.  The screen
was an old one of gilt Spanish leather, stamped and wrought with a
rather florid Louis-Quatorze pattern.  He scanned it curiously,
wondering if it had ever before concealed the secret of a man's life.

Should he move it aside, after all?  Why not let it stay there?  What
was the use of knowing?  If the thing was true, it was terrible.  If
it was not true, why trouble about it?  But what if, by some fate or
deadlier chance, other eyes than his spied behind, and saw the
horrible change?  What should he do if Basil Hallward came and asked
to look at his own picture?  He would be sure to do that.  No; the
[45] thing had to be examined, and at once.  Anything would be better
than this dreadful state of doubt.

He got up, and locked both doors.  At least he would be alone when he
looked upon the mask of his shame.  Then he drew the screen aside,
and saw himself face to face.  It was perfectly true.  The portrait
had altered.

As he often remembered afterwards, and always with no small wonder,
he found himself at first gazing at the portrait with a feeling of
almost scientific interest.  That such a change should have taken
place was incredible to him.  And yet it was a fact.  Was there some
subtle affinity between the chemical atoms, that shaped themselves
into form and color on the canvas, and the soul that was within him?
Could it be that what that soul thought, they realized?--that what it
dreamed, they made true?  Or was there some other, more terrible
reason?  He shuddered, and felt afraid, and, going back to the couch,
lay there, gazing at the picture in sickened horror.

One thing, however, he felt that it had done for him.  It had made
him conscious how unjust, how cruel, he had been to Sibyl Vane.  It
was not too late to make reparation for that.  She could still be his
wife.  His unreal and selfish love would yield to some higher
influence, would be transformed into some nobler passion, and the
portrait that Basil Hallward had painted of him would be a guide to
him through life, would be to him what holiness was to some, and
conscience to others, and the fear of God to us all.  There were
opiates for remorse, drugs that could lull the moral sense to sleep.
But here was a visible symbol of the degradation of sin.  Here was an
ever-present sign of the ruin men brought upon their souls.

Three o'clock struck, and four, and half-past four, but he did not
stir.  He was trying to gather up the scarlet threads of life, and to
weave them into a pattern; to find his way through the sanguine
labyrinth of passion through which he was wandering.  He did not know
what to do, or what to think.  Finally, he went over to the table and
wrote a passionate letter to the girl he had loved, imploring her
forgiveness, and accusing himself of madness.  He covered page after
page with wild words of sorrow, and wilder words of pain.  There is a
luxury in self-reproach.  When we blame ourselves we feel that no one
else has a right to blame us.  It is the confession, not the priest,
that gives us absolution.  When Dorian Gray had finished the letter,
he felt that he had been forgiven.

Suddenly there came a knock to the door, and he heard Lord Henry's
voice outside.  "My dear Dorian, I must see you.  Let me in at once.
I can't bear your shutting yourself up like this."

He made no answer at first, but remained quite still.  The knocking
still continued, and grew louder.  Yes, it was better to let Lord
Henry in, and to explain to him the new life he was going to lead, to
quarrel with him if it became necessary to quarrel, to part if
parting was inevitable.  He jumped up, drew the screen hastily across
the picture, and unlocked the door.

"I am so sorry for it all, my dear boy," said Lord Henry, coming in.
"But you must not think about it too much."

[46] "Do you mean about Sibyl Vane?" asked Dorian.

"Yes, of course," answered Lord Henry, sinking into a chair, and
slowly pulling his gloves off.  "It is dreadful, from one point of
view, but it was not your fault.  Tell me, did you go behind and see
her after the play was over?"

"Yes."

"I felt sure you had.  Did you make a scene with her?"

"I was brutal, Harry,--perfectly brutal.  But it is all right now.  I
am not sorry for anything that has happened.  It has taught me to
know myself better."

"Ah, Dorian, I am so glad you take it in that way!  I was afraid I
would find you plunged in remorse, and tearing your nice hair."

"I have got through all that," said Dorian, shaking his head, and
smiling.  "I am perfectly happy now.  I know what conscience is, to
begin with.  It is not what you told me it was.  It is the divinest
thing in us.  Don't sneer at it, Harry, any more,--at least not
before me.  I want to be good.  I can't bear the idea of my soul
being hideous."

"A very charming artistic basis for ethics, Dorian!  I congratulate
you on it.  But how are you going to begin?"

"By marrying Sibyl Vane."

"Marrying Sibyl Vane!" cried Lord Henry, standing up, and looking at
him in perplexed amazement.  "But, my dear Dorian--"

"Yes, Harry, I know what you are going to say.  Something dreadful
about marriage.  Don't say it.  Don't ever say things of that kind to
me again.  Two days ago I asked Sibyl to marry me.  I am not going to
break my word to her.  She is to be my wife."

"Your wife!  Dorian! . . . Didn't you get my letter?  I wrote to you
this morning, and sent the note down, by my own man."

"Your letter?  Oh, yes, I remember.  I have not read it yet, Harry.
I was afraid there might be something in it that I wouldn't like."

Lord Henry walked across the room, and, sitting down by Dorian Gray,
took both his hands in his, and held them tightly.  "Dorian," he
said, "my letter--don't be frightened--was to tell you that Sibyl
Vane is dead."

A cry of pain rose from the lad's lips, and he leaped to his feet,
tearing his hands away from Lord Henry's grasp.  "Dead!  Sibyl dead!
It is not true!  It is a horrible lie!"

"It is quite true, Dorian," said Lord Henry, gravely.  "It is in all
the morning papers.  I wrote down to you to ask you not to see any
one till I came.  There will have to be an inquest, of course, and
you must not be mixed up in it.  Things like that make a man
fashionable in Paris.  But in London people are so prejudiced.  Here,
one should never make one's debut with a scandal.  One should reserve
that to give an interest to one's old age.  I don't suppose they know
your name at the theatre.  If they don't, it is all right.  Did any
one see you going round to her room?  That is an important point."

Dorian did not answer for a few moments.  He was dazed with horror.
Finally he murmured, in a stifled voice, "Harry, did you say an
inquest?  What did you mean by that?  Did Sibyl--?  Oh, [47] Harry, I
can't bear it!  But be quick.  Tell me everything at once."

"I have no doubt it was not an accident, Dorian, though it must be
put in that way to the public.  As she was leaving the theatre with
her mother, about half-past twelve or so, she said she had forgotten
something up-stairs.  They waited some time for her, but she did not
come down again.  They ultimately found her lying dead on the floor
of her dressing-room.  She had swallowed something by mistake, some
dreadful thing they use at theatres.  I don't know what it was, but
it had either prussic acid or white lead in it.  I should fancy it
was prussic acid, as she seems to have died instantaneously.  It is
very tragic, of course, but you must not get yourself mixed up in it.
I see by the Standard that she was seventeen.  I should have thought
she was almost younger than that.  She looked such a child, and
seemed to know so little about acting.  Dorian, you mustn't let this
thing get on your nerves.  You must come and dine with me, and
afterwards we will look in at the Opera.  It is a Patti night, and
everybody will be there.  You can come to my sister's box.  She has
got some smart women with her."

"So I have murdered Sibyl Vane," said Dorian Gray, half to himself,--
"murdered her as certainly as if I had cut her little throat with a
knife.  And the roses are not less lovely for all that.  The birds
sing just as happily in my garden.  And to-night I am to dine with
you, and then go on to the Opera, and sup somewhere, I suppose,
afterwards.  How extraordinarily dramatic life is!  If I had read all
this in a book, Harry, I think I would have wept over it.  Somehow,
now that it has happened actually, and to me, it seems far too
wonderful for tears.  Here is the first passionate love-letter I have
ever written in my life.  Strange, that my first passionate love-
letter should have been addressed to a dead girl.  Can they feel, I
wonder, those white silent people we call the dead?  Sibyl!  Can she
feel, or know, or listen?  Oh, Harry, how I loved her once!  It seems
years ago to me now.  She was everything to me.  Then came that
dreadful night--was it really only last night?--when she played so
badly, and my heart almost broke.  She explained it all to me.  It
was terribly pathetic.  But I was not moved a bit.  I thought her
shallow.  Then something happened that made me afraid.  I can't tell
you what it was, but it was awful.  I said I would go back to her.  I
felt I had done wrong.  And now she is dead.  My God! my God!  Harry,
what shall I do?  You don't know the danger I am in, and there is
nothing to keep me straight.  She would have done that for me.  She
had no right to kill herself.  It was selfish of her."

"My dear Dorian, the only way a woman can ever reform a man is by
boring him so completely that he loses all possible interest in life.
If you had married this girl you would have been wretched.  Of course
you would have treated her kindly.  One can always be kind to people
about whom one cares nothing.  But she would have soon found out that
you were absolutely indifferent to her.  And when a woman finds that
out about her husband, she either becomes dreadfully dowdy, or wears
very smart bonnets that some other woman's husband has to [48] pay
for.  I say nothing about the social mistake, but I assure you that
in any case the whole thing would have been an absolute failure."

"I suppose it would," muttered the lad, walking up and down the room,
and looking horribly pale.  "But I thought it was my duty.  It is not
my fault that this terrible tragedy has prevented my doing what was
right.  I remember your saying once that there is a fatality about
good resolutions,--that they are always made too late.  Mine
certainly were."

"Good resolutions are simply a useless attempt to interfere with
scientific laws.  Their origin is pure vanity.  Their result is
absolutely nil.  They give us, now and then, some of those luxurious
sterile emotions that have a certain charm for us.  That is all that
can be said for them."

"Harry," cried Dorian Gray, coming over and sitting down beside him,
"why is it that I cannot feel this tragedy as much as I want to?  I
don't think I am heartless.  Do you?"

"You have done too many foolish things in your life to be entitled to
give yourself that name, Dorian," answered Lord Henry, with his
sweet, melancholy smile.

The lad frowned.  "I don't like that explanation, Harry," he
rejoined, "but I am glad you don't think I am heartless.  I am
nothing of the kind.  I know I am not.  And yet I must admit that
this thing that has happened does not affect me as it should.  It
seems to me to be simply like a wonderful ending to a wonderful play.
It has all the terrible beauty of a great tragedy, a tragedy in which
I took part, but by which I have not been wounded."

"It is an interesting question," said Lord Henry, who found an
exquisite pleasure in playing on the lad's unconscious egotism,--"an
extremely interesting question.  I fancy that the explanation is
this.  It often happens that the real tragedies of life occur in such
an inartistic manner that they hurt us by their crude violence, their
absolute incoherence, their absurd want of meaning, their entire lack
of style.  They affect us just as vulgarity affects us.  They give us
an impression of sheer brute force, and we revolt against that.
Sometimes, however, a tragedy that has artistic elements of beauty
crosses our lives.  If these elements of beauty are real, the whole
thing simply appeals to our sense of dramatic effect.  Suddenly we
find that we are no longer the actors, but the spectators of the
play.  Or rather we are both.  We watch ourselves, and the mere
wonder of the spectacle enthralls us.  In the present case, what is
it that has really happened?  Some one has killed herself for love of
you.  I wish I had ever had such an experience.  It would have made
me in love with love for the rest of my life.  The people who have
adored me--there have not been very many, but there have been some--
have always insisted on living on, long after I had ceased to care
for them, or they to care for me.  They have become stout and
tedious, and when I meet them they go in at once for reminiscences.
That awful memory of woman!  What a fearful thing it is!  And what an
utter intellectual stagnation it reveals!  One should absorb the
color of life, but one should never remember its details.  Details
are always vulgar.

[49] "Of course, now and then things linger.  I once wore nothing but
violets all through one season, as mourning for a romance that would
not die.  Ultimately, however, it did die.  I forget what killed it.
I think it was her proposing to sacrifice the whole world for me.
That is always a dreadful moment.  It fills one with the terror of
eternity.  Well,--would you believe it?--a week ago, at Lady
Hampshire's, I found myself seated at dinner next the lady in
question, and she insisted on going over the whole thing again, and
digging up the past, and raking up the future.  I had buried my
romance in a bed of poppies.  She dragged it out again, and assured
me that I had spoiled her life.  I am bound to state that she ate an
enormous dinner, so I did not feel any anxiety.  But what a lack of
taste she showed!  The one charm of the past is that it is the past.
But women never know when the curtain has fallen.  They always want a
sixth act, and as soon as the interest of the play is entirely over
they propose to continue it.  If they were allowed to have their way,
every comedy would have a tragic ending, and every tragedy would
culminate in a farce.  They are charmingly artificial, but they have
no sense of art.  You are more fortunate than I am.  I assure you,
Dorian, that not one of the women I have known would have done for me
what Sibyl Vane did for you.  Ordinary women always console
themselves.  Some of them do it by going in for sentimental colors.
Never trust a woman who wears mauve, whatever her age may be, or a
woman over thirty-five who is fond of pink ribbons.  It always means
that they have a history.  Others find a great consolation in
suddenly discovering the good qualities of their husbands.  They
flaunt their conjugal felicity in one's face, as if it was the most
fascinating of sins.  Religion consoles some.  Its mysteries have all
the charm of a flirtation, a woman once told me; and I can quite
understand it.  Besides, nothing makes one so vain as being told that
one is a sinner.  There is really no end to the consolations that
women find in modern life.  Indeed, I have not mentioned the most
important one of all."

"What is that, Harry?" said Dorian Gray, listlessly.

"Oh, the obvious one.  Taking some one else's admirer when one loses
one's own.  In good society that always whitewashes a woman.  But
really, Dorian, how different Sibyl Vane must have been from all the
women one meets!  There is something to me quite beautiful about her
death.  I am glad I am living in a century when such wonders happen.
They make one believe in the reality of the things that shallow,
fashionable people play with, such as romance, passion, and love."

"I was terribly cruel to her.  You forget that."

"I believe that women appreciate cruelty more than anything else.
They have wonderfully primitive instincts.  We have emancipated them,
but they remain slaves looking for their masters, all the same.  They
love being dominated.  I am sure you were splendid.  I have never
seen you angry, but I can fancy how delightful you looked.  And,
after all, you said something to me the day before yesterday that
seemed to me at the time to be merely fanciful, but that I see now
was absolutely true, and it explains everything."

[50] "What was that, Harry?"

"You said to me that Sibyl Vane represented to you all the heroines
of romance--that she was Desdemona one night, and Ophelia the other;
that if she died as Juliet, she came to life as Imogen."

"She will never come to life again now," murmured the lad, burying
his face in his hands.

"No, she will never come to life.  She has played her last part.  But
you must think of that lonely death in the tawdry dressing-room
simply as a strange lurid fragment from some Jacobean tragedy, as a
wonderful scene from Webster, or Ford, or Cyril Tourneur.  The girl
never really lived, and so she has never really died.  To you at
least she was always a dream, a phantom that flitted through
Shakespeare's plays and left them lovelier for its presence, a reed
through which Shakespeare's music sounded richer and more full of
joy.  The moment she touched actual life, she marred it, and it
marred her, and so she passed away.  Mourn for Ophelia, if you like.
Put ashes on your head because Cordelia was strangled.  Cry out
against Heaven because the daughter of Brabantio died.  But don't
waste your tears over Sibyl Vane.  She was less real than they are."

There was a silence.  The evening darkened in the room.  Noiselessly,
and with silver feet, the shadows crept in from the garden.  The
colors faded wearily out of things.

After some time Dorian Gray looked up.  "You have explained me to
myself, Harry," he murmured, with something of a sigh of relief.  "I
felt all that you have said, but somehow I was afraid of it, and I
could not express it to myself.  How well you know me!  But we will
not talk again of what has happened.  It has been a marvellous
experience.  That is all.  I wonder if life has still in store for me
anything as marvellous."

"Life has everything in store for you, Dorian.  There is nothing that
you, with your extraordinary good looks, will not be able to do."

"But suppose, Harry, I became haggard, and gray, and wrinkled?  What
then?"

"Ah, then," said Lord Henry, rising to go,--"then, my dear Dorian,
you would have to fight for your victories.  As it is, they are
brought to you.  No, you must keep your good looks.  We live in an
age that reads too much to be wise, and that thinks too much to be
beautiful.  We cannot spare you.  And now you had better dress, and
drive down to the club.  We are rather late, as it is."

"I think I shall join you at the Opera, Harry.  I feel too tired to
eat anything.  What is the number of your sister's box?"

"Twenty-seven, I believe.  It is on the grand tier.  You will see her
name on the door.  But I am sorry you won't come and dine."

"I don't feel up to it," said Dorian, wearily.  "But I am awfully
obliged to you for all that you have said to me.  You are certainly
my best friend.  No one has ever understood me as you have."

"We are only at the beginning of our friendship, Dorian," answered
Lord Henry, shaking him by the hand.  "Good-by.  I shall see you
before nine-thirty, I hope.  Remember, Patti is singing."

As he closed the door behind him, Dorian Gray touched the bell, [51]
and in a few minutes Victor appeared with the lamps and drew the
blinds down.  He waited impatiently for him to go.  The man seemed to
take an interminable time about everything.

As soon as he had left, he rushed to the screen, and drew it back.
No; there was no further change in the picture.  It had received the
news of Sibyl Vane's death before he had known of it himself.  It was
conscious of the events of life as they occurred.  The vicious
cruelty that marred the fine lines of the mouth had, no doubt,
appeared at the very moment that the girl had drunk the poison,
whatever it was.  Or was it indifferent to results?  Did it merely
take cognizance of what passed within the soul? he wondered, and
hoped that some day he would see the change taking place before his
very eyes, shuddering as he hoped it.

Poor Sibyl! what a romance it had all been!  She had often mimicked
death on the stage, and at last Death himself had touched her, and
brought her with him.  How had she played that dreadful scene?  Had
she cursed him, as she died?  No; she had died for love of him, and
love would always be a sacrament to him now.  She had atoned for
everything, by the sacrifice she had made of her life.  He would not
think any more of what she had made him go through, that horrible
night at the theatre.  When he thought of her, it would be as a
wonderful tragic figure to show Love had been a great reality.  A
wonderful tragic figure?  Tears came to his eyes as he remembered her
child-like look and winsome fanciful ways and shy tremulous grace.
He wiped them away hastily, and looked again at the picture.

He felt that the time had really come for making his choice.  Or had
his choice already been made?  Yes, life had decided that for him,--
life, and his own infinite curiosity about life.  Eternal youth,
infinite passion, pleasures subtle and secret, wild joys and wilder
sins,--he was to have all these things.  The portrait was to bear the
burden of his shame: that was all.

A feeling of pain came over him as he thought of the desecration that
was in store for the fair face on the canvas.  Once, in boyish
mockery of Narcissus, he had kissed, or feigned to kiss, those
painted lips that now smiled so cruelly at him.  Morning after
morning he had sat before the portrait wondering at its beauty,
almost enamoured of it, as it seemed to him at times.  Was it to
alter now with every mood to which he yielded?  Was it to become a
hideous and loathsome thing, to be hidden away in a locked room, to
be shut out from the sunlight that had so often touched to brighter
gold the waving wonder of the hair?  The pity of it! the pity of it!

For a moment he thought of praying that the horrible sympathy that
existed between him and the picture might cease.  It had changed in
answer to a prayer; perhaps in answer to a prayer it might remain
unchanged.  And, yet, who, that knew anything about Life, would
surrender the chance of remaining always young, however fantastic
that chance might be, or with what fateful consequences it might be
fraught?  Besides, was it really under his control?  Had it indeed
been prayer that had produced the substitution?  Might there not be
some curious scientific reason for it all?  If thought could exercise
its [52] influence upon a living organism, might not thought exercise
an influence upon dead and inorganic things?  Nay, without thought or
conscious desire, might not things external to ourselves vibrate in
unison with our moods and passions, atom calling to atom, in secret
love or strange affinity?  But the reason was of no importance.  He
would never again tempt by a prayer any terrible power.  If the
picture was to alter, it was to alter.  That was all.  Why inquire
too closely into it?

For there would be a real pleasure in watching it.  He would be able
to follow his mind into its secret places.  This portrait would be to
him the most magical of mirrors.  As it had revealed to him his own
body, so it would reveal to him his own soul.  And when winter came
upon it, he would still be standing where spring trembles on the
verge of summer.  When the blood crept from its face, and left behind
a pallid mask of chalk with leaden eyes, he would keep the glamour of
boyhood.  Not one blossom of his loveliness would ever fade.  Not one
pulse of his life would ever weaken.  Like the gods of the Greeks, he
would be strong, and fleet, and joyous.  What did it matter what
happened to the colored image on the canvas?  He would be safe.  That
was everything.

He drew the screen back into its former place in front of the
picture, smiling as he did so, and passed into his bedroom, where his
valet was already waiting for him.  An hour later he was at the
Opera, and Lord Henry was leaning over his chair.



CHAPTER VII

[...52] As he was sitting at breakfast next morning, Basil Hallward
was shown into the room.

"I am so glad I have found you, Dorian," he said, gravely.  "I called
last night, and they told me you were at the Opera.  Of course I knew
that was impossible.  But I wish you had left word where you had
really gone to.  I passed a dreadful evening, half afraid that one
tragedy might be followed by another.  I think you might have
telegraphed for me when you heard of it first.  I read of it quite by
chance in a late edition of the Globe, that I picked up at the club.
I came here at once, and was miserable at not finding you.  I can't
tell you how heart-broken I am about the whole thing.  I know what
you must suffer.  But where were you?  Did you go down and see the
girl's mother?  For a moment I thought of following you there.  They
gave the address in the paper.  Somewhere in the Euston Road, isn't
it?  But I was afraid of intruding upon a sorrow that I could not
lighten.  Poor woman!  What a state she must be in!  And her only
child, too!  What did she say about it all?"

"My dear Basil, how do I know?" murmured Dorian, sipping some pale-
yellow wine from a delicate gold-beaded bubble of Venetian glass, and
looking dreadfully bored.  "I was at the Opera.  You should have come
on there.  I met Lady Gwendolen, Harry's sister, for the first time.
We were in her box.  She is perfectly charming; and Patti sang
divinely.  Don't talk about horrid subjects.  If one doesn't [53]
talk about a thing, it has never happened.  It is simply expression,
as Harry says, that gives reality to things.  Tell me about yourself
and what you are painting."

"You went to the Opera?" said Hallward, speaking very slowly, and
with a strained touch of pain in his voice.  "You went to the Opera
while Sibyl Vane was lying dead in some sordid lodging?  You can talk
to me of other women being charming, and of Patti singing divinely,
before the girl you loved has even the quiet of a grave to sleep in?
Why, man, there are horrors in store for that little white body of
hers!"

"Stop, Basil!  I won't hear it!" cried Dorian, leaping to his feet.
"You must not tell me about things.  What is done is done.  What is
past is past."

"You call yesterday the past?"

"What has the actual lapse of time got to do with it?  It is only
shallow people who require years to get rid of an emotion.  A man who
is master of himself can end a sorrow as easily as he can invent a
pleasure.  I don't want to be at the mercy of my emotions.  I want to
use them, to enjoy them, and to dominate them."

"Dorian, this is horrible!  Something has changed you completely.
You look exactly the same wonderful boy who used to come down to my
studio, day after day, to sit for his picture.  But you were simple,
natural, and affectionate then.  You were the most unspoiled creature
in the whole world.  Now, I don't know what has come over you.  You
talk as if you had no heart, no pity in you.  It is all Harry's
influence.  I see that."

The lad flushed up, and, going to the window, looked out on the
green, flickering garden for a few moments.  "I owe a great deal to
Harry, Basil," he said, at last,--"more than I owe to you.  You only
taught me to be vain."

"Well, I am punished for that, Dorian,--or shall be some day."

"I don't know what you mean, Basil," he exclaimed, turning round.  "I
don't know what you want.  What do you want?"

"I want the Dorian Gray I used to know."

"Basil," said the lad, going over to him, and putting his hand on his
shoulder, "you have come too late.  Yesterday when I heard that Sibyl
Vane had killed herself--"

"Killed herself!  Good heavens! is there no doubt about that?" cried
Hallward, looking up at him with an expression of horror.

"My dear Basil!  Surely you don't think it was a vulgar accident?  Of
course she killed herself  It is one of the great romantic tragedies
of the age.  As a rule, people who act lead the most commonplace
lives.  They are good husbands, or faithful wives, or something
tedious.  You know what I mean,--middle-class virtue, and all that
kind of thing.  How different Sibyl was!  She lived her finest
tragedy.  She was always a heroine.  The last night she played--the
night you saw her--she acted badly because she had known the reality
of love.  When she knew its unreality, she died, as Juliet might have
died.  She passed again into the sphere of art.  There is something
of the martyr about her.  Her death has all the pathetic uselessness
of [54] martyrdom, all its wasted beauty.  But, as I was saying, you
must not think I have not suffered.  If you had come in yesterday at
a particular moment,--about half-past five, perhaps, or a quarter to
six,--you would have found me in tears.  Even Harry, who was here,
who brought me the news, in fact, had no idea what I was going
through.  I suffered immensely, then it passed away.  I cannot repeat
an emotion.  No one can, except sentimentalists.  And you are awfully
unjust, Basil.  You come down here to console me.  That is charming
of you.  You find me consoled, and you are furious.  How like a
sympathetic person!  You remind me of a story Harry told me about a
certain philanthropist who spent twenty years of his life in trying
to get some grievance redressed, or some unjust law altered,--I
forget exactly what it was.  Finally he succeeded, and nothing could
exceed his disappointment.  He had absolutely nothing to do, almost
died of ennui, and became a confirmed misanthrope.  And besides, my
dear old Basil, if you really want to console me, teach me rather to
forget what has happened, or to see it from a proper artistic point
of view.  Was it not Gautier who used to write about la consolation
des arts?  I remember picking up a little vellum-covered book in your
studio one day and chancing on that delightful phrase.  Well, I am
not like that young man you told me of when we were down at Marlowe
together, the young man who used to say that yellow satin could
console one for all the miseries of life.  I love beautiful things
that one can touch and handle.  Old brocades, green bronzes, lacquer-
work, carved ivories, exquisite surroundings, luxury, pomp,--there
is much to be got from all these.  But the artistic temperament that
they create, or at any rate reveal, is still more to me.  To become
the spectator of one's own life, as Harry says, is to escape the
suffering of life.  I know you are surprised at my talking to you
like this.  You have not realized how I have developed.  I was a
school-boy when you knew me.  I am a man now.  I have new passions,
new thoughts, new ideas.  I am different, but you must not like me
less.  I am changed, but you must always be my friend.  Of course I
am very fond of Harry.  But I know that you are better than he is.
You are not stronger,--you are too much afraid of life,--but you are
better.  And how happy we used to be together!  Don't leave me,
Basil, and don't quarrel with me.  I am what I am.  There is nothing
more to be said."

Hallward felt strangely moved.  Rugged and straightforward as he was,
there was something in his nature that was purely feminine in its
tenderness.  The lad was infinitely dear to him, and his personality
had been the great turning-point in his art.  He could not bear the
idea of reproaching him any more.  After all, his indifference was
probably merely a mood that would pass away.  There was so much in
him that was good, so much in him that was noble.

"Well, Dorian," he said, at length, with a sad smile, "I won't speak
to you again about this horrible thing, after to-day.  I only trust
your name won't be mentioned in connection with it.  The inquest is
to take place this afternoon.  Have they summoned you?"

Dorian shook his head, and a look of annoyance passed over his face
at the mention of the word "inquest."  There was something so [55]
crude and vulgar about everything of the kind.  "They don't know my
name," he answered.

"But surely she did?"

"Only my Christian name, and that I am quite sure she never mentioned
to any one.  She told me once that they were all rather curious to
learn who I was, and that she invariably told them my name was Prince
Charming.  It was pretty of her.  You must do me a drawing of her,
Basil.  I should like to have something more of her than the memory
of a few kisses and some broken pathetic words."

"I will try and do something, Dorian, if it would please you.  But
you must come and sit to me yourself again.  I can't get on without
you."

"I will never sit to you again, Basil.  It is impossible!" he
exclaimed, starting back.

Hallward stared at him, "My dear boy, what nonsense!" he cried.  "Do
you mean to say you don't like what I did of you?  Where is it?  Why
have you pulled the screen in front of it?  Let me look at it.  It is
the best thing I have ever painted.  Do take that screen away,
Dorian.  It is simply horrid of your servant hiding my work like
that.  I felt the room looked different as I came in."

"My servant has nothing to do with it, Basil.  You don't imagine I
let him arrange my room for me?  He settles my flowers for me
sometimes,--that is all.  No; I did it myself.  The light was too
strong on the portrait."

"Too strong!  Impossible, my dear fellow!  It is an admirable place
for it.  Let me see it."  And Hallward walked towards the corner of
the room.

A cry of terror broke from Dorian Gray's lips, and he rushed between
Hallward and the screen.  "Basil," he said, looking very pale, "you
must not look at it.  I don't wish you to."

"Not look at my own work! you are not serious.  Why shouldn't I look
at it?" exclaimed Hallward, laughing.

"If you try to look at it, Basil, on my word of honor I will never
speak to you again as long as I live.  I am quite serious.  I don't
offer any explanation, and you are not to ask for any.  But,
remember, if you touch this screen, everything is over between us."

Hallward was thunderstruck.  He looked at Dorian Gray in absolute
amazement.  He had never seen him like this before.  The lad was
absolutely pallid with rage.  His hands were clinched, and the pupils
of his eyes were like disks of blue fire.  He was trembling all over.

"Dorian!"

"Don't speak!"

"But what is the matter?  Of course I won't look at it if you don't
want me to," he said, rather coldly, turning on his heel, and going
over towards the window.  "But, really, it seems rather absurd that I
shouldn't see my own work, especially as I am going to exhibit it in
Paris in the autumn.  I shall probably have to give it another coat
of varnish before that, so I must see it some day, and why not to-
day?"

"To exhibit it!  You want to exhibit it?" exclaimed Dorian Gray, a
strange sense of terror creeping over him.  Was the world going [56]
to be shown his secret?  Were people to gape at the mystery of his
life?  That was impossible.  Something--he did not know what--had to
be done at once.

"Yes: I don't suppose you will object to that.  Georges Petit is
going to collect all my best pictures for a special exhibition in the
Rue de Seze, which will open the first week in October.  The portrait
will only be away a month.  I should think you could easily spare it
for that time.  In fact, you are sure to be out of town.  And if you
hide it always behind a screen, you can't care much about it."

Dorian Gray passed his hand over his forehead.  There were beads of
perspiration there.  He felt that he was on the brink of a horrible
danger.  "You told me a month ago that you would never exhibit it,"
he said.  "Why have you changed your mind?  You people who go in for
being consistent have just as many moods as others.  The only
difference is that your moods are rather meaningless.  You can't have
forgotten that you assured me most solemnly that nothing in the world
would induce you to send it to any exhibition.  You told Harry
exactly the same thing."  He stopped suddenly, and a gleam of light
came into his eyes.  He remembered that Lord Henry had said to him
once, half seriously and half in jest, "If you want to have an
interesting quarter of an hour, get Basil to tell you why he won't
exhibit your picture.  He told me why he wouldn't, and it was a
revelation to me."  Yes, perhaps Basil, too, had his secret.  He
would ask him and try.

"Basil," he said, coming over quite close, and looking him straight
in the face, "we have each of us a secret.  Let me know yours, and I
will tell you mine.  What was your reason for refusing to exhibit my
picture?"

Hallward shuddered in spite of himself.  "Dorian, if I told you, you
might like me less than you do, and you would certainly laugh at me.
I could not bear your doing either of those two things.  If you wish
me never to look at your picture again, I am content.  I have always
you to look at.  If you wish the best work I have ever done to be
hidden from the world, I am satisfied.  Your friendship is dearer to
me than any fame or reputation."

"No, Basil, you must tell me," murmured Dorian Gray.  "I think I have
a right to know."  His feeling of terror had passed away, and
curiosity had taken its place.  He was determined to find out Basil
Hallward's mystery.

"Let us sit down, Dorian," said Hallward, looking pale and pained.
"Let us sit down.  I will sit in the shadow, and you shall sit in the
sunlight.  Our lives are like that.  Just answer me one question.
Have you noticed in the picture something that you did not like?--
something that probably at first did not strike you, but that
revealed itself to you suddenly?"

"Basil!" cried the lad, clutching the arms of his chair with
trembling hands, and gazing at him with wild, startled eyes.

"I see you did.  Don't speak.  Wait till you hear what I have to say.
It is quite true that I have worshipped you with far more romance of
feeling than a man usually gives to a friend.  Somehow, I had never
loved a woman.  I suppose I never had time.  Perhaps, as [57] Harry
says, a really 'grande passion' is the privilege of those who have
nothing to do, and that is the use of the idle classes in a country.
Well, from the moment I met you, your personality had the most
extraordinary influence over me.  I quite admit that I adored you
madly, extravagantly, absurdly.  I was jealous of every one to whom
you spoke.  I wanted to have you all to myself.  I was only happy
when I was with you.  When I was away from you, you were still
present in my art.  It was all wrong and foolish.  It is all wrong
and foolish still.  Of course I never let you know anything about
this.  It would have been impossible.  You would not have understood
it; I did not understand it myself.  One day I determined to paint a
wonderful portrait of you.  It was to have been my masterpiece.  It
is my masterpiece.  But, as I worked at it, every flake and film of
color seemed to me to reveal my secret.  I grew afraid that the world
would know of my idolatry.  I felt, Dorian, that I had told too much.
Then it was that I resolved never to allow the picture to be
exhibited.  You were a little annoyed; but then you did not realize
all that it meant to me.  Harry, to whom I talked about it, laughed
at me.  But I did not mind that.  When the picture was finished, and
I sat alone with it, I felt that I was right.  Well, after a few days
the portrait left my studio, and as soon as I had got rid of the
intolerable fascination of its presence it seemed to me that I had
been foolish in imagining that I had said anything in it, more than
that you were extremely good-looking and that I could paint.  Even
now I cannot help feeling that it is a mistake to think that the
passion one feels in creation is ever really shown in the work one
creates.  Art is more abstract than we fancy.  Form and color tell us
of form and color,--that is all.  It often seems to me that art
conceals the artist far more completely than it ever reveals him.
And so when I got this offer from Paris I determined to make your
portrait the principal thing in my exhibition.  It never occurred to
me that you would refuse.  I see now that you were right.  The
picture must not be shown.  You must not be angry with me, Dorian,
for what I have told you.  As I said to Harry, once, you are made to
be worshipped."

Dorian Gray drew a long breath.  The color came back to his cheeks,
and a smile played about his lips.  The peril was over.  He was safe
for the time.  Yet he could not help feeling infinite pity for the
young man who had just made this strange confession to him.  He
wondered if he would ever be so dominated by the personality of a
friend.  Lord Harry had the charm of being very dangerous.  But that
was all.  He was too clever and too cynical to be really fond of.
Would there ever be some one who would fill him with a strange
idolatry?  Was that one of the things that life had in store?

"It is extraordinary to me, Dorian," said Hallward, "that you should
have seen this in the picture.  Did you really see it?"

"Of course I did."

"Well, you don't mind my looking at it now?"

Dorian shook his head.  "You must not ask me that, Basil.  I could
not possibly let you stand in front of that picture."

"You will some day, surely?"

[58] "Never."

"Well, perhaps you are right.  And now good-by, Dorian.  You have
been the one person in my life of whom I have been really fond.  I
don't suppose I shall often see you again.  You don't know what it
cost me to tell you all that I have told you."

"My dear Basil," cried Dorian, "what have you told me?  Simply that
you felt that you liked me too much.  That is not even a compliment."

"It was not intended as a compliment.  It was a confession."

"A very disappointing one."

"Why, what did you expect, Dorian?  You didn't see anything else in
the picture, did you?  There was nothing else to see?"

"No: there was nothing else to see.  Why do you ask?  But you mustn't
talk about not meeting me again, or anything of that kind.  You and I
are friends, Basil, and we must always remain so."

"You have got Harry," said Hallward, sadly.

"Oh, Harry!" cried the lad, with a ripple of laughter.  "Harry spends
his days in saying what is incredible, and his evenings in doing what
is improbable.  Just the sort of life I would like to lead.  But
still I don't think I would go to Harry if I was in trouble.  I would
sooner go to you, Basil."

"But you won't sit to me again?"

"Impossible!"

"You spoil my life as an artist by refusing, Dorian.  No man comes
across two ideal things.  Few come across one."

"I can't explain it to you, Basil, but I must never sit to you again.
I will come and have tea with you.  That will be just as pleasant."

"Pleasanter for you, I am afraid," murmured Hallward, regretfully.
"And now good-by.  I am sorry you won't let me look at the picture
once again.  But that can't be helped.  I quite understand what you
feel about it."

As he left the room, Dorian Gray smiled to himself.  Poor Basil! how
little he knew of the true reason!  And how strange it was that,
instead of having been forced to reveal his own secret, he had
succeeded, almost by chance, in wresting a secret from his friend!
How much that strange confession explained to him!  Basil's absurd
fits of jealousy, his wild devotion, his extravagant panegyrics, his
curious reticences,--he understood them all now, and he felt sorry.
There was something tragic in a friendship so colored by romance.

He sighed, and touched the bell.  The portrait must be hidden away at
all costs.  He could not run such a risk of discovery again.  It had
been mad of him to have the thing remain, even for an hour, in a room
to which any of his friends had access.



CHAPTER VIII

[...58] When his servant entered, he looked at him steadfastly, and
wondered if he had thought of peering behind the screen.  The man was
quite impassive, and waited for his orders.  Dorian lit a cigarette,
[59] and walked over to the glass and glanced into it.  He could see
the reflection of Victor's face perfectly.  It was like a placid mask
of servility.  There was nothing to be afraid of, there.  Yet he
thought it best to be on his guard.

Speaking very slowly, he told him to tell the housekeeper that he
wanted to see her, and then to go to the frame-maker's and ask him to
send two of his men round at once.  It seemed to him that as the man
left the room he peered in the direction of the screen.  Or was that
only his fancy?

After a few moments, Mrs. Leaf, a dear old lady in a black silk
dress, with a photograph of the late Mr. Leaf framed in a large gold
brooch at her neck, and old-fashioned thread mittens on her wrinkled
hands, bustled into the room.

"Well, Master Dorian," she said, "what can I do for you?  I beg your
pardon, sir,"--here came a courtesy,--"I shouldn't call you Master
Dorian any more.  But, Lord bless you, sir, I have known you since
you were a baby, and many's the trick you've played on poor old Leaf.
Not that you were not always a good boy, sir; but boys will be boys,
Master Dorian, and jam is a temptation to the young, isn't it, sir?"

He laughed.  "You must always call me Master Dorian, Leaf.  I will be
very angry with you if you don't.  And I assure you I am quite as
fond of jam now as I used to be.  Only when I am asked out to tea I
am never offered any.  I want you to give me the key of the room at
the top of the house."

"The old school-room, Master Dorian?  Why, it's full of dust.  I must
get it arranged and put straight before you go into it.  It's not fit
for you to see, Master Dorian.  It is not, indeed."

"I don't want it put straight, Leaf.  I only want the key."

"Well, Master Dorian, you'll be covered with cobwebs if you goes into
it.  Why, it hasn't been opened for nearly five years,--not since his
lordship died."

He winced at the mention of his dead uncle's name.  He had hateful
memories of him.  "That does not matter, Leaf," he replied.  "All I
want is the key."

"And here is the key, Master Dorian," said the old lady, after going
over the contents of her bunch with tremulously uncertain hands.
"Here is the key.  I'll have it off the ring in a moment.  But you
don't think of living up there, Master Dorian, and you so comfortable
here?"

"No, Leaf, I don't.  I merely want to see the place, and perhaps
store something in it,--that is all.  Thank you, Leaf.  I hope your
rheumatism is better; and mind you send me up jam for breakfast."

Mrs. Leaf shook her head.  "Them foreigners doesn't understand jam,
Master Dorian.  They calls it 'compot.'  But I'll bring it to you
myself some morning, if you lets me."

"That will be very kind of you, Leaf," he answered, looking at the
key; and, having made him an elaborate courtesy, the old lady left
the room, her face wreathed in smiles.  She had a strong objection to
the French valet.  It was a poor thing, she felt, for any one to be
born a foreigner.

[60] As the door closed, Dorian put the key in his pocket, and looked
round the room.  His eye fell on a large purple satin coverlet
heavily embroidered with gold, a splendid piece of late seventeenth-
century Venetian work that his uncle had found in a convent near
Bologna.  Yes, that would serve to wrap the dreadful thing in.  It
had perhaps served often as a pall for the dead.  Now it was to hide
something that had a corruption of its own, worse than the corruption
of death itself,--something that would breed horrors and yet would
never die.  What the worm was to the corpse, his sins would be to the
painted image on the canvas.  They would mar its beauty, and eat away
its grace.  They would defile it, and make it shameful.  And yet the
thing would still live on.  It would be always alive.

He shuddered, and for a moment he regretted that he had not told
Basil the true reason why he had wished to hide the picture away.
Basil would have helped him to resist Lord Henry's influence, and the
still more poisonous influences that came from his own temperament.
The love that he bore him--for it was really love--had something
noble and intellectual in it.  It was not that mere physical
admiration of beauty that is born of the senses, and that dies when
the senses tire.  It was such love as Michael Angelo had known, and
Montaigne, and Winckelmann, and Shakespeare himself.  Yes, Basil
could have saved him.  But it was too late now.  The past could
always be annihilated.  Regret, denial, or forgetfulness could do
that.  But the future was inevitable.  There were passions in him
that would find their terrible outlet, dreams that would make the
shadow of their evil real.

He took up from the couch the great purple-and-gold texture that
covered it, and, holding it in his hands, passed behind the screen.
Was the face on the canvas viler than before?  It seemed to him that
it was unchanged; and yet his loathing of it was intensified.  Gold
hair, blue eyes, and rose-red lips,--they all were there.  It was
simply the expression that had altered.  That was horrible in its
cruelty.  Compared to what he saw in it of censure or rebuke, how
shallow Basil's reproaches about Sibyl Vane had been!--how shallow,
and of what little account!  His own soul was looking out at him from
the canvas and calling him to judgment.  A look of pain came across
him, and he flung the rich pall over the picture.  As he did so, a
knock came to the door.  He passed out as his servant entered.

"The persons are here, monsieur."

He felt that the man must be got rid of at once.  He must not be
allowed to know where the picture was being taken to.  There was
something sly about him, and he had thoughtful, treacherous eyes.
Sitting down at the writing-table, he scribbled a note to Lord Henry,
asking him to send him round something to read, and reminding him
that they were to meet at eight-fifteen that evening.

"Wait for an answer," he said, handing it to him, "and show the men
in here."

In two or three minutes there was another knock, and Mr. Ashton
himself, the celebrated frame-maker of South Audley Street, came in
with a somewhat rough-looking young assistant.  Mr. Ashton was a
florid, red-whiskered little man, whose admiration for art was
considerably [61] tempered by the inveterate impecuniosity of most of
the artists who dealt with him.  As a rule, he never left his shop.
He waited for people to come to him.  But he always made an exception
in favor of Dorian Gray.  There was something about Dorian that
charmed everybody.  It was a pleasure even to see him.

"What can I do for you, Mr. Gray?" he said, rubbing his fat freckled
hands.  "I thought I would do myself the honor of coming round in
person.  I have just got a beauty of a frame, sir.  Picked it up at a
sale.  Old Florentine.  Came from Fonthill, I believe.  Admirably
suited for a religious picture, Mr. Gray."

"I am so sorry you have given yourself the trouble of coming round,
Mr. Ashton.  I will certainly drop in and look at the frame,--though
I don't go in much for religious art,--but to-day I only want a
picture carried to the top of the house for me.  It is rather heavy,
so I thought I would ask you to lend me a couple of your men."

"No trouble at all, Mr. Gray.  I am delighted to be of any service to
you.  Which is the work of art, sir?"

"This," replied Dorian, moving the screen back.  "Can you move it,
covering and all, just as it is?  I don't want it to get scratched
going up-stairs."

"There will be no difficulty, sir," said the genial frame-maker,
beginning, with the aid of his assistant, to unhook the picture from
the long brass chains by which it was suspended.  "And, now, where
shall we carry it to, Mr. Gray?"

"I will show you the way, Mr. Ashton, if you will kindly follow me.
Or perhaps you had better go in front.  I am afraid it is right at
the top of the house.  We will go up by the front staircase, as it is
wider."

He held the door open for them, and they passed out into the hall and
began the ascent.  The elaborate character of the frame had made the
picture extremely bulky, and now and then, in spite of the obsequious
protests of Mr. Ashton, who had a true tradesman's dislike of seeing
a gentleman doing anything useful, Dorian put his hand to it so as to
help them.

"Something of a load to carry, sir," gasped the little man, when they
reached the top landing.  And he wiped his shiny forehead.

"A terrible load to carry," murmured Dorian, as he unlocked the door
that opened into the room that was to keep for him the curious secret
of his life and hide his soul from the eyes of men.

He had not entered the place for more than four years,--not, indeed,
since he had used it first as a play-room when he was a child and
then as a study when he grew somewhat older.  It was a large, well-
proportioned room, which had been specially built by the last Lord
Sherard for the use of the little nephew whom, being himself
childless, and perhaps for other reasons, he had always hated and
desired to keep at a distance.  It did not appear to Dorian to have
much changed.  There was the huge Italian cassone, with its
fantastically-painted panels and its tarnished gilt mouldings, in
which he had so often hidden himself as a boy.  There was the
satinwood bookcase filled with his dog-eared school-books.  On the
wall behind it was hanging the same [62] ragged Flemish tapestry
where a faded king and queen were playing chess in a garden, while a
company of hawkers rode by, carrying hooded birds on their gauntleted
wrists.  How well he recalled it all!  Every moment of his lonely
childhood came back to him, as he looked round.  He remembered the
stainless purity of his boyish life, and it seemed horrible to him
that it was here that the fatal portrait was to be hidden away.  How
little he had thought, in those dead days, of all that was in store
for him!

But there was no other place in the house so secure from prying eyes
as this.  He had the key, and no one else could enter it.  Beneath
its purple pall, the face painted on the canvas could grow bestial,
sodden, and unclean.  What did it matter?  No one could see it.  He
himself would not see it.  Why should he watch the hideous corruption
of his soul?  He kept his youth,--that was enough.  And, besides,
might not his nature grow finer, after all?  There was no reason that
the future should be so full of shame.  Some love might come across
his life, and purify him, and shield him from those sins that seemed
to be already stirring in spirit and in flesh,--those curious
unpictured sins whose very mystery lent them their subtlety and their
charm.  Perhaps, some day, the cruel look would have passed away from
the scarlet sensitive mouth, and he might show to the world Basil
Hallward's masterpiece.

No; that was impossible.  The thing upon the canvas was growing old,
hour by hour, and week by week.  Even if it escaped the hideousness
of sin, the hideousness of age was in store for it.  The cheeks would
become hollow or flaccid.  Yellow crow's-feet would creep round the
fading eyes and make them horrible.  The hair would lose its
brightness, the mouth would gape or droop, would be foolish or gross,
as the mouths of old men are.  There would be the wrinkled throat,
the cold blue-veined hands, the twisted body, that he remembered in
the uncle who had been so stern to him in his boyhood.  The picture
had to be concealed.  There was no help for it.

"Bring it in, Mr. Ashton, please," he said, wearily, turning round.
"I am sorry I kept you so long.  I was thinking of something else."

"Always glad to have a rest, Mr. Gray," answered the frame-maker, who
was still gasping for breath.  "Where shall we put it, sir?"

"Oh, anywhere, Here, this will do.  I don't want to have it hung up.
Just lean it against the wall.  Thanks."

"Might one look at the work of art, sir?"

Dorian started.  "It would not interest you, Mr. Ashton," he said,
keeping his eye on the man.  He felt ready to leap upon him and fling
him to the ground if he dared to lift the gorgeous hanging that
concealed the secret of his life.  "I won't trouble you any more now.
I am much obliged for your kindness in coming round."

"Not at all, not at all, Mr. Gray.  Ever ready to do anything for
you, sir."  And Mr. Ashton tramped down-stairs, followed by the
assistant, who glanced back at Dorian with a look of shy wonder in
his rough, uncomely face.  He had never seen any one so marvellous.

When the sound of their footsteps had died away, Dorian locked [63]
the door, and put the key in his pocket.  He felt safe now.  No one
would ever look on the horrible thing.  No eye but his would ever see
his shame.

On reaching the library he found that it was just after five o'clock,
and that the tea had been already brought up.  On a little table of
dark perfumed wood thickly incrusted with nacre, a present from his
guardian's wife, Lady Radley, who had spent the preceding winter in
Cairo, was lying a note from Lord Henry, and beside it was a book
bound in yellow paper, the cover slightly torn and the edges soiled.
A copy of the third edition of the St. James's Gazette had been
placed on the tea-tray.  It was evident that Victor had returned.  He
wondered if he had met the men in the hall as they were leaving the
house and had wormed out of them what they had been doing.  He would
be sure to miss the picture,--had no doubt missed it already, while
he had been laying the tea-things.  The screen had not been replaced,
and the blank space on the wall was visible.  Perhaps some night he
might find him creeping up-stairs and trying to force the door of the
room.  It was a horrible thing to have a spy in one's house.  He had
heard of rich men who had been blackmailed all their lives by some
servant who had read a letter, or overheard a conversation, or picked
up a card with an address, or found beneath a pillow a withered
flower or a bit of crumpled lace.

He sighed, and, having poured himself out some tea, opened Lord
Henry's note.  It was simply to say that he sent him round the
evening paper, and a book that might interest him, and that he would
be at the club at eight-fifteen.  He opened the St. James's
languidly, and looked through it.  A red pencil-mark on the fifth
page caught his eye.  He read the following paragraph:

"INQUEST ON AN ACTRESS.--An inquest was held this morning at the Bell
Tavern, Hoxton Road, by Mr. Danby, the District Coroner, on the body
of Sibyl Vane, a young actress recently engaged at the Royal Theatre,
Holborn.  A verdict of death by misadventure was returned.
Considerable sympathy was expressed for the mother of the deceased,
who was greatly affected during the giving of her own evidence, and
that of Dr. Birrell, who had made the post-mortem examination of the
deceased."

He frowned slightly, and, tearing the paper in two, went across the
room and flung the pieces into a gilt basket.  How ugly it all was!
And how horribly real ugliness made things!  He felt a little annoyed
with Lord Henry for having sent him the account.  And it was
certainly stupid of him to have marked it with red pencil.  Victor
might have read it.  The man knew more than enough English for that.

Perhaps he had read it, and had begun to suspect something.  And,
yet, what did it matter?  What had Dorian Gray to do with Sibyl
Vane's death?  There was nothing to fear.  Dorian Gray had not killed
her.

His eye fell on the yellow book that Lord Henry had sent him.  What
was it, he wondered.  He went towards the little pearl-colored
octagonal stand, that had always looked to him like the work of some
[64] strange Egyptian bees who wrought in silver, and took the volume
up.  He flung himself into an arm-chair, and began to turn over the
leaves.  After a few minutes, he became absorbed.  It was the
strangest book he had ever read.  It seemed to him that in exquisite
raiment, and to the delicate sound of flutes, the sins of the world
were passing in dumb show before him.  Things that he had dimly
dreamed of were suddenly made real to him.  Things of which he had
never dreamed were gradually revealed.

It was a novel without a plot, and with only one character, being,
indeed, simply a psychological study of a certain young Parisian, who
spent his life trying to realize in the nineteenth century all the
passions and modes of thought that belonged to every century except
his own, and to sum up, as it were, in himself the various moods
through which the world-spirit had ever passed, loving for their mere
artificiality those renunciations that men have unwisely called
virtue, as much as those natural rebellions that wise men still call
sin.  The style in which it was written was that curious jewelled
style, vivid and obscure at once, full of argot and of archaisms, of
technical expressions and of elaborate paraphrases, that
characterizes the work of some of the finest artists of the French
school of Decadents.  There were in it metaphors as monstrous as
orchids, and as evil in color.  The life of the senses was described
in the terms of mystical philosophy.  One hardly knew at times
whether one was reading the spiritual ecstasies of some mediaeval
saint or the morbid confessions of a modern sinner.  It was a
poisonous book.  The heavy odor of incense seemed to cling about its
pages and to trouble the brain.  The mere cadence of the sentences,
the subtle monotony of their music, so full as it was of complex
refrains and movements elaborately repeated, produced in the mind of
the lad, as he passed from chapter to chapter, a form of revery, a
malady of dreaming, that made him unconscious of the falling day and
the creeping shadows.

Cloudless, and pierced by one solitary star, a copper-green sky
gleamed through the windows.  He read on by its wan light till he
could read no more.  Then, after his valet had reminded him several
times of the lateness of the hour, he got up, and, going into the
next room, placed the book on the little Florentine table that always
stood at his bedside, and began to dress for dinner.

It was almost nine o'clock before he reached the club, where he found
Lord Henry sitting alone, in the morning-room, looking very bored.

"I am so sorry, Harry," he cried, "but really it is entirely your
fault.  That book you sent me so fascinated me that I forgot what the
time was."

"I thought you would like it," replied his host, rising from his
chair.

"I didn't say I liked it, Harry.  I said it fascinated me.  There is
a great difference."

"Ah, if you have discovered that, you have discovered a great deal,"
murmured Lord Henry, with his curious smile.  "Come, let us go in to
dinner.  It is dreadfully late, and I am afraid the champagne will be
too much iced."



CHAPTER IX

[65] For years, Dorian Gray could not free himself from the memory of
this book.  Or perhaps it would be more accurate to say that he never
sought to free himself from it.  He procured from Paris no less than
five large-paper copies of the first edition, and had them bound in
different colors, so that they might suit his various moods and the
changing fancies of a nature over which he seemed, at times, to have
almost entirely lost control.  The hero, the wonderful young
Parisian, in whom the romantic temperament and the scientific
temperament were so strangely blended, became to him a kind of
prefiguring type of himself.  And, indeed, the whole book seemed to
him to contain the story of his own life, written before he had lived
it.

In one point he was more fortunate than the book's fantastic hero.
He never knew--never, indeed, had any cause to know--that somewhat
grotesque dread of mirrors, and polished metal surfaces, and still
water, which came upon the young Parisian so early in his life, and
was occasioned by the sudden decay of a beauty that had once,
apparently, been so remarkable.  It was with an almost cruel joy--and
perhaps in nearly every joy, as certainly in every pleasure, cruelty
has its place--that he used to read the latter part of the book, with
its really tragic, if somewhat over-emphasized, account of the sorrow
and despair of one who had himself lost what in others, and in the
world, he had most valued.

He, at any rate, had no cause to fear that.  The boyish beauty that
had so fascinated Basil Hallward, and many others besides him, seemed
never to leave him.  Even those who had heard the most evil things
against him (and from time to time strange rumors about his mode of
life crept through London and became the chatter of the clubs) could
not believe anything to his dishonor when they saw him.  He had
always the look of one who had kept himself unspotted from the world.
Men who talked grossly became silent when Dorian Gray entered the
room.  There was something in the purity of his face that rebuked
them.  His mere presence seemed to recall to them the innocence that
they had tarnished.  They wondered how one so charming and graceful
as he was could have escaped the stain of an age that was at once
sordid and sensuous.

He himself, on returning home from one of those mysterious and
prolonged absences that gave rise to such strange conjecture among
those who were his friends, or thought that they were so, would creep
up-stairs to the locked room, open the door with the key that never
left him, and stand, with a mirror, in front of the portrait that
Basil Hallward had painted of him, looking now at the evil and aging
face on the canvas, and now at the fair young face that laughed back
at him from the polished glass.  The very sharpness of the contrast
used to quicken his sense of pleasure.  He grew more and more
enamoured of his own beauty, more and more interested in the
corruption of his own soul.  He would examine with minute care, and
often with a monstrous and terrible delight, the hideous lines that
seared the wrinkling forehead or crawled around the heavy sensual
mouth, [66] wondering sometimes which were the more horrible, the
signs of sin or the signs of age.  He would place his white hands
beside the coarse bloated hands of the picture, and smile.  He mocked
the misshapen body and the failing limbs.

There were moments, indeed, at night, when, lying sleepless in his
own delicately-scented chamber, or in the sordid room of the little
ill-famed tavern near the Docks, which, under an assumed name, and in
disguise, it was his habit to frequent, he would think of the ruin he
had brought upon his soul, with a pity that was all the more poignant
because it was purely selfish.  But moments such as these were rare.
That curiosity about life that, many years before, Lord Henry had
first stirred in him, as they sat together in the garden of their
friend, seemed to increase with gratification.  The more he knew, the
more he desired to know.  He had mad hungers that grew more ravenous
as he fed them.

Yet he was not really reckless, at any rate in his relations to
society.  Once or twice every month during the winter, and on each
Wednesday evening while the season lasted, he would throw open to the
world his beautiful house and have the most celebrated musicians of
the day to charm his guests with the wonders of their art.  His
little dinners, in the settling of which Lord Henry always assisted
him, were noted as much for the careful selection and placing of
those invited, as for the exquisite taste shown in the decoration of
the table, with its subtle symphonic arrangements of exotic flowers,
and embroidered cloths, and antique plate of gold and silver.
Indeed, there were many, especially among the very young men, who
saw, or fancied that they saw, in Dorian Gray the true realization of
a type of which they had often dreamed in Eton or Oxford days, a type
that was to combine something of the real culture of the scholar with
all the grace and distinction and perfect manner of a citizen of the
world.  To them he seemed to belong to those whom Dante describes as
having sought to "make themselves perfect by the worship of beauty."
Like Gautier, he was one for whom "the visible world existed."

And, certainly, to him life itself was the first, the greatest, of
the arts, and for it all the other arts seemed to be but a
preparation.  Fashion, by which what is really fantastic becomes for
a moment universal, and Dandyism, which, in its own way, is an
attempt to assert the absolute modernity of beauty, had, of course,
their fascination for him.  His mode of dressing, and the particular
styles that he affected from time to time, had their marked influence
on the young exquisites of the Mayfair balls and Pall Mall club
windows, who copied him in everything that he did, and tried to
reproduce the accidental charm of his graceful, though to him only
half-serious, fopperies.

For, while he was but too ready to accept the position that was
almost immediately offered to him on his coming of age, and found,
indeed, a subtle pleasure in the thought that he might really become
to the London of his own day what to imperial Neronian Rome the
author of the "Satyricon" had once been, yet in his inmost heart he
desired to be something more than a mere arbiter elegantiarum, to be
consulted on the wearing of a jewel, or the knotting of a necktie, or
[67] the conduct of a cane.  He sought to elaborate some new scheme
of life that would have its reasoned philosophy and its ordered
principles and find in the spiritualizing of the senses its highest
realization.

The worship of the senses has often, and with much justice, been
decried, men feeling a natural instinct of terror about passions and
sensations that seem stronger than ourselves, and that we are
conscious of sharing with the less highly organized forms of
existence.  But it appeared to Dorian Gray that the true nature of
the senses had never been understood, and that they had remained
savage and animal merely because the world had sought to starve them
into submission or to kill them by pain, instead of aiming at making
them elements of a new spirituality, of which a fine instinct for
beauty was to be the dominant characteristic.  As he looked back upon
man moving through History, he was haunted by a feeling of loss.  So
much had been surrendered! and to such little purpose!  There had
been mad wilful rejections, monstrous forms of self-torture and self-
denial, whose origin was fear, and whose result was a degradation
infinitely more terrible than that fancied degradation from which, in
their ignorance, they had sought to escape, Nature in her wonderful
irony driving the anchorite out to herd with the wild animals of the
desert and giving to the hermit the beasts of the field as his
companions.

Yes, there was to be, as Lord Henry had prophesied, a new hedonism
that was to re-create life, and to save it from that harsh, uncomely
puritanism that is having, in our own day, its curious revival.  It
was to have its service of the intellect, certainly; yet it was never
to accept any theory or system that would involve the sacrifice of
any mode of passionate experience.  Its aim, indeed, was to be
experience itself, and not the fruits of experience, sweet or bitter
as they might be.  Of the asceticism that deadens the senses, as of
the vulgar profligacy that dulls them, it was to know nothing.  But
it was to teach man to concentrate himself upon the moments of a life
that is itself but a moment.

There are few of us who have not sometimes wakened before dawn,
either after one of those dreamless nights that make one almost
enamoured of death, or one of those nights of horror and misshapen
joy, when through the chambers of the brain sweep phantoms more
terrible than reality itself, and instinct with that vivid life that
lurks in all grotesques, and that lends to Gothic art its enduring
vitality, this art being, one might fancy, especially the art of
those whose minds have been troubled with the malady of revery.
Gradually white fingers creep through the curtains, and they appear
to tremble.  Black fantastic shadows crawl into the corners of the
room, and crouch there.  Outside, there is the stirring of birds
among the leaves, or the sound of men going forth to their work, or
the sigh and sob of the wind coming down from the hills, and
wandering round the silent house, as though it feared to wake the
sleepers.  Veil after veil of thin dusky gauze is lifted, and by
degrees the forms and colors of things are restored to them, and we
watch the dawn remaking the world in its antique pattern.  The wan
mirrors get back their mimic life.  The flameless tapers stand where
we have left them, and beside them [68] lies the half-read book that
we had been studying, or the wired flower that we had worn at the
ball, or the letter that we had been afraid to read, or that we had
read too often.  Nothing seems to us changed.  Out of the unreal
shadows of the night comes back the real life that we had known.  We
have to resume it where we had left off, and there steals over us a
terrible sense of the necessity for the continuance of energy in the
same wearisome round of stereotyped habits, or a wild longing, it may
be, that our eyelids might open some morning upon a world that had
been re-fashioned anew for our pleasure in the darkness, a world in
which things would have fresh shapes and colors, and be changed, or
have other secrets, a world in which the past would have little or no
place, or survive, at any rate, in no conscious form of obligation or
regret, the remembrance even of joy having its bitterness, and the
memories of pleasure their pain.

It was the creation of such worlds as these that seemed to Dorian
Gray to be the true object, or among the true objects, of life; and
in his search for sensations that would be at once new and
delightful, and possess that element of strangeness that is so
essential to romance, he would often adopt certain modes of thought
that he knew to be really alien to his nature, abandon himself to
their subtle influences, and then, having, as it were, caught their
color and satisfied his intellectual curiosity, leave them with that
curious indifference that is not incompatible with a real ardor of
temperament, and that indeed, according to certain modern
psychologists, is often a condition of it.

It was rumored of him once that he was about to join the Roman
Catholic communion; and certainly the Roman ritual had always a great
attraction for him.  The daily sacrifice, more awful really than all
the sacrifices of the antique world, stirred him as much by its
superb rejection of the evidence of the senses as by the primitive
simplicity of its elements and the eternal pathos of the human
tragedy that it sought to symbolize.  He loved to kneel down on the
cold marble pavement, and with the priest, in his stiff flowered
cope, slowly and with white hands moving aside the veil of the
tabernacle, and raising aloft the jewelled lantern-shaped monstrance
with that pallid wafer that at times, one would fain think, is indeed
the "panis caelestis," the bread of angels, or, robed in the garments
of the Passion of Christ, breaking the Host into the chalice, and
smiting his breast for his sins.  The fuming censers, that the grave
boys, in their lace and scarlet, tossed into the air like great gilt
flowers, had their subtle fascination for him.  As he passed out, he
used to look with wonder at the black confessionals, and long to sit
in the dim shadow of one of them and listen to men and women
whispering through the tarnished grating the true story of their
lives.

But he never fell into the error of arresting his intellectual
development by any formal acceptance of creed or system, or of
mistaking, for a house in which to live, an inn that is but suitable
for the sojourn of a night, or for a few hours of a night in which
there are no stars and the moon is in travail.  Mysticism, with its
marvellous power of making common things strange to us, and the
subtle antinomianism that always seems to accompany it, moved him for
a season; and for a [69] season he inclined to the materialistic
doctrines of the Darwinismus movement in Germany, and found a curious
pleasure in tracing the thoughts and passions of men to some pearly
cell in the brain, or some white nerve in the body, delighting in the
conception of the absolute dependence of the spirit on certain
physical conditions, morbid or healthy, normal or diseased.  Yet, as
has been said of him before, no theory of life seemed to him to be of
any importance compared with life itself.  He felt keenly conscious
of how barren all intellectual speculation is when separated from
action and experiment.  He knew that the senses, no less than the
soul, have their mysteries to reveal.

And so he would now study perfumes, and the secrets of their
manufacture, distilling heavily-scented oils, and burning odorous
gums from the East.  He saw that there was no mood of the mind that
had not its counterpart in the sensuous life, and set himself to
discover their true relations, wondering what there was in
frankincense that made one mystical, and in ambergris that stirred
one's passions, and in violets that woke the memory of dead romances,
and in musk that troubled the brain, and in champak that stained the
imagination; and seeking often to elaborate a real psychology of
perfumes, and to estimate the several influences of sweet-smelling
roots, and scented pollen-laden flowers, of aromatic balms, and of
dark and fragrant woods, of spikenard that sickens, of hovenia that
makes men mad, and of aloes that are said to be able to expel
melancholy from the soul.

At another time he devoted himself entirely to music, and in a long
latticed room, with a vermilion-and-gold ceiling and walls of olive-
green lacquer, he used to give curious concerts in which mad gypsies
tore wild music from little zithers, or grave yellow-shawled
Tunisians plucked at the strained strings of monstrous lutes, while
grinning negroes beat monotonously upon copper drums, or turbaned
Indians, crouching upon scarlet mats, blew through long pipes of reed
or brass, and charmed, or feigned to charm, great hooded snakes and
horrible horned adders.  The harsh intervals and shrill discords of
barbaric music stirred him at times when Schubert's grace, and
Chopin's beautiful sorrows, and the mighty harmonies of Beethoven
himself, fell unheeded on his ear.  He collected together from all
parts of the world the strangest instruments that could be found,
either in the tombs of dead nations or among the few savage tribes
that have survived contact with Western civilizations, and loved to
touch and try them.  He had the mysterious juruparis of the Rio Negro
Indians, that women are not allowed to look at, and that even youths
may not see till they have been subjected to fasting and scourging,
and the earthen jars of the Peruvians that have the shrill cries of
birds, and flutes of human bones such as Alfonso de Ovalle heard in
Chili, and the sonorous green stones that are found near Cuzco and
give forth a note of singular sweetness.  He had painted gourds
filled with pebbles that rattled when they were shaken; the long
clarin of the Mexicans, into which the performer does not blow, but
through which he inhales the air; the harsh ture of the Amazon
tribes, that is sounded by the sentinels who sit all day long in
trees, and that can be heard, it is said, at a distance of three
leagues; the teponaztli, that [70] has two vibrating tongues of wood,
and is beaten with sticks that are smeared with an elastic gum
obtained from the milky juice of plants; the yotl-bells of the
Aztecs, that are hung in clusters like grapes; and a huge cylindrical
drum, covered with the skins of great serpents, like the one that
Bernal Diaz saw when he went with Cortes into the Mexican temple, and
of whose doleful sound he has left us so vivid a description.  The
fantastic character of these instruments fascinated him, and he felt
a curious delight in the thought that Art, like Nature, has her
monsters, things of bestial shape and with hideous voices.  Yet,
after some time, he wearied of them, and would sit in his box at the
Opera, either alone or with Lord Henry, listening in rapt pleasure to
"Tannhauser," and seeing in that great work of art a presentation of
the tragedy of his own soul.

On another occasion he took up the study of jewels, and appeared at a
costume ball as Anne de Joyeuse, Admiral of France, in a dress
covered with five hundred and sixty pearls.  He would often spend a
whole day settling and resettling in their cases the various stones
that he had collected, such as the olive-green chrysoberyl that turns
red by lamplight, the cymophane with its wire-like line of silver,
the pistachio-colored peridot, rose-pink and wine-yellow topazes,
carbuncles of fiery scarlet with tremulous four-rayed stars, flame-
red cinnamon-stones, orange and violet spinels, and amethysts with
their alternate layers of ruby and sapphire.  He loved the red gold
of the sunstone, and the moonstone's pearly whiteness, and the broken
rainbow of the milky opal.  He procured from Amsterdam three emeralds
of extraordinary size and richness of color, and had a turquoise de
la vieille roche that was the envy of all the connoisseurs.

He discovered wonderful stories, also, about jewels.  In Alphonso's
"Clericalis Disciplina" a serpent was mentioned with eyes of real
jacinth, and in the romantic history of Alexander he was said to have
found snakes in the vale of Jordan "with collars of real emeralds
growing on their backs."  There was a gem in the brain of the dragon,
Philostratus told us, and "by the exhibition of golden letters and a
scarlet robe" the monster could be thrown into a magical sleep, and
slain.  According to the great alchemist Pierre de Boniface, the
diamond rendered a man invisible, and the agate of India made him
eloquent.  The cornelian appeased anger, and the hyacinth provoked
sleep, and the amethyst drove away the fumes of wine.  The garnet
cast out demons, and the hydropicus deprived the moon of her color.
The selenite waxed and waned with the moon, and the meloceus, that
discovers thieves, could be affected only by the blood of kids.
Leonardus Camillus had seen a white stone taken from the brain of a
newly-killed toad, that was a certain antidote against poison.  The
bezoar, that was found in the heart of the Arabian deer, was a charm
that could cure the plague.  In the nests of Arabian birds was the
aspilates, that, according to Democritus, kept the wearer from any
danger by fire.

The King of Ceilan rode through his city with a large ruby in his
hand, as the ceremony of his coronation.  The gates of the palace of
John the Priest were "made of sardius, with the horn of the horned
[71] snake inwrought, so that no man might bring poison within."
Over the gable were "two golden apples, in which were two
carbuncles," so that the gold might shine by day, and the carbuncles
by night.  In Lodge's strange romance "A Margarite of America" it was
stated that in the chamber of Margarite were seen "all the chaste
ladies of the world, inchased out of silver, looking through fair
mirrours of chrysolites, carbuncles, sapphires, and greene
emeraults."  Marco Polo had watched the inhabitants of Zipangu place
a rose-colored pearl in the mouth of the dead.  A sea-monster had
been enamoured of the pearl that the diver brought to King Perozes,
and had slain the thief, and mourned for seven moons over his loss.
When the Huns lured the king into the great pit, he flung it away,--
Procopius tells the story,--nor was it ever found again, though the
Emperor Anastasius offered five hundred-weight of gold pieces for it.
The King of Malabar had shown a Venetian a rosary of one hundred and
four pearls, one for every god that he worshipped.

When the Duke de Valentinois, son of Alexander VI., visited Louis
XII. of France, his horse was loaded with gold leaves, according to
Brantome, and his cap had double rows of rubies that threw out a
great light.  Charles of England had ridden in stirrups hung with
three hundred and twenty-one diamonds.  Richard II. had a coat,
valued at thirty thousand marks, which was covered with balas rubies.
Hall described Henry VIII., on his way to the Tower previous to his
coronation, as wearing "a jacket of raised gold, the placard
embroidered with diamonds and other rich stones, and a great
bauderike about his neck of large balasses."  The favorites of James
I. wore ear-rings of emeralds set in gold filigrane.  Edward II. gave
to Piers Gaveston a suit of red-gold armor studded with jacinths, and
a collar of gold roses set with turquoise-stones, and a skull-cap
parseme with pearls.  Henry II. wore jewelled gloves reaching to the
elbow, and had a hawk-glove set with twelve rubies and fifty-two
great pearls.  The ducal hat of Charles the Rash, the last Duke of
Burgundy of his race, was studded with sapphires and hung with pear-
shaped pearls.

How exquisite life had once been!  How gorgeous in its pomp and
decoration!  Even to read of the luxury of the dead was wonderful.

Then he turned his attention to embroideries, and to the tapestries
that performed the office of frescos in the chill rooms of the
Northern nations of Europe.  As he investigated the subject,--and he
always had an extraordinary faculty of becoming absolutely absorbed
for the moment in whatever he took up,--he was almost saddened by the
reflection of the ruin that time brought on beautiful and wonderful
things.  He, at any rate, had escaped that.  Summer followed summer,
and the yellow jonquils bloomed and died many times, and nights of
horror repeated the story of their shame, but he was unchanged.  No
winter marred his face or stained his flower-like bloom.  How
different it was with material things!  Where had they gone to?
Where was the great crocus-colored robe, on which the gods fought
against the giants, that had been worked for Athena?  Where the huge
velarium that Nero had stretched across the Colosseum at Rome, on
which were represented the starry sky, and Apollo driving a chariot
drawn by [72] white gilt-reined steeds?  He longed to see the curious
table-napkins wrought for Elagabalus, on which were displayed all the
dainties and viands that could be wanted for a feast; the mortuary
cloth of King Chilperic, with its three hundred golden bees; the
fantastic robes that excited the indignation of the Bishop of Pontus,
and were figured with "lions, panthers, bears, dogs, forests, rocks,
hunters,--all, in fact, that a painter can copy from nature;" and the
coat that Charles of Orleans once wore, on the sleeves of which were
embroidered the verses of a song beginning "Madame, je suis tout
joyeux," the musical accompaniment of the words being wrought in gold
thread, and each note, a square shape in those days, formed with four
pearls.  He read of the room that was prepared at the palace at
Rheims for the use of Queen Joan of Burgundy, and was decorated with
"thirteen hundred and twenty-one parrots, made in broidery, and
blazoned with the king's arms, and five hundred and sixty-one
butterflies, whose wings were similarly ornamented with the arms of
the queen, the whole worked in gold."  Catherine de Medicis had a
mourning-bed made for her of black velvet powdered with crescents and
suns.  Its curtains were of damask, with leafy wreaths and garlands,
figured upon a gold and silver ground, and fringed along the edges
with broideries of pearls, and it stood in a room hung with rows of
the queen's devices in cut black velvet upon cloth of silver.  Louis
XIV. had gold-embroidered caryatides fifteen feet high in his
apartment.  The state bed of Sobieski, King of Poland, was made of
Smyrna gold brocade embroidered in turquoises with verses from the
Koran.  Its supports were of silver gilt, beautifully chased, and
profusely set with enamelled and jewelled medallions.  It had been
taken from the Turkish camp before Vienna, and the standard of
Mohammed had stood under it.

And so, for a whole year, he sought to accumulate the most exquisite
specimens that he could find of textile and embroidered work, getting
the dainty Delhi muslins, finely wrought, with gold-threat palmates,
and stitched over with iridescent beetles' wings; the Dacca gauzes,
that from their transparency are known in the East as "woven air,"
and "running water," and "evening dew;" strange figured cloths from
Java; elaborate yellow Chinese hangings; books bound in tawny satins
or fair blue silks and wrought with fleurs de lys, birds, and images;
veils of lacis worked in Hungary point; Sicilian brocades, and stiff
Spanish velvets; Georgian work with its gilt coins, and Japanese
Foukousas with their green-toned golds and their marvellously-
plumaged birds.

He had a special passion, also, for ecclesiastical vestments, as
indeed he had for everything connected with the service of the
Church.  In the long cedar chests that lined the west gallery of his
house he had stored away many rare and beautiful specimens of what is
really the raiment of the Bride of Christ, who must wear purple and
jewels and fine linen that she may hide the pallid macerated body
that is worn by the suffering that she seeks for, and wounded by
self-inflicted pain.  He had a gorgeous cope of crimson silk and
gold-thread damask, figured with a repeating pattern of golden
pomegranates set in six-petalled formal blossoms, beyond which on
either side was the pine- [73] apple device wrought in seed-pearls.
The orphreys were divided into panels representing scenes from the
life of the Virgin, and the coronation of the Virgin was figured in
colored silks upon the hood.  This was Italian work of the fifteenth
century.  Another cope was of green velvet, embroidered with heart-
shaped groups of acanthus-leaves, from which spread long-stemmed
white blossoms, the details of which were picked out with silver
thread and colored crystals.  The morse bore a seraph's head in gold-
thread raised work.  The orphreys were woven in a diaper of red and
gold silk, and were starred with medallions of many saints and
martyrs, among whom was St. Sebastian.  He had chasubles, also, of
amber-colored silk, and blue silk and gold brocade, and yellow silk
damask and cloth of gold, figured with representations of the Passion
and Crucifixion of Christ, and embroidered with lions and peacocks
and other emblems; dalmatics of white satin and pink silk damask,
decorated with tulips and dolphins and fleurs de lys; altar frontals
of crimson velvet and blue linen; and many corporals, chalice-veils,
and sudaria.  In the mystic offices to which these things were put
there was something that quickened his imagination.

For these things, and everything that he collected in his lovely
house, were to be to him means of forgetfulness, modes by which he
could escape, for a season, from the fear that seemed to him at times
to be almost too great to be borne.  Upon the walls of the lonely
locked room where he had spent so much of his boyhood, he had hung
with his own hands the terrible portrait whose changing features
showed him the real degradation of his life, and had draped the
purple-and-gold pall in front of it as a curtain.  For weeks he would
not go there, would forget the hideous painted thing, and get back
his light heart, his wonderful joyousness, his passionate pleasure in
mere existence.  Then, suddenly, some night he would creep out of the
house, go down to dreadful places near Blue Gate Fields, and stay
there, day after day, until he was driven away.  On his return he
would sit in front of the picture, sometimes loathing it and himself,
but filled, at other times, with that pride of rebellion that is half
the fascination of sin, and smiling, with secret pleasure, at the
misshapen shadow that had to bear the burden that should have been
his own.

After a few years he could not endure to be long out of England, and
gave up the villa that he had shared at Trouville with Lord Henry, as
well as the little white walled-in house at Algiers where he had more
than once spent his winter.  He hated to be separated from the
picture that was such a part of his life, and he was also afraid that
during his absence some one might gain access to the room, in spite
of the elaborate bolts and bars that he had caused to be placed upon
the door.

He was quite conscious that this would tell them nothing.  It was
true that the portrait still preserved, under all the foulness and
ugliness of the face, its marked likeness to himself; but what could
they learn from that?  He would laugh at any one who tried to taunt
him.  He had not painted it.  What was it to him how vile and full of
shame it looked?  Even if he told them, would they believe it?

Yet he was afraid.  Sometimes when he was down at his great [74]
house in Nottinghamshire, entertaining the fashionable young men of
his own rank who were his chief companions, and astounding the county
by the wanton luxury and gorgeous splendor of his mode of life, he
would suddenly leave his guests and rush back to town to see that the
door had not been tampered with and that the picture was still there.
What if it should be stolen?  The mere thought made him cold with
horror.  Surely the world would know his secret then.  Perhaps the
world already suspected it.

For, while he fascinated many, there were not a few who distrusted
him.  He was blackballed at a West End club of which his birth and
social position fully entitled him to become a member, and on one
occasion, when he was brought by a friend into the smoking-room of
the Carlton, the Duke of Berwick and another gentleman got up in a
marked manner and went out.  Curious stories became current about him
after he had passed his twenty-fifth year.  It was said that he had
been seen brawling with foreign sailors in a low den in the distant
parts of Whitechapel, and that he consorted with thieves and coiners
and knew the mysteries of their trade.  His extraordinary absences
became notorious, and, when he used to reappear again in society, men
would whisper to each other in corners, or pass him with a sneer, or
look at him with cold searching eyes, as if they were determined to
discover his secret.

Of such insolences and attempted slights he, of course, took no
notice, and in the opinion of most people his frank debonair manner,
his charming boyish smile, and the infinite grace of that wonderful
youth that seemed never to leave him, were in themselves a sufficient
answer to the calumnies (for so they called them) that were
circulated about him.  It was remarked, however, that those who had
been most intimate with him appeared, after a time, to shun him.  Of
all his friends, or so-called friends, Lord Henry Wotton was the only
one who remained loyal to him.  Women who had wildly adored him, and
for his sake had braved all social censure and set convention at
defiance, were seen to grow pallid with shame or horror if Dorian
Gray entered the room.

Yet these whispered scandals only lent him, in the eyes of many, his
strange and dangerous charm.  His great wealth was a certain element
of security.  Society, civilized society at least, is never very
ready to believe anything to the detriment of those who are both rich
and charming.  It feels instinctively that manners are of more
importance than morals, and the highest respectability is of less
value in its opinion than the possession of a good chef.  And, after
all, it is a very poor consolation to be told that the man who has
given one a bad dinner, or poor wine, is irreproachable in his
private life.  Even the cardinal virtues cannot atone for cold
entrees, as Lord Henry remarked once, in a discussion on the subject;
and there is possibly a good deal to be said for his view.  For the
canons of good society are, or should be, the same as the canons of
art.  Form is absolutely essential to it.  It should have the dignity
of a ceremony, as well as its unreality, and should combine the
insincere character of a romantic play with the wit and beauty that
make such plays charming.  Is insincerity such a [75] terrible thing?
I think not.  It is merely a method by which we can multiply our
personalities.

Such, at any rate, was Dorian Gray's opinion.  He used to wonder at
the shallow psychology of those who conceive the Ego in man as a
thing simple, permanent, reliable, and of one essence.  To him, man
was a being with myriad lives and myriad sensations, a complex
multiform creature that bore within itself strange legacies of
thought and passion, and whose very flesh was tainted with the
monstrous maladies of the dead.  He loved to stroll through the gaunt
cold picture-gallery of his country-house and look at the various
portraits of those whose blood flowed in his veins.  Here was Philip
Herbert, described by Francis Osborne, in his "Memoires on the Reigns
of Queen Elizabeth and King James," as one who was "caressed by the
court for his handsome face, which kept him not long company."  Was
it young Herbert's life that he sometimes led?  Had some strange
poisonous germ crept from body to body till it had reached his own?
Was it some dim sense of that ruined grace that had made him so
suddenly, and almost without cause, give utterance, in Basil
Hallward's studio, to that mad prayer that had so changed his life?
Here, in gold-embroidered red doublet, jewelled surcoat, and gilt-
edged ruff and wrist-bands, stood Sir Anthony Sherard, with his
silver-and-black armor piled at his feet.  What had this man's legacy
been?  Had the lover of Giovanna of Naples bequeathed him some
inheritance of sin and shame?  Were his own actions merely the dreams
that the dead man had not dared to realize?  Here, from the fading
canvas, smiled Lady Elizabeth Devereux, in her gauze hood, pearl
stomacher, and pink slashed sleeves.  A flower was in her right hand,
and her left clasped an enamelled collar of white and damask roses.
On a table by her side lay a mandolin and an apple.  There were large
green rosettes upon her little pointed shoes.  He knew her life, and
the strange stories that were told about her lovers.  Had he
something of her temperament in him?  Those oval heavy-lidded eyes
seemed to look curiously at him.  What of George Willoughby, with his
powdered hair and fantastic patches?  How evil he looked!  The face
was saturnine and swarthy, and the sensual lips seemed to be twisted
with disdain.  Delicate lace ruffles fell over the lean yellow hands
that were so overladen with rings.  He had been a macaroni of the
eighteenth century, and the friend, in his youth, of Lord Ferrars.
What of the second Lord Sherard, the companion of the Prince Regent
in his wildest days, and one of the witnesses at the secret marriage
with Mrs. Fitzherbert?  How proud and handsome he was, with his
chestnut curls and insolent pose!  What passions had he bequeathed?
The world had looked upon him as infamous.  He had led the orgies at
Carlton House.  The star of the Garter glittered upon his breast.
Beside him hung the portrait of his wife, a pallid, thin-lipped woman
in black.  Her blood, also, stirred within him.  How curious it all
seemed!

Yet one had ancestors in literature, as well as in one's own race,
nearer perhaps in type and temperament, many of them, and certainly
with an influence of which one was more absolutely conscious.  There
[76] were times when it seemed to Dorian Gray that the whole of
history was merely the record of his own life, not as he had lived it
in act and circumstance, but as his imagination had created it for
him, as it had been in his brain and in his passions.  He felt that
he had known them all, those strange terrible figures that had passed
across the stage of the world and made sin so marvellous and evil so
full of wonder.  It seemed to him that in some mysterious way their
lives had been his own.

The hero of the dangerous novel that had so influenced his life had
himself had this curious fancy.  In a chapter of the book he tells
how, crowned with laurel, lest lightning might strike him, he had
sat, as Tiberius, in a garden at Capri, reading the shameful books of
Elephantis, while dwarfs and peacocks strutted round him and the
flute-player mocked the swinger of the censer; and, as Caligula, had
caroused with the green-shirted jockeys in their stables, and supped
in an ivory manger with a jewel-frontleted horse; and, as Domitian,
had wandered through a corridor lined with marble mirrors, looking
round with haggard eyes for the reflection of the dagger that was to
end his days, and sick with that ennui, that taedium vitae, that
comes on those to whom life denies nothing; and had peered through a
clear emerald at the red shambles of the Circus, and then, in a
litter of pearl and purple drawn by silver-shod mules, been carried
through the Street of Pomegranates to a House of Gold, and heard men
cry on Nero Caesar as he passed by; and, as Elagabalus, had painted
his face with colors, and plied the distaff among the women, and
brought the Moon from Carthage, and given her in mystic marriage to
the Sun.

Over and over again Dorian used to read this fantastic chapter, and
the chapter immediately following, in which the hero describes the
curious tapestries that he had had woven for him from Gustave
Moreau's designs, and on which were pictured the awful and beautiful
forms of those whom Vice and Blood and Weariness had made monstrous
or mad: Filippo, Duke of Milan, who slew his wife, and painted her
lips with a scarlet poison; Pietro Barbi, the Venetian, known as Paul
the Second, who sought in his vanity to assume the title of Formosus,
and whose tiara, valued at two hundred thousand florins, was bought
at the price of a terrible sin; Gian Maria Visconti, who used hounds
to chase living men, and whose murdered body was covered with roses
by a harlot who had loved him; the Borgia on his white horse, with
Fratricide riding beside him, and his mantle stained with the blood
of Perotto; Pietro Riario, the young Cardinal Archbishop of Florence,
child and minion of Sixtus IV., whose beauty was equalled only by his
debauchery, and who received Leonora of Aragon in a pavilion of white
and crimson silk, filled with nymphs and centaurs, and gilded a boy
that he might serve her at the feast as Ganymede or Hylas; Ezzelin,
whose melancholy could be cured only by the spectacle of death, and
who had a passion for red blood, as other men have for red wine,--the
son of the Fiend, as was reported, and one who had cheated his father
at dice when gambling with him for his own soul; Giambattista Cibo,
who in mockery took the name of Innocent, and into whose torpid veins
the blood of three lads was infused by a [77] Jewish doctor;
Sigismondo Malatesta, the lover of Isotta, and the lord of Rimini,
whose effigy was burned at Rome as the enemy of God and man, who
strangled Polyssena with a napkin, and gave poison to Ginevra d'Este
in a cup of emerald, and in honor of a shameful passion built a pagan
church for Christian worship; Charles VI., who had so wildly adored
his brother's wife that a leper had warned him of the insanity that
was coming on him, and who could only be soothed by Saracen cards
painted with the images of Love and Death and Madness; and, in his
trimmed jerkin and jewelled cap and acanthus-like curls, Grifonetto
Baglioni, who slew Astorre with his bride, and Simonetto with his
page, and whose comeliness was such that, as he lay dying in the
yellow piazza of Perugia, those who had hated him could not choose
but weep, and Atalanta, who had cursed him, blessed him.

There was a horrible fascination in them all.  He saw them at night,
and they troubled his imagination in the day.  The Renaissance knew
of strange manners of poisoning,--poisoning by a helmet and a lighted
torch, by an embroidered glove and a jewelled fan, by a gilded
pomander and by an amber chain.  Dorian Gray had been poisoned by a
book.  There were moments when he looked on evil simply as a mode
through which he could realize his conception of the beautiful.



CHAPTER X

[...77] It was on the 7th of November, the eve of his own thirty-
second birthday, as he often remembered afterwards.

He was walking home about eleven o'clock from Lord Henry's, where he
had been dining, and was wrapped in heavy furs, as the night was cold
and foggy.  At the corner of Grosvenor Square and South Audley Street
a man passed him in the mist, walking very fast, and with the collar
of his gray ulster turned up.  He had a bag in his hand.  He
recognized him.  It was Basil Hallward.  A strange sense of fear, for
which he could not account, came over him.  He made no sign of
recognition, and went on slowly, in the direction of his own house.

But Hallward had seen him.  Dorian heard him first stopping, and then
hurrying after him.  In a few moments his hand was on his arm.

"Dorian!  What an extraordinary piece of luck!  I have been waiting
for you ever since nine o'clock in your library.  Finally I took pity
on your tired servant, and told him to go to bed, as he let me out.
I am off to Paris by the midnight train, and I wanted particularly to
see you before I left.  I thought it was you, or rather your fur
coat, as you passed me.  But I wasn't quite sure.  Didn't you
recognize me?"

"In this fog, my dear Basil?  Why, I can't even recognize Grosvenor
Square.  I believe my house is somewhere about here, but I don't feel
at all certain about it.  I am sorry you are going away, as I have
not seen you for ages.  But I suppose you will be back soon?"

"No: I am going to be out of England for six months.  I intend [78]
to take a studio in Paris, and shut myself up till I have finished a
great picture I have in my head.  However, it wasn't about myself I
wanted to talk.  Here we are at your door.  Let me come in for a
moment.  I have something to say to you."

"I shall be charmed.  But won't you miss your train?" said Dorian
Gray, languidly, as he passed up the steps and opened the door with
his latch-key.

The lamp-light struggled out through the fog, and Hallward looked at
his watch.  "I have heaps of time," he answered.  "The train doesn't
go till twelve-fifteen, and it is only just eleven.  In fact, I was
on my way to the club to look for you, when I met you.  You see, I
shan't have any delay about luggage, as I have sent on my heavy
things.  All I have with me is in this bag, and I can easily get to
Victoria in twenty minutes."

Dorian looked at him and smiled.  "What a way for a fashionable
painter to travel!  A Gladstone bag, and an ulster!  Come in, or the
fog will get into the house.  And mind you don't talk about anything
serious.  Nothing is serious nowadays.  At least nothing should be."

Hallward shook his head, as he entered, and followed Dorian into the
library.  There was a bright wood fire blazing in the large open
hearth.  The lamps were lit, and an open Dutch silver spirit-case
stood, with some siphons of soda-water and large cut-glass tumblers,
on a little table.

"You see your servant made me quite at home, Dorian.  He gave me
everything I wanted, including your best cigarettes.  He is a most
hospitable creature.  I like him much better than the Frenchman you
used to have.  What has become of the Frenchman, by the bye?"

Dorian shrugged his shoulders.  "I believe he married Lady Ashton's
maid, and has established her in Paris as an English dressmaker.
Anglomanie is very fashionable over there now, I hear.  It seems
silly of the French, doesn't it?  But--do you know?--he was not at
all a bad servant.  I never liked him, but I had nothing to complain
about.  One often imagines things that are quite absurd.  He was
really very devoted to me, and seemed quite sorry when he went away.
Have another brandy-and-soda?  Or would you like hock-and-seltzer?  I
always take hock-and-seltzer myself.  There is sure to be some in the
next room."

"Thanks, I won't have anything more," said Hallward, taking his cap
and coat off, and throwing them on the bag that he had placed in the
corner.  "And now, my dear fellow, I want to speak to you seriously.
Don't frown like that.  You make it so much more difficult for me."

"What is it all about?" cried Dorian, in his petulant way, flinging
himself down on the sofa.  "I hope it is not about myself.  I am
tired of myself to-night.  I should like to be somebody else."

"It is about yourself," answered Hallward, in his grave, deep voice,
"and I must say it to you.  I shall only keep you half an hour."

Dorian sighed, and lit a cigarette.  "Half an hour!" he murmured.

[79] "It is not much to ask of you, Dorian, and it is entirely for
your own sake that I am speaking.  I think it right that you should
know that the most dreadful things are being said about you in
London,--things that I could hardly repeat to you."

"I don't wish to know anything about them.  I love scandals about
other people, but scandals about myself don't interest me.  They have
not got the charm of novelty."

"They must interest you, Dorian.  Every gentleman is interested in
his good name.  You don't want people to talk of you as something
vile and degraded.  Of course you have your position, and your
wealth, and all that kind of thing.  But position and wealth are not
everything.  Mind you, I don't believe these rumors at all.  At
least, I can't believe them when I see you.  Sin is a thing that
writes itself across a man's face.  It cannot be concealed.  People
talk of secret vices.  There are no such things as secret vices.  If
a wretched man has a vice, it shows itself in the lines of his mouth,
the droop of his eyelids, the moulding of his hands even.  Somebody--
I won't mention his name, but you know him--came to me last year to
have his portrait done.  I had never seen him before, and had never
heard anything about him at the time, though I have heard a good deal
since.  He offered an extravagant price.  I refused him.  There was
something in the shape of his fingers that I hated.  I know now that
I was quite right in what I fancied about him.  His life is dreadful.
But you, Dorian, with your pure, bright, innocent face, and your
marvellous untroubled youth,--I can't believe anything against you.
And yet I see you very seldom, and you never come down to the studio
now, and when I am away from you, and I hear all these hideous things
that people are whispering about you, I don't know what to say.  Why
is it, Dorian, that a man like the Duke of Berwick leaves the room of
a club when you enter it?  Why is it that so many gentlemen in London
will neither go to your house nor invite you to theirs?  You used to
be a friend of Lord Cawdor.  I met him at dinner last week.  Your
name happened to come up in conversation, in connection with the
miniatures you have lent to the exhibition at the Dudley.  Cawdor
curled his lip, and said that you might have the most artistic
tastes, but that you were a man whom no pure-minded girl should be
allowed to know, and whom no chaste woman should sit in the same room
with.  I reminded him that I was a friend of yours, and asked him
what he meant.  He told me.  He told me right out before everybody.
It was horrible!  Why is your friendship so fateful to young men?
There was that wretched boy in the Guards who committed suicide.  You
were his great friend.  There was Sir Henry Ashton, who had to leave
England, with a tarnished name.  You and he were inseparable.  What
about Adrian Singleton, and his dreadful end?  What about Lord Kent's
only son, and his career?  I met his father yesterday in St. James
Street.  He seemed broken with shame and sorrow.  What about the
young Duke of Perth?  What sort of life has he got now?  What
gentleman would associate with him?  Dorian, Dorian, your reputation
is infamous.  I know you and Harry are great friends.  I say nothing
about that now, but [80] surely you need not have made his sister's
name a by-word.  When you met Lady Gwendolen, not a breath of scandal
had ever touched her.  Is there a single decent woman in London now
who would drive with her in the Park?  Why, even her children are not
allowed to live with her.  Then there are other stories,--stories
that you have been seen creeping at dawn out of dreadful houses and
slinking in disguise into the foulest dens in London.  Are they true?
Can they be true?  When I first heard them, I laughed.  I hear them
now, and they make me shudder.  What about your country-house, and
the life that is led there?  Dorian, you don't know what is said
about you.  I won't tell you that I don't want to preach to you.  I
remember Harry saying once that every man who turned himself into an
amateur curate for the moment always said that, and then broke his
word.  I do want to preach to you.  I want you to lead such a life as
will make the world respect you.  I want you to have a clean name and
a fair record.  I want you to get rid of the dreadful people you
associate with.  Don't shrug your shoulders like that.  Don't be so
indifferent.  You have a wonderful influence.  Let it be for good,
not for evil.  They say that you corrupt every one whom you become
intimate with, and that it is quite sufficient for you to enter a
house, for shame of some kind to follow after you.  I don't know
whether it is so or not.  How should I know?  But it is said of you.
I am told things that it seems impossible to doubt.  Lord Gloucester
was one of my greatest friends at Oxford.  He showed me a letter that
his wife had written to him when she was dying alone in her villa at
Mentone.  Your name was implicated in the most terrible confession I
ever read.  I told him that it was absurd,--that I knew you
thoroughly, and that you were incapable of anything of the kind.
Know you?  I wonder do I know you?  Before I could answer that, I
should have to see your soul."

"To see my soul!" muttered Dorian Gray, starting up from the sofa and
turning almost white from fear.

"Yes," answered Hallward, gravely, and with infinite sorrow in his
voice,--"to see your soul.  But only God can do that."

A bitter laugh of mockery broke from the lips of the younger man.
"You shall see it yourself, to-night!" he cried, seizing a lamp from
the table.  "Come: it is your own handiwork.  Why shouldn't you look
at it?  You can tell the world all about it afterwards, if you
choose.  Nobody would believe you.  If they did believe you, they'd
like me all the better for it.  I know the age better than you do,
though you will prate about it so tediously.  Come, I tell you.  You
have chattered enough about corruption.  Now you shall look on it
face to face."

There was the madness of pride in every word he uttered.  He stamped
his foot upon the ground in his boyish insolent manner.  He felt a
terrible joy at the thought that some one else was to share his
secret, and that the man who had painted the portrait that was the
origin of all his shame was to be burdened for the rest of his life
with the hideous memory of what he had done.

"Yes," he continued, coming closer to him, and looking steadfastly
into his stern eyes, "I will show you my soul.  You shall see the
thing that you fancy only God can see."

[81] Hallward started back.  "This is blasphemy, Dorian!" he cried.
"You must not say things like that.  They are horrible, and they
don't mean anything."

"You think so?" He laughed again.

"I know so.  As for what I said to you to-night, I said it for your
good.  You know I have been always devoted to you."

"Don't touch me.  Finish what you have to say."

A twisted flash of pain shot across Hallward's face.  He paused for a
moment, and a wild feeling of pity came over him.  After all, what
right had he to pry into the life of Dorian Gray?  If he had done a
tithe of what was rumored about him, how much he must have suffered!
Then he straightened himself up, and walked over to the fireplace,
and stood there, looking at the burning logs with their frost-like
ashes and their throbbing cores of flame.

"I am waiting, Basil," said the young man, in a hard, clear voice.

He turned round.  "What I have to say is this," he cried.  "You must
give me some answer to these horrible charges that are made against
you.  If you tell me that they are absolutely untrue from beginning
to end, I will believe you.  Deny them, Dorian, deny them!  Can't you
see what I am going through?  My God! don't tell me that you are
infamous!"

Dorian Gray smiled.  There was a curl of contempt in his lips.  "Come
up-stairs, Basil," he said, quietly.  "I keep a diary of my life from
day to day, and it never leaves the room in which it is written.  I
will show it to you if you come with me."

"I will come with you, Dorian, if you wish it.  I see I have missed
my train.  That makes no matter.  I can go to-morrow.  But don't ask
me to read anything to-night.  All I want is a plain answer to my
question."

"That will be given to you up-stairs.  I could not give it here.  You
won't have to read long.  Don't keep me waiting."



CHAPTER XI

[...81] He passed out of the room, and began the ascent, Basil
Hallward following close behind.  They walked softly, as men
instinctively do at night.  The lamp cast fantastic shadows on the
wall and staircase.  A rising wind made some of the windows rattle.

When they reached the top landing, Dorian set the lamp down on the
floor, and taking out the key turned it in the lock.  "You insist on
knowing, Basil?" he asked, in a low voice.

"Yes."

"I am delighted," he murmured, smiling.  Then he added, somewhat
bitterly, "You are the one man in the world who is entitled to know
everything about me.  You have had more to do with my life than you
think."  And, taking up the lamp, he opened the door and went in.  A
cold current of air passed them, and the light shot up for a moment
in a flame of murky orange.  He shuddered.  "Shut the door behind
you," he said, as he placed the lamp on the table.

[82] Hallward glanced round him, with a puzzled expression.  The room
looked as if it had not been lived in for years.  A faded Flemish
tapestry, a curtained picture, an old Italian cassone, and an almost
empty bookcase,--that was all that it seemed to contain, besides a
chair and a table.  As Dorian Gray was lighting a half-burned candle
that was standing on the mantel-shelf, he saw that the whole place
was covered with dust, and that the carpet was in holes.  A mouse ran
scuffling behind the wainscoting.  There was a damp odor of mildew.

"So you think that it is only God who sees the soul, Basil?  Draw
that curtain back, and you will see mine."

The voice that spoke was cold and cruel.  "You are mad, Dorian, or
playing a part," muttered Hallward, frowning.

"You won't?  Then I must do it myself," said the young man; and he
tore the curtain from its rod, and flung it on the ground.

An exclamation of horror broke from Hallward's lips as he saw in the
dim light the hideous thing on the canvas leering at him.  There was
something in its expression that filled him with disgust and
loathing.  Good heavens! it was Dorian Gray's own face that he was
looking at!  The horror, whatever it was, had not yet entirely marred
that marvellous beauty.  There was still some gold in the thinning
hair and some scarlet on the sensual lips.  The sodden eyes had kept
something of the loveliness of their blue, the noble curves had not
yet passed entirely away from chiselled nostrils and from plastic
throat.  Yes, it was Dorian himself.  But who had done it?  He seemed
to recognize his own brush-work, and the frame was his own design.
The idea was monstrous, yet he felt afraid.  He seized the lighted
candle, and held it to the picture.  In the left-hand corner was his
own name, traced in long letters of bright vermilion.

It was some foul parody, some infamous, ignoble satire.  He had never
done that.  Still, it was his own picture.  He knew it, and he felt
as if his blood had changed from fire to sluggish ice in a moment.
His own picture!  What did it mean?  Why had it altered?  He turned,
and looked at Dorian Gray with the eyes of a sick man.  His mouth
twitched, and his parched tongue seemed unable to articulate.  He
passed his hand across his forehead.  It was dank with clammy sweat.

The young man was leaning against the mantel-shelf, watching him with
that strange expression that is on the faces of those who are
absorbed in a play when a great artist is acting.  There was neither
real sorrow in it nor real joy.  There was simply the passion of the
spectator, with perhaps a flicker of triumph in the eyes.  He had
taken the flower out of his coat, and was smelling it, or pretending
to do so.

"What does this mean?" cried Hallward, at last.  His own voice
sounded shrill and curious in his ears.

"Years ago, when I was a boy," said Dorian Gray, "you met me, devoted
yourself to me, flattered me, and taught me to be vain of my good
looks.  One day you introduced me to a friend of yours, who explained
to me the wonder of youth, and you finished a portrait of me that
revealed to me the wonder of beauty.  In a mad moment, that [83] I
don't know, even now, whether I regret or not, I made a wish.
Perhaps you would call it a prayer . . . ."

"I remember it!  Oh, how well I remember it!  No! the thing is
impossible.  The room is damp.  The mildew has got into the canvas.
The paints I used had some wretched mineral poison in them.  I tell
you the thing is impossible."

"Ah, what is impossible?" murmured the young man, going over to the
window, and leaning his forehead against the cold, mist-stained
glass.

"You told me you had destroyed it."

"I was wrong.  It has destroyed me."

"I don't believe it is my picture."

"Can't you see your romance in it?" said Dorian, bitterly.

"My romance, as you call it . . ."

"As you called it."

"There was nothing evil in it, nothing shameful.  This is the face of
a satyr."

"It is the face of my soul."

"God! what a thing I must have worshipped!  This has the eyes of a
devil."

"Each of us has Heaven and Hell in him, Basil," cried Dorian, with a
wild gesture of despair.

Hallward turned again to the portrait, and gazed at it.  "My God! if
it is true," he exclaimed, "and this is what you have done with your
life, why, you must be worse even than those who talk against you
fancy you to be!"  He held the light up again to the canvas, and
examined it.  The surface seemed to be quite undisturbed, and as he
had left it.  It was from within, apparently, that the foulness and
horror had come.  Through some strange quickening of inner life the
leprosies of sin were slowly eating the thing away.  The rotting of a
corpse in a watery grave was not so fearful.

His hand shook, and the candle fell from its socket on the floor, and
lay there sputtering.  He placed his foot on it and put it out.  Then
he flung himself into the rickety chair that was standing by the
table and buried his face in his hands.

"Good God, Dorian, what a lesson! what an awful lesson!"  There was
no answer, but he could hear the young man sobbing at the window.

"Pray, Dorian, pray," he murmured.  "What is it that one was taught
to say in one's boyhood?  'Lead us not into temptation.  Forgive us
our sins.  Wash away our iniquities.'  Let us say that together.  The
prayer of your pride has been answered.  The prayer of your
repentance will be answered also.  I worshipped you too much.  I am
punished for it.  You worshipped yourself too much.  We are both
punished."

Dorian Gray turned slowly around, and looked at him with tear-dimmed
eyes.  "It is too late, Basil," he murmured.

"It is never too late, Dorian.  Let us kneel down and try if we can
remember a prayer.  Isn't there a verse somewhere, 'Though your sins
be as scarlet, yet I will make them as white as snow'?"

[84] "Those words mean nothing to me now."

"Hush! don't say that.  You have done enough evil in your life.  My
God! don't you see that accursed thing leering at us?"

Dorian Gray glanced at the picture, and suddenly an uncontrollable
feeling of hatred for Basil Hallward came over him.  The mad passions
of a hunted animal stirred within him, and he loathed the man who was
seated at the table, more than he had ever loathed anything in his
whole life.  He glanced wildly around.  Something glimmered on the
top of the painted chest that faced him.  His eye fell on it.  He
knew what it was.  It was a knife that he had brought up, some days
before, to cut a piece of cord, and had forgotten to take away with
him.  He moved slowly towards it, passing Hallward as he did so.  As
soon as he got behind him, he seized it, and turned round.  Hallward
moved in his chair as if he was going to rise.  He rushed at him, and
dug the knife into the great vein that is behind the ear, crushing
the man's head down on the table, and stabbing again and again.

There was a stifled groan, and the horrible sound of some one choking
with blood.  The outstretched arms shot up convulsively three times,
waving grotesque stiff-fingered hands in the air.  He stabbed him
once more, but the man did not move.  Something began to trickle on
the floor.  He waited for a moment, still pressing the head down.
Then he threw the knife on the table, and listened.

He could hear nothing, but the drip, drip on the threadbare carpet.
He opened the door, and went out on the landing.  The house was quite
quiet.  No one was stirring.

He took out the key, and returned to the room, locking himself in as
he did so.

The thing was still seated in the chair, straining over the table
with bowed head, and humped back, and long fantastic arms.  Had it
not been for the red jagged tear in the neck, and the clotted black
pool that slowly widened on the table, one would have said that the
man was simply asleep.

How quickly it had all been done!  He felt strangely calm, and,
walking over to the window, opened it, and stepped out on the
balcony.  The wind had blown the fog away, and the sky was like a
monstrous peacock's tail, starred with myriads of golden eyes.  He
looked down, and saw the policeman going his rounds and flashing a
bull's-eye lantern on the doors of the silent houses.  The crimson
spot of a prowling hansom gleamed at the corner, and then vanished.
A woman in a ragged shawl was creeping round by the railings,
staggering as she went.  Now and then she stopped, and peered back.
Once, she began to sing in a hoarse voice.  The policeman strolled
over and said something to her.  She stumbled away, laughing.  A
bitter blast swept across the Square.  The gas-lamps flickered, and
became blue, and the leafless trees shook their black iron branches
as if in pain.  He shivered, and went back, closing the window behind
him.

He passed to the door, turned the key, and opened it.  He did not
even glance at the murdered man.  He felt that the secret of the
whole thing was not to realize the situation.  The friend who had
painted [85] the fatal portrait, the portrait to which all his misery
had been due, had gone out of his life.  That was enough.

Then he remembered the lamp.  It was a rather curious one of Moorish
workmanship, made of dull silver inlaid with arabesques of burnished
steel.  Perhaps it might be missed by his servant, and questions
would be asked.  He turned back, and took it from the table.  How
still the man was!  How horribly white the long hands looked!  He was
like a dreadful wax image.

He locked the door behind him, and crept quietly down-stairs.  The
wood-work creaked, and seemed to cry out as if in pain.  He stopped
several times, and waited.  No: everything was still.  It was merely
the sound of his own footsteps.

When he reached the library, he saw the bag and coat in the corner.
They must be hidden away somewhere.  He unlocked a secret press that
was in the wainscoting, and put them into it.  He could easily burn
them afterwards.  Then he pulled out his watch.  It was twenty
minutes to two.

He sat down, and began to think.  Every year--every month, almost--
men were strangled in England for what he had done.  There had been a
madness of murder in the air.  Some red star had come too close to
the earth.

Evidence?  What evidence was there against him?  Basil Hallward had
left the house at eleven.  No one had seen him come in again.  Most
of the servants were at Selby Royal.  His valet had gone to bed.

Paris!  Yes.  It was to Paris that Basil had gone, by the midnight
train, as he had intended.  With his curious reserved habits, it
would be months before any suspicions would be aroused.  Months?
Everything could be destroyed long before then.

A sudden thought struck him.  He put on his fur coat and hat, and
went out into the hall.  There he paused, hearing the slow heavy
tread of the policeman outside on the pavement, and seeing the flash
of the lantern reflected in the window.  He waited, holding his
breath.

After a few moments he opened the front door, and slipped out,
shutting it very gently behind him.  Then he began ringing the bell.
In about ten minutes his valet appeared, half dressed, and looking
very drowsy.

"I am sorry to have had to wake you up, Francis," he said, stepping
in; "but I had forgotten my latch-key.  What time is it?"

"Five minutes past two, sir," answered the man, looking at the clock
and yawning.

"Five minutes past two?  How horribly late!  You must wake me at nine
to-morrow.  I have some work to do."

"All right, sir."

"Did any one call this evening?"

"Mr. Hallward, sir.  He stayed here till eleven, and then he went
away to catch his train."

"Oh!  I am sorry I didn't see him.  Did he leave any message?"

"No, sir, except that he would write to you."

[86] "That will do, Francis.  Don't forget to call me at nine
tomorrow."

"No, sir."

The man shambled down the passage in his slippers.

Dorian Gray threw his hat and coat upon the yellow marble table, and
passed into the library.  He walked up and down the room for a
quarter of an hour, biting his lip, and thinking.  Then he took the
Blue Book down from one of the shelves, and began to turn over the
leaves.  "Alan Campbell, 152, Hertford Street, Mayfair."  Yes; that
was the man he wanted.



CHAPTER XII

[...86] At nine o'clock the next morning his servant came in with a
cup of chocolate on a tray, and opened the shutters.  Dorian was
sleeping quite peacefully, lying on his right side, with one hand
underneath his cheek.  He looked like a boy who had been tired out
with play, or study.

The man had to touch him twice on the shoulder before he woke, and as
he opened his eyes a faint smile passed across his lips, as though he
had been having some delightful dream.  Yet he had not dreamed at
all.  His night had been untroubled by any images of pleasure or of
pain.  But youth smiles without any reason.  It is one of its
chiefest charms.

He turned round, and, leaning on his elbow, began to drink his
chocolate.  The mellow November sun was streaming into the room.  The
sky was bright blue, and there was a genial warmth in the air.  It
was almost like a morning in May.

Gradually the events of the preceding night crept with silent blood-
stained feet into his brain, and reconstructed themselves there with
terrible distinctness.  He winced at the memory of all that he had
suffered, and for a moment the same curious feeling of loathing for
Basil Hallward, that had made him kill him as he sat in the chair,
came back to him, and he grew cold with passion.  The dead man was
still sitting there, too, and in the sunlight now.  How horrible that
was!  Such hideous things were for the darkness, not for the day.

He felt that if he brooded on what he had gone through he would
sicken or grow mad.  There were sins whose fascination was more in
the memory than in the doing of them, strange triumphs that gratified
the pride more than the passions, and gave to the intellect a
quickened sense of joy, greater than any joy they brought, or could
ever bring, to the senses.  But this was not one of them.  It was a
thing to be driven out of the mind, to be drugged with poppies, to be
strangled lest it might strangle one itself.

He passed his hand across his forehead, and then got up hastily, and
dressed himself with even more than his usual attention, giving a
good deal of care to the selection of his necktie and scarf-pin, and
changing his rings more than once.

He spent a long time over breakfast, tasting the various dishes,
talking to his valet about some new liveries that he was thinking of
[87] getting made for the servants at Selby, and going through his
correspondence.  Over some of the letters he smiled.  Three of them
bored him.  One he read several times over, and then tore up with a
slight look of annoyance in his face.  "That awful thing, a woman's
memory!" as Lord Henry had once said.

When he had drunk his coffee, he sat down at the table, and wrote two
letters.  One he put in his pocket, the other he handed to the valet.

"Take this round to 152, Hertford Street, Francis, and if Mr.
Campbell is out of town, get his address."

As soon as he was alone, he lit a cigarette, and began sketching upon
a piece of paper, drawing flowers, and bits of architecture, first,
and then faces.  Suddenly he remarked that every face that he drew
seemed to have an extraordinary likeness to Basil Hallward.  He
frowned, and, getting up, went over to the bookcase and took out a
volume at hazard.  He was determined that he would not think about
what had happened, till it became absolutely necessary to do so.

When he had stretched himself on the sofa, he looked at the title-
page of the book.  It was Gautier's "Emaux et Camees," Charpentier's
Japanese-paper edition, with the Jacquemart etching.  The binding was
of citron-green leather with a design of gilt trellis-work and dotted
pomegranates.  It had been given to him by Adrian Singleton.  As he
turned over the pages his eye fell on the poem about the hand of
Lacenaire, the cold yellow hand "du supplice encore mal lavee," with
its downy red hairs and its "doigts de faune."  He glanced at his own
white taper fingers, and passed on, till he came to those lovely
verses upon Venice:

     Sur une gamme chromatique,
        Le sein de perles ruisselant,
     La Venus de l'Adriatique
        Sort de l'eau son corps rose et blanc.

     Les domes, sur l'azur des ondes
        Suivant la phrase au pur contour,
     S'enflent comme des gorges rondes
        Que souleve un soupir d'amour.

     L'esquif aborde et me depose,
        Jetant son amarre au pilier,
     Devant une facade rose,
        Sur le marbre d'un escalier.

How exquisite they were!  As one read them, one seemed to be floating
down the green water-ways of the pink and pearl city, lying in a
black gondola with silver prow and trailing curtains.  The mere lines
looked to him like those straight lines of turquoise-blue that follow
one as one pushes out to the Lido.  The sudden flashes of color
reminded him of the gleam of the opal-and-iris-throated birds that
flutter round the tall honey-combed Campanile, or stalk, with such
stately grace, through the dim arcades.  Leaning back with half-
closed eyes, he kept saying over and over to himself,--

     Devant une facade rose,
     Sur le marbre d'un escalier.

[88] The whole of Venice was in those two lines.  He remembered the
autumn that he had passed there, and a wonderful love that had
stirred him to delightful fantastic follies.  There was romance in
every place.  But Venice, like Oxford, had kept the background for
romance, and background was everything, or almost everything.  Basil
had been with him part of the time, and had gone wild over Tintoret.
Poor Basil! what a horrible way for a man to die!

He sighed, and took up the book again, and tried to forget.  He read
of the swallows that fly in and out of the little cafe at Smyrna
where the Hadjis sit counting their amber beads and the turbaned
merchants smoke their long tasselled pipes and talk gravely to each
other; of the Obelisk in the Place de la Concorde that weeps tears of
granite in its lonely sunless exile, and longs to be back by the hot
lotus-covered Nile, where there are Sphinxes, and rose-red ibises,
and white vultures with gilded claws, and crocodiles, with small
beryl eyes, that crawl over the green steaming mud; and of that
curious statue that Gautier compares to a contralto voice, the
"monstre charmant" that couches in the porphyry-room of the Louvre.
But after a time the book fell from his hand.  He grew nervous, and a
horrible fit of terror came over him.  What if Alan Campbell should
be out of England?  Days would elapse before he could come back.
Perhaps he might refuse to come.  What could he do then?  Every
moment was of vital importance.

They had been great friends once, five years before,--almost
inseparable, indeed.  Then the intimacy had come suddenly to an end.
When they met in society now, it was only Dorian Gray who smiled:
Alan Campbell never did.

He was an extremely clever young man, though he had no real
appreciation of the visible arts, and whatever little sense of the
beauty of poetry he possessed he had gained entirely from Dorian.
His dominant intellectual passion was for science.  At Cambridge he
had spent a great deal of his time working in the Laboratory, and had
taken a good class in the Natural Science tripos of his year.
Indeed, he was still devoted to the study of chemistry, and had a
laboratory of his own, in which he used to shut himself up all day
long, greatly to the annoyance of his mother, who had set her heart
on his standing for Parliament and had a vague idea that a chemist
was a person who made up prescriptions.  He was an excellent
musician, however, as well, and played both the violin and the piano
better than most amateurs.  In fact, it was music that had first
brought him and Dorian Gray together,--music and that indefinable
attraction that Dorian seemed to be able to exercise whenever he
wished, and indeed exercised often without being conscious of it.
They had met at Lady Berkshire's the night that Rubinstein played
there, and after that used to be always seen together at the Opera,
and wherever good music was going on.  For eighteen months their
intimacy lasted.  Campbell was always either at Selby Royal or in
Grosvenor Square.  To him, as to many others, Dorian Gray was the
type of everything that is wonderful and fascinating in life.
Whether or not a quarrel had taken place between them no one ever
knew.  But suddenly people remarked that they scarcely spoke when
[89] they met, and that Campbell seemed always to go away early from
any party at which Dorian Gray was present.  He had changed, too,--
was strangely melancholy at times, appeared almost to dislike hearing
music of any passionate character, and would never himself play,
giving as his excuse, when he was called upon, that he was so
absorbed in science that he had no time left in which to practise.
And this was certainly true.  Every day he seemed to become more
interested in biology, and his name appeared once or twice in some of
the scientific reviews, in connection with certain curious
experiments.

This was the man that Dorian Gray was waiting for, pacing up and down
the room, glancing every moment at the clock, and becoming horribly
agitated as the minutes went by.  At last the door opened, and his
servant entered.

"Mr. Alan Campbell, sir."

A sigh of relief broke from his parched lips, and the color came back
to his cheeks.

"Ask him to come in at once, Francis."

The man bowed, and retired.  In a few moments Alan Campbell walked
in, looking very stern and rather pale, his pallor being intensified
by his coal-black hair and dark eyebrows.

"Alan! this is kind of you.  I thank you for coming."

"I had intended never to enter your house again, Gray.  But you said
it was a matter of life and death."  His voice was hard and cold.  He
spoke with slow deliberation.  There was a look of contempt in the
steady searching gaze that he turned on Dorian.  He kept his hands in
the pockets of his Astrakhan coat, and appeared not to have noticed
the gesture with which he had been greeted.

"It is a matter of life and death, Alan, and to more than one person.
Sit down."

Campbell took a chair by the table, and Dorian sat opposite to him.
The two men's eyes met.  In Dorian's there was infinite pity.  He
knew that what he was going to do was dreadful.

After a strained moment of silence, he leaned across and said, very
quietly, but watching the effect of each word upon the face of the
man he had sent for, "Alan, in a locked room at the top of this
house, a room to which nobody but myself has access, a dead man is
seated at a table.  He has been dead ten hours now.  Don't stir, and
don't look at me like that.  Who the man is, why he died, how he
died, are matters that do not concern you.  What you have to do is
this--"

"Stop, Gray.  I don't want to know anything further.  Whether what
you have told me is true or not true, doesn't concern me.  I entirely
decline to be mixed up in your life.  Keep your horrible secrets to
yourself.  They don't interest me any more."

"Alan, they will have to interest you.  This one will have to
interest you.  I am awfully sorry for you, Alan.  But I can't help
myself.  You are the one man who is able to save me.  I am forced to
bring you into the matter.  I have no option.  Alan, you are a
scientist.  You know about chemistry, and things of that kind.  You
have made experiments.  What you have got to do is to destroy the
[90] thing that is up-stairs,--to destroy it so that not a vestige
will be left of it.  Nobody saw this person come into the house.
Indeed, at the present moment he is supposed to be in Paris.  He will
not be missed for months.  When he is missed, there must be no trace
of him found here.  You, Alan, you must change him, and everything
that belongs to him, into a handful of ashes that I may scatter in
the air."

"You are mad, Dorian."

"Ah!  I was waiting for you to call me Dorian."

"You are mad, I tell you,--mad to imagine that I would raise a finger
to help you, mad to make this monstrous confession.  I will have
nothing to do with this matter, whatever it is.  Do you think I am
going to peril my reputation for you?  What is it to me what devil's
work you are up to?"

"It was a suicide, Alan."

"I am glad of that.  But who drove him to it?  You, I should fancy."

"Do you still refuse to do this, for me?"

"Of course I refuse.  I will have absolutely nothing to do with it.
I don't care what shame comes on you.  You deserve it all.  I should
not be sorry to see you disgraced, publicly disgraced.  How dare you
ask me, of all men in the world, to mix myself up in this horror?  I
should have thought you knew more about people's characters.  Your
friend Lord Henry Wotton can't have taught you much about psychology,
whatever else he has taught you.  Nothing will induce me to stir a
step to help you.  You have come to the wrong man.  Go to some of
your friends.  Don't come to me."

"Alan, it was murder.  I killed him.  You don't know what he had made
me suffer.  Whatever my life is, he had more to do with the making or
the marring of it than poor Harry has had.  He may not have intended
it, the result was the same."

"Murder!  Good God, Dorian, is that what you have come to?  I shall
not inform upon you.  It is not my business.  Besides, you are
certain to be arrested, without my stirring in the matter.  Nobody
ever commits a murder without doing something stupid.  But I will
have nothing to do with it."

"All I ask of you is to perform a certain scientific experiment.  You
go to hospitals and dead-houses, and the horrors that you do there
don't affect you.  If in some hideous dissecting-room or fetid
laboratory you found this man lying on a leaden table with red
gutters scooped out in it, you would simply look upon him as an
admirable subject.  You would not turn a hair.  You would not believe
that you were doing anything wrong.  On the contrary, you would
probably feel that you were benefiting the human race, or increasing
the sum of knowledge in the world, or gratifying intellectual
curiosity, or something of that kind.  What I want you to do is
simply what you have often done before.  Indeed, to destroy a body
must be less horrible than what you are accustomed to work at.  And,
remember, it is the only piece of evidence against me.  If it is
discovered, I am lost; and it is sure to be discovered unless you
help me."

[91] "I have no desire to help you.  You forget that.  I am simply
indifferent to the whole thing.  It has nothing to do with me."

"Alan, I entreat you.  Think of the position I am in.  Just before
you came I almost fainted with terror.  No! don't think of that.
Look at the matter purely from the scientific point of view.  You
don't inquire where the dead things on which you experiment come
from.  Don't inquire now.  I have told you too much as it is.  But I
beg of you to do this.  We were friends once, Alan."

"Don't speak about those days, Dorian: they are dead."

"The dead linger sometimes.  The man up-stairs will not go away.  He
is sitting at the table with bowed head and outstretched arms.  Alan!
Alan! if you don't come to my assistance I am ruined.  Why, they will
hang me, Alan!  Don't you understand?  They will hang me for what I
have done."

"There is no good in prolonging this scene.  I refuse absolutely to
do anything in the matter.  It is insane of you to ask me."

"You refuse absolutely?"

"Yes."

The same look of pity came into Dorian's eyes, then he stretched out
his hand, took a piece of paper, and wrote something on it.  He read
it over twice, folded it carefully, and pushed it across the table.
Having done this, he got up, and went over to the window.

Campbell looked at him in surprise, and then took up the paper, and
opened it.  As he read it, his face became ghastly pale, and he fell
back in his chair.  A horrible sense of sickness came over him.  He
felt as if his heart was beating itself to death in some empty
hollow.

After two or three minutes of terrible silence, Dorian turned round,
and came and stood behind him, putting his hand upon his shoulder.

"I am so sorry, Alan," he murmured, "but you leave me no alternative.
I have a letter written already.  Here it is.  You see the address.
If you don't help me, I must send it.  You know what the result will
be.  But you are going to help me.  It is impossible for you to
refuse now.  I tried to spare you.  You will do me the justice to
admit that.  You were stern, harsh, offensive.  You treated me as no
man has ever dared to treat me,--no living man, at any rate.  I bore
it all.  Now it is for me to dictate terms."

Campbell buried his face in his hands, and a shudder passed through
him.

"Yes, it is my turn to dictate terms, Alan.  You know what they are.
The thing is quite simple.  Come, don't work yourself into this
fever.  The thing has to be done.  Face it, and do it."

A groan broke from Campbell's lips, and he shivered all over.  The
ticking of the clock on the mantel-piece seemed to him to be dividing
time into separate atoms of agony, each of which was too terrible to
be borne.  He felt as if an iron ring was being slowly tightened
round his forehead, and as if the disgrace with which he was
threatened had already come upon him.  The hand upon his shoulder
weighed like a hand of lead.  It was intolerable.  It seemed to crush
him.

"Come, Alan, you must decide at once."

[92] He hesitated a moment.  "Is there a fire in the room up-stairs?"
he murmured.

"Yes, there is a gas-fire with asbestos."

"I will have to go home and get some things from the laboratory."

"No, Alan, you need not leave the house.  Write on a sheet of note-
paper what you want, and my servant will take a cab and bring the
things back to you."

Campbell wrote a few lines, blotted them, and addressed an envelope
to his assistant.  Dorian took the note up and read it carefully.
Then he rang the bell, and gave it to his valet, with orders to
return as soon as possible, and to bring the things with him.

When the hall door shut, Campbell started, and, having got up from
the chair, went over to the chimney-piece.  He was shivering with a
sort of ague.  For nearly twenty minutes, neither of the men spoke.
A fly buzzed noisily about the room, and the ticking of the clock was
like the beat of a hammer.

As the chime struck one, Campbell turned around, and, looking at
Dorian Gray, saw that his eyes were filled with tears.  There was
something in the purity and refinement of that sad face that seemed
to enrage him.  "You are infamous, absolutely infamous!" he muttered.

"Hush, Alan: you have saved my life," said Dorian.

"Your life?  Good heavens! what a life that is!  You have gone from
corruption to corruption, and now you have culminated in crime.  In
doing what I am going to do, what you force me to do, it is not of
your life that I am thinking."

"Ah, Alan," murmured Dorian, with a sigh, "I wish you had a
thousandth part of the pity for me that I have for you."  He turned
away, as he spoke, and stood looking out at the garden.  Campbell
made no answer.

After about ten minutes a knock came to the door, and the servant
entered, carrying a mahogany chest of chemicals, with a small
electric battery set on top of it.  He placed it on the table, and
went out again, returning with a long coil of steel and platinum wire
and two rather curiously-shaped iron clamps.

"Shall I leave the things here, sir?" he asked Campbell.

"Yes," said Dorian.  "And I am afraid, Francis, that I have another
errand for you.  What is the name of the man at Richmond who supplies
Selby with orchids?"

"Harden, sir."

"Yes,--Harden.  You must go down to Richmond at once, see Harden
personally, and tell him to send twice as many orchids as I ordered,
and to have as few white ones as possible.  In fact, I don't want any
white ones.  It is a lovely day, Francis, and Richmond is a very
pretty place, otherwise I wouldn't bother you about it."

"No trouble, sir.  At what time shall I be back?"

Dorian looked at Campbell.  "How long will your experiment take,
Alan?" he said, in a calm, indifferent voice.  The presence of a
third person in the room seemed to give him extraordinary courage.

Campbell frowned, and bit his lip.  "It will take about five hours,"
he answered.

[93] "It will be time enough, then, if you are back at half-past
seven, Francis.  Or stay: just leave my things out for dressing.  You
can have the evening to yourself.  I am not dining at home, so I
shall not want you."

"Thank you, sir," said the man, leaving the room.

"Now, Alan, there is not a moment to be lost.  How heavy this chest
is!  I'll take it for you.  You bring the other things."  He spoke
rapidly, and in an authoritative manner.  Campbell felt dominated by
him.  They left the room together.

When they reached the top landing, Dorian took out the key and turned
it in the lock.  Then he stopped, and a troubled look came into his
eyes.  He shuddered.  "I don't think I can go in, Alan," he murmured.

"It is nothing to me.  I don't require you," said Campbell, coldly.

Dorian half opened the door.  As he did so, he saw the face of the
portrait grinning in the sunlight.  On the floor in front of it the
torn curtain was lying.  He remembered that the night before, for the
first time in his life, he had forgotten to hide it, when he crept
out of the room.

But what was that loathsome red dew that gleamed, wet and glistening,
on one of the hands, as though the canvas had sweated blood?  How
horrible it was!--more horrible, it seemed to him for the moment,
than the silent thing that he knew was stretched across the table,
the thing whose grotesque misshapen shadow on the spotted carpet
showed him that it had not stirred, but was still there, as he had
left it.

He opened the door a little wider, and walked quickly in, with half-
closed eyes and averted head, determined that he would not look even
once upon the dead man.  Then, stooping down, and taking up the gold-
and-purple hanging, he flung it over the picture.

He stopped, feeling afraid to turn round, and his eyes fixed
themselves on the intricacies of the pattern before him.  He heard
Campbell bringing in the heavy chest, and the irons, and the other
things that he had required for his dreadful work.  He began to
wonder if he and Basil Hallward had ever met, and, if so, what they
had thought of each other.

"Leave me now," said Campbell.

He turned and hurried out, just conscious that the dead man had been
thrust back into the chair and was sitting up in it, with Campbell
gazing into the glistening yellow face.  As he was going downstairs
he heard the key being turned in the lock.

It was long after seven o'clock when Campbell came back into the
library.  He was pale, but absolutely calm.  "I have done what you
asked me to do," he muttered.  "And now, good-by.  Let us never see
each other again."

"You have saved me from ruin, Alan.  I cannot forget that," said
Dorian, simply.

As soon as Campbell had left, he went up-stairs.  There was a
horrible smell of chemicals in the room.  But the thing that had been
sitting at the table was gone.



CHAPTER XIII

[94] "There is no good telling me you are going to be good, Dorian,"
cried Lord Henry, dipping his white fingers into a red copper bowl
filled with rose-water.  "You are quite perfect.  Pray don't change."

Dorian shook his head.  "No, Harry, I have done too many dreadful
things in my life.  I am not going to do any more.  I began my good
actions yesterday."

"Where were you yesterday?"

"In the country, Harry.  I was staying at a little inn by myself."

"My dear boy," said Lord Henry smiling, "anybody can be good in the
country.  There are no temptations there.  That is the reason why
people who live out of town are so uncivilized.  There are only two
ways, as you know, of becoming civilized.  One is by being cultured,
the other is by being corrupt.  Country-people have no opportunity of
being either, so they stagnate."

"Culture and corruption," murmured Dorian.  "I have known something
of both.  It seems to me curious now that they should ever be found
together.  For I have a new ideal, Harry.  I am going to alter.  I
think I have altered."

"You have not told me yet what your good action was.  Or did you say
you had done more than one?"

"I can tell you, Harry.  It is not a story I could tell to any one
else.  I spared somebody.  It sounds vain, but you understand what I
mean.  She was quite beautiful, and wonderfully like Sibyl Vane.  I
think it was that which first attracted me to her.  You remember
Sibyl, don't you?  How long ago that seems!  Well, Hetty was not one
of our own class, of course.  She was simply a girl in a village.
But I really loved her.  I am quite sure that I loved her.  All
during this wonderful May that we have been having, I used to run
down and see her two or three times a week.  Yesterday she met me in
a little orchard.  The apple-blossoms kept tumbling down on her hair,
and she was laughing.  We were to have gone away together this
morning at dawn.  Suddenly I determined to leave her as flower-like
as I had found her."

"I should think the novelty of the emotion must have given you a
thrill of real pleasure, Dorian," interrupted Lord Henry.  "But I can
finish your idyl for you.  You gave her good advice, and broke her
heart.  That was the beginning of your reformation."

"Harry, you are horrible!  You mustn't say these dreadful things.
Hetty's heart is not broken.  Of course she cried, and all that.  But
there is no disgrace upon her.  She can live, like Perdita, in her
garden."

"And weep over a faithless Florizel," said Lord Henry, laughing.  "My
dear Dorian, you have the most curious boyish moods.  Do you think
this girl will ever be really contented now with any one of her own
rank?  I suppose she will be married some day to a rough carter or a
grinning ploughman.  Well, having met you, and loved you, will teach
her to despise her husband, and she will be wretched.  From a moral
point of view I really don't think much of your great renunciation.
[95] Even as a beginning, it is poor.  Besides, how do you know that
Hetty isn't floating at the present moment in some mill-pond, with
water-lilies round her, like Ophelia?"

"I can't bear this, Harry!  You mock at everything, and then suggest
the most serious tragedies.  I am sorry I told you now.  I don't care
what you say to me, I know I was right in acting as I did.  Poor
Hetty!  As I rode past the farm this morning, I saw her white face at
the window, like a spray of jasmine.  Don't let me talk about it any
more, and don't try to persuade me that the first good action I have
done for years, the first little bit of self-sacrifice I have ever
known, is really a sort of sin.  I want to be better.  I am going to
be better.  Tell me something about yourself.  What is going on in
town?  I have not been to the club for days."

"The people are still discussing poor Basil's disappearance."

"I should have thought they had got tired of that by this time," said
Dorian, pouring himself out some wine, and frowning slightly.

"My dear boy, they have only been talking about it for six weeks, and
the public are really not equal to the mental strain of having more
than one topic every three months.  They have been very fortunate
lately, however.  They have had my own divorce-case, and Alan
Campbell's suicide.  Now they have got the mysterious disappearance
of an artist.  Scotland Yard still insists that the man in the gray
ulster who left Victoria by the midnight train on the 7th of November
was poor Basil, and the French police declare that Basil never
arrived in Paris at all.  I suppose in about a fortnight we will be
told that he has been seen in San Francisco.  It is an odd thing, but
every one who disappears is said to be seen at San Francisco.  It
must be a delightful city, and possess all the attractions of the
next world."

"What do you think has happened to Basil?" asked Dorian, holding up
his Burgundy against the light, and wondering how it was that he
could discuss the matter so calmly.

"I have not the slightest idea.  If Basil chooses to hide himself, it
is no business of mine.  If he is dead, I don't want to think about
him.  Death is the only thing that ever terrifies me.  I hate it.
One can survive everything nowadays except that.  Death and vulgarity
are the only two facts in the nineteenth century that one cannot
explain away.  Let us have our coffee in the music-room, Dorian.  You
must play Chopin to me.  The man with whom my wife ran away played
Chopin exquisitely.  Poor Victoria!  I was very fond of her.  The
house is rather lonely without her."

Dorian said nothing, but rose from the table, and, passing into the
next room, sat down to the piano and let his fingers stray across the
keys.  After the coffee had been brought in, he stopped, and, looking
over at Lord Henry, said, "Harry, did it ever occur to you that Basil
was murdered?"

Lord Henry yawned.  "Basil had no enemies, and always wore a
Waterbury watch.  Why should he be murdered?  He was not clever
enough to have enemies.  Of course he had a wonderful genius for
painting.  But a man can paint like Velasquez and yet be as dull as
possible.  Basil was really rather dull.  He only interested me once,
[96] and that was when he told me, years ago, that he had a wild
adoration for you."

"I was very fond of Basil," said Dorian, with a sad look in his eyes.
"But don't people say that he was murdered?"

"Oh, some of the papers do.  It does not seem to be probable.  I know
there are dreadful places in Paris, but Basil was not the sort of man
to have gone to them.  He had no curiosity.  It was his chief defect.
Play me a nocturne, Dorian, and, as you play, tell me, in a low
voice, how you have kept your youth.  You must have some secret.  I
am only ten years older than you are, and I am wrinkled, and bald,
and yellow.  You are really wonderful, Dorian.  You have never looked
more charming than you do to-night.  You remind me of the day I saw
you first.  You were rather cheeky, very shy, and absolutely
extraordinary.  You have changed, of course, but not in appearance.
I wish you would tell me your secret.  To get back my youth I would
do anything in the world, except take exercise, get up early, or be
respectable.  Youth!  There is nothing like it.  It's absurd to talk
of the ignorance of youth.  The only people whose opinions I listen
to now with any respect are people much younger than myself.  They
seem in front of me.  Life has revealed to them her last wonder.  As
for the aged, I always contradict the aged.  I do it on principle.
If you ask them their opinion on something that happened yesterday,
they solemnly give you the opinions current in 1820, when people wore
high stocks and knew absolutely nothing.  How lovely that thing you
are playing is!  I wonder did Chopin write it at Majorca, with the
sea weeping round the villa, and the salt spray dashing against the
panes?  It is marvelously romantic.  What a blessing it is that there
is one art left to us that is not imitative!  Don't stop.  I want
music to-night.  It seems to me that you are the young Apollo, and
that I am Marsyas listening to you.  I have sorrows, Dorian, of my
own, that even you know nothing of.  The tragedy of old age is not
that one is old, but that one is young.  I am amazed sometimes at my
own sincerity.  Ah, Dorian, how happy you are!  What an exquisite
life you have had!  You have drunk deeply of everything.  You have
crushed the grapes against your palate.  Nothing has been hidden from
you.  But it has all been to you no more than the sound of music.  It
has not marred you.  You are still the same.

"I wonder what the rest of your life will be.  Don't spoil it by
renunciations.  At present you are a perfect type.  Don't make
yourself incomplete.  You are quite flawless now.  You need not shake
your head: you know you are.  Besides, Dorian, don't deceive
yourself.  Life is not governed by will or intention.  Life is a
question of nerves, and fibres, and slowly-built-up cells in which
thought hides itself and passion has its dreams.  You may fancy
yourself safe, and think yourself strong.  But a chance tone of color
in a room or a morning sky, a particular perfume that you had once
loved and that brings strange memories with it, a line from a
forgotten poem that you had come across again, a cadence from a piece
of music that you had ceased to play,--I tell you, Dorian, that it is
on things like these that our lives depend.  Browning writes about
that somewhere; but our [97] own senses will imagine them for us.
There are moments when the odor of heliotrope passes suddenly across
me, and I have to live the strangest year of my life over again.

"I wish I could change places with you, Dorian.  The world has cried
out against us both, but it has always worshipped you.  It always
will worship you.  You are the type of what the age is searching for,
and what it is afraid it has found.  I am so glad that you have never
done anything, never carved a statue, or painted a picture, or
produced anything outside of yourself!  Life has been your art.  You
have set yourself to music.  Your days have been your sonnets."

Dorian rose up from the piano, and passed his hand through his hair.
"Yes, life has been exquisite," he murmured, "but I am not going to
have the same life, Harry.  And you must not say these extravagant
things to me.  You don't know everything about me.  I think that if
you did, even you would turn from me.  You laugh.  Don't laugh."

"Why have you stopped playing, Dorian?  Go back and play the nocturne
over again.  Look at that great honey-colored moon that hangs in the
dusky air.  She is waiting for you to charm her, and if you play she
will come closer to the earth.  You won't?  Let us go to the club,
then.  It has been a charming evening, and we must end it charmingly.
There is some one at the club who wants immensely to know you,--young
Lord Poole, Bournmouth's eldest son.  He has already copied your
neckties, and has begged me to introduce him to you.  He is quite
delightful, and rather reminds me of you."

"I hope not," said Dorian, with a touch of pathos in his voice.  "But
I am tired to-night, Harry.  I won't go to the club.  It is nearly
eleven, and I want to go to bed early."

"Do stay.  You have never played so well as to-night.  There was
something in your touch that was wonderful.  It had more expression
than I had ever heard from it before."

"It is because I am going to be good," he answered, smiling.  "I am a
little changed already."

"Don't change, Dorian; at any rate, don't change to me.  We must
always be friends."

"Yet you poisoned me with a book once.  I should not forgive that.
Harry, promise me that you will never lend that book to any one.  It
does harm."

"My dear boy, you are really beginning to moralize.  You will soon be
going about warning people against all the sins of which you have
grown tired.  You are much too delightful to do that.  Besides, it is
no use.  You and I are what we are, and will be what we will be.
Come round tomorrow.  I am going to ride at eleven, and we might go
together.  The Park is quite lovely now.  I don't think there have
been such lilacs since the year I met you."

"Very well.  I will be here at eleven," said Dorian.  "Good-night,
Harry."  As he reached the door he hesitated for a moment, as if he
had something more to say.  Then he sighed and went out.

It was a lovely night, so warm that he threw his coat over his arm,
and did not even put his silk scarf round his throat.  As he strolled
[98] home, smoking his cigarette, two young men in evening dress
passed him.  He heard one of them whisper to the other, "That is
Dorian Gray."  He remembered how pleased he used to be when he was
pointed out, or stared at, or talked about.  He was tired of hearing
his own name now.  Half the charm of the little village where he had
been so often lately was that no one knew who he was.  He had told
the girl whom he had made love him that he was poor, and she had
believed him.  He had told her once that he was wicked, and she had
laughed at him, and told him that wicked people were always very old
and very ugly.  What a laugh she had!--just like a thrush singing.
And how pretty she had been in her cotton dresses and her large hats!
She knew nothing, but she had everything that he had lost.

When he reached home, he found his servant waiting up for him.  He
sent him to bed, and threw himself down on the sofa in the library,
and began to think over some of the things that Lord Henry had said
to him.

Was it really true that one could never change?  He felt a wild
longing for the unstained purity of his boyhood,--his rose-white
boyhood, as Lord Henry had once called it.  He knew that he had
tarnished himself, filled his mind with corruption, and given horror
to his fancy; that he had been an evil influence to others, and had
experienced a terrible joy in being so; and that of the lives that
had crossed his own it had been the fairest and the most full of
promise that he had brought to shame.  But was it all irretrievable?
Was there no hope for him?

It was better not to think of the past.  Nothing could alter that.
It was of himself, and of his own future, that he had to think.  Alan
Campbell had shot himself one night in his laboratory, but had not
revealed the secret that he had been forced to know.  The excitement,
such as it was, over Basil Hallward's disappearance would soon pass
away.  It was already waning.  He was perfectly safe there.  Nor,
indeed, was it the death of Basil Hallward that weighed most upon his
mind.  It was the living death of his own soul that troubled him.
Basil had painted the portrait that had marred his life.  He could
not forgive him that.  It was the portrait that had done everything.
Basil had said things to him that were unbearable, and that he had
yet borne with patience.  The murder had been simply the madness of a
moment.  As for Alan Campbell, his suicide had been his own act.  He
had chosen to do it.  It was nothing to him.

A new life!  That was what he wanted.  That was what he was waiting
for.  Surely he had begun it already.  He had spared one innocent
thing, at any rate.  He would never again tempt innocence.  He would
be good.

As he thought of Hetty Merton, he began to wonder if the portrait in
the locked room had changed.  Surely it was not still so horrible as
it had been?  Perhaps if his life became pure, he would be able to
expel every sign of evil passion from the face.  Perhaps the signs of
evil had already gone away.  He would go and look.

He took the lamp from the table and crept up-stairs.  As he unlocked
the door, a smile of joy flitted across his young face and [99]
lingered for a moment about his lips.  Yes, he would be good, and the
hideous thing that he had hidden away would no longer be a terror to
him.  He felt as if the load had been lifted from him already.

He went in quietly, locking the door behind him, as was his custom,
and dragged the purple hanging from the portrait.  A cry of pain and
indignation broke from him.  He could see no change, unless that in
the eyes there was a look of cunning, and in the mouth the curved
wrinkle of the hypocrite.  The thing was still loathsome,--more
loathsome, if possible, than before,--and the scarlet dew that
spotted the hand seemed brighter, and more like blood newly spilt.

Had it been merely vanity that had made him do his one good deed?  Or
the desire of a new sensation, as Lord Henry had hinted, with his
mocking laugh?  Or that passion to act a part that sometimes makes us
do things finer than we are ourselves?  Or, perhaps, all these?

Why was the red stain larger than it had been?  It seemed to have
crept like a horrible disease over the wrinkled fingers.  There was
blood on the painted feet, as though the thing had dripped,--blood
even on the hand that had not held the knife.

Confess?  Did it mean that he was to confess?  To give himself up,
and be put to death?  He laughed.  He felt that the idea was
monstrous.  Besides, who would believe him, even if he did confess?
There was no trace of the murdered man anywhere.  Everything
belonging to him had been destroyed.  He himself had burned what had
been below-stairs.  The world would simply say he was mad.  They
would shut him up if he persisted in his story.

Yet it was his duty to confess, to suffer public shame, and to make
public atonement.  There was a God who called upon men to tell their
sins to earth as well as to heaven.  Nothing that he could do would
cleanse him till he had told his own sin.  His sin?  He shrugged his
shoulders.  The death of Basil Hallward seemed very little to him.
He was thinking of Hetty Merton.

It was an unjust mirror, this mirror of his soul that he was looking
at.  Vanity?  Curiosity?  Hypocrisy?  Had there been nothing more in
his renunciation than that?  There had been something more.  At least
he thought so.  But who could tell?

And this murder,--was it to dog him all his life?  Was he never to
get rid of the past?  Was he really to confess?  No.  There was only
one bit of evidence left against him.  The picture itself,--that was
evidence.

He would destroy it.  Why had he kept it so long?  It had given him
pleasure once to watch it changing and growing old.  Of late he had
felt no such pleasure.  It had kept him awake at night.  When he had
been away, he had been filled with terror lest other eyes should look
upon it.  It had brought melancholy across his passions.  Its mere
memory had marred many moments of joy.  It had been like conscience
to him.  Yes, it had been conscience.  He would destroy it.

He looked round, and saw the knife that had stabbed Basil Hallward.
He had cleaned it many times, till there was no stain left upon it.
It was bright, and glistened.  As it had killed the painter, so it
[100] would kill the painter's work, and all that that meant.  It
would kill the past, and when that was dead he would be free.  He
seized it, and stabbed the canvas with it, ripping the thing right up
from top to bottom.

There was a cry heard, and a crash.  The cry was so horrible in its
agony that the frightened servants woke, and crept out of their
rooms.  Two gentlemen, who were passing in the Square below, stopped,
and looked up at the great house.  They walked on till they met a
policeman, and brought him back.  The man rang the bell several
times, but there was no answer.  The house was all dark, except for a
light in one of the top windows.  After a time, he went away, and
stood in the portico of the next house and watched.

"Whose house is that, constable?" asked the elder of the two
gentlemen.

"Mr. Dorian Gray's, sir," answered the policeman.

They looked at each other, as they walked away, and sneered.  One of
them was Sir Henry Ashton's uncle.

Inside, in the servants' part of the house, the half-clad domestics
were talking in low whispers to each other.  Old Mrs. Leaf was
crying, and wringing her hands.  Francis was as pale as death.

After about a quarter of an hour, he got the coachman and one of the
footmen and crept up-stairs.  They knocked, but there was no reply.
They called out.  Everything was still.  Finally, after vainly trying
to force the door, they got on the roof, and dropped down on to the
balcony.  The windows yielded easily: the bolts were old.

When they entered, they found hanging upon the wall a splendid
portrait of their master as they had last seen him, in all the wonder
of his exquisite youth and beauty.  Lying on the floor was a dead
man, in evening dress, with a knife in his heart.  He was withered,
wrinkled, and loathsome of visage.  It was not till they had examined
the rings that they recognized who it was.














Produced by Alfred J. Drake, Ph.D.





ESSAYS FROM 'THE GUARDIAN'

By WALTER HORATIO PATER

E-text Editor: Alfred J. Drake, Ph.D.
Electronic Version 1.0 / Date 10-12-01


DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES

[1] I DISCLAIM ALL LIABILITY TO YOU FOR DAMAGES, COSTS AND EXPENSES,
INCLUDING LEGAL FEES, AND

[2] YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE OR UNDER STRICT LIABILITY, OR
FOR BREACH OF WARRANTY OR CONTRACT, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES, EVEN IF YOU
GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.

THE E-TEXTS ON THIS SITE ARE PROVIDED TO YOU "AS-IS".  NO WARRANTIES
OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, ARE MADE TO YOU AS TO THE E-TEXTS OR
ANY MEDIUM THEY MAY BE ON, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF
MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.

Some states do not allow disclaimers of implied warranties or the
exclusion or limitation of consequential damages, so the above
disclaimers and exclusions may not apply to you, and you may have
other legal rights.


ESSAYS FROM 'THE GUARDIAN'


NOTES BY THE E-TEXT EDITOR:

Reliability: Although I have done my best to ensure that the text you
read is error-free in comparison with an exact reprint of the
standard edition--Macmillan's 1910 Library Edition--please exercise
scholarly caution in using it.  It is not intended as a substitute
for the printed original but rather as a searchable supplement.  My
e-texts may prove convenient substitutes for hard-to-get works in a
course where both instructor and students accept the possibility of
some imperfections in the text, but if you are writing a scholarly
article, dissertation, or book, you should use the standard hard-copy
editions of any works you cite.


Pagination and Paragraphing: To avoid an unwieldy electronic copy, I
have transferred original pagination to brackets.  A bracketed
numeral such as [22] indicates that the material immediately
following the number marks the beginning of the relevant page.  I
have preserved paragraph structure except for first-line indentation.

Hyphenation: I have not preserved original hyphenation since an e-
text does not require line-end or page-end hyphenation.

Greek typeface: For this full-text edition, I have transliterated
Pater's Greek quotations.  If there is a need for the original Greek,
it can be viewed at my site, http://www.ajdrake.com/etexts, a
Victorianist archive that contains the complete works of Walter Pater
and many other nineteenth-century texts, mostly in first editions.





CONTENTS




1. English Literature: 1-16

2. Amiel's "Journal Intime": 17-37

3. Browning: 39-51

4. "Robert Elsmere": 53-70

5. Their Majesties' Servants: 71-88

6. Wordsworth: 89-104

7. Mr. Gosse's Poems: 105-118

8. Ferdinand Fabre: 119-134

9. The "Contes" of M. Augustin Filon: 135-149





ESSAYS FROM 'THE GUARDIAN'

WALTER HORATIO PATER


E-text Editor: Alfred J. Drake, Ph.D.
Electronic Version 1.0 / Date 10-12-01




PATER'S NOTE: The nine papers contained in the following volume
originally appeared anonymously in The Guardian newspaper.




E-TEXT EDITOR'S NOTE: I have not preserved the title pages of this
volume, but have instead moved dates to each essay's end and included
any necessary title-page material in the heading area of the first
substantive page.





I.  ENGLISH LITERATURE




FOUR BOOKS FOR STUDENTS OF ENGLISH LITERATURE


[3] THE making of an anthology of English prose is what must have
occurred to many of its students, by way of pleasure to themselves,
or of profit to other persons.  Such an anthology, the compass and
variety of our prose literature being considered, might well follow
exclusively some special line of interest in it; exhibiting, for
instance, what is so obviously striking, its imaginative power, or
its (legitimately) poetic beauty, or again, its philosophical
capacity.  Mr. Saintsbury's well-considered Specimens of English
Prose Style, from Malory to Macaulay (Kegan Paul), a volume, as we
think, which bears fresh witness to the truth of the old remark that
it takes a scholar indeed to make a [4] good literary selection, has
its motive sufficiently indicated in the very original "introductory
essay," which might well stand, along with the best of these extracts
from a hundred or more deceased masters of English, as itself a
document or standard, in the matter of prose style.  The essential
difference between poetry and prose--"that other beauty of prose"--in
the words of the motto he has chosen from Dryden, the first master of
the sort of prose he prefers:--that is Mr. Saintsbury's burden.  It
is a consideration, undoubtedly, of great importance both for the
writer and the critic; in England especially, where, although (as Mr.
Saintsbury rightly points out, in correction of an imperfectly
informed French critic of our literature) the radical distinction
between poetry and prose has ever been recognized by its students,
yet the imaginative impulse, which is perhaps the richest of our
purely intellectual gifts, has been apt to invade the province of
that tact and good judgment, alike as to matter and manner, in which
we are not richer than other people.  Great poetry and great prose,
it might be found, have most of their qualities in common.  But [5]
their indispensable qualities are different, or even opposed; and it
is just the indispensable qualities of prose and poetry respectively,
which it is so necessary for those who have to do with either to bear
ever in mind.  Order, precision, directness, are the radical merits
of prose thought; and it is more than merely legitimate that they
should form the criterion of prose style, because within the scope of
those qualities, according to Mr. Saintsbury, there is more than just
the quiet, unpretending usefulness of the bare sermo pedestris.
Acting on language, those qualities generate a specific and unique
beauty--"that other beauty of prose"--fitly illustrated by these
specimens, which the reader needs hardly be told, after what has been
now said, are far from being a collection of "purple patches."

Whether or not he admits their practical cogency, an attentive reader
will not fail to be interested in the attempt Mr. Saintsbury has made
to give technical rules of metre for the production of the true prose
rhythm.  Any one who cares to do so might test the validity of those
rules in the nearest possible way, by applying them to the varied
examples in this wide [6] survey of what has been actually well done
in English prose, here exhibited on the side of their strictly
prosaic merit--their conformity, before all other aims, to laws of a
structure primarily reasonable.  Not that that reasonable prose
structure, or architecture, as Mr. Saintsbury conceives it, has been
always, or even generally, the ideal, even of those chosen writers
here in evidence.  Elizabethan prose, all too chaotic in the beauty
and force which overflowed into it from Elizabethan poetry, and
incorrect with an incorrectness which leaves it scarcely legitimate
prose at all: then, in reaction against that, the correctness of
Dryden, and his followers through the eighteenth century, determining
the standard of a prose in the proper sense, not inferior to the
prose of the Augustan age in Latin, or of the "great age in France":
and, again in reaction against this, the wild mixture of poetry and
prose, in our wild nineteenth century, under the influence of such
writers as Dickens and Carlyle: such are the three periods into which
the story of our prose literature divides itself.  And Mr. Saintsbury
has his well-timed, practical suggestions, upon a survey of them.

[7] If the invasion of the legitimate sphere of prose in England by
the spirit of poetry, weaker or stronger, has been something far
deeper than is indicated by that tendency to write unconscious blank
verse, which has made it feasible to transcribe about one-half of
Dickens's otherwise so admirable Barnaby Rudge in blank-verse lines,
a tendency (outdoing our old friend M. Jourdain) commoner than Mr.
Saintsbury admits, such lines being frequent in his favourite Dryden;
yet, on the other hand, it might be maintained, and would be
maintained by its French critics, that our English poetry has been
too apt to dispense with those prose qualities, which, though not the
indispensable qualities of poetry, go, nevertheless, to the making of
all first-rate poetry--the  qualities, namely, of orderly structure,
and such qualities generally as depend upon second thoughts.  A
collection of specimens of English poetry, for the purpose of
exhibiting the achievement of prose excellences by it (in their
legitimate measure) is a desideratum we commend to Mr. Saintsbury.
It is the assertion, the development, the product of those very
different indispensable qualities of poetry, in the presence [8] of
which the English is equal or superior to all other modern
literature--the native, sublime, and beautiful, but often wild and
irregular, imaginative power in English poetry from Chaucer to
Shakespeare, with which Professor Minto deals, in his Characteristics
of English Poets (Blackwood), lately reprinted.  That his book should
have found many readers we can well understand, in the light of the
excellent qualities which, in high degree, have gone to the making of
it: a tasteful learning, never deserted by that hold upon
contemporary literature which is so animating an influence in the
study of what belongs to the past.  Beginning with an elaborate
notice of Chaucer, full of the minute scholarship of our day, he
never forgets that his subject is, after all, poetry.  The followers
of Chaucer, and the precursors of Shakespeare, are alike real persons
to him--old Langland reminding him of Carlyle's "Gospel of Labour."
The product of a large store of reading has been here secreted anew
for the reader who desires to see, in bird's-eye view, the light and
shade of a long and varied period of poetic literature, by way of
preparation for Shakespeare, [9] (with a full essay upon whom the
volume closes,) explaining Shakespeare, so far as he can be explained
by literary antecedents.

That powerful poetry was twin-brother to a prose, of more varied, but
certainly of wilder and more irregular power than the admirable, the
typical, prose of Dryden.  In Dryden, and his followers through the
eighteenth century, we see the reaction against the exuberance and
irregularity of that prose, no longer justified by power, but
cognizable rather as bad taste.  But such reaction was effective only
because an age had come--the age of a negative, or agnostic
philosophy--in which men's minds must needs be limited to the
superficialities of things, with a kind of narrowness amounting to a
positive gift.  What that mental attitude was capable of, in the way
of an elegant, yet plain-spoken, and life-like delineation of men's
moods and manners, as also in the way of determining those moods and
manners themselves to all that was lively, unaffected, and
harmonious, can be seen nowhere better than in Mr. Austin Dobson's
Selections from Steele (Clarendon Press) prefaced by his careful
"Life."  The well-known qualities of [10] Mr. Dobson's own original
work are a sufficient guarantee of the taste and discrimination we
may look for in a collection like this, in which the random
lightnings of the first of the essayists are grouped under certain
heads--"Character Sketches," "Tales and Incidents," "Manners and
Fashions," and the like--so as to diminish, for the general reader,
the scattered effect of short essays on a hundred various subjects,
and give a connected, book-like character to the specimens.

Steele, for one, had certainly succeeded in putting himself, and his
way of taking the world--for this pioneer of an everybody's
literature had his subjectivities--into books.  What a survival of
one long-past day, for instance, in "A Ramble from Richmond to
London"!  What truth to the surface of common things, to their direct
claim on our interest! yet with what originality of effect in that
truthfulness, when he writes, for instance:

"I went to my lodgings, led by a light, whom I put into the discourse
of his private economy, and made him give me an account of the
charge, hazard, profit, and loss of a family that depended upon a
link."

[11] It was one of his peculiarities, he tells us, to live by the eye
far more than by any other sense (a peculiarity, perhaps, in an
Englishman), and this is what he sees at the early daily service then
common in some City churches.  Among those who were come only to see
or be seen, "there were indeed a few in whose looks there appeared a
heavenly joy and gladness upon the entrance of a new day, as if they
had gone to sleep with expectation of it."

The industrious reader, indeed, might select out of these specimens
from Steele, a picture, in minute detail, of the characteristic
manners of that time.  Still, beside, or only a little way beneath,
such a picture of passing fashion, what Steele and his fellows really
deal with is the least transitory aspects of life, though still
merely aspects--those points in which all human nature, great or
little, finds what it has in common, and directly shows itself up.
The natural strength of such literature will, of course, be in the
line of its tendencies; in transparency, variety, and directness.  To
the unembarrassing matter, the unembarrassed style!  Steele is,
perhaps, the most impulsive writer of the school [12] to which he
belongs; he abounds in felicities of impulse.  Yet who can help
feeling that his style is regular because the matter he deals with is
the somewhat uncontentious, even, limited soul, of an age not
imaginative, and unambitious in its speculative flight?  Even in
Steele himself we may observe with what sureness of instinct the men
of that age turned aside at the contact of anything likely to make
them, in any sense, forget themselves.

No one indicates better than Charles Lamb, to whose memory Mr. Alfred
Ainger has done such good service, the great and peculiar change
which was begun at the end of the last century, and dominates our
own; that sudden increase of the width, the depth, the complexity of
intellectual interest, which has many times torn and distorted
literary style, even with those best able to comprehend its laws.  In
Mrs. Leicester's School, with other Writings in Prose and Verse
(Macmillan), Mr. Ainger has collected and annotated certain remains
of Charles and Mary Lamb, too good to lie unknown to the present
generation, in forgotten periodicals or inaccessible reprints.  The
story of the Odyssey, abbreviated [13] in very simple prose, for
children--of all ages--will speak for itself.  But the garland of
graceful stories which gives name to the volume, told by a party of
girls on the evening of their assembling at school, are in the
highest degree characteristic of the brother and sister who were ever
so successful in imparting to others their own enjoyment of books and
people.  The tragic circumstance which strengthened and consecrated
their natural community of interest had, one might think, something
to do with the far-reaching pensiveness even of their most humorous
writing, touching often the deepest springs of pity and awe, as the
way of the highest humour is--a way, however, very different from
that of the humorists of the eighteenth century.  But one cannot
forget also that Lamb was early an enthusiastic admirer of
Wordsworth: of Wordsworth, the first characteristic power of the
nineteenth century, his essay on whom, in the Quarterly Review, Mr.
Ainger here reprints.  Would that he could have reprinted it as
originally composed, and ungarbled by Gifford, the editor!  Lamb,
like Wordsworth, still kept the charm of a serenity, [14] a
precision, unsurpassed by the quietest essayist of the preceding age.
But it might have been foreseen that the rising tide of thought and
feeling, on the strength of which they too are borne upward, would
sometimes overflow barriers.  And so it happens that these simple
stories are touched, much as Wordsworth's verse-stories were, with
tragic power.  Dealing with the beginnings of imagination in the
minds of children, they record, with the reality which a very
delicate touch preserves from anything lugubrious, not those merely
preventible miseries of childhood over which some writers have been
apt to gloat, but the contact of childhood with the great and
inevitable sorrows of life, into which children can enter with depth,
with dignity, and sometimes with a kind of simple, pathetic
greatness, to the discipline of the heart.  Let the reader begin with
the "Sea Voyage," which is by Charles Lamb; and, what Mr. Ainger
especially recommends, the "Father's Wedding-Day," by his sister
Mary.

The ever-increasing intellectual burden of our age is hardly likely
to adapt itself to the exquisite, but perhaps too delicate and
limited, [15] literary instruments of the age of Queen Anne.  Yet Mr.
Saintsbury is certainly right in thinking that, as regards style,
English literature has much to do.  Well, the good quality of an age,
the defect of which lies in the direction of intellectual anarchy and
confusion, may well be eclecticism: in style, as in other things, it
is well always to aim at the combination of as many excellences as
possible--opposite excellences, it may be--those other beauties of
prose.  A busy age will hardly educate its writers in correctness.
Let its writers make time to write English more as a learned
language; and completing that correction of style which had only gone
a certain way in the last century, raise the general level of
language towards their own.  If there be a weakness in Mr.
Saintsbury's view, it is perhaps in a tendency to regard style a
little too independently of matter.  And there are still some who
think that, after all, the style is the man; justified, in very great
varieties, by the simple consideration of what he himself has to say,
quite independently of any real or supposed connection with this or
that literary age or school.  Let us close with the words of a most
[16] versatile master of English--happily not yet included in Mr.
Saintsbury's book--a writer who has dealt with all the perturbing
influences of our century in a manner as classical, as idiomatic, as
easy and elegant, as Steele's:

"I wish you to observe," says Cardinal Newman, "that the mere dealer
in words cares little or nothing for the subject which he is
embellishing, but can paint and gild anything whatever to order;
whereas the artist, whom I am acknowledging, has his great or rich
visions before him, and his only aim is to bring out what he thinks
or what he feels in a way adequate to the thing spoken of, and
appropriate to the speaker."

17th February 1886





II.  AMIEL'S "JOURNAL INTIME"





Amiel's Journal.  The Journal Intime of Henri-Frederic Amiel.
Translated, with an Introduction and Notes, by Mrs. Humphry Ward.
Two vols.  Macmillans.

[19] CERTAIN influential expressions of opinion have attracted much
curiosity to Amiel's Journal Intime, both in France, where the book
has already made its mark, and in England, where Mrs. Humphry Ward's
translation is likely to make it widely known among all serious
lovers of good literature.  Easy, idiomatic, correct, this English
version reads like an excellent original English work, and gives
fresh proof that the work of translation, if it is to be done with
effect, must be done by those who, possessing, like Mrs. Ward,
original literary gifts, are willing to make a long act of self-
denial or self-effacement [20] for the benefit of the public.  In
this case, indeed, the work is not wholly one of self-effacement, for
the accomplished translator has prefaced Amiel's Journal by an able
and interesting essay of seventy pages on Amiel's life and
intellectual position.  And certainly there is much in the book, thus
effectively presented to the English reader, to attract those who
interest themselves in the study of the finer types of human nature,
of literary expression, of metaphysical and practical philosophy; to
attract, above all, those interested in such philosophy, at points
where it touches upon questions of religion, and especially at the
present day.

Henri-Frederic Amiel was born at Geneva in 1821.  Orphaned of both
his parents at the age of twelve, his youth was necessarily "a little
bare and forlorn," and a deep interest in religion became fixed in
him early.  His student days coming to an end, the years which
followed, from 1842 to 1848--Wanderjahre, in which he visited
Holland, Italy, Sicily, and the principal towns of Germany--seem to
have been the happiest of his life.  In 1849 he became a Professor at
Geneva, and there is little more to tell of him in [21] the way of
outward events.  He published some volumes of verse; to the last
apparently still only feeling after his true literary metier.  Those
last seven years were a long struggle against the disease which ended
his life, consumption, at the age of fifty-three.  The first entry in
his Journal is in 1848.  From that date to his death, a period of
over twenty-five years, this Journal was the real object of all the
energies of his richly-endowed nature: and from its voluminous sheets
his literary executors have selected the deeply interesting volumes
now presented in English.

With all its gifts and opportunities it was a melancholy life--
melancholy with something not altogether explained by the somewhat
pessimistic philosophy exposed in the Journal, nor by the consumptive
tendency of Amiel's physical constitution, causing him from a very
early date to be much preoccupied with the effort to reconcile
himself with the prospect of death, and reinforcing the far from
sanguine temperament of one intellectually also a poitrinaire.

You might think him at first sight only an admirable specimen of a
thoroughly well-educated [22] man, full, of course, of the modern
spirit; stimulated and formed by the influences of the varied
intellectual world around him; and competing, in his turn, with many
very various types of contemporary ability.  The use of his book to
cultivated people might lie in its affording a kind of standard by
which they might take measure of the maturity and producible quality
of their own thoughts on a hundred important subjects.  He will write
a page or two, giving evidence of that accumulated power and
attainment which, with a more strenuous temperament, might have
sufficed for an effective volume.  Continually, in the Journal, we
pause over things that would rank for beauties among widely differing
models of the best French prose.  He has said some things in Pascal's
vein not unworthy of Pascal.  He had a right to compose "Thoughts":
they have the force in them which makes up for their unavoidable want
of continuity.

But if, as Amiel himself challenges us to do, we look below the
surface of a very equable and even smoothly accomplished literary
manner, we discover, in high degree of development, that perplexity
or complexity of soul, the expression [23] of which, so it be with an
adequate literary gift, has its legitimate, because inevitable,
interest for the modern reader.  Senancour and Maurice de Guerin in
one, seem to have been supplemented here by a larger experience, a
far greater education, than either of them had attained to.  So
multiplex is the result that minds of quite opposite type might well
discover in these pages their own special thought or humour, happily
expressed at last (they might think) in precisely that just shade of
language themselves had searched for in vain.  And with a writer so
vivid and impressive as Amiel, those varieties of tendency are apt to
present themselves as so many contending persons.  The perplexed
experience gets the apparent clearness, as it gets also the
animation, of a long dialogue; only, the disputants never part
company, and there is no real conclusion.  "This nature," he
observes, of one of the many phases of character he has discovered in
himself, "is, as it were, only one of the men which exist in me.  It
is one of my departments.  It is not the whole of my territory, the
whole of my inner kingdom"; and again, "there are ten men in me,
according to time, place, surrounding, [24] and occasion; and, in my
restless diversity, I am for ever escaping myself."

Yet, in truth, there are but two men in Amiel--two sufficiently
opposed personalities, which the attentive reader may define for
himself; compare with, and try by each other--as we think, correct
also by each other.  There is the man, in him and in these pages, who
would be "the man of disillusion," only that he has never really been
"the man of desires"; and who seems, therefore, to have a double
weariness about him.  He is akin, of course, to Obermann, to Rene,
even to Werther, and, on our first introduction to him, we might
think that we had to do only with one more of the vague
"renunciants," who in real life followed those creations of fiction,
and who, however delicate, interesting as a study, and as it were
picturesque on the stage of life, are themselves, after all,
essentially passive, uncreative, and therefore necessarily not of
first-rate importance in literature.  Taken for what it is worth, the
expression of this mood--the culture of ennui for its own sake--is
certainly carried to its ideal of negation by Amiel.  But the
completer, the positive, soul, which will merely take [25] that mood
into its service (its proper service, as we hold, is in counteraction
to the vulgarity of purely positive natures) is also certainly in
evidence in Amiel's "Thoughts"--that other, and far stronger person,
in the long dialogue; the man, in short, possessed of gifts, not for
the renunciation, but for the reception and use, of all that is
puissant, goodly, and effective in life, and for the varied and
adequate literary reproduction of it; who, under favourable
circumstances, or even without them, will become critic, or poet, and
in either case a creative force; and if he be religious (as Amiel was
deeply religious) will make the most of "evidence," and almost
certainly find a Church.

The sort of purely poetic tendency in his mind, which made Amiel
known in his own lifetime chiefly as a writer of verse, seems to be
represented in these volumes by certain passages of natural
description, always sincere, and sometimes rising to real
distinction.  In Switzerland it is easy to be pleased with scenery.
But the record of such pleasure becomes really worth while when, as
happens with Amiel, we feel that there has been, and with success, an
intellectual [26] effort to get at the secret, the precise motive,
of the pleasure; to define feeling, in this matter.  Here is a good
description of an effect of fog, which we commend to foreigners
resident in London:

"Fog has certainly a poetry of its own--a grace, a dreamy charm.  It
does for the daylight what a lamp does for us at night; it turns the
mind towards meditation; it throws the soul back on itself.  The sun,
as it were, sheds us abroad in nature, scatters and disperses us;
mist draws us together and concentrates us--it is cordial, homely,
charged with feeling.  The poetry of the sun has something of the
epic in it; that of fog and mist is elegiac and religious.  Pantheism
is the child of light; mist engenders faith in near protectors.  When
the great world is shut off from us, the house becomes itself a small
universe.  Shrouded in perpetual mist, men love each other better;
for the only reality then is the family, and, within the family, the
heart; and the greatest thoughts come from the heart--so says the
moralist."

It is of Swiss fog, however, that he is speaking, as, in what
follows, of Swiss frost:

[27] "Three snowstorms this afternoon.  Poor blossoming plum-trees
and peach-trees!  What a difference from six years ago, when the
cherry-trees, adorned in their green spring dress and laden with
their bridal flowers, smiled at my departure along the Vaudois
fields, and the lilacs of Burgundy threw great gusts of perfume into
my face!"  The weather is seldom talked of with so much real
sensitiveness to it as in this:

"The weather is rainy, the whole atmosphere grey; it is a time
favourable to thought and meditation.  I have a liking for such days
as these; they revive one's converse with oneself and make it
possible to live the inner life: they are quiet and peaceful, like a
song in a minor key.  We are nothing but thought, but we feel our
life to its very centre.  Our very sensations turn to reverie.  It is
a strange state of mind; it is like those silences in worship which
are not the empty moments of devotion, but the full moments, and
which are so because at such times the soul, instead of being
polarized, dispersed, localized, in a single impression or thought,
feels her own totality and is conscious of herself."

[28] "Every landscape," he writes, "is, as it were, a state of the
soul": and again, "At bottom there is but one subject of study; the
forms and metamorphoses of mind: all other subjects may be reduced to
that; all other studies bring us back to this study."  And, in truth,
if he was occupied with the aspects of nature to such an excellent
literary result, still, it was with nature only as a phenomenon of
the moral order.  His interest, after all, is, consistently, that of
the moralist (in no narrow sense) who deals, from predilection, with
the sort of literary work which stirs men--stirs their intellect--
through feeling; and with that literature, especially, as looked at
through the means by which it became capable of thus commanding men.
The powers, the culture, of the literary producer: there, is the
centre of Amiel's curiosity.

And if we take Amiel at his own word, we must suppose that but for
causes, the chief of which were bad health and a not long life, he
too would have produced monumental work, whose scope and character he
would wish us to conjecture from his "Thoughts."  Such indications
there certainly are in them.  He was [29] meant--we see it in the
variety, the high level both of matter and style, the animation, the
gravity, of one after another of these thoughts--on religion, on
poetry, on politics in the highest sense; on their most abstract
principles, and on the authors who have given them a personal colour;
on the genius of those authors, as well as on their concrete works;
on outlying isolated subjects, such as music, and special musical
composers--he was meant, if people ever are meant for special lines
of activity, for the best sort of criticism, the imaginative
criticism; that criticism which is itself a kind of construction, or
creation, as it penetrates, through the given literary or artistic
product, into the mental and inner constitution of the producer,
shaping his work.  Of such critical skill, cultivated with all the
resources of Geneva in the nineteenth century, he has given in this
Journal abundant proofs.  Corneille, Cherbuliez; Rousseau, Sismondi;
Victor Hugo, and Joubert; Mozart and Wagner--all who are interested
in these men will find a value in what Amiel has to say of them.
Often, as for instance in his excellent criticism of Quinet, he has
to make large exceptions [30]; limitations, skilfully effected by
the way, in the course of a really appreciative estimate.  Still,
through all, what we feel is that we have to do with one who
criticises in this fearlessly equitable manner only because he is
convinced that his subject is of a real literary importance.  A
powerful, intellectual analysis of some well-marked subject, in such
form as makes literature enduring, is indeed what the world might
have looked for from him: those institutes of aesthetics, for
instance, which might exist, after Lessing and Hegel, but which
certainly do not exist yet.  "Construction," he says--artistic or
literary construction--"rests upon feeling, instinct, and," alas!
also, "upon will."  The instinct, at all events, was certainly his.
And over and above that he had possessed himself of the art of
expressing, in quite natural language, very difficult thoughts; those
abstract and metaphysical conceptions especially, in which German
mind has been rich, which are bad masters, but very useful ministers
towards the understanding, towards an analytical survey, of all that
the intellect has produced.

But something held him back: not so much [31] a reluctancy of
temperament, or of physical constitution (common enough cause why men
of undeniable gifts fail of commensurate production) but a cause
purely intellectual--the presence in him, namely, of a certain vein
of opinion; that other, constituent but contending, person, in his
complex nature.  "The relation of thought to action," he writes,
"filled my mind on waking, and I found myself carried towards a
bizarre formula, which seems to have something of the night still
clinging about it.  Action is but coarsened thought."  That is but an
ingenious metaphysical point, as he goes on to show.  But, including
in "action" that literary production in which the line of his own
proper activity lay, he followed--followed often--that fastidious
utterance to a cynical and pessimistic conclusion.

Maia, as he calls it, the empty "Absolute" of the Buddhist, the
"Infinite," the "All," of which those German metaphysicians he loved
only too well have had so much to say: this was for ever to give the
go-by to all positive, finite, limited interests whatever.  The vague
pretensions of an abstract expression acted on him with all the force
of a prejudice.  "The ideal," he admits, [32] "poisons for me all
imperfect possession"; and again, "The Buddhist tendency in me blunts
the faculty of free self-government, and weakens the power of action.
I feel a terror of action and am only at ease in the impersonal,
disinterested, and objective line of thought."  But then, again, with
him "action" meant chiefly literary production.  He quotes with
approval those admirable words from Goethe, "In der Beschrankung
zeigt sich erst der Meister"; yet still always finds himself wavering
between "frittering myself away on the infinitely little, and longing
after what is unknown and distant."  There is, doubtless, over and
above the physical consumptive tendency, an instinctive turn of
sentiment in this touching confession.  Still, what strengthened both
tendencies was that metaphysical prejudice for the "Absolute," the
false intellectual conscience.  "I have always avoided what attracted
me, and turned my back upon the point where secretly I desired to
be"; and, of course, that is not the way to a free and generous
productivity, in literature, or in anything else; though in
literature, with Amiel at all events, it meant the fastidiousness
which [33] is incompatible with any but the very best sort of
production.

And as that abstract condition of Maia, to the kind and quantity of
concrete literary production we hold to have been originally possible
for him; so was the religion he actually attained, to what might have
been the development of his profoundly religious spirit, had he been
able to see that the old-fashioned Christianity is itself but the
proper historic development of the true "essence" of the New
Testament.  There, again, is the constitutional shrinking, through a
kind of metaphysical prejudice, from the concrete--that fear of the
actual--in this case, of the Church of history; to which the
admissions, which form so large a part of these volumes, naturally
lead.  Assenting, on probable evidence, to so many of the judgments
of the religious sense, he failed to see the equally probable
evidence there is for the beliefs, the peculiar direction of men's
hopes, which complete those judgments harmoniously, and bring them
into connection with the facts, the venerable institutions of the
past--with the lives of the saints.  By failure, as we think, of that
historic sense, of [34] which he could speak so well, he got no
further in this direction than the glacial condition of rationalistic
Geneva.  "Philosophy," he says, "can never replace religion."  Only,
one cannot see why it might not replace a religion such as his: a
religion, after all, much like Seneca's.

"I miss something," he himself confesses, "common worship, a positive
religion, shared with other people.  Ah!  when will the Church to
which I belong in heart rise into being?"  To many at least of those
who can detect the ideal through the disturbing circumstances which
belong to all actual institutions in the world, it was already there.
Pascal, from considerations to which Amiel was no stranger, came to
the large hopes of the Catholic Church; Amiel stopped short at a
faith almost hopeless; and by stopping short just there he really
failed, as we think, of intellectual consistency, and missed that
appeasing influence which his nature demanded as the condition of its
full activity, as a force, an intellectual force, in the world--in
the special business of his life.  "Welcome the unforeseen," he says
again, by way of a counsel of perfection in the matter of culture,
"but give to [35] your life unity, and bring the unforeseen within
the lines of your plan."  Bring, we should add, the Great Possibility
at least within the lines of your plan--your plan of action or
production; of morality; especially of your conceptions of religion.
And still, Amiel too, be it remembered (we are not afraid to repeat
it), has said some things in Pascal's vein not unworthy of Pascal.

And so we get only the Journal.  Watching in it, in the way we have
suggested, the contention of those two men, those two minds in him,
and observing how the one might have ascertained and corrected the
shortcomings of the other, we certainly understand, and can
sympathize with Amiel's despondency in the retrospect of a life which
seemed to have been but imperfectly occupied.  But, then, how
excellent a literary product, after all, the Journal is.  And already
we have found that it improves also on second reading.  A book of
"thoughts" should be a book that may be fairly dipped into, and yield
good quotable sayings.  Here are some of its random offerings:

Look twice, if what you want is a just [36] conception; look once, if
what you want is a sense of beauty."

"It is not history which teaches conscience to be honest; it is the
conscience which educates history.  Fact is corrupting--it is we who
correct it by the persistence of our ideal."

"To do easily what is difficult for others is the mark of talent.  To
do what is impossible for talent is the mark of genius."

"Duty has the virtue of making us feel the reality of a positive
world, while at the same time detaching us from it."

"As it is impossible to be outside God, the best is consciously to
dwell in Him."

"He also (the Son of Man), He above all, is the great Misunderstood,
the least comprehended."

"The pensee writer is to the philosopher what the dilettante is to
the artist."

There are some, we know, who hold that genius cannot, in the nature
of things, be "sterile"; that there are no "mute" Miltons, or the
like.  Well! genius, or only a very distinguished talent, the gift
which Amiel nursed so jealously did come into evidence.  And the [37]
reader, we hope, sees also already how well his English translator
has done her work.  She may justly feel, as part at least of the
reward of a labour which must have occupied much time, so many of the
freshest hours of mind and spirit, that she has done something to
help her author in the achievement of his, however discouraged still
irrepressible, desire, by giving additional currency to a book which
the best sort of readers will recognize as an excellent and certainly
very versatile companion, not to be forgotten.

17th March 1886





III.  BROWNING





An Introduction to the Study of Browning.
By Arthur Symons.  Cassells.


[41] WHETHER it be true or not that Mr. Browning is justly chargeable
with "obscurity"--with a difficulty of manner, that is, beyond the
intrinsic difficulty of his matter--it is very probable that an
Introduction to the study of his works, such as this of Mr. Symons,
will add to the number of his readers.  Mr. Symons's opening essay on
the general characteristics of Mr. Browning is a just and acceptable
appreciation of his poetry as a whole, well worth reading, even at
this late day.  We find in Mr. Symons the thoughtful and practised
yet enthusiastic student in literature--in intellectual problems;
always quiet and sane, praising Mr. Browning with tact, with a real
refinement and grace; saying well many [42] things which every
competent reader of the great poet must feel to be true; devoting to
the subject he loves a critical gift so considerable as to make us
wish for work from his hands of larger scope than this small volume.
His book is, according to his intention, before all things a useful
one.  Appreciating Mr. Browning fairly, as we think, in all his
various efforts, his aim is to point his readers to the best, the
indisputable, rather than to the dubious portions of his author's
work.  Not content with his own excellent general criticism of Mr.
Browning, he guides the reader to his works, or division of work,
seriatim, making of each a distinct and special study, and giving a
great deal of welcome information about the poems, the circumstances
of their composition, and the like, with delightful quotations.
Incidentally, his Introduction has the interest of a brief but
effective selection from Mr. Browning's poems; and he has added an
excellent biography.

Certainly we shall not quarrel with Mr. Symons for reckoning Mr.
Browning, among English poets, second to Shakespeare alone--"He comes
very near the gigantic total of [43] Shakespeare."  The quantity of
his work?  Yes! that too, in spite of a considerable unevenness, is a
sign of genius.  "So large, indeed, appear to be his natural
endowments that we cannot feel as if even thirty volumes would have
come near to exhausting them."  Imaginatively, indeed, Mr. Browning
has been a multitude of persons; only (as Shakespeare's only untried
style was the simple one) almost never simple ones; and certainly he
has controlled them all to profoundly interesting artistic ends by
his own powerful personality.  The world and all its action, as a
show of thought, that is the scope of his work.  It makes him pre-
eminently a modern poet--a poet of the self-pondering, perfectly
educated, modern world, which, having come to the end of all direct
and purely external experiences, must necessarily turn for its
entertainment to the world within:--

"The men and women who live and move in that new world of his
creation are as varied as life itself; they are kings and beggars,
saints and lovers, great captains, poets, painters, musicians,
priests and Popes, Jews, gipsies and dervishes, street-girls,
princesses, dancers with the wicked [44] witchery of the daughter of
Herodias, wives with the devotion of the wife of Brutus, joyous girls
and malevolent grey-beards, statesmen, cavaliers, soldiers of
humanity, tyrants and bigots, ancient sages and modern spiritualists,
heretics, scholars, scoundrels, devotees, rabbis, persons of quality
and men of low estate--men and women as multiform as nature or
society has made them."

The individual, the personal, the concrete, as distinguished from,
yet revealing in its fulness, the general, the universal--that is Mr.
Browning's chosen subject-matter: "Every man is for him an epitome of
the universe, a centre of creation."  It is always the particular
soul, and the particular act or episode, as the flower of the
particular soul--the act or episode by which its quality comes to the
test--in which he interests us.  With him it is always "a drama of
the interior, a tragedy or comedy of the soul, to see thereby how
each soul becomes conscious of itself."  In the Preface to the later
edition of Sordello, Mr. Browning himself told us that to him little
else seems worth study except the development of a soul, the
incidents, the story, of that.  And, [45] in fact, the intellectual
public generally agrees with him.  It is because he has ministered
with such marvellous vigour, and variety, and fine skill to this
interest, that he is the most modern, to modern people the most
important, of poets.

So much for Mr. Browning's matter; for his manner, we hold Mr. Symons
right in thinking him a master of all the arts of poetry.  "These
extraordinary little poems," says Mr. Symons of "Johannes Agricola"
and "Porphyria's Lover"--

"Reveal not only an imagination of intense fire and heat, but an
almost finished art--a power of conceiving subtle mental complexities
with clearness and of expressing them in a picturesque form and in
perfect lyric language.  Each poem renders a single mood, and renders
it completely."

Well, after all, that is true of a large portion of Mr. Browning's
work.  A curious, an erudite artist, certainly, he is to some extent
an experimenter in rhyme or metre, often hazardous.  But in spite of
the dramatic rudeness which is sometimes of the idiosyncrasy, the
true and native colour of his multitudinous dramatis personae, or
monologists, Mr. Symons is right in [46] laying emphasis on the
grace, the finished skill, the music, native and ever ready to the
poet himself--tender, manly, humorous, awe-stricken--when speaking in
his own proper person.  Music herself, the analysis of the musical
soul, in the characteristic episodes of its development is a wholly
new range of poetic subject in which Mr. Browning is simply unique.
Mr. Symons tells us:--

"When Mr. Browning was a mere boy, it is recorded that he debated
within himself whether he should not become a painter or a musician
as well as a poet.  Finally, though not, I believe, for a good many
years, he decided in the negative.  But the latent qualities of
painter and musician had developed themselves in his poetry, and much
of his finest and very much of his most original verse is that which
speaks the language of painter and musician as it had never before
been spoken.  No English poet before him has ever excelled his
utterances on music, none has so much as rivalled his utterances on
art.  'Abt Vogler' is the richest, deepest, fullest poem on music in
the language.  It is not the theories of the poet, but the instincts
of the [47] musician, that it speaks.  'Master Hugues of Saxe-Gotha,'
another special poem on music, is unparalleled for ingenuity of
technical interpretation: 'A Toccata of Galuppi's' is as rare a
rendering as can anywhere be found of the impressions and sensations
caused by a musical piece; but 'Abt Vogler' is a very glimpse into
the heaven where music is born."

It is true that "when the head has to be exercised before the heart
there is chilling of sympathy."  Of course, so intellectual a poet
(and only the intellectual poet, as we have pointed out, can be
adequate to modern demands) will have his difficulties.  They were a
part of the poet's choice of vocation, and he was fully aware of
them:--

"Mr. Browning might say, as his wife said in an early preface, I
never mistook pleasure for the final cause of poetry, nor leisure for
the hour of the poet--as indeed he has himself said, to much the same
effect, in a letter printed many years ago: I never pretended to
offer such literature as should be a substitute for a cigar or a game
at dominoes to an idle man."

"Moreover, while a writer who deals with [48] easy themes has no
excuse if he is not pellucid to a glance, one who employs his
intellect and imagination on high and hard questions has a right to
demand a corresponding closeness of attention, and a right to say
with Bishop Butler, in answer to a similar complaint: 'It must be
acknowledged that some of the following discourses are very abstruse
and difficult, or, if you please, obscure; but I must take leave to
add that those alone are judges whether or no, and how far this is a
fault, who are judges whether or no, and how far it might have been
avoided--those only who will be at the trouble to understand what is
here said, and to see how far the things here insisted upon, and not
other things, might have been put in a plainer manner.'"

In Mr. Symons's opinion Pippa Passes is Mr. Browning's most perfect
piece of work, for pregnancy of intellect, combined with faultless
expression in a perfectly novel yet symmetrical outline: and he is
very likely right.  He is certainly right in thinking Mas they
formerly stood, Mr. Browning's most delightful volumes.  It is only
to be regretted [49] that in the later collected edition of the works
those two magical old volumes are broken up and scattered under other
headings.  We think also that Mr. Symons in his high praise does no
more than justice to The Ring and the Book.  The Ring and the Book is
at once the largest and the greatest of Mr. Browning's works, the
culmination of his dramatic method, and the turning-point more
decisively than Dramatis Personae of his style.  Yet just here he
rightly marks a change in Mr. Browning's manner:--

"Not merely the manner of presentment, the substance, and also the
style and versification have undergone a change.  I might point to
the profound intellectual depth of certain pieces as its
characteristic, or, equally, to the traces here and there of an
apparent carelessness of workmanship; or, yet again, to the new and
very marked partiality for scenes and situations of English and
modern rather than medieval and foreign life."

Noble as much of Mr. Browning's later work is, full of intellect,
alive with excellent passages (in the first volume of the Dramatic
Idyls [50] perhaps more powerful than in any earlier work);
notwithstanding all that, we think the change here indicated matter
of regret.  After all, we have to conjure up ideal poets for
ourselves out of those who stand in or behind the range of volumes on
our book-shelves; and our ideal Browning would have for his entire
structural type those two volumes of Men and Women with Pippa Passes.

Certainly, it is a delightful world to which Mr. Browning has given
us the key, and those volumes a delightful gift to our age-record of
so much that is richest in the world of things, and men, and their
works--all so much the richer by the great intellect, the great
imagination, which has made the record, transmuted them into
imperishable things of art:--

"'With souls should souls have place'--this, with Mr. Browning, is
something more than a mere poetical conceit.  It is the condensed
expression of an experience, a philosophy, and an art.  Like the
lovers of his lyric, Mr. Browning has renounced the selfish
serenities of wild-wood and dream-palace; he has fared up and down
among men, listening to the music of humanity, [51] observing the
acts of men, and he has sung what he has heard, and he has painted
what he has seen.  Will the work live? we ask; and we can answer only
in his own words--

It lives,
If precious be the soul of man to man."

9th November 1887





IV.  "ROBERT ELSMERE"




[55] THOSE who, in this bustling age, turn to fiction not merely for
a little passing amusement, but for profit, for the higher sort of
pleasure, will do well, we think (after a conscientious perusal on
our own part) to bestow careful reading on Robert Elsmere.  A chef
d'oeuvre of that kind of quiet evolution of character through
circumstance, introduced into English literature by Miss Austen, and
carried to perfection in France by George Sand (who is more to the
point, because, like Mrs. Ward, she was not afraid to challenge
novel-readers to an interest in religious questions), it abounds in
sympathy with people as we find them, in aspiration towards something
better--towards a certain ideal--in a refreshing sense of second
thoughts everywhere.  The author clearly has developed a remarkable
natural aptitude for literature by liberal reading and most patient
care [56] in composition--composition in that narrower sense which is
concerned with the building of a good sentence; as also in that wider
sense, which ensures, in a work like this, with so many joints, so
many currents of interest, a final unity of impression an the part of
the reader, and easy transition by him from one to the other.  Well-
used to works of fiction which tell all they have to tell in one thin
volume, we have read Mrs. Ward's three volumes with unflagging
readiness.

For, in truth, that quiet method of evolution, which she pursues
undismayed to the end, requires a certain lengthiness; and the
reader's reward will be in a secure sense that he has been in
intercourse with no mere flighty remnants, but with typical forms, of
character, firmly and fully conceived.  We are persuaded that the
author might have written a novel which should have been all shrewd
impressions of society, or all humorous impressions of country life,
or all quiet fun and genial caricature.  Actually she has chosen to
combine something of each of these with a very sincerely felt
religious interest; and who will deny that to trace the influence of
religion upon human character is one of the [57] legitimate functions
of the novel?  In truth, the modern "novel of character" needs some
such interest, to lift it sufficiently above the humdrum of life; as
men's horizons are enlarged by religion, of whatever type it may be--
and we may say at once that the religious type which is dear to Mrs.
Ward, though avowedly "broad," is not really the broadest.  Having
conceived her work thus, she has brought a rare instinct for
probability and nature to the difficult task of combining this
religious motive and all the learned thought it involves, with a very
genuine interest in many  varieties of average mundane life.

We should say that the author's special ethical gift lay in a
delicately intuitive sympathy, not, perhaps, with all phases of
character, but certainly with the very varied class of persons
represented in these volumes.  It may be congruous with this,
perhaps, that her success should be more assured in dealing with the
characters of women than with those of men.  The men who pass before
us in her pages, though real and tangible and effective enough, seem,
nevertheless, from time to time to reveal their joinings.  They are
composite of many different men we seem to have [58] known, and fancy
we could detach again from the ensemble and from each other.  And
their goodness, when they are good, is--well! a little conventional;
the kind of goodness that men themselves discount rather largely in
their estimates of each other.  Robert himself is certainly worth
knowing--a really attractive union of manliness and saintliness, of
shrewd sense and unworldly aims, and withal with that kindness and
pity the absence of which so often abates the actual value of those
other gifts.  Mrs. Ward's literary power is sometimes seen at its
best (it is a proof of her high cultivation of this power that so it
should be) in the analysis of minor characters, both male and female.
Richard Leyburn, deceased before the story begins, but warm in the
memory of the few who had known him, above all of his great-souled
daughter Catherine, strikes us, with his religious mysticism, as
being in this way one of the best things in the book:--

"Poor Richard Leyburn!  Yet where had the defeat lain?

"'Was he happy in his school life?'  Robert asked gently.  'Was
teaching what he liked?'

[59] "'Oh! yes, only--' and then added hurriedly, as though drawn on
in spite of herself by the grave sympathy of his look, 'I never knew
anybody so good who thought himself of so little account.  He always
believed that he had missed everything, wasted everything, and that
anybody else would have made infinitely more out of his life.  He vas
always blaming, scourging himself.  And all the time he was the
noblest, purest, most devoted--'

"She stopped.  Her voice had passed beyond her control.  Elsmere was
startled by the feeling she showed.  Evidently he had touched one of
the few sore places in this pure heart.  It was as though her memory
of her father had in it elements of almost intolerable pathos, as
though the child's brooding love and loyalty were in perpetual
protest even now after this lapse of years against the verdict which
an over-scrupulous, despondent soul had pronounced upon itself.  Did
she feel that he had gone uncomforted out of life--even by her--even
by religion?  Was that the sting?"

A little later she gives the record of his last hours:--

[60] "'Catherine!  Life is harder, the narrower way narrower than
ever.  I die--and memory caught still the piteous long-drawn breath
by which the voice was broken--'in much--much perplexity about many
things.  You have a clear soul, an iron will.  Strengthen the others.
Bring them safe to the day of account.'"

And then the smaller--some of them, ethically, very small--women;
Lady Wynnstay, Mrs. Fleming, Mrs. Thornburgh; above all, Robert's
delightful Irish mother, and Mrs. Darcy; how excellent they are!
Mrs. Darcy we seem to have known, yet cannot have enough of, rejoiced
to catch sight of her capital letter on the page, as we read on.  In
truth, if a high and ideal purpose, really learned in the school of
Wordsworth and among the Westmorland hills which Mrs. Ward describes
so sympathetically, with fitting dignity and truth of style, has
accompanied the author throughout; no less plain, perhaps more
pleasing to some readers, is the quiet humour which never fails her,
and tests, while it relieves, the sincerity of her more serious
thinking:--

"At last Mrs. Darcy fluttered off, only, however, to come hurrying
back with little, short, [61] scudding steps, to implore them all to
come to tea with her as soon as possible in the garden that was her
special hobby, and in her last new summer-house.

"'I build two or three every summer,' she said; 'now there are
twenty-one!  Roger laughs at me,' and there was a momentary
bitterness in the little eerie face; 'but how can one live without
hobbies?  That's one--then I've two more.  My album--oh, you will all
write in my album, won't you?  When I was young--when I was Maid of
Honour'--and she drew herself up slightly--'everybody had albums.
Even the dear Queen herself!  I remember how she made M. Guizot write
in it; something quite stupid, after all.  Those hobbies--the garden
and the album--are quite harmless, aren't they?  They hurt nobody, do
they?'  Her voice dropped a little, with a pathetic expostulating
intonation in it, as of one accustomed to be rebuked."

Mrs. Ward's women, as we have said, are more organic, sympathetic,
and really creative, than her men, and make their vitality evident by
becoming, quite naturally, the centres of very [62] life-like and
dramatic groups of people, family or social; while her men are the
very genii of isolation and division.  It is depressing to see so
really noble a character as Catherine soured, as we feel, and
lowered, as time goes on, from the happy resignation of the first
volume (in which solemn, beautiful, and entire, and so very real, she
is like a poem of Wordsworth) down to the mere passivity of the third
volume, and the closing scene of Robert Elsmere's days, very
exquisitely as this episode of unbelieving yet saintly biography has
been conceived and executed.  Catherine certainly, for one, has no
profit in the development of Robert's improved gospel.  The "stray
sheep," we think, has by no means always the best of the argument,
and her story is really a sadder, more testing one than his.  Though
both alike, we admit it cordially, have a genuine sense of the
eternal moral charm of "renunciation," something even of the thirst
for martyrdom, for those wonderful, inaccessible, cold heights of the
Imitation, eternal also in their aesthetic charm.

These characters and situations, pleasant or profoundly interesting,
which it is good to have [63] come across, are worked out, not in
rapid sketches, nor by hazardous epigram, but more securely by
patient analysis; and though we have said that Mrs. Ward is most
successful in female portraiture, her own mind and culture have an
unmistakable virility and grasp and scientific firmness.  This
indispensable intellectual process, which will be relished by
admirers of George Eliot, is relieved constantly by the sense of a
charming landscape background, for the most part English.  Mrs. Ward
has been a true disciple in the school of Wordsworth, and really
undergone its influence.  Her Westmorland scenery is more than a mere
background; its spiritual and, as it were, personal hold on persons,
as understood by the great poet of the Lakes, is seen actually at
work, in the formation, in the refining, of character.  It has been a
stormy day:--

"Before him the great hollow of High Fell was just coming out from
the white mists surging round it.  A shaft of sunlight lay across its
upper end, and he caught a marvellous apparition of a sunlit valley
hung in air, a pale strip of blue above it, a white thread of stream
wavering [64] through it, and all around it and below it the rolling
rain-clouds."

There is surely something of "natural magic" in that!  The wilder
capacity of the mountains is brought out especially in a weird story
of a haunted girl, an episode well illustrating the writer's more
imaginative psychological power; for, in spite of its quiet general
tenour, the book has its adroitly managed elements of sensation--
witness the ghost, in which the average human susceptibility to
supernatural terrors takes revenge on the sceptical Mr. Wendover, and
the love-scene with Madame de Netteville, which, like those other
exciting passages, really furthers the development of the proper
ethical interests of the book.  The Oxford episodes strike us as
being not the author's strongest work, as being comparatively
conventional, coming, as they do, in a book whose predominant note is
reality.  Yet her sympathetic command over, her power of evoking, the
genius of places, is clearly shown in the touches by which she brings
out the so well-known grey and green of college and garden--touches
which bring the real Oxford to the mind's eye better than any
elaborate description [65] --for the beauty of the place itself
resides also in delicate touches.  The book passes indeed,
successively, through distinct, broadly conceived phases of scenery,
which, becoming veritable parts of its texture, take hold on the
reader, as if in an actual sojourn in the places described.  Surrey--
its genuine though almost suburban wildness, with the vicarage and
the wonderful abode, above all, the ancient library of Mr. Wendover,
all is admirably done, the landscape naturally counting for a good
deal in the development of the profoundly meditative, country-loving
souls of Mrs. Ward's favourite characters.

Well!  Mrs. Ward has chosen to use all these varied gifts and
accomplishments for a certain purpose.  Briefly, Robert Elsmere, a
priest of the Anglican Church, marries a very religious woman; there
is the perfection of "mutual love"; at length he has doubts about
"historic Christianity"; he gives up his orders; carries his
learning, his fine intellect, his goodness, nay, his saintliness,
into a kind of Unitarianism; the wife becomes more intolerant than
ever; there is a long and faithful effort on both sides, eventually
successful, on the part of these mentally [66] divided people, to
hold together; ending with the hero's death, the genuine piety and
resignation of which is the crowning touch in the author's able,
learned, and thoroughly sincere apology for Robert Elsmere's
position.

For good or evil, the sort of doubts which troubled Robert Elsmere
are no novelty in literature, and we think the main issue of the
"religious question" is not precisely where Mrs. Ward supposes--that
it has advanced, in more senses than one, beyond the point raised by
Renan's Vie de Jesus.  Of course, a man such as Robert Elsmere came
to be ought not to be a clergyman of the Anglican Church.  The priest
is still, and will, we think, remain, one of the necessary types of
humanity; and he is untrue to his type, unless, with whatever
inevitable doubts in this doubting age, he feels, on the whole, the
preponderance in it of those influences which make for faith.  It is
his triumph to achieve as much faith as possible in an age of
negation.  Doubtless, it is part of the ideal of the Anglican Church
that, under certain safeguards, it should find room for
latitudinarians even among its clergy.  Still, with these, as [67]
with all other genuine priests, it is the positive not the negative
result that justifies the position.  We have little patience with
those liberal clergy who dwell on nothing else than the difficulties
of faith and the propriety of concession to the opposite force.  Yes!
Robert Elsmere was certainly right in ceasing to be a clergyman.  But
it strikes us as a blot on his philosophical pretensions that he
should have been both so late in perceiving the difficulty, and then
so sudden and trenchant in dealing with so great and complex a
question.  Had he possessed a perfectly philosophic or scientific
temper he would have hesitated.  This is not the place to discuss in
detail the theological position very ably and seriously argued by
Mrs. Ward.  All we can say is that, one by one, Elsmere's objections
may be met by considerations of the same genus, and not less equal
weight, relatively to a world so obscure, in its origin and issues,
as that in which we live.

Robert Elsmere was a type of a large class of minds which cannot be
sure that the sacred story is true.  It is philosophical, doubtless,
and a duty to the intellect to recognize our doubts, [68] to locate
them, perhaps to give them practical effect.  It may be also a moral
duty to do this.  But then there is also a large class of minds which
cannot be sure it is false--minds of very various degrees of
conscientiousness and intellectual power, up to the highest.  They
will think those who are quite sure it is false unphilosophical
through lack of doubt.  For their part, they make allowance in their
scheme of life for a great possibility, and with some of them that
bare concession of possibility (the subject of it being what it is)
becomes the most important fact in the world.

The recognition of it straightway opens wide the door to hope and
love; and such persons are, as we fancy they always will be, the
nucleus of a Church.  Their particular phase of doubt, of philosophic
uncertainty, has been the secret of millions of good Christians,
multitudes of worthy priests.  They knit themselves to believers, in
various degrees, of all ages.  As against the purely negative action
of the scientific spirit, the high-pitched Grey, the theistic
Elsmere, the "ritualistic priest," the quaint Methodist Fleming, both
so admirably sketched, present [69] perhaps no unconquerable
differences.  The question of the day is not between one and another
of these, but in another sort of opposition, well defined by Mrs.
Ward herself, between--

"Two estimates of life--the estimate which is the offspring of the
scientific spirit, and which is for ever making the visible world
fairer and more desirable in mortal eyes; and the estimate of Saint
Augustine."

To us, the belief in God, in goodness at all, in the story of
Bethlehem, does not rest on evidence so diverse in character and
force as Mrs. Ward supposes.  At his death Elsmere has started what
to us would be a most unattractive place of worship, where he
preaches an admirable sermon on the purely human aspect of the life
of Christ.  But we think there would be very few such sermons in the
new church or chapel, for the interest of that life could hardly be
very varied, when all such sayings as that "though He was rich, for
our sakes He became poor" have ceased to be applicable to it.  It is
the infinite nature of Christ which has led to such diversities of
genius in preaching as St. Francis, and Taylor, and Wesley.

[70] And after all we fear we have been unjust to Mrs. Ward's work.
If so, we should read once more, and advise our readers to read, the
profoundly thought and delicately felt chapter--chapter forty-three
in her third volume--in which she describes the final spiritual
reunion, on a basis of honestly diverse opinion, of the husband and
wife.  Her view, we think, could hardly have been presented more
attractively.  For ourselves we can only thank her for pleasure and
profit in the reading of her book, which has refreshed actually the
first and deepest springs of feeling, while it has charmed the
literary sense.

28th March 1888





V.  THEIR MAJESTIES' SERVANTS




Annals of the English Stage, from Thomas Betterton to Edmund Kean.
By Dr. Doran, F.S.A.  Edited and revised by Robert W. Lowe.  John C.
Nimmo.

[73] THOSE who care for the history of the drama as a branch of
literature, or for the history of that general development of human
manners of which the stage has been always an element and a very
lively measure or index, will be grateful to Mr. Lowe for this
revised and charmingly illustrated edition of Dr. Doran's pleasant
old book.  Three hundred years and more of a singularly varied and
vivacious sort of history!--it was a bold thing to undertake; and Dr.
Doran did his work well--did it with adequate "love."  These Annals
of the English Stage, from Thomas Betterton to Edmund [74] Kean, are
full of the colours of life in their most emphatic and motley
contrasts, as is natural in proportion as the stage itself
concentrates and artificially intensifies the character and
conditions of ordinary life.  The long story of "Their Majesties'
Servants," treated thus, becomes from age to age an agreeable
addition to those personal memoirs--Evelyn's, and the like--which
bring the influence and charm of a visible countenance to the dry
tenour of ordinary history, and the critic's work upon it naturally
becomes, in the first place, a mere gathering of some of the flowers
which lie so abundantly scattered here and there.

A history of the English stage must necessarily be in part a history
of one of the most delightful of subjects--old London, of which from
time to time we catch extraordinary glimpses in Dr. Doran's pages.
From 1682 to 1695, as if the Restoration had not come, there was but
one theatre in London.  In Charles I.'s time Shoreditch was the
dramatic quarter of London par excellence.--

"The popular taste was not only there directed towards the stage, but
it was a district [75] wherein many actors dwelt, and consequently
died.  The baptismal register of St.  Leonard's, Shoreditch, contains
Christian names which appear to have been chosen with reference to
the heroines of Shakespeare; and the record of burials bears the name
of many an old actor of mark whose remains now lie within the
churchyard."

Earlier and later, the Surrey side of the Thames was the favourite
locality for play-houses.  The Globe was there, and the Bear-garden,
represented in Mr. Lowe's luxurious new edition by delightful
woodcuts.  For this new edition adds to the original merits of the
work the very substantial charm of abundant illustrations, first-rate
in subject and execution, and of three kinds--copper-plate likenesses
of actors and other personages connected with theatrical history; a
series of delicate, picturesque, highly detailed woodcuts of
theatrical topography, chiefly the little old theatres; and, by way
of tail-pieces to the chapters, a second series of woodcuts of a
vigour and reality of information, within very limited compass, which
make one think of Callot and the German [76] "little masters,"
depicting Garrick and other famous actors in their favourite scenes.

In the vignettes of the Bear-garden and the Swan Theatre, for
instance, the artist has managed to throw over his minute plate a
wonderful air of pleasantness, a light which, though very delicate,
is very theatrical.  The river and its tiny craft, the little gabled
houses of the neighbourhood, with a garden or two dropped in, tell
delightfully in the general effect.  They are worthy to rank with
Cruikshank's illustrations of Jack Sheppard and The Tower of London,
as mementoes of the little old smokeless London before the century of
Johnson, though that, too, as Dr. Doran bears witness, knew what fogs
could be.  Then there is the Fortune Theatre near Cripplegate, and,
most charming of all, two views--street and river fronts--the Duke's
Theatre, Dorset Garden, in Fleet Street, designed by Wren, decorated
by Gibbons--graceful, naive, dainty, like the work of a very refined
Palladio, working minutely, perhaps more delicately than at Vicenza,
in the already crowded city on the Thames side.

[77] The portraits of actors and other theatrical celebrities range
from Elizabeth, from the melodramatic costumes and faces of the
contemporaries of Shakespeare, to the conventional costumes, the
rotund expression, of the age of the Georges, masking a power of
imaginative impersonation probably unknown in Shakespeare's day.
Edward Burbage, like Shakespeare's own portrait, is, we venture to
think, a trifle stolid.  Field--Nathaniel Field, author of The Fatal
Dowry, and an actor of reputation--in his singular costume, and with
a face of perhaps not quite reassuring subtlety, might pass for the
original of those Italian, or Italianized, voluptuaries in sin which
pleased the fancy of Shakespeare's age.  Mixed up with many striking,
thoroughly dramatic physiognomies, it must be confessed that some of
these portraits scarcely help at all to explain the power of the
players to whom they belonged.  That, perhaps, is what we might
naturally expect; the more, in proportion as the dramatic art is a
matter in which many very subtle and indirect channels to men's
sympathy are called into play.  Edward Alleyn, from the portrait
preserved at [78] his noble foundation at Dulwich, like a fine
Holbein, figures, in blent strength and delicacy, as a genial, or
perhaps jovial, soul, finding time for sentiment,--Prynne (included,
we suppose, in this company, like the skull at the feast) as a
likable if somewhat melancholic young man; while Garrick and his wife
playing cards, after Zoffany, present a pair of just very nice young
people.  On the other hand, the tail-pieces, chiefly devoted to
Garrick, prove what a wonderful natural variety there was in
Garrick's soul, and are well worth comparative study.  Noticeable
again, among the whole-plate portraits, is the thoroughly reassuring
countenance of Steele, the singularly fine heads of John, Charles,
and Fanny Kemble, while the certainly plain, pinched countenance of
William Davenant reminds one of Charles Kean, and might well have
lighted up, as did his, when the soul came into it, into power and
charm, as the speaking eyes assure us even in its repose.

The Renaissance inherited the old foolish prejudice of Roman times,
when, although the writers of plays were the intimate friends of
emperors, the actors were thought infamous. [79] Still, on the whole,
actors fared better in England than in Romanist France, where Moliere
was buried with less ceremony than a favourite dog.  Very different
was the treatment of the eminent Mrs. Oldfield, who died in 1730:--

"Poor 'Narcissa' after death (says Walpole) was attired in a Holland
nightdress, with tucker and double ruffles of Brunswick lace, of
which latter material she also wore a headdress, and a pair of new
kid gloves.  In this dress the deceased actress received such honour
as actress never received before, nor has ever received since.  The
lady lay in state in the Jerusalem Chamber.  Had she been really a
queen the public could not have thronged more eagerly to the
spectacle; and after the lying in state there was a funeral of as
much ceremony as has been observed at the obsequies of many a queen.
There were anthems and prayers and a sermon; and Dr. Parker, who
officiated, remarked, when all was over, to a few particular friends,
and with some equivocation, as it seems to me, that he  'buried her
very willingly, and with much satisfaction.'"

Yet even in England players had need of [80] powerful protectors.
"Wit," said Chesterfield, opposing an unjust licensing Act, "Wit, my
lords! is the property of those who have it, and too often the only
property they have to depend on."  Wit, indeed, with the other gifts
that make good company, has largely gone with theatrical talents, too
often little to the benefit of the gifted persons.  Theatrical
society, rather than the theatre, has made the lives of actors as we
see them in these volumes, in many cases so tragic, even sordidly
tragic.

If misery and madness abound in stage life, so also does an
indomitable cheerfulness, always at least a cheerful countenance.
Dr. Doran's book abounds, as might be expected, with admirable
impromptus and the like; one might collect a large posy of them.
Foote, seeing a sweep on a blood-horse, remarked, "There goes
Warburton on Shakespeare!"  When he heard that the Rockingham Cabinet
was fatigued to death and at its wits' end, he exclaimed that it
could not have been the length of the journey which had tired it.
Again, when Lord Carmarthen, at a party, told him his handkerchief
was hanging from his pocket, Foote replaced [81] it with a "Thank
you, my lord; you know the company better than I."  Jevon, a century
earlier, was in the habit of taking great liberties with authors and
audience.  He made Settle half mad and the house ecstatic when
having, as Lycurgus, Prince of China, to "fall on his sword," he
placed it flat on the stage, and, falling over it, "died," according
to the direction of the acting copy.  Quaint enough, but certainly no
instance of anybody's wit, is the account of how a French translation
of a play of Vanbrugh--not architect of Blenheim only, but
accomplished in many other ways--appeared at the Odeon, in 1862, with
all fitting raptures, as a posthumous work of Voltaire recently
discovered.  The Voltairean wit vas found as "delightful in this as
in the last century."

Of Shakespeare on the stage Dr. Doran has a hundred curious things to
note:--that Richard the Third, for instance, who has retained a so
unflattering possession of the stage, was its "first practically
useful patron."  We see Queen Elizabeth full of misgiving at a
difficult time at the popularity of Richard the Second:--"The
deposition and death of King Richard the [82] Second."  "Tongues
whisper to the Queen that this play is part of a great plot to teach
her subjects how to murder kings."  It is perhaps not generally known
that Charles Shakespeare, William's brother, survived till the
Restoration.

Oldys says, a propos of the restoration of the stage at that time:--

"The actors were greedily inquisitive into every little circumstance,
more especially in Shakespeare's dramatic character, which his
brother could relate of him.  But he, it seems, was so stricken in
years, and possibly his memory so weakened by infirmities, that he
could give them but little light into their inquiries; and all that
could be recollected from him of his brother Will in that station was
the faint, general, and almost lost ideas he had of having once seen
him act a part in one of his own comedies, wherein being present to
personate a decrepit old man, he wore a long beard, and appeared so
weak and drooping and unable to walk, that he was forced to be
supported and carried by another person to a table, at which he was
seated among some company who were eating, and one of them sang a
song."

[83] This description applies to old Adam in As You Like It.  Many
are the evidences that Shakespeare's reputation had from time to time
a struggle to maintain itself.  James Howard, in Pepys's day--

"Belonged to the faction which affected to believe that there was no
popular love for Shakespeare, to render whom palatable he arranged
Romeo and Juliet for the stage, with a double denouement--one
serious, the other hilarious.  If your heart were too sensitive to
bear the deaths of the loving pair, you had only to go on the
succeeding afternoon to see them wedded, and set upon the way of a
well-assured domestic felicity."

In 1678 Rymer asserted (was it undesignedly a true testimony to the
acting of his time?) that Shakespeare had depicted Brutus and Cassius
as "Jack Puddins."

Here, as in many another detail, we are reminded, of course, of the
difference between our own and past times in mimic as in real life.
For Prynne one of the great horrors of the stage was the introduction
of actresses from France by Henrietta Maria, to take the place of
young [84] male actors of whom Dr. Doran has some interesting
notices.  Who the lady was who first trod the stage as a professional
actress is not known, but her part was Desdemona.  And yet it was
long after that--

"Edward Kynaston died (in 1712).  He lies buried in the churchyard of
St. Paul's, Covent Garden.  If not the greatest actor of his day,
Kynaston was the greatest of the 'boy-actresses.'  So exalted was his
reputation 'that,' says Downes, 'it has since been disputable among
the judicious, whether any woman that succeeded him so sensibly
touched the audience as he.'"

In Charles II.'s time it was a custom to return the price of
admission to all persons who left the theatre before the close of the
first act.  Consequently, many shabby persons were wont to force
their way in without paying, on the plea that they did not intend to
remain beyond the time limited.  Hence much noisy contention, to the
great discomfort even of Royalty.  The brawling, drinking habits of
the time were even more discomforting.  An angry word, passed one
April evening of 1682 between the son of Sir Edward Dering and a hot-
blooded young [85] Welshman, led to recrimination and sword-drawing.
The two young fellows not having elbow-room in the pit, clambered on
to the stage, and fought there, to the greater comfort of the
audience, and with a more excited fury on the part of the combatants.
The mingling of the public with the players was a practice which so
annoyed the haughty French actor, Baron, that to suggest to the
audience the absurdity of it, he would turn his back on them for a
whole act, and play to the audience on the stage.  Sometimes the
noise was so loud that an actor's voice would scarcely be heard.  It
was about 1710 that the word encore was introduced at the operatic
performances in the Haymarket, and very much objected to by plain-
going Englishmen.  It was also the custom of some who desired the
repetition of a song to cry Altra volta!  Altra volta!

Even indirectly the history of the stage illustrates life, and
affords many unexpected lights on historical characters.  Oliver
Cromwell, though he despised the stage, could condescend to laugh at,
and with, men of less dignity than actors.  Buffoonery was not
entirely expelled [86] from his otherwise grave court.  Oxford and
Drury Lane itself dispute the dignity of giving birth to Nell Gwynne
with Hereford, where a mean house is still pointed out as the first
home of this mother of a line of dukes, whose great-grandson was to
occupy the neighbouring palace as Bishop of Hereford for forty years.
At her burial in St.  Martin's-in-the-Fields, Archbishop Tenison
preached the sermon.  When this was subsequently made the ground of
exposing him to the reproof of Queen Mary, she remarked that the good
doctor, no doubt, had said nothing but what the facts authorized.

"Who should act genteel comedy perfectly," asks Walpole, "but people
of fashion, that have sense?"  And, in truth, the seventeenth century
gave many ladies to the stage, Mrs. Barry being the most famous of
them.  Like many eminent actors, she was famous for the way in which
she would utter one single expression in a play.  Dr. Doran gives
some curious instances from later actors.  "What mean my grieving
subjects?" uttered in the character of Queen Elizabeth, was invested
by her with such emphatic grace and dignity as to call up murmurs of
approbation [87] which swelled into thunders of applause.  Her noble
head is here engraved after Kneller, like the head of a magnificent
visionary man.

Should we really care for the greatest actors of the past could we
have them before us?  Should we find them too different from our
accent of thought, of feeling, of speech, in a thousand minute
particulars which are of the essence of all three?  Dr. Doran's long
and interesting records of the triumphs of Garrick, and other less
familiar, but in their day hardly less astonishing, players, do not
relieve one of the doubt.  Garrick himself, as sometimes happens with
people who have been the subject of much anecdote and other
conversation, here as elsewhere, bears no very distinct figure.  One
hardly sees the wood for the trees.  On the other hand, the account
of Betterton, "perhaps the greatest of English actors," is
delightfully fresh.  That intimate friend of Dryden, Tillatson, Pope,
who executed a copy of the actor's portrait by Kneller which is still
extant, was worthy of their friendship; his career brings out the
best elements in stage life.  The stage in these volumes presents
itself indeed not merely [88] as a mirror of life, but as an
illustration of the utmost intensity of life, in the fortunes and
characters of the players.  Ups and downs, generosity, dark fates,
the most delicate goodness, have nowhere been more prominent than in
the private existence of those devoted to the public mimicry of men
and women.  Contact with the stage, almost throughout its history,
presents itself as a kind of touchstone, to bring out the bizarrerie,
the theatrical tricks and contrasts, of the actual world.

27th June 1888





VI.  WORDSWORTH




The Complete Poetical Works of William Wordsworth.  With an
Introduction by John Morley.  Macmillans.

The Recluse.  By William Wordsworth.  Macmillans.

Selections from Wordsworth.  By William Knight and other Members of
the Wordsworth Society.  With Preface and Notes.  Kegan Paul.

[91] THE appearance, so close to each other, of Professor Knight's
careful and elaborately annotated Selections from William Wordsworth,
of Messrs. Macmillan's collected edition of the poet's works, with the
first book of The Recluse, now published for the first time, and of
an excellent introductory essay by Mr. John Morley, forms a welcome
proof that the study of the [92] most philosophic of English poets is
increasing among us.  Surely nothing could be better, hardly anything
more directly fitted than careful reading of Wordsworth, to counter
the faults and offences of our busy generation, in regard both to
thought and taste, and to remind people, amid the enormous expansion,
at the present time, of all that is material and mechanical in life,
of the essential value, the permanent ends, of life itself.  In the
collected edition the poems are printed with the dates, so far as can
be ascertained, in the order of their composition--an arrangement
which has indisputable recommendations for the student of
Wordsworth's genius; though the former method of distributing his
work into large groups of subject had its value, as throwing light
upon his poetic motives, and more especially as coming from himself.

In his introductory essay Mr. Morley has dwelt strongly on the
circumstance of Wordsworth's remarkable personal happiness, as having
had much to do with the physiognomy of his poetic creation--a calm,
irresistible, well-being--almost mystic in character, and yet
doubtless [93] connected with physical conditions.  Long ago De
Quincey noted it as a strongly determinant fact in Wordsworth's
literary career, pointing, at the same time, to his remarkable good
luck also, on the material side of life.  The poet's own flawless
temperament, his fine mountain atmosphere of mind (so to express it),
had no doubt a good deal to do with that.  What a store of good
fortune, what a goodly contribution to happiness, in the very best
sense of that term, is really involved in a cheerful, grateful,
physical temperament; especially, in the case of a poet--a great
poet--who will, of course, have to face the appropriate trials of a
great poet.

Coleridge and other English critics at the beginning of the present
century had a great deal to say concerning a psychological
distinction of much importance (as it appeared to them) between the
fancy and the imagination.  Stripped of a great deal of somewhat
obscure metaphysical theory, this distinction reduced itself to the
certainly vital one, with which all true criticism more or less
directly has to do, between the lower and higher degrees of intensity
in the [94] poet's conception of his subject, and his concentration
of himself upon his work.  It was Wordsworth who made most of this
distinction, assuming it as the basis for the final classification
(abandoned, as we said, in the new edition) of his poetical writings.
And nowhere is the distinction more realizable than in Wordsworth's
own work.  For though what may be called professed Wordsworthians,
including Matthew Arnold, found a value in all that remains of him--
could read anything he wrote, "even the 'Thanksgiving Ode,'--
everything, I think, except 'Vaudracour and Julia,'"--yet still the
decisiveness of such selections as those made by Arnold himself, and
now by Professor Knight, hint at a certain very obvious difference of
level in his poetic work.

This perpetual suggestion of an absolute duality between his lower
and higher moods, and the poetic work produced in them, stimulating
the reader to look below the immediate surface of his poetry, makes
the study of Wordsworth an excellent exercise for the training of
those mental powers in us, which partake both of thought and
imagination.  It begets in those [95] who fall in with him at the
right moment of their spiritual development, a habit of reading
between the lines, a faith in the effect of concentration and
collectedness of mind on the right appreciation of poetry, the
expectation that what is really worth having in the poetic order will
involve, on their part, a certain discipline of the temper not less
than of the intellect.  Wordsworth meets them with the assurance that
he has much to give them, and of a very peculiar kind, if they will
follow a certain difficult way, and seems to possess the secret of
some special mental illumination.  To follow that way is an
initiation, by which they will become able to distinguish, in art,
speech, feeling, manners, in men and life generally, what is genuine,
animated, and expressive from what is only conventional and
derivative, and therefore inexpressive.

A very intimate sense of the expressiveness of outward things, which
ponders, listens, penetrates, where the earlier, less developed
consciousness passed lightly by, is an important element in the
general temper of our modern poetry.  Critics of literary history
have again [96] and again remarked upon it; it is a characteristic
which reveals itself in many different forms, but is strongest and
most sympathetic in what is strongest and most serious in modern
literature; it is exemplified by writers as unlike Wordsworth as the
French romanticist poets.  As a curious chapter in the history of the
human mind, its growth might be traced from Rousseau and St. Pierre
to Chateaubriand, from Chateaubriand to Victor Hugo; it has no doubt
some obscure relationship to those pantheistic theories which have
greatly occupied people's minds in many modern readings of
philosophy; it makes as much difference between the modern and the
earlier landscape art as there is between the roughly outlined masks
of a Byzantine mosaic and a portrait by Reynolds or Romney.  Of this
new landscape sense the poetry of Wordsworth is the elementary and
central exposition; he is more exclusively occupied with its
development than any other poet.  Wordsworth's own character, as we
have already observed, was dominated by a certain contentment, a sort
of naturally religious placidity, not often found in union with a
poetic sensibility so [97] active as his; and this gentle sense of
well-being was favourable to the quiet, habitual observation of the
inanimate, or imperfectly animate, world.  His life of eighty placid
years was almost without what, with most human beings, count for
incidents.  His flight from the active world, so genially celebrated
in this newly published poem of The Recluse; his flight to the Vale
of Grasmere, like that of some pious youth to the Chartreuse, is the
most marked event of his existence.  His life's changes are almost
entirely inward ones; it falls into broad, untroubled, perhaps
somewhat monotonous, spaces; his biographers have very little to
tell.  What it really most resembles, different as its superficies
may look, is the career of those early mediaeval religious artists,
who, precisely because their souls swarmed with heavenly visions,
passed their fifty or sixty years in tranquil, systematic industry,
seemingly with no thoughts beyond it.  This placid life developed in
Wordsworth, to an extraordinary degree, an innate sensibility to
natural sights and sounds--the flower and its shadow on the stone,
the cuckoo and its echo.  The poem of [98] "Resolution and
Independence" is a storehouse of such records; for its fulness of
lovely imagery it may be compared to Keats's "Saint Agnes' Eve."  To
read one of his greater pastoral poems for the first time is like a
day spent in a new country; the memory is crowded for a while with
its precise and vivid incidents:--

The pliant harebell swinging in the breeze,
On some grey rock:
The single sheep, and the one blasted tree,
And the bleak music from that old stone wall:--
In the meadows and the lower ground,
Was all the sweetness of a common dawn:--
And that green corn all day is rustling in thine ears!

Clear and delicate at once as he is in the outlining of visible
imagery, he is more finely scrupulous still in the noting of sounds;
he conceives of noble sound as even moulding the human countenance to
nobler types, and as something actually "profaned" by visible form or
colour.  He has a power likewise of realizing and conveying to the
consciousness of his reader abstract and elementary impressions,
silence, darkness, absolute motionlessness, or, again, the whole
complex sentiment of a particular place, the abstract expression of
desolation in the long [99] white road, of peacefulness in a
particular folding of the hills.

That sense of a life in natural objects, which in most poetry is but
a rhetorical artifice, was, then, in Wordsworth the assertion of what
was for him almost literal fact.  To him every natural object seemed
to possess something of moral or spiritual life, to be really capable
of a companionship with man, full of fine intimacies.  An emanation,
a particular spirit, belonged not to the moving leaves or water only,
but to the distant peak arising suddenly, by some change of
perspective, above the nearer horizon of the hills, to the passing
space of light across the plain, to the lichened Druidic stone even,
for a certain weird fellowship in it with the moods of men.  That he
awakened "a sort of thought in sense" is Shelley's just estimate of
this element in Wordsworth's poetry.

It was through nature, ennobled in this way by the semblance of
passion and thought, that the poet approached the spectacle of human
life.  For him, indeed, human life is, in the first instance, only an
additional, and as it were incidental grace, upon this expressive
landscape.

[100] When he thought of men and women, it was of men and women as in
the presence and under the influence of those effective natural
objects, and linked to them by many associations.  Such influences
have sometimes seemed to belittle those who are the subject of them,
at the least to be likely to narrow the range of their sympathies.
To Wordsworth, on the contrary, they seemed directly to dignify human
nature, as tending to tranquillize it.  He raises physical nature to
the level of human thought, giving it thereby a mystic power and
expression; he subdues man to the level of nature, but gives him
therewith a certain breadth and vastness and solemnity.

Religious sentiment, consecrating the natural affections and rights
of the human heart, above all that pitiful care and awe for the
perishing human clay of which relic-worship is but the corruption,
has always had much to do with localities, with the thoughts which
attach themselves to definite scenes and places.  And what is true of
it everywhere is truest in those secluded valleys, where one
generation after another maintains the same abiding-place; and [101]
it was on this side that Wordsworth apprehended religion most
strongly.  Having so much to do with the recognition of local
sanctities, the habit of connecting the very trees and stones of a
particular spot of earth with the great events of life, till the low
walls, the green mounds, the half-obliterated epitaphs, seemed full
of oracular voices, even the religion of those people of the dales
appeared but as another link between them and the solemn imageries of
the natural world.  And, again, this too tranquillized them, by
bringing them under the rule of traditional, narrowly localized
observances.  "Grave livers," they seemed to him under this aspect,
of stately speech, and something of that natural dignity of manners
which underlies the highest courtesy.

And, seeing man thus as a part of nature, elevated and solemnized in
proportion as his daily life and occupations brought him into
companionship with permanent natural objects, he was able to
appreciate passion in the lowly.  He chooses to depict people from
humble life, because, being nearer to nature than others, they are on
the whole more impassioned, certainly [102] more direct in their
expression of passion, than other men; it is for this direct
expression of passion that he values their humble words.  In much
that he said in exaltation of rural life he was but pleading
indirectly for that sincerity, that perfect fidelity to one's own
inward presentations, to the precise features of the picture within,
without which any profound poetry is impossible.  It was not for
their tameness, but for their impassioned sincerity, that he chose
incidents and situations from common life, "related in a selection of
language really used by men."  He constantly endeavours to bring his
language nearer to the real language of men; but it is to the real
language of men, not on the dead level of their ordinary intercourse,
but in certain select moments of vivid sensation, when this language
is winnowed and ennobled by sentiment.  There are poets who have
chosen rural life for their subject for the sake of its passionless
repose; and there are times when Wordsworth himself extols the mere
calm and dispassionate survey of things as the highest aim of
poetical culture.  But it was not for such passionless calm that he
preferred the scenes of [103] pastoral life; and the meditative poet,
sheltering himself from the agitations of the outward world, is in
reality only clearing the scene for the exhibition of great emotions,
and what he values most is the almost elementary expression of
elementary feelings.

In Wordsworth's prefatory advertisement to the first edition of The
Prelude, published in 1850, it is stated that that work was intended
to be introductory to The Recluse: and that The Recluse, if
completed, would have consisted of three parts.  The second part is
The Excursion.  The third part was only planned; but the first book
of the first part was left in manuscript by Wordsworth--though in
manuscript, it is said, in no great condition of forwardness for the
printers.  This book, now for the first time printed in extenso (a
very noble passage from it found place in that prose advertisement to
The Excursion), is the great novelty of this latest edition of
Wordsworth's poetic works.  It was well worth adding to the poet's
great bequest to English literature.  The true student of his work,
who has formulated for himself what he supposes to be the leading
characteristics [104] of Wordsworth's genius, will feel, we think, a
lively interest in putting them to test by the many and various
striking passages in what is there presented for the first time.

17th February 1889





VII.  MR. GOSSE'S POEMS




On Viol and Flute.  By Edmund Gosse.

[107] PERHAPS no age of literature, certainly no age of literature in
England, has been so rich as ours in excellent secondary poetry; and
it is with our poetry (in a measure) as with our architecture,
constrained by the nature of the case to be imitative.  Our
generation, quite reasonably, is not very proud of its architectural
creations; confesses that it knows too much--knows, but cannot do.
And yet we could name certain modern churches in London, for
instance, to which posterity may well look back puzzled.--Could these
exquisitely pondered buildings have been indeed works of the
nineteenth century?  Were they not the subtlest creations of the age
in which Gothic art was spontaneous?  In truth, we have had instances
of workmen, who, through long, large, [108] devoted study of the
handiwork of the past, have done the thing better, with a more fully
enlightened consciousness, with full intelligence of what those early
workmen only guessed at.  And something like this is true of some of
our best secondary poetry.  It is the least that is true--the least
that can fairly be said in praise of the poetic work of Mr. Edmund
Gosse.

Of course there can be no exact parallel between arts so different as
architecture and poetic composition: But certainly in the poetry of
our day also, though it has been in some instances powerfully
initiative and original, there is great scholarship, a large
comparative acquaintance with the poetic methods of earlier workmen,
and a very subtle intelligence of their charm.  Of that fine
scholarship in this matter there is no truer example than Mr. Gosse.
It is manifested especially in the even finish of his varied work, in
the equality of his level--a high level--in species of composition so
varied as the three specimens which follow.

Far away, in late spring, "by the sea in the south," the swallows are
still lingering around "white Algiers."  In Mr. Gosse's "Return of
[109] the Swallows," the northern birds--lark and thrush--have long
been calling to them:--

And something awoke in the slumbering heart
Of the alien birds in their African air,
And they paused, and alighted, and twittered apart,
And met in the broad white dreamy square,
And the sad slave woman, who lifted up
From the fountain her broad-lipped earthen cup,
Said to herself, with a weary sigh,
"To-morrow the swallows will northward fly."

Compare the following stanzas, from a kind of palinode, "1870-1871,"
years of the Franco-German war and the Parisian Commune:--

The men who sang that pain was sweet
Shuddered to see the mask of death
Storm by with myriad thundering feet;
The sudden truth caught up our breath
Our throats like pulses beat.

The songs of pale emaciate hours,
The fungus-growth of years of peace,
Withered before us like mown flowers;
We found no pleasure more in these
When bullets fell in showers.

For men whose robes are dashed with blood,
What joy to dream of gorgeous stairs,
Stained with the torturing interlude
That soothed a Sultan's midday prayers,
In old days harsh and rude?

[110]

For men whose lips are blanched and white,
With aching wounds and torturing thirst,
What charm in canvas shot with light,
And pale with faces cleft and curst,
Past life and life's delight?

And then Mr. Gosse's purely descriptive power, his aptitude for
still-life and landscape, is unmistakably vivid and sound.  Take, for
an instance, this description of high-northern summer:--

The ice-white mountains clustered all around us,
But arctic summer blossomed at our feet;
The perfume of the creeping sallows found us,
The cranberry-flowers were sweet.

Below us through the valley crept a river,
Cleft round an island where the Lap-men lay;
Its sluggish water dragged with slow endeavour
The mountain snows away.

There is no night-time in the northern summer,
But golden shimmer fills the hours of sleep,
And sunset fades not, till the bright new-comer,
Red sunrise, smites the deep.

But when the blue snow-shadows grew intenser
Across the peaks against the golden sky,
And on the hills the knots of deer grew denser,
And raised their tender cry,

[111]

And wandered downward to the Lap-men's dwelling,
We knew our long sweet day was nearly spent,
And slowly, with our hearts within us swelling,
Our homeward steps we bent.

"Sunshine before Sunrise!"  There's a novelty in that, for poetic use
at least, so far as we know, though we remember one fine paragraph
about it in Sartor Resartus.  The grim poetic sage of Chelsea,
however, had never seen what he describes: not so Mr. Gosse, whose
acquaintance with northern lands and northern literature is special.
We have indeed picked out those stanzas from a quiet personal record
of certain amorous hours of early youth in that quaint arctic land,
Mr. Gosse's description of which, like his pretty poem on Lubeck,
made one think that what the accomplished group of poets to which he
belongs requires is, above all, novelty of motive, of subject.

He takes, indeed, the old themes, and manages them better than their
old masters, with more delicate cadences, more delicate transitions
of thought, through long dwelling on earlier practice.  He seems to
possess complete command of the technique of poetry--every form of
what may be called skill of hand in it; and what marks in [112] him
the final achievement of poetic scholarship is the perfect balance
his work presents of so many and varied effects, as regards both
matter and form.  The memories of a large range of poetic reading are
blent into one methodical music so perfectly that at times the notes
seem almost simple.  Sounding almost all the harmonies of the modern
lyre, he has, perhaps as a matter of course, some of the faults also,
the "spasmodic" and other lapses, which from age to age, in
successive changes of taste, have been the "defects" of excellent
good "qualities."  He is certainly not the--

Pathetic singer, with no strength to sing,

as he says of the white-throat on the tulip-tree,

Whose leaves unfinished ape her faulty song.

In effect, a large compass of beautiful thought and expression, from
poetry old and new, have become to him matter malleable anew for a
further and finer reach of literary art.  And with the perfect grace
of an intaglio, he shows, as in truth the minute intaglio may do, the
faculty of structure, the logic of poetry.  "The New Endymion" is a
good instance of such sustained [113] power.  Poetic scholar!--If we
must reserve the sacred name of "poet" to a very small number, that
humbler but perhaps still rarer title is due indisputably to Mr.
Gosse.  His work is like exquisite modern Latin verse, into the
academic shape of which, discreet and coy, comes a sincere, deeply
felt consciousness of modern life, of the modern world as it is.  His
poetry, according with the best intellectual instincts of our
critical age, is as pointed out recently by a clever writer in the
Nineteenth Century, itself a kind of exquisite, finally revised
criticism.

Not that he fails in originality; only, the graces, inborn certainly,
but so carefully educated, strike one more.  The sense of his
originality comes to one as but an after-thought; and certainly one
sign of his vocation is that he has made no conscious effort to be
original.  In his beautiful opening poem of the "White-throat,"
giving his book its key-note, he seems, indeed, to accept that
position, reasons on and justifies it.  Yet there is a clear note of
originality (so it seems to us) in the peculiar charm of his strictly
personal compositions; and, generally, in such touches as he gives us
of the soul, the life, of the [114] nineteenth century.  Far greater,
we think, than the charm of poems strictly classic in interest, such
as the "Praise of Dionysus," exquisite as that is, is the charm of
those pieces in which, so to speak, he transforms, by a kind of
colour-change, classic forms and associations into those--say! of
Thames-side--pieces which, though in manner or subject promising a
classic entertainment, almost unaware bring you home.--No! after all,
it is not imagined Greece, dreamy, antique Sicily, but the present
world about us, though mistakable for a moment, delightfully, for the
land, the age, of Sappho, of Theocritus:--

There is no amaranth, no pomegranate here,
But can your heart forget the Christmas rose,
The crocuses and snowdrops once so dear?

Quite congruously with the placid, erudite, quality of his culture,
although, like other poets, he sings much of youth, he is often most
successful in the forecast, the expression, of the humours, the
considerations, that in truth are more proper to old age:--

When age comes by and lays his frosty hands
So lightly on mine eyes, that, scarce aware

[115]

Of what an endless weight of gloom they bear,
I pause, unstirred, and wait for his commands.
When time has bound these limbs of mine with bands,
And hushed mine ears, and silvered all my hair,
May sorrow come not, nor a vain despair
Trouble my soul that meekly girdled stands.

As silent rivers into silent lakes,
Through hush of reeds that not a murmur breaks,
Wind, mindful of the poppies whence they came,
So may my life, and calmly burn away,
As ceases in a lamp at break of day
The flagrant remnant of memorial flame.

Euthanasia!--Yet Mr. Gosse, with all his accomplishment, is still a
young man.  His youthful confidence in the perpetuity of poetry, of
the poetical interests in life, creed-less as he may otherwise seem
to be, is, we think, a token, though certainly an unconscious token,
of the spontaneous originality of his muse.  For a writer of his
peculiar philosophic tenets, at all events, the world itself, in
truth, must seem irretrievably old or even decadent.

Old, decadent, indeed, it would seem with Mr. Gosse to be also
returning to the thoughts, the fears, the consolations, of its youth
in Greece, in Italy:--

[116]

Nor seems it strange indeed
To hold the happy creed
That all fair things that bloom and die
Have conscious life as well as I.

Then let me joy to be
Alive with bird and tree,
And have no haughtier aim than this,
To be a partner in their bliss.

Convinced, eloquent,--again and again the notes of Epicurean
philosophy fall almost unconsciously from his lips.  With poetry at
hand, he appears to feel no misgivings.  A large faith he might seem
to have in what is called "natural optimism," the beauty and
benignity of nature, if let alone, in her mechanical round of changes
with man and beast and flower.  Her method, however, certainly
involves forgetfulness for the individual; and to this, to the
prospect of oblivion, poetry, too, may help to brace us, if, unlike
so genial and cheerful a poet as Mr. Gosse, we need bracing thereto:-
-

Now, giant-like, the tall young ploughmen go
Between me and the sunset, footing slow;
My spirit, as an uninvited guest,
Goes with them, wondering what desire, what aim,
May stir their hearts and mine with common flame,
Or, thoughtless, do their hands suffice their soul?

[117]

I know not, care not, for I deem no shame
To hold men, flowers, and trees and stars the same,
Myself, as these, one atom in the whole.

That is from one of those half-Greek, half-English idylls, reminding
one of Frederick Walker's "Ploughman," of Mason's "Evening Hymn," in
which Mr. Gosse is at his best.  A favourite motive, he has treated
it even more melodiously in "Lying in the Grass":--

I do not hunger for a well-stored mind,
I only wish to live my life, and find
My heart in unison with all mankind.

My life is like the single dewy star
That trembles on the horizon's primrose-bar,--
A microcosm where all things living are.

And if, among the noiseless grasses, Death
Should come behind and take away my breath,
I should not rise as one who sorroweth;

For I should pass, but all the world would be
Full of desire and young delight and glee,
And why should men be sad through loss of me?

The light is flying; in the silver-blue
The young moon shines from her bright window through:
The mowers are all gone, and I go too.

A vein of thought as modern as it is old!  More not less depressing,
certainly, to our over-meditative [118], susceptible, nervous,
modern age, than to that antiquity which was indeed the genial youth
of the world, but, sweetly attuned by his skill of touch, it is the
sum of what Mr. Gosse has to tell us of the experience of life.  Or
is it, after all, to quote him once more, that beyond those ever-
recurring pagan misgivings, those pale pagan consolations, our
generation feels yet cannot adequately express--

The passion and the stress
Of thoughts too tender and too sad to be
Enshrined in any melody she knows?

29th October 1890





VIII.  FERDINAND FABRE




[NORINE]: AN IDYLL OF THE CEVENNES


[121] A FRENCH novelist who, with much of Zola's undoubted power,
writes always in the interest of that high type of Catholicism which
still prevails in the remote provinces of France, of that high type of
morality of which the French clergy have nobly maintained the ideal,
is worth recommending to the more serious class of English readers.
Something of the gift of Francois Millet, whose peasants are
veritable priests, of those older religious painters who could
portray saintly heads so sweetly and their merely human proteges so
truly, seems indeed to have descended to M. Ferdinand Fabre.  In the
Abbe Tigrane, in Lucifer, and elsewhere, he has delineated, with
wonderful power and patience, a strictly ecclesiastical portraiture--
[122] shrewd, passionate, somewhat melancholy heads, which, though
they are often of peasant origin, are never by any chance
undignified.  The passions he treats of in priests are, indeed,
strictly clerical, most often their ambitions--not the errant humours
of the mere man in the priest, but movements of spirit properly
incidental to the clerical type itself.  Turning to the secular
brothers and sisters of these peasant ecclesiastics, at first sight
so strongly contrasted with them, M. Fabre shows a great acquaintance
with the sources, the effects, of average human feeling; but still in
contact--in contact, as its conscience, its better mind, its ideal--
with the institutions of religion.  What constitutes his
distinguishing note as a writer is the recognition of the religious,
the Catholic, ideal, intervening masterfully throughout the picture
he presents of life, as the only mode of poetry realizable by the
poor; and although, of course, it does a great deal more beside,
certainly doing the high work of poetry effectively.  For his
background he has chosen, has made his own and conveys very vividly
to his readers, a district of France, gloomy, in spite of its
almonds, its [123] oil and wine, but certainly grandiose.  The large
towns, the sparse hamlets, the wide landscape of the Cevennes, are
for his books what the Rhineland is to those delightful authors,
Messrs. Erckmann-Chatrian.  In Les Courbezon, the French Vicar of
Wakefield, as Sainte-Beuve declared, with this imposing background,
the Church and the world, as they shape themselves in the Cevennes,
the priest and the peasant, occupy about an equal share of interest.
Sometimes, as in the charming little book we wish now to introduce,
unclerical human nature occupies the foreground almost exclusively;
though priestly faces will still be found gazing upon us from time to
time.

In form, the book is a bundle of letters from a Parisian litterateur
to the friend of his boyhood, now the cure of one of those mountain
villages.  He is refreshing himself, in the midst of dusty,
sophisticated Paris, with memories of their old, delightful
existence--vagabonde, libre, agreste, pastorale--in their upland
valley.  He can appeal safely to the aged cure's friendly justice,
even in exposing delicacies of sentiment which most men conceal:--

[124] "As for you, frank, certain of your own mind, joyous of heart,
methinks scarce understanding those whose religion makes their souls
tremble instead of fortifying them--you, I am sure, take things by
the large and kindly side of human life."

The story our Parisian has to tell is simple enough, and we have no
intention of betraying it, but only to note some of the faces, the
scenes, that peep out in the course of it.

The gloom of the Cevennes is the impression M. Fabre most commonly
conveys.  In this book it is rather the cheerful aspect of summer,
those upland valleys of the Cevennes presenting then a symphony in
red, so to call it--as in a land of cherries and goldfinches; and he
has a genial power certainly of making you really feel the sun on the
backs of the two boys out early for a long ramble, of old peasants
resting themselves a little, with spare enjoyment, ere the end:--

"As we turned a sharp elbow of the stream the aspect of the country
changed.  It seemed to me entirely red.  Cherries in enormous bunches
were hanging everywhere over our heads....

[125] "It was a hut, rather low, rather dark.  A log of chestnut was
smouldering in a heap of ashes.  Every object was in its place: the
table, the chairs, the plates ranged on the dresser.  A fairy, in
truth, reigned there, and, by the touch of her wand, brought
cleanliness and order on every side.

"'Is it you, Norine?' asked a voice from a dark corner, three steps
from the fireplace.

"'Yes, mon grand, it is I!  The heat was growing greater every
moment, and I have taken in the goats.'

"Norine unclosed the window.  A broad light spread over the floor of
beaten earth, like a white cloth.  The cottage was illuminated.  I
saw an old man seated on a wooden stool in a recess, where an ample
serge curtain concealed a bed.  He held himself slightly bent, the
two hands held forth, one over the other, on the knob of a knotty
staff, highly polished.  In spite of eighty years, Norine's
grandfather--le grand, as they say up there--had not lost a hair:
beautiful white locks fell over his shoulders--crisp, thick,
outspread.  I thought of those fine wigs of tow or hemp with which
the distaff of [126] our Prudence was always entangled.  He was close
shaved, after the manner of our peasants; and the entire mask was to
be seen disengaged, all its admirable lines free, commanded by a
full-sized nose, below which the good, thick lips were smiling, full
of kindness.  The eyes, however, though still clear and soft in
expression, had a certain fixity which startled me.  He raised
himself.  His stature seemed to me beyond proportion.  He was really
beautiful, with the contentment of his face, straight as the trunk of
a chestnut, his old velvet coat thrown back, his shirt of coarse
cloth open at the breast, so that one saw the play of the ribs.

"'Monsieur le neveu!' he cried; 'where are you? Come to me!  I am
blind.'

"I approached.  He felt me, with ten fingers, laying aside his staff.

"'And you would not take offence if a poor peasant like me embraced
you?'

"'Quick, Jalaguier!'  I cried, throwing myself into his arms.
'Quick!'  He pressed me till the joints started.  Leaned upon his
broad chest, I heard the beating of his heart.  It beat under my ears
with a burden like our bell at [126] Camplong.  What powerful
vitality in Norine's grand!  'It does an old man good:--a good hug!'
he said, letting me go."

The boyish visitors are quite ready to sit down there to dinner:--

"With the peasant of the Cevennes (M. Fabre tells us) the meal is
what nature meant it to be--a few moments for self-recovery after
fatigue, a short space of silence of a quite elevated character,
almost sacred.  The poor human creature has given the sweat of his
brow to extort from an ungrateful soil his daily bread; and now he
eats that well-savoured bread in silent self-respect.

"'It is a weary thing to be thinking always of one's work (says the
grand to the somewhat sparing Norine).  We must also think of our
sustenance.  You are too enduring, my child! it is a mistake to
demand so much of your arms.  In truth, le bon Dieu has cut you out
after the pattern of your dead father.  Every morning, in my prayers,
I put in my complaint thereanent.  My poor boy died from going too
fast.  He could never sit still when it was a question of gathering a
few sous from the [128] fields; and those fields took and consumed
him.'"

The boy fancies that the blind eyes are turned towards a particular
spot in the landscape, as if they saw:--

"'I often turn my eyes in that direction (the old man explains) from
habit.  One might suppose that a peasant had the scent of the earth
on which he has laboured.  I have given so much of the sweat of my
brow--there--towards Rocaillet!  Angelique, my dead wife, was of
Rocaillet; and when she married me, brought a few morsels of land in
her apron.  What a state they're in now!--those poor morsels of land
we used to weed and rake and hoe, my boy and I!  What superb crops of
vetches we mowed then, for feeding, in due time, our lambs, our
calves!  All is gone to ruin since my blindness, and especially since
Angelique left me for the churchyard, never to come back.'  He paused
to my great relief.  For every one of those phrases he modulated
under the fig-trees more sadly than the Lamentations of Jeremiah on
Jeudi Saint overset me--was like death."

[129] That is good drawing, in its simple and quiet way!  The actual
scene, however, is cheerful enough on this early summer day--a
symphony, as we said, in cherries and goldfinches, in which the
higher valleys of the Cevennes abound.  In fact, the boys witness the
accordailles, the engagement, of Norine and Justin Lebasset.  The
latter is calling the birds to sing good luck to the event:--

"He had a long steady look towards the fruit-trees, and then
whistled, on a note at once extremely clear and extremely soft.  He
paused, watched awhile, recommenced.  The note became more rapid,
more sonorous.  What an astounding man he was, this Justin Lebasset!
Upright, his red beard forward, his forehead thrown back, his eyes on
the thick foliage of the cherry-trees, his hands on his haunches, in
an attitude of repose, easy, superb, he was like some youthful pagan
god, gilded with red gold, on his way across the country--like Pan,
if he chose to amuse himself by charming birds.  You should have seen
the enthusiastic glances with which Norine watched him.  Upright--she
too, slim, at full height, inclining from [130] time to time towards
Justin with a movement of irresistible fascination, she followed the
notes of her mate; and sometimes, her, lips half opening, added
thereto a sigh--something of a sigh, an aspiration, a prayer, towards
the goldfinch, withdrawn into the shadows.

"The leaves were shaken in the clear, burning green; and, on a
sudden, a multitude of goldfinches, the heads red in the wind, the
wings half spread, were fluttering from branch to branch.  I could
have fancied, amid the quivering of the great bunches of fruit, that
they were cherries on the wing.  Justin suffered his pipe to die
away: the birds were come at his invitation, and performed their
prelude."

It is forty years afterwards that the narrator, now a man of letters
in Paris, writes to his old friend, with tidings of Justin and
Norine:--

"In 1842 (he observes) you were close on fifteen; I scarcely twelve.
In my eyes your age made you my superior.  And then, you were so
strong, so tender, so amiteux, to use a word from up there--a
charming word.  And so God, Who had His designs for you, whereas I,
in spite of my pious childhood, wandered on [131] my way as chance
bade me, led you by the hand, attached, ended by keeping you for
Himself.  He did well truly when He chose you and rejected me!"

His finding the pair in the wilds of Paris is an adventure, in which,
in fact, a goldfinch again takes an important part--a goldfinch who
is found to understand the Cevenol dialect:--

"The goldfinch (escaped from its cage somewhere, into the dreary
court of the Institute) has seen me: is looking at me.  If he chose
to make his way into my apartment, he would be very welcome.  I feel
a strong impulse to try him with that unique patois word, which,
whistled after a peculiar manner, when I was a boy never failed to
succeed in the mountains of Orb--Beni!  Beni!  Viens!  Viens!  I dare
not!  He might take fright and fly away altogether."

In effect, the Cevenol bird, true to call, introduces Norine, his
rightful owner, whose husband Justin is slowly dying.  Towards the
end of a hard life, faithful to their mountain ideal, they have not
lost their dignity, though in a comparatively sordid medium: [132]

"As for me, my dear Arribas, I remained in deep agitation, an
attentive spectator of the scene; and while Justin and Norine, set
both alike in the winepress of sorrow, le pressoir de la douleur, as
your good books express it, murmured to each other their broken
consoling words, I saw them again, in thought, young, handsome, in
the full flower of life, under the cherry-trees, the swarming
goldfinches, of blind Barthelemy Jalaguier.  Ah me!  It was thus
that, five-and-forty years after, in this dark street of Paris, that
festive day was finishing, blessed, in the plenitude of nature, by
that august old man, celebrated by the alternate song of all the
birds of Rocaillet."

Justin's one remaining hope is to go home to those native mountains,
if it may be, with the dead body of his boy, dead "the very morning
on which he should have received the tonsure from the hands of Mgr.
l'Archeveque," and buried now temporarily at the cemetery of
Montparnasse:--

Theodore calls me.  I saw him distinctly to-night.  He gave me a
sign.  After all said, life is heavy, sans le fillot, and but [133]
for you it were well to be released from it....'

"I have seen Justin Lebasset die, dear Arribas, and was touched,
edified, to the bottom of my soul.  God grant, when my hour comes, I
may find that calm, that force, in the last struggle with life.  Not
a complaint!  not a sigh!  Once only he gave Norine a sorrowful,
heartrending look; then, from lips already cold, breathed that one
word, 'Theodore!'  Marcus Aurelius used to say: 'A man should leave
the world as a ripe olive falls from the tree that bore it, and with
a kiss for the earth that nourished it.'  Well! the peasant of
Rocaillet had the beautiful, noble, simple death of the fruit of the
earth, going to the common receptacle of all mortal beings, with no
sense that he was torn away.  Pardon, I pray, my quotation from
Marcus Aurelius, who persecuted the Christians.  I give it with the
same respect with which you would quote some holy writer.  Ah! my
dear Arribas! not all the saints have received canonization."

It is to the priestly character, in truth, that M. Fabre always comes
back for tranquillizing [134] effect; and if his peasants have
something akin to Wordsworth's, his priests may remind one of those
solemn ecclesiastical heads familiar in the paintings and etchings of
M. Alphonse Legros.  The reader travelling in Italy, or Belgium
perhaps, has doubtless visited one or more of those spacious
sacristies, introduced to which for the inspection of some more than
usually recherche work of art, one is presently dominated by their
reverend quiet: simple people coming and going there, devout, or at
least on devout business, with half-pitched voices, not without
touches of kindly humour, in what seems to express like a picture the
most genial side, midway between the altar and the home, of the
ecclesiastical life.  Just such interiors we seem to visit under the
magic of M. Fabre's well-trained pen.  He has a real power of taking
one from Paris, or from London, to places and people certainly very
different from either, to the satisfaction of those who seek in
fiction an escape.

12th June 1889





IX.  THE "CONTES" OF M. AUGUSTIN FILON




TALES OF A HUNDRED YEARS SINCE
["CONTES DU CENTENAIRE."  PAR AUGUSTIN FILON.  PARIS: HACHETTE ET
CIE. ]


[137] IT was a happy thought of M. Filon to put into the mouth of an
imaginary centenarian a series of delightfully picturesque studies
which aim at the minute presentment of life in France under the old
regime, and end for the most part with the Revolution.  A genial
centenarian, whose years have told happily on him, he appreciates not
only those humanities of feeling and habit which were peculiar to the
last century and passed away with it, but also that permanent
humanity which has but undergone a change of surface in the new world
of our own, wholly different though it may look.  With a sympathetic
sense of life as it is always, [138] M. Filon has transplanted the
creations of his fancy into an age certainly at a greater distance
from ourselves than can be estimated by mere lapse of time, and where
a fully detailed antiquarian knowledge, used with admirable tact and
economy, is indeed serviceable in giving reality of effect to scene
and character.  In truth, M. Filon's very lively antiquarianism
carries with it a genuine air of personal memory.  With him, as
happens so rarely, an intimate knowledge of historic detail is the
secret of life, of the impression of life; puts his own imagination
on the wing; secures the imaginative cooperation of the reader.  A
stately age--to us, perhaps, in the company of the historic muse,
seeming even more stately than it actually was--it is pleasant to
find it, as we do now and again on these pages, in graceful
deshabille.  With perfect lightness of touch, M. Filon seems to have
a complete command of all the physiognomic details of old France, of
old Paris and its people--how they made a holiday; how they got at
the news; the fashions.  Did the English reader ever hear before of
the beautifully dressed doll which came once a month [139] from Paris
to Soho to teach an expectant world of fashion how to dress itself?
Old Paris!  For young lovers at their windows; for every one
fortunate enough to have seen it: "Qu'il est joli ce paysage du Paris
nocturne d'il y a cent ans!"  We think we shall best do justice to an
unusually pretty book by taking one of M. Filon's stories (not
because we are quite sure it is the cleverest of them) with a view to
the more definite illustration of his method, therein.

Christopher Marteau was a warden of the corporation of Luthiers.  He
dealt in musical instruments, as his father and grandfather had done
before him, at the sign of Saint Cecilia.  With his wife, his only
child Phlipote, and Claude his apprentice, who was to marry Phlipote,
he occupied a good house of his own.  Of course the disposition of
the young people, bred together from their childhood, does not at
first entirely concur with the parental arrangements.  But the story
tells, reassuringly, how--to some extent how sadly--they came
heartily to do so.  M. Marteau was no ordinary shopkeeper.  The
various distinguished people who had fingered his clavecins, and
turned over the [140] folios of music, for half a century past, had
left their memories behind them; M. de Voltaire, for instance, who
had caressed the head of Phlipote with an aged, skeleton hand,
leaving, apparently, no very agreeable impression on the child,
though her father delighted to recall the incident, being himself a
demi-philosophe.  He went to church, that is to say, only twice a
year, on the Feast of St. Cecilia and on the Sunday when the Luthiers
offered the pain benit.  It was his opinion that everything in the
State needed reform except the Corporations.  The relations of the
husband to his affectionate, satiric, pleasure-seeking wife, who knew
so well all the eighteen theatres which then existed in Paris, are
treated with much quiet humour.  On Sundays the four set forth
together for a country holiday.  At such times Phlipote would walk
half-a-dozen paces in advance of her father and mother, side by side
with her intended.  But they never talked to each other: the hands,
the eyes, never met.  Of what was Phlipote dreaming? and what was in
the thoughts of Claude?

It happened one day that, like sister and brother, the lovers
exchanged confidences.  "It [141] is not always," observes Phlipote,
whom every one excepting Claude on those occasions sought with
admiring eyes--

"'It is not always one loves those one is told to love.'

"'What, have you, too, a secret, my little Phlipote?'

"'I too, Claude!  Then what may be yours?'

"'Listen, Phlipote!' he answered.  'We don't wish to be husband and
wife, but we can be friends--good and faithful friends, helping each
other to change the decision of our parents.'

"'Were I but sure you would not betray me--'

"'Would you like me to confess first?  The woman I love--Ah! but you
will laugh at my folly!'

"'No, Claude!  I shall not laugh.  I know too well what one suffers.'

"'Especially when love is hopeless.'

"'Hopeless?'

"'Alas!  I have never spoken to her.  Perhaps never shall!'

[142] "'Well! as for me, I don't even know the name of him to whom my
heart is given!'

"'Ah! poor Phlipote!'

"'Poor Claude!'

"They had approached each other.  The young man took the tiny hand of
his friend, pressing it in his own.

"'The woman I adore is Mademoiselle Guimard!'

"'What!  Guimard of the Opera?--the fiancee of Despreaux?'"

Claude still held the hands of Phlipote, who was trembling now, and
almost on fire at the story of this ambitious love.  In return she
reveals her own.  It was Good Friday.  She had come with her mother
to the Sainte Chapelle to hear Mademoiselle Coupain play the organ
and witness the extraordinary spectacle of the convulsionnaires,
brought thither to be touched by the relic of the True Cross.  In the
press of the crowd at this exciting scene Phlipote faints, or nearly
faints, when a young man comes kindly to their aid.  "She is so
young!" he explains to the mother, "she seems so delicate!"  "He
looked at me," she tells Claude--"he looked at [143] me, through his
half-closed eyelids; and his words were like a caress."--

"'And have you seen him no More?' asks Claude, full of sympathy.

"'Yes! once again.  He pretended to be looking at the window of the
Little Dunkirk, over the way, but with cautious glances towards our
house.  Only, as he did not know what storey we live on, he failed to
discover me behind my curtain, where I was but half visible.'

"'You should have shown yourself.'

"'Oh, Claude!' she cried, with a delicious gesture of timidity, of
shame.

"So they prattled for a long time; he talking of the great Guimard,
she of her unknown lover, scarce listening to, but completely
understanding each other.

"'Holloa!'cries the loud voice of Christopher Marteau.  'What are you
doing out there?'

"The young people arose.  Phlipote linked her arm gaily in that of
Claude.  'How contented I feel!' she says; 'how good it is to have a
friend--to have you whom I used to detest, because I thought you were
in love with me.  Now, when I know you can't bear me, I [144] shall
be nicely in love with you.'  The soft warmth of her arm seemed to
pass through Claude, and gave him strange sensations.  He resumed
naively, 'Yes! and how odd it is after all that I am not in love with
you.  You are so pretty!'  Phlipote raised her finger coquettishly,
'No compliments, monsieur.  Since we are not to marry each other, it
is forbidden to pay court to me!'"

From that day a close intimacy established itself between the
formerly affianced pair, now become accomplices in defeating the good
intentions of their elders.  In long conversations, they talked in
turn, or both together, of their respective loves.  Phlipote allows
Claude entrance to her chamber, full of admiration for its graceful
arrangements, its virgin cleanliness.  He inspects slowly all the
familiar objects daily touched by her, her books, her girlish
ornaments.  One day she cried with an air of mischief, "If she were
here in my place, what would you do?" and no sooner were the words
uttered than his arms were round her neck.  "'Tis but to teach you
what I would do were she here."  They were a little troubled by this
adventure.

[145] And the next day was a memorable one.  By the kind contrivance
of Phlipote herself, Claude gains the much-desired access to the
object of his affections, but to his immense disillusion.  If he
could but speak to her, he fancies he should find the courage, the
skill, to bend her.  Breathless, Phlipote comes in secret with the
good news.  The great actress desires some one to tune her clavecin:-
-

"'Papa would have gone; but I begged him so earnestly to take me to
the Theatre Francais that he could not refuse; and it is yourself
will go this evening to tune the clavecin of your beloved.'

"'Phlipote, you've a better heart than I!  This morning I saw a
gentleman, who resembled point by point your description of the
unknown at the Sainte Chapelle, prowling about our shop.'

"'And you didn't tell me!'

"Claude hung his head.

"'But why not?' the young girl asks imperiously.  'Why not?'

"'In truth I could hardly say, hardly understand, myself.  Do you
forgive me, Phlipote?'

"'I suppose I must.  So make yourself as smart as you can, to please
your goddess.'"

[146] Next day she hears the story of Claude's grievous
disappointment on seeing the great actress at home--plain, five-and-
forty, ill-tempered.  He had tuned the clavecin and taken flight.

And now for Phlipote's idol!  It was agreed that Whitsunday should be
spent at Versailles.  On that day the royal apartments were open to
the public, and at the hour of High Mass the crowd flowed back
towards the vestibule of the chapel to witness what was called the
procession of the Cordons Bleus.  The "Blue Ribbons" were the knights
of the Order Du Saint-Esprit in their robes of ceremony, who came to
range themselves in the choir according to the date of their
creation.  The press was so great that the parents were separated
from the young people.  Claude, however, at the side of Phlipote,
realized the ideal of a faithful and jealous guardian.  The
hallebardes of the Suisses rang on the marble pavement of the
gallery.  Royalty, now unconsciously presenting its ceremonies for
the last time, advanced through a cloud of splendour; but before the
Queen appeared it was necessary that all the knights of the order
down to the youngest should pass by, slow, solemn, majestic.

[147] They wore, besides their ribbons of blue moire, the silver dove
on the shoulder, and the long mantle of sombre blue velvet lined with
yellow satin.  Phlipote watched mechanically the double file of
haughty figures passing before them: then, on a sudden, with a feeble
cry, falls fainting into the arms of Claude.

Recovered after a while, under shelter of the great staircase, she
wept as those weep whose heart is broken by a great blow.  Claude,
without a word, sustained, soothed her.  A sentiment of gratitude
mingled itself with her distress.  "How good he is!" she thought.

"It was a pity," says her mother a little later "a pity you did not
see the Cordons Bleus.  Fancy!  You will laugh at me!  But in one of
the handsomest of the Chevaliers I felt sure I recognized the
stranger who helped us at the Sainte Chapelle, and was so gallant
with you."

Phlipote did not laugh.  "You are deceived, mother!" she said in a
faint voice.  "Pardi!" cries the father.  "'Tis what I always say.
Your stranger was some young fellow from a shop."

Two months later the young people receive [148] the nuptial
benediction, and continue the musical business when the elders retire
to the country.  At first a passionate lover, Claude was afterwards a
good and devoted husband.  Phlipote never again opened her lips
regarding the vague love which for a moment had flowered in her
heart: only sometimes, a cloud of reverie veiled her eyes, which
seemed to seek sadly, beyond the circle of her slow, calm life, a
brilliant but chimeric image visible for her alone.

And once again she saw him.  It was in the terrible year 1794.  She
knew the hour at which the tumbril with those condemned to die passed
the windows; and at the first signal would close them and draw the
curtain.  But on this day some invincible fascination nailed her to
her place.  There were ten faces; but she had eyes for one alone.
She had not forgotten, could not mistake, him--that pale head, so
proud and fine, but now thin with suffering; the beautiful mobile
eyes, now encircled with the signs of sorrow and watching.  The
convict's shirt, open in large, broad folds, left bare the neck,
delicate as a woman's, and made for that youthful face an aureole, of
innocence, of martyrdom.  His looks [149] met hers.  Did he recognize
her?  She could not have said.  She remained there, paralyzed with
emotion, till the moment when the vision disappeared.

Then she flung herself into her chamber, fell on her knees, lost
herself in prayer.  There was a distant roll of drums.  The man to
whom she had given her maiden soul was gone.

"Cursed be their anger, for it was cruel!" says the reader.  But
Monsieur Filon's stories sometimes end as merrily as they begin; and
always he is all delicacy--a delicacy which keeps his large yet
minute antiquarian knowledge of that vanished time ever in service to
a direct interest in humanity as it is permanently, alike before and
after '93.  His book is certainly one well worth possessing.

THE END

16th July 1890






Typed by Brett Fishburne Proofed by Reina Hosier and Kestrel.



Mademoiselle Fifi

By Guy de Maupassant





Contents




                           Page
Preface  .  .  .  .  .  .  .  7
Mademoiselle Fifi .  .  .  . 11
Boule de Suif  .  .  .  .  . 33





Preface





Guy de Maupassant


Guy de Maupassant was born at the Chateau de Miromesnil, near
Dieppe, on August 5th, 1850.  The Maupassants were an old Lorraine
family who had settled in Normandy in the middle of the Eighteenth
Century.  His father had married in 1846 a young lady of the rich
bourgeoisie, Laure Le Poittevin.  With her brother Alfred, she had
been the playmate of Gustave Flaubert, the son of a Rouen surgeon,
who was destined to have a directing influence on her son's life.
She was a woman of no common literary accomplishments, very fond of
the Classics, especially Shakespeare.  Separated from her husband,
she kept her two sons, Guy and his younger brother Herve.

Until he was thirteen years old Guy lived with his mother at
Etretat, in the Villa des Verguies, where between the sea and the
luxuriant country, he grew very fond of nature and out door sports;
he went fishing with the fishermen of the coast and spoke patois
with the peasants.  He was deeply devoted to his mother.  He first
entered the Seminary of Yvetot, but managed to have himself expelled
on account of a peccadillo of precocious poetry.  From his early
religious education he conserved a marked hostility to Religion.
Then he was sent to the Rouen Lycee, where he proved a good scholar
indulging in poetry and taking a prominent part in theatricals.
The war of 1870 broke out soon after his graduation from College;
he enlisted as a volunteer and fought gallantly.  After the war, in
1871, he left Normandy and came to Paris where he spent ten years
as a clerk in the Navy Department.  During these ten tedious years
his only recreation was canoeing on the Seine on Sundays and holidays.
Gustave Flaubert took him under his protection and acted as a kind
of literary guardian to him, guiding his debut in journalism and
literature.  At Flaubert's home he befriended the Russian novelist
Tourgueneff and Emilie Zola, as well as many of the protagonists of
the realistic school.  He wrote considerable verse and short plays.
In 1878 he was transferred to the Ministry of Public Instruction
and became a contributing editor to several leading newspapers
such as Le Figaro, le Gil Blas, le Gaulois and l'Echo de Paris.
He devoted his spare time to writing novels and short stories.  In
1880 he published his first masterpiece, "Boule de Suif", which met
with an instant and tremendous success.  Flaubert characterized it
as "a masterpiece that will remain."

The decade from 1880 to 1891 was the most fertile period of
Maupassant's life.  Made famous by his first short story, he worked
methodically and produced two and sometimes four volumes annually.
By a privilege of nature and his Norman origin, he combined talent
and practical business sense, which brought him affluence and wealth.
In 1881 he published his first volume of short stories under the
title of "La Maison Tellier"; it reached its twelfth edition in two
years; in 1883 he finished his first novel "Une Vie", twenty-five
thousand copies of which were sold in less than a year.  Glory and
Fortune smiled on him.  In his novels, he concentrated all his
observations scattered in his short stories.  His second novel
"Bel Ami", which came out in 1885, had thirty-seven editions in
four months.  His editor, Havard, commissioned him to write new
masterpieces and, without the slightest effort, his pen produced new
masterpieces of style, description, conception and penetration[*].
With a natural aversion for Society, he loved retirement, solitude
and meditation.  He traveled extensively in Algeria, Italy, England,
Britany, Sicily, Auvergne, and from each voyage he brought back
a new volume.  He cruised on his private yacht "Bel Ami", named
after one of his earlier masterpieces.  This feverish life did not
prevent him from making friends among the literary celebrities of
his day:  Dumas fils had a paternal affection for him; at Aix-les-Bains
he met Taine and fell under the spell of the philosopher-historian.
Flaubert continued to act as his literary Godfather.  His friendship
with the Goucourts was of short duration; his frank and practical
nature reacted against the ambiance of gossip, scandal, duplicity
and invidious criticism that the two brothers had created around
them in the guise of an Eighteenth Century style salon.  He hated
the human comedy, the social farce.

In his latter years he developed an exaggerated love for solitude,
a predilection for self-preservation and still worse, a constant
fear of death and mania of persecution, which ran like a black
thread through all his writings and brought on gradually the final
tragic catastrophe.--He became insane in 1891 and died in 1893
without having recovered his mind.

Life, movement, penetrating[*] observation, and hypersensitiveness,
both artistic and physical, are the dominant traits of this literary
phenomenon.  His rise to fame was as vertiginous as his fall and
decay.  As a novelist he may have his equals and superiors, but
as a short story-writer, with the exception of Charles Nodier and
Alphonse Daudet, he had none.--

The Happy Hour Library

[*][Note from  Brett:  The original uses "penertation" and
"penertating" but I could not find this word anywhere so assumed
it was a typographical error.]





Mademoiselle Fifi




The Prussian Commander, Major Graf von Farlsberg, was finishing
the reading of his mail, comfortably seated in a large tapestry
armchair, with his booted feet resting on the elegant marble of the
mantelpiece on which, for the last three months that he had been
occupying the Chateau d'Uville, his spurs had traced two deep
grooves, growing deeper every day.

A cup of coffee was steaming on an inlaid guerdon, stained with
liqueur, burned by cigars, notched by the penknife of the conquering
officer who, while sharpening his pencil, would stop at times and
trace on the marble monograms or designs according to the fancy of
his indolent dream.

After he had finished his letters and read the German newspapers,
which his orderly had brought him, he rose, threw into the fire
three or four enormous pieces of green wood, for these gentlemen
were cutting down, little by little, the trees of the park to
keep themselves warm and stepped over to the window.  The rain was
pouring, a regular Normandy rain which one might have thought was
let loose and showered down by a furious hand, a slanting rain,
thick like a curtain, forming a kind of wall with oblique stripes,
a rain that lashed, splashed, deluged everything, a rain peculiar
to the neighborhood of Rouen, that watering pot of France.

The Officer looked for a long while at the inundated lawn, and yonder,
the swollen Andilles, which was overflowing; and with his fingers
he was drumming on the window-pane a waltz from the Rhineland, when
a noise caused him to turn around; it was his second in command,
Baron von Kelweingstein, holding a rank equivalent to that of
Captain.

The Major was a giant, with broad shoulders, graced by a fan-shaped
blond beard, flowing down his chest and forming a breast-shield.
His whole tall, solemn person suggested the image of a military
peacock, a peacock that would carry its tail spread on its chin.
He had blue eyes, cold and gentle; a cheek bearing the scar of a
sword wound inflicted during the Austrian war; and he was said to
be a kind hearted man as well as a brave officer.

Short, red faced, corpulent, tightly belted, the Captain wore,
cropped almost close, his red hair, the fiery filaments of which,
when under the reflection of certain lights, might have given the
impression as though his face had been rubbed with phosphorus.  Two
teeth lost in a night orgy and brawl, he did not exactly remember
now, caused him to spit out indistinct words which one could not
always understand.  He was bald only on the top of his head, like
a tonsured monk, with a crop of short, curly hair, golden and shiny,
around this circle of bare flesh.

The Commander shook hands, and gulped down his cup of coffee (the
sixth since that morning), while listening to the report of his
subordinate about the incidents and happening in the service.  Then
both came back near the window and declared that theirs was not a
cheerful lot.  The Major, a quiet man, married and having left his
wife home, would adapt himself to anything; but the Baron Captain,
accustomed to leading a fast life, a patron of low resorts, a wild
chaser of disreputable women, was furious at having been confined
for the last three months to the obligatory chasteness of this out
of the way Post.

Presently they heard a scratching on the door; the Commander said:
"Come in," and a man, one of their automaton soldiers, appeared
in the aperture, announcing by his mere presence that luncheon was
served.

In the dining-room they found three officers of lower rank; one
lieutenant, Otto von Grossling, and two second-lieutenants, Fritz
Scheuneberg and Markgraf Wilhelm von Eyrik, a tiny blond man,
haughty and brutal with his men, harsh toward the vanquished foe,
and violent like a fire-arm.

Since his arrival in France his comrade called him only Mademoiselle
Fifi.  This nickname was bestowed upon him on account of his
coquettish style of dressing and manners, his slender waist, which
looked as if it were laced in a corset, his pale face on which a
nascent mustache could hardly be seen, and also on account of the
habit he had acquired, in order to express his supreme contempt
for persons and things, of using continually the French locution:
"Fi! fi donc!" which he pronounced with a slight lisping.

The dining-room of the Chateau d'Uville was a large and regal hall,
the ancient mirrors of which constellated with bullet holes, and
the high Flanders tapestries, slashed with sword cuts and hanging
in shreds at certain places, told the tale of Mademoiselle Fifi's
favorite occupations and pastime during his hours of idleness.

On the walls, three family portraits, a warrior wearing his armor,
a Cardinal and a Chief Justice, were smoking long porcelain pipes,
while in its frame, ungilt by age, a noble lady in a tight waist,
was showing with an arrogant air an enormous pair of mustache
crayoned with charcoal.

And the Officers' luncheon went off almost silently in this mutilated
room, darkened by the shower outside, sad and depressing in its
vanquished appearance, the old oak parquet floor of which had become
solid like the floor of a bar room.

Having finished eating, it was time for smoking; they began to drink
and, reverting to their usual topic, they spoke of their monotonous
and tedious life.  Bottles of cognac and liqueur passed from hand
to hand, and seating back on their chairs, they were all absorbing
their liqueur in repeated sips, holding at the corner of their
mouths the long curved pipes ending in a meerschaum bowl, invariably
daubed as if to seduce Hottentots.

As soon as their glasses were empty, they refilled them with
a gesture of resigned weariness.  But Mademoiselle Fifi broke his
glass every instant and then a soldier brought him immediately a
new one.

A mist of acrid smoke bathed, drowned them, and they seemed to sink
into a somnolent and sad inebriety, in that taciturn and morose
intoxication peculiar to men who have nothing to do.

But suddenly the Baron sat up.  A revolt shook him; he swore:  "By
heavens! this cannot go on indefinitely; we must in the end invent
something."

Lieutenant Otto and Second-Lieutenant Fritz, two Teutons eminently
endowed with heavy and serious German faces, replied together:
"What shall we invent, Captain?"

He mused for a few seconds and resumed:  "What?  Well, we must
organize an entertainment, if the Commander will permit."

The Major took his pipe out of his mouth:  "What entertainment,
Captain?"--

The Baron came nearer:  "Leave it to me, Commander; I shall send
Pflicht[*] to Rouen, and he will bring us some women I know where
to get them.  A supper will be prepared here; besides we have
everything, and I may venture to say we shall spend a rather pleasant
evening."

[*]Duty

Graf Farlsberg, shrugged his shoulders and smiled:  "You are crazy,
my friend!"

But all the officers had risen, surrounding their chief and beseeching
him:  "Let the Captain go, Commander; it is so sad here!"

Finally the Major yielded:  "All right!" said he; and immediately
the Baron sent for Pflicht.  Pflicht was an old non-commissioned
officer, who had never been seen smiling, but who carried out with
fanatical punctuality the orders of his superiors, no matter what
they were.

Erect, with his impassive face, he received the Baron's instructions;
then he left the room; and five minutes later a large military
wagon, covered with miller's tarpaulin stretched in the shape of
a dome, was being rapidly driven away under the heavy rain at the
gallop of four horses.

At once an awakening thrill seemed to run through the group
of officers and shook them from their lethargy; the languid poses
straightened up, faces became animated and they began to talk.

Although the shower was continuing as heavy as ever, the Major
affirmed that it was not so dark, and Lieutenant Otto announced
positively that the weather was clearing up.  Even Mademoiselle
Fifi seemed unable to keep still.  He rose and sat down again.  His
harsh and clear eye was looking for something to break; suddenly,
glaring at the lady with the mustache, the young prig drew his
revolver:  "You shall not witness it, you!" said he, and, without
leaving his seat, he aimed.  Two bullets fired in rapid succession
put out the eyes of the portrait.

Then he exclaimed:  "Let us explode a mine!"  And at once the
conversation was interrupted, as if a powerful and new curiosity
had taken hold of every one present.

A mine, that was his invention, his way of destroying, his favorite
amusement.

When he hurriedly left his chateau, Comte Fernand d'Armoy d'Uville,
the legitimate owner, had had no time to take with him nor hide
away anything except the silver-plate, which he had stowed away in
a hole made in a wall.  Now as he was immensely wealthy and lived
in great luxury, his large salon, the door of which communicated
with the dining-room, presented the appearance of a Picture Gallery
before the precipitate flight of the master.

Priceless paintings and aquarelles were hanging on the walls, while
on the tables, the etageres and the elegant cabinets, thousands of
bric a brac and bibelots, statuettes, Dresden and Chinese vases,
old ivories and Venice pottery peopled the large room with their
precious and odd multitude.

Hardly any were left by this time.  Not that they had been stolen;
the Major, Graf Farlsberg, would not have permitted nor tolerated
it; but Mademoiselle Fifi once in a while exploded a mine; and on
such occasions all the officers enjoyed themselves thoroughly for
five minutes.

The little Markgraf went to the salon to fetch what he needed; he
brought in a tiny and graceful Chinese tea-pot of the Rose family,
which he filled with gun powder, and through the neck of which he
carefully introduced a long piece of tinder, lighted it and, running,
carried this infernal machine into the next room.

Then he returned quickly and closed the door behind him.  All the
Germans stood up and waited, their faces wreathed in childlike smiles
of curiosity, and as soon as the explosion shook the Chateau, they
hurried in all at once.

Mademoiselle Fifi, who had been the first one to rush in, was
deliriously clapping his hands in front of a terra cotta Venus,
whose head at last had been blown off; and each picked up broken
pieces of China, wondering at the strange indentation of the
fragments, examining the new damage done, claiming that some of
the damage had been caused by previous explosions.  And the Major
was contemplating, with a paternal look, the large salon upset by
this Neronian firework and strewn with the debris of the objects of
Art.  He came out first, declaring good- naturedly:  "It was very
successful this time!"

But such a spout of smoke had invaded the dining-room, mixing
with the smoke of tobacco, that it was impossible to breathe.  The
Commander opened the window, and all the officers, who had come
back to drink a last glass of cognac, crowded near it.

The damp air blew into the room bringing in a kind of water dust,
which sprayed and powdered the beards, and a smell of inundation.
They were looking at the tall trees bending under the shower, the
broad valley darkened by this outflow of the black low clouds[*],
and in the distance the Church spire rising like a gray point in
the pelting rain.

[*][Note from Brett:  The original uses "clowds," but I think
"clouds" was intended.]

Since the arrival of the Germans, the Church bell had not rung.
It was in fact the only resistance with which the invaders met in
that neighborhood, the resistance of the bell-tower.  The Curate
had not refused to receive and feed Prussian soldiers; he had even,
on several occasions, accepted to drink a bottle of beer or claret
with the enemy Commander, who often used him as a benevolent
intermediary.  But it was useless to ask him for a single ring of
his bell; he would rather have faced a firing squad.  That was his
way of protesting against invasion, a peaceful protest, the protest
of silence, the only one, said he, that became a priest, a man of
peace and not of blood.  And everybody for ten miles around praised
the firmness, the heroism of Father Chantavoine, who dared to affirm
the public mourning and proclaim it by the obstinate mutism of his
Church.

The entire village, enthusiastic about this resistance, was ready
to support and back up its pastor to the bitter end, to risk
anything, considering this tacit protest as a safeguard of the
national honor.  It seemed to the peasants that in this way they
deserved better of their country than Belfort or Strasbourg, that
they had given just as good an example, that the name of their hamlet
would remain immortal for it; and with that single exception, they
refused nothing to the victorious Prussians.

The Commander and his officers laughed in private at this manifestation
of inoffensive courage, and as the entire neighborhood showed
themselves obliging to them and docile to their orders, they
willingly tolerated the priest's silent patriotism.

Little Markgraf Wilhelm was the only one who would have liked to
compel the bell to ring; he was very indignant at the political
condescendence of his superior officer towards the priest; and every
day he was beseeching the Commander to let him do once, just once,
"Ding-dong!  Ding-dong!" merely for the sake of having a little
fun.  And he begged for it with feline gracefulness, the cajolery
of a woman, the tenderness of voice of a beloved mistress craving
for something, but the Commander did not yield, and to console
himself, Mademoiselle Fifi exploded mines in the chateau d'Uville.

The five men remained there, in a group, for a few minutes, inhaling
the damp air.  Finally Lieutenant Fritz spoke with a thick laugh:
"Decidedly, the ladies will not have fine weather for their trip."

Thereupon they separated, each going to his work, the Captain having
a great deal to do to make arrangements for the dinner party.

When they met again at nightfall, they began to laugh at seeing
each other dolled up coquettishly and smart like on grand review
days, perfumed, pomaded and hale.  The Commander's hair seemed less
gray than in the morning, and the Captain had shaved, keeping only
his mustache, which looked like a flame under his nose.

Notwithstanding the rain, the window was kept open and from time
to time one of them went over to listen.  At ten minutes past six
o'clock, the Baron reported a distant rolling.  They all hurried
downstairs, and soon the large carriage came up with the four horses
still galloping, covered with mud up to their backs, steaming and
blowing.

And five women got off the carriage and stepped on the perron,
five graceful girls carefully selected by a chum of the Captain,
to whom Pflicht had taken a card from his officer.

They had not been reluctant to come, knowing that they would be
well paid; besides, they were quite well acquainted and familiar
with the Prussians, having been in intercourse with them for the
past three months and making the best of men as of things.  "Our
business requires it," they told each other on their way, no doubt
in order to ease off some secret pricking of a remnant of conscience.

And, presently, they were ushered into the dining-room.  Lighted
up, the dining-room looked still more lugubrious in its pitiful
dilapidation, and the table covered with viands, rich china
and silver plate, which had been discovered in the wall where the
owner had hidden them, gave to the premises the appearance of a low
tavern, where bandits are having supper after a successful raffle.
The Captain, radiant, took hold of the women as of a familiar thing,
appreciating them, embracing them, scenting them, estimating them
at their value as instruments of pleasure; and as the three younger
men wanted to take one each, he objected to it with authority,
reserving to himself the privilege of making the assignments, in
perfect fairness, according to rank, so as not to injure in any
way the hierarchy.

Then, in order to preclude any discussion, any contest and any
suspicion of partiality, he lined them up according to height, and
addressing the tallest, in a tone of command:  "Your name?"

She replied, raising her voice:  "Pamela."

Then he announced:  "Number one, by the name of Pamela, is adjudged
to the Commander."

Having then kissed Blondine, the second as a mark of his claim to
ownership, he offered the fat Amanda to Lieutenant Otto; Eva la
Tomate to Second-Lieutenant Fritz, and the smallest of all, Rachel,
a very young brunette, with black eyes like ink spots, a Jewess
whose pug nose confirmed the rule that ascribes hooked noses to
all her race, to the youngest officer, the frail Markgraf Wilhelm
von Eyrik.

As a matter of fact they were all pretty and plump, without
any distinctive character on their faces, shaped almost alike in
appearance and style and complexion by the daily practice of their
illicit trade and the life in common in disreputable houses.

The three young men wanted immediately to take their partners out
of the room under pretext of offering them brushes and soap for
washing and freshening up; but the Captain was wise enough not
to allow it, claiming that they were clean enough to sit down to
dinner, and for fear that those who went up might want to change
their girls when they came down, and thus disturb the other couples.
His experience prevailed.  There were only plenty of kisses, kisses
of expectancy.

Suddenly Rachel suffocated, coughing to tears and rejecting smoke
through her nose.  The Markgraf, feigning to kiss her, had blown
a whiff of tobacco into her mouth.  She did not get angry, did not
utter a single word, but glared at her possessor with anger aroused
way down at the bottom of her black eyes.

They sat down to dinner.  The Commander himself seemed to be
delighted; he took Pamela on his right and Blondine on his left,
and while unfolding his napkin, he declared:--"This was a charming
idea of yours, Captain!"

Lieutenants Otto and Fritz, polite and obsequious as if they were
sitting near Society ladies, did slightly intimidate their neighbors;
but Baron von Kelweingstein, let loose in his vice, was beaming;
he cracked unsavory jokes, and with his crown of red hair, seemed
to be on fire.  He paid gallant compliments in his defective
French of the Rhine, and his lewd nonsense, smacking of taverns,
expectorated through the hole between his two broken teeth, reached
the girls in the middle of a rapid fire of saliva.

The girls did not understand his witticisms, and their intelligence
did not seem to be awakened until he sputtered obscene words, rough
expressions, crippled by his accent.  Then all in a chorus began
to laugh as if they were demented, falling on the laps of their
neighbors, repeating the words which the Baron disfigured purposely
in order to make them say filthy things.  They vomited at will
plenty of them, intoxicated after drinking from the first bottles
of wine; and relapsing into their real selves, opening the gates
to their habits, they kissed mustaches on their right and those on
their left, pinched arms, uttered furious screams, drank out of
all the glasses, sang French couplets and bits of German songs they
had learned in their daily intercourse with the enemy.

Soon the men themselves flushed and excited by the female flesh
spread under their nose and within reach of their hands, lost all
restraint, roaring, breaking the plates, while behind them impassive
soldiers were waiting.

The Commander only kept some restraint.

Mademoiselle Fifi had taken Rachel on his knees and deliberately
working himself up to a pitch of frenzy, kissed madly the ebony
curls on her neck, inhaling through the thin interstice between
the gown and her skin, the sweet warmth of her body and the full
fragrance of her person; through the silk, he pinched her furiously
making her scream, seized with a rabid ferocity and distracted by
his craving for destruction.  Often also holding her in his arms,
squeezing her as if he wanted to mix her with himself, he pressed
long kisses on the fresh lips of the Jewess and embraced her until
he lost breath; but suddenly he bit her so deep that a dash of
blood flowed down the chin of the young girl and ran into her waist.

Once more she looked at him, straight in the face, and washing the
wound, she muttered:  "You will have to pay for it!"  He began to
laugh, with a harsh laugh:  "All right, I shall pay!" said he.

At dessert, champagne was served.  The Commander rose and with the
same tone as he would have taken to drink the health of the Empress
Augusta, he said:

"To our ladies!"  And a series of toasts were then drunk, toasts
with the gallantry and manner of drunkards and troopers, mixed
with obscene jokes, rendered still more brutal by their ignorance
of the language.

They were rising one after the other, trying to be witty, making
efforts to be funny; and the women, so intoxicated that they were
hardly able to sit up, with their vacant look, their heavy, clammy
tongues, applauded vociferously each time.

The Captain, no doubt intending to lend the orgy an atmosphere
of gallantry, raised once more his glass and pronounced:  "To our
victories over the hearts!"

Then Lieutenant Otto, a kind of bear from the Black Forest, jumped
up, inflamed, saturated with drinks, and suddenly, carried away by
alcoholic patriotism, he cried:  "To our victories over France!"

Intoxicated as they were, the women kept silent and Rachel,
shuddering with rage, retorted:  "Well!  I know some Frenchmen in
whose presence you would not dare say such things."

But the little Markgraf, still holding her on his knees, began to
laugh, having become exceedingly exhilarated by the wine:  "Ah!
Ah! Ah! I never met any myself.  As soon as they see us, they run
away."

The girl exasperated, shouted in his face:  "You lie, you dirty
pig!"

For a second he fixed on her his clear eyes, as he used to fix
them on the paintings the canvas of which he riddled with revolver
shots; then he laughed:  "Oh yes! let us speak of it, you beauty!
Would we be here if they were brave?"--and he became more and more
excited:  "We are their masters; France belongs to us!"

She sprang off his knees and fell back on her chair.  He rose, held
out his glass over the table and repeated:  "France, the French,
their fields, their woods and their houses belong to us!"

The others, who were thoroughly intoxicated, suddenly shaken by
military enthusiasm, the enthusiasm of brutes, seized their glasses
and shouted vociferously:  "Long live Prussia!" and emptied them
at a draught.

The girls did not protest, reduced to silence and frightened.  Even
Rachel kept silent, unable to reply.

Then the little Markgraf placed on the head of the Jewess his glass
of Champaign, refilled, and said--"The women of France belong to
us!"

She jumped up so quickly that the glass was upset and spilled the
yellow wine in her black hair, as for a baptism; it fell broken to
pieces on the floor.  Her lips quivering, she looked defiantly at
the officer; the latter kept laughing; she stammered in a voice
choked with rage:  "That, that is not true! you shall never have
the women of France!"

He sat down to laugh at his ease and tried to imitate the Parisian
accent:  "That is a good one! that is a good one!  And what are
you doing here, you little one?"

Confused, at first, she did not answer, as she did not, in her
excitement, understand fully what he said; then, as soon as the
meaning of it dawned on her mind, she shouted at him indignantly
and vehemently:  "I, I, I am not a woman!  I am a prostitute! and
that is all a Prussian deserves!"

Hardly had she finished, that he slapped her face violently; but,
as he was raising his hand again, maddened with rage she caught on
the table a small silver-bladed dessert knife, and so quickly that
nobody noticed it, she stabbed him right in the neck, just at the
hollow where the breast begins.

A word, that he was about to mutter, was cut short in his throat,
and he remained stiff, with his mouth open and a frightful look.

All shouted and got up tumultuously; but having thrown her chair
in the legs of Lieutenant Otto, who collapsed and fell down at full
length, she ran to the window, opened it before they could catch
her, and jumped out in the night, under the rain that was still
falling.

In two minutes Mademoiselle Fifi was dead.  Then Fritz and Otto drew
their swords and wanted to massacre the women, who threw themselves
to their knees; the Major, not without difficulty, prevented the
butchery and had the four bewildered girls locked up in a room
and guarded by two soldiers; and then, as if he were disposing his
men for battle, he organized the search for the fugitive[*], quite
certain that he would catch her.

[*][Note from Brett:  The original uses "fugutive," but, again, I
think this is a typographical error as there is no such word.]

Fifty men, whipped by threats, were launched on her trail in the
park; two hundred others searched the woods and all the houses of
the Valley.

The table, cleared in an instant, was turned into a mortuary bed,
and the four officers, straight, rigid and sobered up, with the
harsh faces of warriors on duty stood near the windows, searching
and scanning the night.

The torrential rain was continuing.  An incessant rippling filled
the darkness, a floating murmur of water that falls and water that
runs, water that drops and water that gushes forth.

Suddenly a rifle shot was heard; then another far away; and thus
for four hours one heard from time to time, near or distant reports
of firing and rallying cries, strange words shouted like a call by
guttural voices.

At daybreak everybody returned.  Two soldiers had been killed and
three others wounded by their comrades in the eagerness of the
chase and the confusion of the nocturnal pursuit.

They had not been able to find Rachel.

Then the inhabitants were terrorized, the houses searched most
carefully, the whole region combed, beaten, scoured.  The Jewess
did not seem to have left any trace of her passage.

The General, who had been notified, ordered to hush the matter up
so as not to give a bad example in the Army, and he disciplined
the Commander who, in turn, punished his subordinates.  The General
had said:  "We do not go to war to indulge in orgies and caress
prostitutes."  And exasperated Graf Farlsberg resolved to take
revenge on the country.

As he needed a pretext to take drastic measures without constraint,
he summoned the Priest and ordered him to ring the Church bell at
the burial of Markgraf von Eyrik.

Contrary to general expectation, the priest showed himself docile,
humble, full of attention.  And when the body of Mademoiselle Fifi,
carried by soldiers, preceded, surrounded and followed by soldiers,
who marched with loaded rifles, left the Chateau d'Urville, on the
way to the cemetery, for the first time the bell sounded the knell
in a gay tone, as if a friendly hand had been fondling it.

It rang also in the evening, and the next day and every day;
it chimed as much as they wanted.  Sometimes also, in the dead of
night, it would ring all alone and throw two or three notes in the
darkness, seized by a singular mirth, awakened one knew not why.
All the peasants in the neighborhood then thought that the bell had
been bewitched; and no one except the Priest and the Sexton came
near the bell-tower.

A poor girl was living up there, in fear and solitude, secretly
fed by those two men.

She remained there until the German troops departed.  Then, one
evening, the Priest having borrowed the baker's cart, drove himself
and the prisoner as far as the Gate of Rouen.  When they reached
the Gate, the Priest kissed her; she got off the cart and quickly
went back to the disreputable house, the keeper of which had thought
that she was dead.

She was taken out of the house of prostitution shortly afterwards
by a patriot without prejudice, who loved her for her brave act,
and then, having loved her for herself, married her and made of
her a lady as good as many others.





Boule de Suif




For several days in succession the remnants of a routed army had been
passing through the City.  They were not troops, but disorganized
hordes.  The men had long, dirty beards and tattered uniforms; they
walked with a listless gait, without flag nor formation.  All seemed
exhausted, worn out, incapable of thought or resolve, marching
only by force of habit and dropping with fatigue as soon as they
stopped.  One saw for the most part hastily mobilized men, peaceful
business men and rentiers, bending under the weight of their rifles;
young snappy volunteers, easily scared, but full of enthusiasm,
ready to attack as well as to retreat; then, among them, a few
red trousers, fragments of a division decimated in a great battle;
despondent artillery men aligned with these non-descript infantrymen;
and there and there the shining helmet of a heavy footed dragon
who had difficulty in keeping step with the quicker pace of the
soldiers of the line.

Legions of francs-tireurs with heroic names:  "Avengers of
Defeat"--"Citizens of the Tombs"--"Brothers in Death"--passed in
their turn looking like bandits.

Their leaders, former drapers or grain merchants, tallow or soap
dealers, warriors for the circumstance, who had been commissioned
officers on account of their money or the length of their mustaches;
covered with arms, flannel and stripes, they were talking in
a high-sounding voice, discussing plans of campaign, and claiming
that they alone supported on their shoulders agonizing France; as
a matter of fact, these braggarts were afraid of their own men,
scoundrels often brave to excess, but always ready for pillage and
debauch.

It was rumored that the Prussians were going to enter Rouen.

The National Guard who, for the past two months, had been very
carefully reconnoitering in the neighboring woods, at times shooting
their own sentries and getting ready to fight when a little rabbit
rustled in the bushes, had been mustered out and returned to their
homes.  Their arms, uniforms, all their deadly apparel, with which
they had recently frightened the milestones along the national
highways for three leagues around, had suddenly disappeared.

The last of the French soldiers had just crossed the Seine to go
to Pont-Andemer by Saint Sever and Bourg-Achard; and following them
all, their general, desperate, unable to attempt anything with such
non-descript wrecks, himself dismayed in the crushing debacle of a
people accustomed to conquer and now disastrously defeated despite
their legendary bravery, was walking between two orderlies.

Then a profound calm, a trembling and silent expectancy hovered over
the City.  Many corpulent well to do citizens, emasculated by the
business life they had led, were anxiously waiting for the victors,
fearing lest they might consider as weapons their roasting spits
or their large kitchen knives.

Life seemed to be at a standstill; the shops were closed and the
streets silent and deserted.  Sometimes a citizen, intimidated by
this silence, ran rapidly along the walls.

The anguish of suspense made the citizens desire the arrival of
the enemy.

In the afternoon of the day that followed the departure of the
French troops, a few Uhlans, coming from no one knew where, crossed
the City in a hurry.  Then, a little later, a black mass came down
the Ste. Catherine Hill, while two other invading waves appeared
on the Darnetal and Boisguillame roads.  The vanguards of the three
corps made their junction at precisely the same time in the Hotel
de Ville Square; and, by all the neighboring roads, the German Army
was arriving, rolling its battalions that made the pavements ring
under their heavy and well measured steps.

Orders shouted in an unknown and guttural voice, rose along the
houses which seemed dead and deserted, while behind the closed
shutters, eyes watched these victorious men, masters of the City,
of property and life by the right of war.  The inhabitants, in
their darkened rooms, felt the bewilderment caused by cataclysms,
the great bloody upheavals of the earth against which all human
wisdom and force are of no avail.  For the same feeling reappears
whenever the established order of things is upset, when security
ceases to exist, when all that is protected by the laws of men
or those of protected nature, is at the mercy of unreasoning and
ferocious brutality.  The earthquake crushing a whole nation under
crumbling houses; the overflowing river swirling the bodies of
drowned peasants along with the dead oxen and the beams torn away
from the roofs, or the glorious army massacring those who defend
themselves, taking away the others as prisoners, pillaging in the
name of the sword and offering thanks to God to the thunder of the
guns, are as many appalling scourges which disconcert any belief
in eternal justice, all the trust we were taught to place in the
protection of heaven and the reason of man.

Small detachments knocked at each door and then disappeared in the
houses.  It was occupation after invasion.  Now the vanquished had
to show themselves nice to their conquerors.

After a while, once the first terror had abated, a new tranquility
settled down.  In many houses the Prussian Officer took his meals
with the family.  Some were well bred, and out of politeness, showed
sympathy for France and spoke of their reluctance to participate
in the war.  People were grateful for such sentiments; furthermore,
they might have needed their protection any day.  By being nice to
them they would possibly have fewer men billeted to their houses.
And why hurt the feelings of a man who had full power over them?  To
act in that way would be less bravery than temerity--and temerity
is no longer a failing of the citizens of Rouen, as in the days of
heroic defense when their City became famous.  Last of all--supreme
argument derived from French urbanity--they said that they could
allow themselves to be polite in their own houses, provided they
did not exhibit in public too much familiarity with the foreign
soldier.  On the streets they passed each other as strangers, but
at home they willingly chatted, and every night the German stayed
up later and later, warming himself at the family fire-place.

Even the City was gradually resuming some of its ordinary aspect.
The French were seldom seen promenading in the Streets, but Prussian
soldiers swarmed.  Besides, the officers of the Blue Hussars, who
arrogantly rattled their big instruments of death on the pavements,
did not seem to have for the plain citizens enormously more contempt
than the officers of the French Chasseurs who, the year before,
had been drinking in the same Cafes.

There was, however, something in the air, something subtle
and unknown, an intolerable foreign atmosphere like an offensive
odor--the smell of invasion.  It pervaded the houses and the public
places, changed the taste of food and made you feel as if you
were traveling in far distant lands, amid barbarians and dangerous
tribes.

The conquerors exacted money, a great deal of money.  The citizens
kept on paying; they could afford to pay, they were rich.  But the
more a Norman businessman becomes opulent, the more he suffers when
he has to make any sacrifice, or sees any parcel of his property
pass into the hands of others.

And yet, within a distance of two or three leagues from the City,
down the river, in the direction of Croisset, Dieppendalle or
Biessart, boatmen and fishermen often hauled from the bottom of
the water the body of some German swollen in his uniform, killed
with a knife or by a blow of savate, his head crushed by a stone,
or pushed from a bridge into the water.  The mud of the river-bed
buried such obscure, savage and yet legitimate vengeances, unknown
acts of heroism, silent attacks more perilous than battles in the
open, and yet without any of the halo and glamour of glory.

For hatred of the foreigner always arms some intrepid persons ready
to die for an idea.

As the invaders, although subjecting the City to their inflexible
discipline, had committed none of the horrors which rumor credited
them with having perpetrated all along their triumphal march, people
became bolder, and desire to do business belabored again the hearts
of the local merchants.  Some of them had large interest in Havre,
which was occupied by the French Army, and they tried to reach that
sea port in going by land to Dieppe and proceeding from there by
boat.

They used the influence of the German Officers, with whom they
had become acquainted, and a special permit was secured from the
General in Chief.  Now then, a large four-horse coach having been
engaged for this trip, and ten persons having had their names booked
with the driver, it was decided to leave on a Tuesday morning,
before daybreak, to avoid attracting any crowd.

For some time past the frost had hardened the ground, and on that
particular Monday, at about three o'clock, big black clouds coming
from the North brought the snow which fell without interruption
all that evening and during the whole night.

At half past four in the morning, the travelers met in the courtyard
of the Hotel de Normandie, where they were to take the coach.

They were still half asleep, and shivered with cold under their
wraps.  They could not see each other well in the darkness, and
bundled in their heavy winter clothing, their bodies looked like
fat priests in their long cassocks.  Two men recognized each other;
a third joined them; they talked:--"I am taking my wife with me--"
said one;--"So am I"--"And I too"--The first speaker continued, "We
shall not come back to Rouen, and if the Prussians should threaten
Havre, we shall cross over to England"--They all had the same plans,
being of similar disposition.

However, the horses were not yet harnessed.  A small lantern,
carried by a stable boy, came now and then out of a dark doorway,
and immediately disappeared in another.  Horses were stamping the
ground, but their hooves being covered with dung and straw, the
noise of the stamping was deadened; a man's voice talking to the
animals and swearing at them was heard from the rear of the building.
A faint tickle grew soon into a clear and continuous jingling,
rhythmical with the movements of the horses, now stopping, now
resuming in a sudden peal accompanied by the deadened noise of an
iron-shod hoof, pawing the ground.

The door closed suddenly.  All the noise ceased.  The frozen
passengers stopped talking:  they stood motionless and stiff.

An uninterrupted curtain of white, glistening flakes ceaselessly
fell on the ground; it obliterated the forms of things and powdered
them with an icy foam; and in the great silence of the quiet City,
buried under the winter, one could hear nothing save that vague,
nameless rustle of the falling snow--a sensation rather than
a sound--an intermingling of light atoms which seemed to fill the
space and cover the whole world.

The man reappeared with his lantern, leading by a rope a sad-looking
horse who followed him reluctantly.  He placed him against the
shaft, fastened the straps, turned around for a long time to make
sure that the harness was properly fixed, for he could use only
one hand, the other holding the lantern.  As he was going to bring
the second animal, he noticed that all the travelers were standing
still, already white with snow, and he told them:--"Why don't you
get in the coach? there you would be under shelter at least."

No doubt this had not occurred to them; at once there was a rush
to get in.  The three men installed their wives in the rear of the
coach and then got in themselves; one after the other, the remaining
indistinct and snow covered forms took the last seats without
exchanging a single word.

The floor was covered with straw into which the feet sank.  The ladies
in the rear, having brought with them small copper foot-warmers,
heated by means of a chemical coal, lighted these apparatuses, and
for some time, in a low voice, they enumerated their advantages,
repeating to each other things which they had not known for a long
time.

At last six horses instead of four having been harnessed to the coach,
on account of the difficult roads and heavier draft, a voice from
the outside asked:  "Is everybody in?"--To which a voice replied
from the inside:--"Yes"--And the coach started.

The coach proceeded slowly, slowly, at a snail's pace.  The wheels
sank into the snow; the entire body of the carriage groaned with
creaks; the animals were slipping, puffing, steaming, and the
driver's gigantic whip was cracking continuously, flying in every
direction, coiling up and unrolling itself like a thin snake, and
suddenly lashing some rounded back, which then stretched out under
a more violent effort.

Imperceptibly the day was breaking.  Those light flakes that a
traveler, a pure blood native of Rouen, had compared to a rain of
cotton, had stopped falling.  A murky light filtered through the big,
dark and heavy clouds, which rendered more dazzling the whiteness
of the country where one could see now a line of tall trees spangled
with hoar frost, now a cottage with a snow hood.

Inside the coach, the travelers eyed each other inquisitively in
the melancholy light of the dawn.

Way in the rear, on the best seats, facing each other, Mr. and
Mrs. Loiseau, wholesale wine dealers of the Rue Grand-Pont, were
slumbering.

Former clerk to a merchant who had been ruined in business, Loiseau
had bought his employer's stock and made a fortune.  He was selling
very cheap very bad wine to small liquor dealers in the country, and
was considered by his friends and acquaintances as a sharp crook,
a real Norman full of wiles and joviality.  His reputation as a
crook was so well established that one evening at the Prefecture,
Mr. Tournel, a writer of fables and songs, a biting and fine wit,
a local literary glory, having proposed to the ladies' whom he
saw rather drowsy, to play a game of "L'oiseau vole," (the bird
steals--flies) the joke flew through the salons of the Prefect and
from there, reaching those of the town, made all the jaws of the
Province laugh for a whole month.

In addition to this unsavory reputation, Loiseau was famous for his
various practical jokes, his good or bad tricks; and nobody could
mention his name without adding immediately:--"Loiseau is merciless;
he spares nobody!"--

Undersized, he had a balloon shaped stomach surmounted by a florid
face between a pair of grayish whiskers.

His wife, tall, stout determined, with a loud voice, a woman of
quick decision, represented order and arithmetic in the business
house which her husband enlivened by his mirthful activity.

Beside them sat, more dignified and belonging to a superior class,
Mr. Carre-Lamadon, a man of considerable standing, a leader in the
cotton business, proprietor of three spinning mills, officer of
the Legion of Honor and member of the General Council.  During the
Empire he had been the leader of the friendly opposition, solely
for the purpose of commanding a higher price for his support when
he rallied to the cause which he was fighting daily with courteous
weapons, according to his own expression.  Mrs. Carre-Lamadon,
considerably younger than her husband, remained the consolation of
Officers belonging to good families who had been quartered in Rouen.

She was sitting opposite her husband, pretty, slender, graceful,
curled in her furs, and gazed mournfully at the lamentable interior
of the coach.

Her neighbors, Count and Countess Hubert de Breville, bore one of
the most ancient and noble names of Normandy.  the Count, an old
nobleman of aristocratic bearing, endeavored to accentuate by the
artifices of his toilette his natural resemblance to King Henry
IV, who, according to a legend, in which the family gloried, had
caused the maternity of a de Breville lady whose husband, on account
of his royal connection, had been made a Count and Governor of a
Province.

A Colleague of Carre-Lamadon in the General Council, Count Hubert
represented the Orleanist party in his Department.  The story of
his marriage with the daughter of a small ship-owner of Nantes had
always remained mysterious.  But as the Countess had a grand air,
entertained better than any other hostess, and was credited with
having been the Dulcinea of one of Louis Philippe's sons, the
whole nobility showed her the greatest consideration, and her salon
remained the most exclusive in the locality, the only one where
old gallantry was conserved and admission to which was not easy.

The wealth of the de Brevilles, all invested in real estate, was
estimated to yield an annual income of five hundred thousand francs.

These six persons occupied the rear of the coach, the side of
wealthy, serene and solid Society, authoritative, honest people
who have religion and principles.

By a strange hazard, all the women were seated on the same side;
and the Countess further had for neighbors two saintly nuns who
fingered long rosaries and mumbled Paters and Aves.  One of them
was old and had a face so deeply pitted with smallpox, that she
looked as if she had been shot full in the face by a rapid-firing
gun.  The other, very frail, had a pretty and sickly head on
a narrow consumptive chest eaten up by that devouring faith which
makes martyrs and visionaries.  Seated opposite the nuns, a man
and a woman attracted the eyes of all the other passengers.

The man, a well known character, was Cornudet the democrat,
the terror of respectable people.  Since twenty years he had been
dipping his large red beard in the bocks of all the democratic
Cafes.  He had spent, with the help of his brethren and friends, a
good sized fortune inherited from his father, a retired Confectioner,
and he was impatiently waiting for the advent of the Republic
to secure a political position deserved by so many revolutionary
libations.  On the fourth of September, possibly as a result of a
practical joke, he had thought that he had been appointed Prefect, but
when he wanted to take up his duties, the clerk, who had remained
in charge of the office, refused to recognize him, which compelled
him to retire.  A very good natured chap, and moreover inoffensive
and serviable, he had worked with an incomparable energy to organize
the defense of the City.  He had had trenches dug in the plains,
all the young trees in the neighboring forests cut down, traps set
on all the roads, and at the approach of the enemy, satisfied with
his preparations, he had hurriedly returned to town.  He thought
now that he would be more useful in Havre where new trenches were
going to be needed.

The woman, one of those called gallant, was famous for her precocious
embonpoint which had earned her the nickname of "Boule de Suif"
(ball of tallow).  Short and rotund all over, fat enough to supply
lard, with puffed fingers constricted at the joints and looking
like strings of small sausages, a shiny and tight skin, an enormous
bust which protruded from under her gown, she was yet attractive
and much coveted, her fresh appearance being pleasant to look at.
Her face was like a red apple, a peony bud, ready to bloom forth;
and in the upper part of her face, two magnificent black eyes,
shaded by large thick lashes which cast a shadow into them; in the
lower part, a charming mouth, narrow, moist, ripe for kisses, and
furnished with white and microscopic teeth.

Moreover she was said to be full of invaluable qualities.

As soon as she was recognized, whispers circulated among the
respectable women and the words:  "hussy", "public scandal" were
spoken so loud that she raised her head.  Then she turned on her
neighbors such a challenging and haughty look, that a great silence
fell on the company and they all lowered their eyes except Loiseau,
who kept on watching her with an exhilarated air.

But soon the conversation was resumed between the three ladies, whom
the presence of this girl had suddenly made friends, almost intimates.
It seemed to them that they should form a sort of "fasces" of their
conjugal dignities in the presence of this shameless mercenary;
for legalized love always looks down on its free brother.

The three men, also drawn closer by an instinct of conservation at
the sight of Cornudet, spoke of money matters with an expression
of contempt for the poor.  Count Hubert related the damage done to
his property by the Prussians, the losses that would result from
their stealing of a tenfold millionaire grand Seigneur whom such
reverses would hardly incommodate for one year.  Mr. Carre-Lamadon,
who had suffered serious losses in his cotton business, had taken
the precaution of sending six hundred thousand francs to England,
a provision for rainy days which would enable him to meet
emergencies.  As to Loiseau, he had found a way of selling to the
French Quartermaster's Office all the low grade wines he had in
stock, so that the Government owed him a tremendous sum, which he
expected to cash in time at Havre.

And all three cast at each other quick and friendly glances.
Although belonging to different social sets, they felt united in the
brotherhood of money, the great freemasonry of those who possess,
who jingle gold when they put their hands in the pockets of their
trousers.

The coach was making such slow headway that at ten o'clock A. M.
they had traveled only four leagues.  The men got off three times
and walked up the hills.  They began to feel uneasy, because they
expected to have luncheon in Totes and now there was hardly any
possibility of getting there before night.  Each was watching to
find an inn on the road, when the coach foundered in a snow-drift,
and it took two hours to extricate it.

Appetites grew and spirits fell; no road-house, no wine dealer could
be discovered, the approach of the Prussians and the passage of
the starving French troops having frightened away all the trades-people.

The men went to the farmhouses by the roadside to look for food
but they did not even find bread, for the suspicious peasants had
hidden away their reserve of provisions for fear of being pillaged
by the soldiers who, having nothing to eat, were taking forcibly
what they discovered.

Toward one o'clock in the afternoon Loiseau announced that positively
he felt a big hollow in his stomach.  All of them had been suffering
like him for a long time, and the violent craving for food, growing
steadily had killed off the conversations.

From time to time one of them yawned, another imitated him instantly;
and each, in turn, according to his character, manners and social
position, opened his mouth noisily or modestly holding his hand
before the gaping hole from which breath steamed out.

Boule de Suif stooped several times as if looking for something under
her petticoats.  She hesitated a second, looked at her neighbors
and the straightened herself up quietly.  Faces were pale and drawn.
Loiseau said that he would pay one thousand francs for a knuckle
of ham.  His wife made a gesture as if to protest, then she became
calm.  She always suffered when she heard of money being squandered,
and did not even understand jokes on that subject.  "As a matter
of fact, I don't feel well, said the Count; why did I not think
of taking provisions with me?"--Every one was reproaching himself
with the same omission.

Cornudet, however, had a pocket bottle of rum; he offered some to
his companions; they refused coldly.  Loiseau alone accepted a few
drops, and when he returned the bottle, he thanked:  "It is good,
all the same! it warms you up and it cheats the appetite."--The
drink put him in good humor and he proposed that they should do as
on the small boat in the song:  "eat the fattest of the passengers."
This indirect allusion to Boule de Suif shocked the well-bred
passengers.  There was no response.  Cornudet alone smiled.  The
two good Sisters had ceased to mumble their rosary, and with their
hands thrust down in their wide sleeves, they held themselves
motionless, obstinately lowering their eyes and doubtless offering
up as a sacrifice to God the suffering He had sent them.

At last, at three o'clock, as they were still in the middle of an
interminable plain, without any village in sight, Boule de Suif
bent down quickly and from under her seat pulled out a large basket
covered with a white napkin.

She drew out first a small earthen plate, a fine silver drinking
cup, then a large pot in which two whole chickens, carved in pieces,
had stewed in their own gravy; and one could further see in the
basket other good things wrapped up, pastry, fruit, delicacies,
provisions prepared for a three days' trip, so that the traveler
would not have to touch the food in the inns.  The neck of four
bottles emerged from among the food packages.  She took the wing of
a chicken and, began to eat it delicately with one of those small
rolls which in Normandy are called "Regence."

All the eyes were attracted in her direction.  Then the appetizing
smell filled the coach, making the nostrils dilate and mouths water,
while the jaws under the ears contracted painfully.  The contempt
of the ladies for this girl was becoming ferocious, developing
into a desire to kill her or throw her, with her drinking cup, her
basket and her provisions, out of the coach on the snow.

All the while, Loiseau had been devouring with his eyes the pot of
chicken.  He said:--"Well, well, the lady has been more provident
than all of us!  There are persons who always manage to think of
everything."--She raised her head towards him:--"Would you like
some, Sir?"  "It is hard to fast since morning--"  And looking
around him he added:--"In moments like this, one is glad to find
obliging people."

He had a newspaper which he unfolded on his knees in order not to
soil his trousers, and with the point of a knife, which he always
carried in his pocket, he picked a leg thoroughly varnished with
jelly, bit it off and chewed it with such evident relish, that
there arose in the coach a heavy sigh of distress.

Boule de Suif, with a humble and gentle voice, proposed to the good
Sisters to share her luncheon.  They both accepted instantly and,
without raising their eyes, began to eat very fast, after having
muttered a few words of thanks.  Neither did Cornudet decline the
offer of his neighbor, and with the nuns, they improvised a sort
of table by unfolding newspapers on their knees.

Mouths were opening and closing constantly, swallowing, chewing,
gulping ferociously.  Loiseau in his corner was very busy eating,
and in a low voice was urging his wife to imitate him.  She resisted
for a long time, but, after a cramp, which ran through her stomach,
she yielded.  Then her husband, rounding his sentences, asked their
"charming companion" whether she would allow him to offer a small
piece to Madame Loiseau.  She replied:--"Why, certainly, Sir!"--with
an amiable smile, and held out the terrine.  An embarrassment
occurred when the first bottle of claret was opened:  there was
only one drinking cup.  They passed it around after wiping it each
time.  Cornudet alone, no doubt in a spirit of gallantry, put his
lips on the spot which was still moist from the lips of his neighbor.

Then, surrounded by people who were eating, suffocated by the
emanations of the food, Count and Countess de Breville, as well as
Mr. and Mrs. Carre-Lamadon, were suffering from that torture which
has perpetuated the name of Tantalus.  All at once the manufacturer's
young wife heaved a sigh which caused every one to turn and look
at her; she was as white as the snow outside; her eyes closed,
her head fell forward, and she fainted.  Her husband, alarmed, was
imploring everybody's help.  All lost their heads, but the oldest
of the two Nuns holding in her arm the head of the unconscious
lady, slipped between her lips the drinking cup of Boule de Suif
and made her swallow a few drops of wine.  The pretty lady moved,
opened her eyes, smiled and declared in a dying voice that she felt
better.  However, to prevent a recurrence of the fainting, the Nun
obliged her to drink a full cup of claret, and she added:--"It is
just hunger, and nothing else."

Then Boule de Suif, blushing and embarrassed, stammered, looking
at the four passengers who had not yet broken their fast:--"Mon
Dieu!, if I ventured to offer these ladies and gentlemen?"  She
stopped short, thinking she had hurt their feelings.  Loiseau began
to speak:  "Well, by Jove! in cases like this, we are all brothers
and sisters and must help each other.  Come, ladies, no ceremony!
accept what is offered; what the devil! do we even know whether we
are going to find a house to shelter us during the night?  At the
rate at which we are traveling, we shall not be in Totes before
to-morrow noon."  They hesitated, none daring to assume the
responsibility of saying "Yes."

But the Count settled the question.  He turned to the intimidated
fat girl and assuming his grand aristocratic tone, he said to
her:--"We accept gratefully, Madame."

The first step only costs.  Once the Rubicon crossed, they ate
heartily.  The basket was emptied.  It still contained one pate de
foie gras, one pate de mauvette, a piece of smoked ham, Crassane
pears, a Pont-l'Eveque cheese, assorted petits-fours, and a cup
full of pickled gherkins and onions, Boule de Suif, like all women,
having a predilection for raw things.

One could not partake of the girl's provisions without speaking to
her.  Now then, they talked, first with some restraint, then, as
she behaved very well, with more freedom.  Mesdames de Breville
and Carre-Lamadon, who had great "savoir-faire," made themselves
tactfully gracious.  Specially the Countess showed that amiable
condescension of great ladies whom no contact can sully, and she
was charming.  On the other hand, fat Madame Loiseau, who had the
soul of a gendarme, remained distant, sullen, saying little but
eating much.

Naturally they talked about the war.  They told the horrible
things done by the Prussians, the deeds of bravery of the French;
and all these people, who were fleeing, paid homage to the courage
of others.  Personal experiences soon followed, and Boule de Suif,
related with unaffected emotion, with that warmth of language often
characteristic of girls of her class in expressing their natural
feelings, how she had left Rouen:--"First I thought that I could
stay," she said; "I had my house full of provisions, and I preferred
to feed a few soldiers then expatriate myself and go God knows
where.  But when I saw them, the Prussians, it was too much for
me, I could not stand it.  They made my blood boil with rage; and I
wept all day for very shame.  Then some were billeted to my house;
I flew at the throat of the first one who entered.  And I would
have fixed that one, if they had not pulled me away by the hair.
After that, I had to hide.  Finally I found an opportunity to go,
I left, and here I am!"

She was warmly congratulated.  She was rising in the esteem of her
traveling companions, who had not shown themselves as fearless.
And in listening to her, Cornudet had the approving and benevolent
smile of an apostle, in the same way as a priest hears a devout
person praise God, for long-bearded democrats have the monopoly
of patriotism just as the men in cassocks have the monopoly of
religion.  He spoke, in his turn, with a dogmatic tone, with the
declamatory emphasis learned from proclamations daily posted on
the walls, and he winded up with a piece of eloquence in which he
condemned masterfully that "scoundrel of Napoleon III."

But Boule de Suif became angry immediately because she was a partisan
of the Bonapartes.  She turned as red as a cherry and stuttering
with indignation:--"I should have like to see you in his place,
you and your friends!  It would have been nice, oh yes!  It is you
who betrayed the poor man!  If we were ruled by rascals like you,
there would remain nothing else to do for us but leave France."--Impassive,
Cornudet kept a superior and contemptuous smile, but one could feel
that big words were impending, when the Count interposed and, not
without some difficulty, calmed the exasperated girl by proclaiming
authoritatively that all sincere opinions should be respected.
However, the Countess and the wife of the Cotton manufacturer, who
bore in their hearts the unreasoning hatred of all decent people
for the Republic, and that predilection which all women have for
the pomp of despotic Governments, felt irresistibly attracted toward
this dignified prostitute whose opinions were very much like theirs.

The basket was empty.  The ten of them had easily consumed its
contents, regretting that it was not larger.  The conversation
continued for some time, though it flagged since they had finished
eating.

The night was falling; darkness gradually grew deeper and deeper,
and the cold, felt more during digestion, made Boule De Suif shiver
notwithstanding her corpulence.  Then Madame de Breville offered
her her foot-warmer, the coal of which had been renewed several
times since the morning, and she accepted it willingly, for she felt
her feet frozen.  Mesdames Carre-Lamadon and Loiseau gave theirs
to the Nuns.

The driver had lighted his lanterns.  They threw a bright gleam
on the cloud of vapor rising from the perspiring backs of the rear
horses, and on both sides of the road the snow seemed to unroll
under the mobile light of the lamps.

Nothing could be distinguished in the coach; suddenly there was
a movement between Boule de Suif and Cornudet; and Loiseau, whose
eyes scanned the darkness, through that he saw the long-bearded
man jump up, as if he had received a noiseless but well aimed blow.

Tiny lights appeared ahead on the road.  It was Totes.  They had
traveled eleven hours which, added to the hours of rest given in
four times to the horses for feeding and breathing, made fourteen
hours.  They entered the town and the coach stopped in front of
the Hotel du Commerce.

The door of the coach opened.  A well known noise startled all
the passengers; it was the clanging of a scabbard on the pavement.
Then the voice of a German called out something.

Although the coach was at a standstill, nobody got off, as if they
were expecting to be massacred the moment they left the coach.
Then the driver appeared, holding in his hand one of his lanterns
which suddenly lighted the interior of the coach and shoed two rows
of frightened faces, whose mouths were agape and eyes wide open in
surprise and terror.

Beside the driver, in full light, stood a German Officer, a tall
young man, exceedingly thin and blond, laced in his uniform as
tightly as a girl in her corset, and wearing tilted to one side
his flat and waxed cap, which gave him the appearance of a porter
in an English Hotel.  His exaggerated mustache, long and straight,
tapering indefinitely on both sides and ending in a single blond
hair, so thin that the point could not be seen, seemed to weigh on
the corners of his mouth and pulling down his cheeks, impressed on
the lips a drooping fold.

In Alsatian French, he invited the travelers to alight, saying in
a stiff tone:--"Will you please get off, ladies and gentlemen?"--

The two good Sisters obeyed first with the docility of holy women
accustomed to submission.  The Count and Countess appeared next,
followed by the manufacturer and his wife, then Loiseau pushing in
front of him his larger and better half.

Loiseau, as he got off, told the officer:  "Good day, Sir!" prompted
by a feeling of prudence much more than politeness.  The Officer,
insolent like all men holding absolute authority, stared at him
and did not reply.

Boule de Suif and Cornudet, although near the door of the coach,
were the last to alight, serious and dignified in the presence
of the enemy.  The corpulent girl was trying to control herself
and be calm; the democrat, with a tragic and rather shaky hand,
was tormenting his reddish beard.  They wanted to maintain their
dignity, being fully conscious of the fact that at such meetings
each represents a little his country; and both equally revolted by
the supineness of their companions, she tried to show herself more
proud than her neighbors, the honest women, while he, realizing that
he owed an example, continued in his whole attitude his mission of
resistance, first assumed when he mined and destroyed the highways.

They entered the spacious kitchen of the inn, and the German, having
called for and inspected the permit to leave Rouen signed by the
General in Chief, in which were mentioned the names, description
and profession of each traveler, examined them for a long while,
comparing the persons with the written particulars.

He said abruptly:  "All right!", and he disappeared.

Then they breathed freely.  They were still hungry; supper was
ordered.  It required half an hour to prepare it; and while two
servants were apparently engaged in getting it ready, the travelers
went upstairs to have a look at their rooms.  They were all in a
long hall ending in a glazed door marked with a speaking number.

They were going to sit down to supper when the proprietor of the
inn appeared.  He was a former horse dealer, a stout, asthmatic
man, always wheezing, coughing and clearing his throat.  His father
had transmitted him the name of Follenvie.

He inquired:

"Mademoiselle Elizabeth Rousset?"--Boule de Suif started; she turned
around:

--"That is my name!"--

--"Mademoiselle, the Prussian Officer wants to speak to you
immediately."

--"To me?"

--"Yes, if you are Mlle. Elizabeth Rousset?"

She became uneasy, reflected a moment, then declared squarely:--"That
may be, but I shall not go."

There was a movement around her; each discussed and speculated as
to the cause of this order.  The Count came near her:

--"You are wrong, Madame, because your refusal might bring considerable
trouble not only to you but also to all your traveling companions.
We should never resist those who are the strongest.  Assuredly your
compliance with this order cannot involve any danger; no doubt you
are wanted for some forgotten formality"--

All joined the Count in urging her, pressing her, lecturing her and
finally they convinced her; for all of them dreaded complications
which might result from insubordination on her part.  At last she
said:

--"I am doing this for your sake, don't forget it."

The Countess took her hand:

--"And we thank you for it."--

She went out.  All waited for her return before they sat down at
the table.

Each was sorry that he had not been called instead of that violent
and irascible girl, and prepared mentally the platitudes he would
utter in case he should be called in his turn.

But at the end of ten minutes, she came back, out of breath, red to
suffocation, exasperated.  She was stammering:--"Oh! la Canaille!
la Canaille!"[*]

[*][Note from Brett:  This translates, roughly, into "Oh! the rogue!
the rogue!"]

All rushed up to her to find out what had happened, but she did
not say anything, and as the Count was insisting, she replied with
a great deal of dignity:--"No, it does not concern you; I cannot
speak..."

Then they took their seats around a high soup tureen from which
issued a smell of cabbage.  In spite of this untoward incident,
the supper was cheerful.  The cider was good; the Loiseau couple
and the Sisters drank of it by economy.  the others ordered wine.
Cornudet called for a bottle of beer.  He had a peculiar way
of uncorking the bottle, making the beer foam, examining it as he
inclined his glass, which he then raised between the lamp and his
eyes in order to appreciate better its color.  While drinking,
his long beard, that had kept the color of his favorite beverage,
seemed to shake with joy; his eyes squinted in his effort not to
lose sight of his glass, and he looked as if he were performing
the only function for which he had been created.  One would have
thought that in his mind he established a relationship and a kind
of affinity between the two great passions that occupied all his
life:  Pale Ale and Revolution; and certainly he could not taste
the former without dreaming of the latter.

Mr. and Mrs. Follenvie were dining at the other end of the table,
the man, rattling like a broken down locomotive, was too short
winded to talk while eating; but the woman never kept silent.  She
told all her impressions on the arrival of the Prussians, what they
did, what they said, execrating them first because they cost them
money, and then because she had two sons in the Army.  She spoke
especially to the Countess, flattered at the opportunity of talking
with a lady of quality.

Then she lowered her voice to broach delicate subjects, and
her husband interrupted her now and then:--"You better hold your
tongue, Madame Follenvie!"--But she did not pay any attention to
his admonitions, and continued,

--"Yes, Madame, these people do nothing but eat potatoes and pork,
and again pork and potatoes.  And you must not think that they are
clean.  Oh, No, indeed not!--They soil and dirty everything, permit
me the expression.  And if you saw them drill for hours and days!
they are all there, in a field, and march forward and march backward,
and turn this way and turn that way.  If at least they cultivated
the land, or worked on the roads, in their country!--But no,
Madame, these soldiers are good for nothing; what a pity that the
poor people should toil and feed them and they should learn nothing
but how to massacre!--I am only an uneducated old woman, it is true,
but in seeing them wear themselves out by marching from morning
till night, I say to myself:--"When there are so many people who
make so many discoveries to serve the people, why should others
take so much trouble to be harmful?  Truly, is it not abominable
to kill people, whether they are Prussians, or English, or Polish
or French?--If you take revenge on somebody, who has wronged you,
that is bad enough, because you are condemned to jail, but when our
boys are exterminated like game, with guns, it must be all right,
because decorations are given to the man who kills the most--No,
indeed, I shall never be able to understand it."

Cornudet raised his voice:

--"War is barbarous when you attack a peaceful neighbor; it is a
sacred duty when waged in defense of one's country."

The old woman lowered her head.

--"Yes in self-defense, it is another matter, but shouldn't we
rather kill off all the Kings who go to war for their own pleasure?"

--Cornudet's eyes flashed:

--"Bravo, citoyenne[*]!" said he.

[*][Note from Brett:  This translates, roughly, into "citizen"]

Mr. Carre-Lamadon was in deep meditation.  Although a fanatical
admirer of illustrious generals, the common sense of that peasant
woman made him think of the opulence that would bring to a country
so many hands now idle and necessarily ruinous, so many forces
kept unproductive, if they were employed for the great industrial
enterprises which, at the present pace, it would take centuries to
complete.

But Loiseau, leaving his seat, went and spoke in a very low
voice to the inn-keeper.  The fat man was laughing, coughing, and
expectorating.  His enormous stomach shook with merriment at the
jokes of his neighbor, and he bought from him six casks of claret
to be delivered in the Spring, after the departure of the Prussians.

Hardly were they through with supper, they retired, as they were
all tired out.

Loiseau, however, who had kept an eye on what was going on, send
his wife to bed; then he pressed now his ear, now his eye to the
keyhole in order to try and discover what he called "the mysteries
of the hall."--

After about an hour, he heard a rustle, peeped out quickly and saw
Boule de Suif, who looked still more corpulent in a blue cashmere
dressing gown trimmed with white lace.  She held a candle in her
hand and made straight for the room at the other end of the hall
bearing a conspicuous number.  But a side-door opened, and when,
after a few minutes, she came back, Cornudet, in his shirt-sleeves
and suspenders, was following her.  Boule de Suif seemed to deny
him energetically admission to her room.  Unfortunately Loisseau
could not hear what they said, but in the end, as they raised their
voices, he was able to catch a few words.  Cornudet was insisting
eagerly:

--"Come, now, you are silly! what does it matter to you?"--

She seemed indignant and replied:

--"No, my friend, there are times when we cannot do such things,
and why, here, it would be a shame!"

Apparently, he failed to understand and asked why.--Then she became
excited and speaking louder, she said:

--"Why?  Don't you understand why?  When Prussians are in the house,
maybe in the next room?"  He had a newspaper which he unfolded on
his knees.  A hussy who denied herself to the solicitations of a
man while they were near the enemy, must have aroused in his heart
his failing dignity, for, after having kissed her, he went back
stealthily to his room.

Loiseau, quite excited, left the keyhole, and quickly jumped into the
conjugal bed to seek solace near the hard carcass of his espoused.

Then the whole house became silent.  But soon there arose from
somewhere, from some indeterminate direction, which might have
been the cellar as well as the attic, a powerful monotonous snore,
a deep and prolonged noise, like the throbbing of a boiler under
pressure--Mr. Follenvie was sleeping.

As it had been decided that they would start at eight o'clock the
next morning, at that hour everybody was in the kitchen; but the
coach, the hood of which formed a roof of snow, stood solitary
in the middle of the yard, without horses and without driver.  In
vain a search was made for the latter in the stable, barns, and
coach-house.  Then all the men decided to scour the country, and
they set out.  They found themselves in the Square, with the Church
at the farther end, and on both sides low houses in which Prussian
soldiers could be seen.   The first one they saw was peeling
potatoes; further on, the second was washing the barber's shop.
Another, bearded up to his eyes, was kissing a crying child and
lulling him on his knees to quiet it; fat peasant women, whose
husbands were "in the fighting army," were showing by the language
of signs to their obedient conquerors the work they had to do:  chop
wood, prepare soup, grind coffee; one of them was even washing for
his hostess, an impotent grandmother.

The Count, surprised, questioned the beadle who was coming out of
the presbytery.  The old Church rat replied:--"Oh, those here are
not bad; they are not Prussians, according to what I hear.  They
come from farther off, I don't know exactly where; and they have
all left wives and children at home; they are not so fond of war,
I assure you; I am positive that over there they are mourning for
their men; and war will cause them much distress, as it does us.
Here at least we are not so badly off for the present, because the
soldiers don't harm us and they work as if they were in their own
houses.  You see, Sir, we poor people, must help each other.  It
is the wealthy ones who make war."

Cornudet, indignant at the cordial understanding established between
the conquerors and the conquered, went away, preferring to shut
himself up in the inn.  Loiseau cracked a joke:  "They are re-peopling
the country."  Mr. Carre-Lamadon, more serious, interjected:--"They
are repairing."  But they could not find the driver.  Finally they
discovered him in the village Cafe, fraternizing and drinking with
the orderly of the Prussian Officer.  The Count interpolated:

--"Didn't you have orders to have the coach ready for eight o'clock?"

--"Oh yes, but I have received other orders since."

--"What orders?"

--"Not to harness the horses at all."

--"Who gave you that order?"

--"Upon my faith, the Prussian Commander."

--"Why?"

--"I don't know.  Go and ask him.  I am forbidden to harness the
horses and I don't; that is all there is to it."

--"Did he tell you so himself?"

--"No.  Sir, it is the inn-keeper that gave me the order for him."

--"When did he give it?"

--"Last night, just as I was going to bed!"

The three men became quite alarmed.

They called for Monsieur Follenvie, but the servant told them that
on account of his asthma, that gentleman never got up before ten
o'clock.  He had even left formal orders not to wake him up earlier,
except in case of fire.

They wanted to see the officer, but it was absolutely impossible,
although he lodged in the inn.  Mr. Follenvie only was authorized
to speak to him about civil matters.  Then they waited.  The women
went up to their rooms and got busy with their trifles.

Cornudet sat down and made himself comfortable in front of the high
fireplace of the kitchen, in which a big fire was blazing.  He had
one of the small tables of the Cafe brought there, ordered a jug
of beer, and drew out his pipe which, among the democrats, enjoyed
a consideration almost equal to his own, as if it had served the
country in serving Cornudet.  It was a superb meerschaum pipe,
admirably blackened, as black as its master's teeth, but fragrant,
nicely curved, shining, familiar to his hand, and completing his
physiognomy.  And he remained still, his eyes fixed now on the
flame of the fire, now on the foam crowning his jug; and every
time, after he had drunk, he passed, with an air of satisfaction,
his thin, long fingers in his flowing greasy hair, while he sucked
his mustache fringed with foam.

Loiseau, under pretence of stretching his legs, went out to sell
wine to the dealers of the village.  The Count and the manufacturer
began to talk politics.  They were forecasting France's future.  The
one kept faith in the Orleans dynasty, the other expected an unknown
savior, a hero who would rise up when everything was desperate:
a Duguseclin, a Jeanne d'Arc perhaps? or another Napoleon the
Great?--"Ah! if the Imperial Prince had not been so young!"--Cornudet
listening to their conversation, was smiling as a man who holds
the keys to destiny.--His pipe perfumed the whole kitchen.

As it was striking ten o'clock, Mr. Follenvie appeared.  He was
immediately questioned, but he only repeated two or three times,
without any variation, the following words:--"The Officer told me
so!"--"Monsieur Follenvie, you will forbid the driver to harness
up the coach of these travelers to-morrow morning.  I don't want
them to go without my order.  You understand?  That is enough!"

Then they wanted to see the Officer.  The Count sent in his card
on which Mr. Carre-Lamadon added his own name and all his titles.
The Prussian sent word that the two men would be admitted to speak
to him after he had had his luncheon, that is to say about one
o'clock.

The ladies came down, and they all had a bite,  in spite of their
anxiety.  Boule de Suif seemed to be sick and prodigiously worried.

They were finishing their coffee, when the orderly came to call
the gentlemen.  Loiseau joined the first two, but as they tried to
induce Cornudet to go with them in order to add more solemnity to
their application, he declared proudly that he expected not to have
any intercourse with the Germans; and he resumed his seat near the
fire-place, ordering another jug of beer.

The three men went up and were ushered into the finest room of the
inn, in which the Officer received them, stretched on an armchair,
his feet resting on the mantelpiece, and smoking a long porcelain
pipe, wrapped in a flamboyant dressing-robe, no doubt stolen from
the abandoned residence of some bourgeois lacking in taste.  He did
not get up, neither did he greet them nor look at them.  He was a
magnificent specimen of the insolence natural to victorious soldiers.

After a few seconds, he said in his defective French:

--"What do you want?"

The Count spoke:--"We wish to continue our journey, Sir."

--"No!"

--"May I inquire what is the reason for this refusal?"

--"Because I don't want."

--"I would respectfully call your attention to the fact, Sir, that
your General in chief has delivered us a permit to go to Dieppe,
and I don't think we did anything to deserve your rigors."

--"I don't want to let you go, that is all; you may retire!"

Having bowed, all three retired.

They spent a wretched afternoon.  They could not in any way account
for this German's caprice, and the most singular ideas worried
their heads.  Everybody stayed in the kitchen and there was endless
discussion imagining the most unlikely things.  Perhaps they wanted
to hold them as hostages--but for what object?--or take them away
as prisoners? or, rather, demand from them a large ransom? at this
thought they became panic-stricken.  The wealthiest were the most
alarmed, seeing themselves already compelled, in order to redeem
their lives, to pour bags of gold into the hands of this insolent
soldier.  They racked their brains to find plausible and acceptable
lies, conceal their wealth, pass themselves off as very poor,
very poor.  Loiseau took off his watch and chain and hid it in his
pocket.  The approaching night filled them with apprehension.--The
lamp was lighted, and as they still had fully two hours before
dinner, Madame Loiseau proposed a game of "trente-et-un."  That
would be a diversion.  They accepted.  Even Cornudet, having put
out his pipe, joined the party out of politeness.

The Count shuffled the cards and dealt; Boule de Suif had a full
thirty-one; and soon the interest in the game quieted the fears
that were haunting the minds.  But Cornudet noticed that the Loiseau
couple had arranged to cheat.

As they were going to sit down to dinner, Mr. Follenvie reappeared,
and with his grating voice announced:  "The Prussian Officer sends
me to ask Mlle. Elizabeth Rousset whether she has changed her mind?"

Boule de Suif stood still, pale as death.  Then turning suddenly
crimson, she felt so suffocated by anger that she could not speak.
Finally she gasped out:  "You will please tell that scoundrel, that
rascal, that carrion of a Prussian, that I shall never consent;
you understand, never, never, never!"

The fat inn-keeper went away.  Then Boule de Suif was surrounded,
questioned, solicited by everybody to reveal the mystery of her
visit.  First she resisted, but soon exasperation got the best of
her.--"What he wants?...what he wants?....  He wants me to keep
company with him," she exclaimed.  Nobody was shocked by this
revelation, so great was their indignation.  Cornudet broke his
jug as he banged it down on the table.  There was a general clamor
of reprobation against the ignoble soldier, a waive of anger, a
combination of all for resistance as if each one of the party had
been called upon to make the sacrifice demanded of Boule de Suif.
The Count declared just like the barbarians in ancient times.  The
women specially showed Boule de Suif an affectionate and energetic
commiseration.  The good sisters who showed up only at meal time,
had bowed their heads and said nothing.

They dined however as soon as the first furor had abated, but they
spoke little.

The ladies retired early; and the men, while smoking, organized a
game of ecarte and invited Mr. Follenvie to join them, because they
wanted to question him skillfully as to the means to be used to
overcome the Officer's resistance.  but he had his mind concentrated
on the cards; he did not hear anything, did not answer anything, and
kept on repeating:  "Attend to the game, Gentlemen! attend to the
game!"--His attention was so tense that he even forgot to expectorate,
which produced at times a wheezing in his chest like the sounds of
an organ.  His whistling lungs gave out every note of the asthmatic
scale from the deep and hollow tones up to the shrill crowing of
young roosters trying to sing.

He even refused to go up when his wife, overcome with sleep, came
to get him.  Then she went away all alone, because she was an
early riser, getting up with the sun, whereas her husband kept late
hours, always ready to spend the night with friends.  He called
to her:--"Put my eggnog near the fire!"--and continued the game.
When the travelers saw that they could not get anything out of
him, they announced that it was time to retire, and they all went
to bed.

They rose quite early again the next morning with a vague hope, a
greater desire to be able to proceed on their journey, and a dread
of having to spend another day in this wretched little inn.  Alas!
the horses remained in the stable, the driver was invisible.  Having
nothing better to do, they went and wandered around the coach.

Luncheon was very gloomy, and there had developed a general coolness
toward Boule de Suif, for night, which brings counsel, had somewhat
modified their judgment.  They almost bore a grudge against the
girl for not having surreptitiously gone to the Prussian Officer
to afford a pleasant surprise to her companions when they awoke.
Nothing more simple!  Beside, who would have suspected it?  She
might have saved appearances by having the Officer say that he had
taken pity on their distress.  To her it would have been of little
consequence.

But nobody as yet gave expression to such thoughts.

In the afternoon, as they were bored to death, the Count proposed
to take a walk around the village.  Each one wrapped himself
up carefully and the small company set off, with the exception of
Cornudet, who preferred to remain by the fire, and the good Nuns
who spent their days in Church or at the Parish house.

The cold, growing daily more and more intense, bit mercilessly
the nose and ears of the strollers; their feet pained them so much
that each step was a torture; and when the country opened up before
them, it looked so frightfully dismal under the boundless sheet
of white, that they all retraced their steps hastily, with souls
frozen and hearts heavy.

The four women walked in front and the three men followed them a
little behind.

Loiseau, who understood the situation very clearly, inquired suddenly
whether that "wench" was going to keep them much longer in such a
place.  The Count, always courteous, realized that they could not
expect such a painful sacrifice from a woman, and that the offer
should originate from her.  Monsieur Carre-Lamadon remarked that
if the French undertook, as it was rumored, a counter-offensive
by way of Dieppe, the battle would certainly be fought in Totes.
This remark made the other two quite anxious--"How about trying
to escape on foot?" suggested Loiseau.  The Count shrugged his
shoulders:--"That is out of the question in this snow, and with
our wives!  And furthermore we would be pursued immediately, caught
in ten minutes and brought back as prisoners, at the mercy of the
soldiers"--That was true.  There was silence again.

The ladies talked toilette, but a certain constraint seemed to
separate them.

Suddenly the Officer appeared at the end of the street.  On the snow
that bound the horizon, his tall and wasp-like uniformed figure
outlined itself; he walked, knees apart, with that motion particular
to soldiers who are anxious not to soil their carefully polished
boots.

He bowed as he passed the ladies, and looked scornfully at the
men who, it must be said to their credit, had enough dignity not
to raise their hats, although Loiseau made a move to take off his
headgear.

Boule de Suif blushed red to her ears, and the three married women
felt greatly humiliated to have been met by the Officer while they
were in the company of this girl whom he had treated so unceremoniously.

Then they spoke of him, of his figure and his face.  Madame
Carre-Lamadon, who had known many officers and who judged them as
a connoisseur, found that this one was not so bad looking after
all; she even regretted that he was not French, because he would
have made a very handsome husband with whom all the women would
have fallen in love.

Once back in the inn, they did not know what to do with themselves.
Even acrid words were exchanged about insignificant matters.  The
silent dinner did not last long and each went upstairs to bed, in
the hope of sleeping the time away.

The next morning they came down with tired faces and exasperated
tempers.  The women hardly spoke to Boule de Suif.

A Church bell began to ring; it was for a baptism.  Boule de Suif
had a child being brought up by peasants in Yvetot.  She did not
see it even once a year and never gave it a thought; but the idea
of the one that was going to be baptized developed a sudden and
violent tenderness for her own and she insisted absolutely on going
to the ceremony.

As soon as she was gone, those who remained looked at each other,
and drew their chairs closer, for they felt that in the end they had
to take some decision.--Loiseau had an inspiration:  he suggested
that they should propose to the officer to keep Boule de Suif only
and let the others go.

Mr. Follenvie undertook again to convey the message, but he came
down almost immediately.  The German, who knew human nature, had
kicked him out of his room.  He meant to keep everybody as long as
his wishes had not been complied with.

Then the vulgar temper of Madame Loiseau broke loose:--"And yet
we are not going to die of old age here!  Since it is that vixen's
trade to carry it on with all men, I think that she has no right to
refuse one rather than another.  Imagine, she has taken all that
she found in Rouen, even coachmen, yes, Madame, the coachman of
the Prefecture; I know it for a fact, because he buys his wine of
us.  And now that it is a question of getting us out of trouble,
she is putting on virtuous airs, the drab!  I find that the Officer
behaves very well.  Possibly he may have abstained for a long time,
and here we are three of us whom he certainly would have preferred.
But no, he is satisfied with the girl who is public property.  He
respects married women.  Think of it, he is the master here.  All
that he had to do was to say:  'I want' and he might have taken us
by force, with the aid of his soldiers."

The two other women shuddered slightly.  The eyes of pretty Madame
Carre-Lamadon sparkled, and she grew a little pale as if she felt
herself already taken by force by the officer.

The men who were arguing among themselves, came near them.  Loiseau,
excited, wanted to deliver up that "miserable woman," bound
hand and foot, to the enemy.  But the Count, descended from three
generations of Ambassadors, and endowed with the physique of a
diplomat, was advocating more tactfulness and persuasion--"We should
persuade her"--said he.

Then they conspired.

The women drew close to each other; the tone of their voices was
lowered, and the discussion became general, each giving her opinion.
It was most correct, besides.  The ladies specially found delicate
euphemisms, charming subtleties of expression to say the most
shocking things.  A stranger would have understood nothing, so well
were the precautions of language observed.  But as the thin veneer
of pudor[*], with which every Society woman is provided, covers
only the surface, they showed their real selves in this wretched
adventure, and were as a matter of fact enjoying themselves
immensely, feeling themselves in their element, handling love with
the sensuousness of a gourmand cook who prepares supper for somebody
else.

[*][Note from Brett:  I think this is an excellent, though unintentional,
pun.  "Pudor" is Spanish for "shame," but this meaning makes the
sentence difficult to read (at best), although it does convey the
intent.  I think that the word intended is "powder," but left the
original in case I am wrong]

Their gaiety came back of itself, so amusing after all did the whole
incident seem to them.  The Count found rather risky witticisms,
but so cleverly told that they provoked smiles.  In his turn Loiseau
fired some broader jokes, which did not shock the listeners; and
the thought brutally expressed by his wife preponderated in every
one's mind:  "Since it is her business, why should the girl refuse
this man rather than another?"--The pretty Mme. Carre-Lamadon seemed
even inclined to think that in her place she would refuse this one
less than any other.

The blockade was carefully prepared, as if they were besieging
a fortress.  Each agreed to play the part assigned to him or her,
the arguments to be used, the maneuvers to be executed.  They decided
on the plan of attack, the stratagems and the surprise assault to
be attempted in order to compel this living citadel to receive the
enemy.

Cornudet, however, remained apart, completely unwilling to participate
in this plot.

The minds were so tensely absorbed in this scheme that nobody
heard Boule de Suif coming in.  But the Count whispered a gentle:
"Hush!" which caused all eyes to look up.  There she stood.  There
was a sudden silence and a certain embarrassment prevented them
first from speaking to her.  The Countess having more than the
others the habit of drawing-room duplicities, questioned her:--"Was
the baptism interesting?--"

The girl, still laboring under her emotion, told everything,
described the faces, the attitudes, and even the appearance of the
Church.  She added:--"It does one so much good to pray sometimes!--"

However, until lunch time the ladies confined themselves to being
nice to her with a view to make her feel more confident and amenable
to their advances.

As soon as they sat down to luncheon, the preliminary attack was
initiated.  It was at first a vague discussion about self-sacrifice.
They quoted instances from ancient History, such as Judith and
Holophern, then, without any reason Lucretia with Sextus, Cleopatra
who admitted to her intimacy all the enemy generals and reduced
them to slavish servility.  Then a fancy History was propounded,
originating in the imagination of those ignorant millionaires, and
according to which Roman matrons used to go to Capua and lull Hannibal
in their arms, and with him, his lieutenants and the phalanxes
of his mercenaries.  They quoted all the women who had stopped
conquerors, converted their bodies into battlefields, a means of
conquest, a weapon, who by their heroic caresses had vanquished
frightful and execrated beings, and had sacrificed their chastity
to vengeance and patriotic devotion.

They even spoke, in veiled terms, of that English lady of noble
family, who had allowed herself to be inoculated with a horrid and
contagious disease, which she wanted to communicate to Bonaparte,
and how the latter had been miraculously saved by a sudden faintness
during the fatal appointment.

And all this was told without overstepping the bounds of propriety
and moderation, with her and there a studied manifestation of
enthusiasm intended to provoke emulation.

In the end one would have been led to believe that the only mission
of woman on this earth was a perpetual sacrifice of her person, a
continual offering of herself to the caprices of enemy soldiers.

The two nuns did not seem to hear this conversation, lost as they
were in their own deep thoughts.  Boule de Suif was silent.

The whole afternoon she was left to herself.  But instead of
calling her "Madame" as they had done so far, they addressed her
as mademoiselle, nobody knew why, as if they wanted to lower her
one step in their esteem, which she had escaladed, and make her
feel her shameful situation.

While soup was being served, Mr. Follenvie reappeared and repeated
his sentence of the day before:--"The Prussian Officer sends me to
inquire whether Mademoiselle Elizabeth Rousset has not yet changed
her mind?"

Boule de Suif replied curtly:  "No, Sir."

But at dinner the coalition weakened.  Loiseau spoke three unfortunate
sentences.  Each was racking his brains to find new examples and
did not find any, when the Countess, possibly without premeditation,
prompted by a vague desire to render homage to religion, questioned
the elder of the two nuns about the most noteworthy deeds in the
lives of the Saints.--Now, many Saints had committed acts which
would be crimes in our estimation; but the Church absolves readily
such transgressions when they are committed for the glory of God
and the love of our neighbors.  This was a powerful argument; the
Countess made the most of it.  Then, either by one of those tacit
understandings, those veiled complaisances in which whoever wears
the clerical garb excels, or through fortunate stupidity, serviable
foolishness, the old nun brought a formidable support to the
conspiracy.  They thought she was timid; she showed herself bold,
talkative, violent.  This one was not trouble by the hesitations of
casuistry; her doctrine seemed to be an iron bar; her faith never
hesitated; her conscience had no scruples.  She found quite natural
Abraham's sacrifice, because she would immediately have killed her
father and mother if she had received an order from heaven to do so;
and in her opinion nothing could displease God if the motive were
laudable.  The Countess taking advantage of the sacred authority
of her unexpected accomplice, led her on to make a kind of edifying
paraphrase of this axiom of morality:  "The end justifies the
means."

She questioned her:

--"Then, Sister, you think that God accepts all methods and forgives
the act when the motive is pure?"

--"Who could doubt it, Madame?  An action condemnable in itself
often becomes meritorious by the thought which inspires it."

And they continued in this way, unraveling God's intentions,
forecasting his judgments, and making Him take interest in things
that really did not concern Him at all.

All this was expounded in a veiled, clever, discreet and insinuating
manner.  But each word of the holy woman in cornet made a breach in
the indignant resistance of the courtesan.  Then the conversation
drifting somewhat, the woman with the hanging rosary spoke of the
Convents of her Order, of her Superior, of herself, and of her
lovely neighbor, the dear Sister Saint-Nicephore.  They had been
called to Havre to nurse in the Hospitals hundreds of soldiers stricken
with small-pox.  She described them, those wretched victims, and
gave details about their disease.  And while they had been stopped
on their way by the caprices of this Prussian Officer, a large number
of Frenchmen, whom they would probably have saved, might die.  It
was her specialty to nurse soldiers; she had been in Crimea,
in Italy, in Austria, and telling the story of her campaigns, she
unexpectedly revealed herself one of those Nuns fond of drums and
bugles, who seem to have been created to follow the armies in action,
to pick soldiers during the vicissitudes of battles, and, better
than a General, to tame with one word the rough and insubordinate
troopers; a genuine martial and bellicose Nun, whose wrinkled and
pitted face, looked like an image of the devastations of war.

No one uttered a word after she had concluded, so excellent seemed
to be the effect of her discourse.

As soon as the meal was over, they went up quickly to their rooms
and came down the next morning rather late.

Luncheon went off quietly.  They were giving the seed that had been
sown time to germinate and come to fruition.

The Countess proposed to take a walk in the afternoon; then the
Count, as previously agreed, offered his arm to Boule de Suif and
walked with her at some distance behind.

He spoke to her in that familiar, paternal and slightly contemptuous
tone which sedate men assume when talking with women of loose morals,
calling her:  "my dear child," treating her from the height of his
social position, his unquestionable honesty.  He went straight to
the core of the matter:

--"So you prefer to leave us here exposed like yourself to all the
violence which would result from a defeat of the Prussian Army,
rather than consent to one of those complaisances which you have
had so often in your life"--

Boule de Suif did not answer.


He tried kindness, reasoning, sentiment.  He managed to remain
"Monsieur le Comte" even while showing himself gallant, when necessary,
flattering, amiable.  He praised to exaltation the services she
would render them, spoke of their gratitude, then suddenly, using
the familiar "thou," gaily:  "And thou knowest, my dear, he might
be proud of having tasted the charms of a pretty girl such as he
won't find often in his own country."

Boule de Suif did not reply and joined the rest of the party.

As soon as they returned to the inn, she went up to her room and
was not seen again.  There was extreme anxiety.  What was she going
to do?  If she resisted, what an embarrassment for them all?

The dinner hour struck; they waited for her in vain.  Then Mr.
Follenvie came in and announced that Mademoiselle Rousset did not
feel well and that they might sit down to dinner.  They all pricked
their ears.  The Count came near the inn-keeper and whispered:  "Is
it all right?"--"Yes."

For the sake of propriety, he did not say anything to his companions,
but nodded to them slightly.  Immediately a great sigh of relief
went up from all breasts; joy brightened every face.  Loiseau
exclaimed:  "By Jove, I'll treat to champagne if any is left in
this house!"--And Madame Loiseau felt a pang when the inn-keeper
returned with four bottles in his hand.  Every one had suddenly
become communicative and merry; a lively joy filled the hearts.
The Count seemed to notice that Madame Carre-Lamadon was charming;
the manufacturer paid compliments to the Countess; the conversation
was lively, gay and full of witticisms.

Suddenly Loiseau, with an alarmed face, raised his arms and
shouted:  "Silence!"  They all stopped talking, were surprised nay
even frightened.  Then he listened, said "Hush!" signaling with his
two hands, raised his eyes to the ceiling, listened again and, in
his natural voice, he resumed:  "Don't be afraid, everything is
all right!"

They hesitated to understand what he meant, but soon a smile lighted
up all the faces.

After a quarter of an hour, he started again the same farce and
repeated it often during the evening; he mimicked as if he were
calling a person on the second floor and giving her equivocal advices
drawn from his imagination of a commercial traveler.  At times he
assumed a dismal air and sighed:--"Poor girl!"--or he muttered in
his teeth, with a peevish air:--"Rascal of a Prussian!"--Several
times, when the others did not think of it, he called out
repeatedly in a vibrating voice:  "Enough!  Enough!" and he added
as if soliloquizing:--"Provided that we see her again and that the
wretch does not kill her!"

Although such jokes were in very bad taste, they amused more than
they shocked the company, for indignation like everything else
depends on environment, and the atmosphere that had gradually
developed around them was laden with naughty thoughts.

At dessert, even the women indulged in witty and discreet allusions.
Their eyes were bright and gleaming; they had drunk considerably.
The Count who, even in his moments of relaxation, preserved
a dignified appearance, found a comparison with the end of winter
in the polar regions and the joy of the ship-wrecked mariners when
they see a way open to the South; and this comparison was greatly
appreciated.

Loiseau, warmed up, rose to his feet with a glass of champagne in
his hands:--"I drink to our deliverance!"--Everybody stood up; he
was acclaimed.  Even the two good sisters, urged by the ladies,
consented to moisten their lips with the sparkling wine, which
they had never tasted.  They declared that it tasted like sparkling
lemonade, but that it was finer.

Loiseau summed up the situation:

--"What a pity that there is no piano!  We might have danced a
quadrille!"--

Cornudet had not said a single word, nor made a single gesture; he
even seemed to be plunged in very serious thoughts, and from time
to time tugged furiously at his long beard as if he wanted to
make it longer.  Finally, toward midnight, as they were going to
separate, Loiseau, who was unsteady on his feet slapped him suddenly
on the stomach and spluttered:--"You are not in a gay mood to-night,
you don't talk much, citoyen?"--But Cornudet raised briskly his
head and casting a swift and terrible look at the company, fairly
shouted:--"I tell you all, that you have behaved infamously!"--He
got up, walked to the door and repeated once more:  "Infamous!"
and he disappeared.

This threw a chill at first.  Loiseau nonplused, stood looking
foolish; but he recovered his countenance and then suddenly began
to laugh and repeat:--"Sour grapes! my dear Sir, sour grapes!"--The
company did not understand what he meant; he explained the "mysteries
of the hall"--Then there was a resumption of formidable gayety.
The ladies were immensely amused.  The Count and Mr. Carre-Lamadon
laughed to tears.  They could hardly believe their ears.

--"Why! are you sure?  He wanted"--"I tell you that I saw it with
my own eyes."

--"And she refused?"

--"Because the Prussian was in the next room."

--"Is it possible?"

--"I swear it is true!"--

The Count was choking with laughter.  The manufacturer was compressing
his stomach with his hands.

--"And you understand, to-night he does not think it is funny at
all."--

And all three began to laugh again, choking, out of breath.

Thereupon they retired.  But Madame Loiseau, who had the prickly
disposition of a nettle remarked to her husband, at the moment
they were going to bed:--"That stuck-up little Madame Carre-Lamadon
laughed deceitfully all evening."

"You know, for women, when they chase uniforms, it does not make
any difference whether the uniforms are French or Prussian.  What
a pity, oh Lord!"--

And all night, in the darkness of the hall there were light sounds
like tremors, hardly audible, similar to murmurs, contacts of bare
feet, imperceptible crackings.  And they fell asleep quite late,
certainly, because rays of light could be seen for a long time under
the doors.  Champagne has such effects; I understand it disturbs
the sleep.

The next morning a bright winter sunshine made the snow dazzling.
The coach, finally harnessed, was waiting at the door, while
an army of white pigeons, ensconced in their white feathers, with
their pink eyes spotted in the middle with small black dots, were
walking leisurely between the legs of the six horses and picking
their food from the steaming manure which they were scattering.

The driver, wrapped up in his sheepskin cloak, was up on his seat,
smoking a pipe, and all the travelers, looking radiant, were having
provisions packed up for the rest of the trip.

Boule de Suif only had not come down.  She appeared.

She seemed to be rather confused, bashful; shyly, she walked up to
her companions who, all with the same movement, turned away from
her as if they had not seen her.  The Count, dignified, took his
wife by the arm and removed her from this impure contact.

The girl stood still, stupefied; then picking up all her courage
she accosted the manufacturer's wife with a--"Good morning,
Madame!"--humbly muttered.  The other answered only with a short
and impertinent nod accompanied by a look of outraged virtue.
Everybody seemed to be busy and kept away from her as if she were
carrying some infectious germs in her skirt.  Then they rushed up
to the coach, in which she entered last, without being helped by
anyone, and silently she took the seat she had occupied during the
final part of the journey.

They feigned not to see her, not to know her; but Mme. Loiseau,
looking at her indignantly from a distance, told her husband half
aloud:--"Fortunately I am not sitting next to her."--

The heavy coach started and the journey was resumed.

First nobody spoke.  Boule de Suif did not dare raise her eyes.
At the same time she felt indignant at all her companions, and
humiliated for having yielded to the Prussian Officer into whose
arms she had been hypocritically forced by them.

But the Countess, turning to Madame Carre-Lamadon, broke soon this
painful silence.

--"I think you knew Madame d'Estrelles."

--"Yes, she is one of my friends."

--"What a charming woman!"

--"Fascinating!  Really a select nature, besides highly educated,
and an artist to the tips of her fingers.  She sings delightfully
and paints to perfection."

The manufacturer was talking with the Count, and in the middle of
the clatter of the window-panes, one could catch here and there a
word:--"Coupon--maturity--premium--term--"

Loiseau, who had stolen from the inn the old pack of cards, greasy
after five years friction on dirty tables, started a game of
"bezigue" with his wife.

The good sisters took from their belts the long rosaries, made
simultaneously the sign of the cross and suddenly their lips began
to move rapidly, becoming more and more accelerated, precipitating
their vague murmur as if in a race of "orisons;" and now and then
they kissed a medal, crossed themselves again, and resumed their
swift and continuous mutterings.

Cornudet sat still and deep in thoughts.  After they had traveled
for three hours, Loiseau picked up his cards and said:--"I am
hungry."  Then his wife reached out for a package from which she
drew a piece of cold veal.  She cut it carefully in thin and neat
slices and both began to eat.

--"Why shouldn't we do the same?"--said the Countess.  Upon general
consent, she unpacked the provisions prepared for the two couples.
In one of those oval dishes, the cover of which bears a china
hare, to show that a hare pie lies inside, there were exquisite
delicatessen, the white streams of lard crossing the brown meat of
the game, mixed with other fine chopped meats.  A handsome piece of
Swiss-cheese, wrapped in a newspaper, had taken on its fat surface
the imprint:--"Sundry items."

The two sisters opened a hunk of sausage which smelled of garlic;
and Cornudet plunging at the same time both his hands in the large
pockets of his baggy overcoat, drew from one four hard-boiled eggs
and from the other the crust of a loaf of bread.  He removed the
shells threw them under his feet, on the straw, and began to bite
the eggs voraciously, dropping on his large beard small pieces of
yellowish yolk which looked like stars.

Boule de Suif, in the haste and confusion of her departure, had not
thought of taking provisions; and exasperated, suffocating with
rage, she was looking on all those people who ate heartily.  At
first a tumultuous anger shook her, and she opened her mouth to
tell them what she thought of them in a wave of insults that surged
to her lips; but she could not speak, so exasperated was she with
indignation.

Nobody looked at her, took notice of her.  She felt drowned in the
scorn of those honest rascals who had first sacrificed her and then
cast her away like something unclean and of no further use.  Then
she thought of her large basket full of good things, which they
had devoured greedily, of her two chickens shining in jelly, her
pastry, her pears, her four bottles of claret; and suddenly, her
furor having died out, like an over strung cord, she felt like
crying.  She made terrible efforts; stiffened herself up, swallowed
her sobs like children, but the tears were surging, shining at the
border of her eyelids, and soon two big tears breaking away from
her eyes coursed slowly down her cheeks.  Others followed them
more swiftly, running like drops of water filtering through rocks
and fell regularly on the rounded curve of her bosom.  She remained
upright, her eyes motionless, her face rigid and pale, hoping that
the others would not notice her.

But the Countess noticed it and called her husband's attention
with a sign.  He shrugged his shoulders, as if to say:--"What can
I do?  It is not my fault!"--Madame Loiseau had a silent laugh of
triumph and muttered:  "She is weeping for shame!"--

The two good sisters had resumed their prayers after having rolled
up in a paper the rest of their sausage.

Then Cornudet, who was digesting the eggs, stretched his long legs
under the seat, sat back, crossed his arms, smiled like a man who
has thought of a good joke and began to whistle the Marseillaise.

The faces of all the others darkened.  Decidedly the popular song
did not please his neighbors.  They became nervous, fidgety, and
seemed ready to howl like dogs that hear a barrel-organ.  He noticed
it, did not stop.  At times he even pronounced the words:


Amour sacre del la patrie,
Conduis, soutiens, nos bras vengeurs,
Liberte, liberte cherie,
Combats avec tes defenseurs.


The snow being harder, the coach traveled more quickly, and as far
as Dieppe, during the long dreary hours of the trip, through the
jostles of the road, during the twilight, and later in the thick
darkness of the coach, he kept on with a fierce obstinacy his
monotonous and revengeful whistling, compelling the fagged and
exasperated hearers to follow the anthem from one end to the other,
to remember every word that went with each measure.

And Boule de Suif was still weeping; and at times a sob, which she
could not restrain, passed between two verses in the night.


FINIS








Redacted by Curtis A. Weyant {dylan38@angelfire.com}
Courtesy of the Michigan State University Libraries
(http://digital.lib.msu.edu/)


                   FLAPPERS AND PHILOSOPHERS
                      F. SCOTT FITZGERALD

                            To Zelda





Contents

The Offshore Pirate
The Ice Palace
Head and Shoulders
The Cut-Glass Bowl
Bernice Bobs Her Hair
Benediction
Dalyrimple Goes Wrong
The Four Fists







Flappers and Philosophers





The Offshore Pirate




I


This unlikely story begins on a sea that was a blue dream, as
colorful as blue-silk stockings, and beneath a sky as blue as the
irises of children's eyes. From the western half of the sky the
sun was shying little golden disks at the sea--if you gazed
intently enough you could see them skip from wave tip to wave tip
until they joined a broad collar of golden coin that was
collecting half a mile out and would eventually be a dazzling
sunset. About half-way between the Florida shore and the golden
collar a white steam-yacht, very young and graceful, was riding
at anchor and under a blue-and-white awning aft a yellow-haired
girl reclined in a wicker settee reading The Revolt of the
Angels, by Anatole France.

She was about nineteen, slender and supple, with a spoiled
alluring mouth and quick gray eyes full of a radiant curiosity.
Her feet, stockingless, and adorned rather than clad in
blue-satin slippers which swung nonchalantly from her toes, were
perched on the arm of a settee adjoining the one she occupied.
And as she read she intermittently regaled herself by a faint
application to her tongue of a half-lemon that she held in her
hand. The other half, sucked dry, lay on the deck at her feet and
rocked very gently to and fro at the almost imperceptible motion
of the tide.

The second half-lemon was well-nigh pulpless and the golden
collar had grown astonishing in width, when suddenly the drowsy
silence which enveloped the yacht was broken by the sound of
heavy footsteps and an elderly man topped with orderly gray hair
and clad in a white-flannel suit appeared at the head of the
companionway. There he paused for a moment until his eyes became
accustomed to the sun, and then seeing the girl under the awning
he uttered a long even grunt of disapproval.

If he had intended thereby to obtain a rise of any sort he was
doomed to disappointment. The girl calmly turned over two pages,
turned back one, raised the lemon mechanically to tasting
distance, and then very faintly but quite unmistakably yawned.

"Ardita!" said the gray-haired man sternly.

Ardita uttered a small sound indicating nothing.

"Ardita!" he repeated. "Ardita!"

Ardita raised the lemon languidly, allowing three words to slip
out before it reached her tongue.

"Oh, shut up."

"Ardita!"

"What?"

Will you listen to me--or will I have to get a servant to hold
you while I talk to you?"

The lemon descended very slowly and scornfully.

"Put it in writing."

"Will you have the decency to close that abominable book and
discard that damn lemon for two minutes?"

"Oh, can't you lemme alone for a second?"

"Ardita, I have just received a telephone message from the
shore---"

"Telephone?" She showed for the first time a faint interest.

"Yes, it was---"

"Do you mean to say," she interrupted wonderingly, "'at they let
you run a wire out here?"

"Yes, and just now---"

"Won't other boats bump into it?"

"No. It's run along the bottom. Five min---"

"Well, I'll be darned! Gosh! Science is golden or
something--isn't it?"

"Will you let me say what I started to?"

"Shoot!"

"Well it seems--well, I am up here--" He paused and swallowed
several times distractedly. "Oh, yes. Young woman, Colonel
Moreland has called up again to ask me to be sure to bring you in
to dinner. His son Toby has come all the way from New York to
meet you and he's invited several other young people. For the
last time, will you---"

"No" said Ardita shortly, "I won't. I came along on this darn
cruise with the one idea of going to Palm Beach, and you knew it,
and I absolutely refuse to meet any darn old colonel or any darn
young Toby or any darn old young people or to set foot in any
other darn old town in this crazy state. So you either take me to
Palm Beach or else shut up and go away."

"Very well. This is the last straw. In your infatuation for this
man.--a man who is notorious for his excesses--a man your father
would not have allowed to so much as mention your name--you have
rejected the demi-monde rather than the circles in which you have
presumably grown up. From now on---"

"I know" interrupted Ardita ironically, "from now on you go your
way and I go mine. I've heard that story before. You know I'd
like nothing better."

"From now on," he announced grandiloquently, "you are no niece of
mine. I---"

"O-o-o-oh!" The cry was wrung from Ardita with the agony of a
lost soul. "Will you stop boring me! Will you go 'way! Will you
jump overboard and drown! Do you want me to throw this book at
you!"

"If you dare do any---"

Smack! The Revolt of the Angels sailed through the air, missed
its target by the length of a short nose, and bumped cheerfully
down the companionway.

The gray-haired man made an instinctive step backward and then
two cautious steps forward. Ardita jumped to her five feet four
and stared at him defiantly, her gray eyes blazing.

"Keep off!"

"How dare you!" he cried.

"Because I darn please!"

"You've grown unbearable! Your disposition---"

"You've made me that way! No child ever has a bad disposition
unless it's her fancy's fault! Whatever I am, you did it."

Muttering something under his breath her uncle turned and,
walking forward called in a loud voice for the launch. Then he
returned to the awning, where Ardita had again seated herself and
resumed her attention to the lemon.

"I am going ashore," he said slowly. "I will be out again at nine
o'clock to-night. When I return we start back to New York,
wither I shall turn you over to your aunt for the rest of your
natural, or rather unnatural, life."  He paused and looked at
her, and then all at once something in the utter childness of her
beauty seemed to puncture his anger like an inflated tire, and
render him helpless, uncertain, utterly fatuous.

"Ardita," he said not unkindly, "I'm no fool. I've been round. I
know men. And, child, confirmed libertines don't reform until
they're tired--and then they're not themselves--they're husks of
themselves." He looked at her as if expecting agreement, but
receiving no sight or sound of it he continued. "Perhaps the man
loves you--that's possible. He's loved many women and he'll love
many more. Less than a month ago, one month, Ardita, he was
involved in a notorious affair with that red-haired woman, Mimi
Merril; promised to give her the diamond bracelet that the Czar
of Russia gave his mother. You know--you read the papers."

"Thrilling scandals by an anxious uncle," yawned Ardita. "Have it
filmed. Wicked clubman making eyes at virtuous flapper. Virtuous
flapper conclusively vamped by his lurid past. Plans to meet him
at Palm Beach. Foiled by anxious uncle."

"Will you tell me why the devil you want to marry him?"

"I'm sure I couldn't say," said Audits shortly. "Maybe because
he's the only man I know, good or bad, who has an imagination and
the courage of his convictions. Maybe it's to get away from the
young fools that spend their vacuous hours pursuing me around the
country. But as for the famous Russian bracelet, you can set
your mind at rest on that score. He's going to give it to me at
Palm Beach--if you'll show a little intelligence."

"How about the--red-haired woman?"

"He hasn't seen her for six months," she said angrily. "Don't you
suppose I have enough pride to see to that? Don't you know by
this time that I can do any darn thing with any darn man I want
to?"

She put her chin in the air like the statue of France Aroused,
and then spoiled the pose somewhat by raising the lemon for
action.

"Is it the Russian bracelet that fascinates you?"

"No, I'm merely trying to give you the sort of argument that
would appeal to your intelligence. And I wish you'd go 'way," she
said, her temper rising again. "You know I never change my mind.
You've been boring me for three days until I'm about to go
crazy. I won't go ashore! Won't! Do you hear? Won't!"

"Very well," he said, "and you won't go to Palm Beach either. Of
all the selfish, spoiled, uncontrolled disagreeable, impossible
girl I have---"

Splush! The half-lemon caught him in the neck. Simultaneously
came a hail from over the side.

"The launch is ready, Mr. Farnam."

Too full of words and rage to speak, Mr. Farnam cast one utterly
condemning glance at his niece and, turning, ran swiftly down the
ladder.



II


Five o'clock robed down from the sun and plumped soundlessly into
the sea. The golden collar widened into a glittering island; and
a faint breeze that had been playing with the edges of the
awning and swaying one of the dangling blue slippers became
suddenly freighted with song. It was a chorus of men in close
harmony and in perfect rhythm to an accompanying sound of oars
dealing the blue writers. Ardita lifted her head and
listened.

     "Carrots and Peas,
      Beans on their knees,
      Pigs in the seas,
          Lucky fellows!
      Blow us a breeze,
      Blow us a breeze,
      Blow us a breeze,
          With your bellows."

Ardita's brow wrinkled in astonishment. Sitting very still she
listened eagerly as the chorus took up a second verse.

     "Onions and beans,
      Marshalls and Deans,
      Goldbergs and Greens
          And Costellos.
      Blow us a breeze,
      Blow us a breeze,
      Blow us a breeze,
          With your bellows."

With an exclamation she tossed her book to the desk, where it
sprawled at a straddle, and hurried to the rail. Fifty feet away
a large rowboat was approaching containing seven men, six of them
rowing and one standing up in the stern keeping time to their
song with an orchestra leader's baton.

     "Oysters and Rocks,
      Sawdust and socks,
      Who could make clocks
          Out of cellos?---"

The leader's eyes suddenly rested on Ardita, who was leaning over
the rail spellbound with curiosity. He made a quick movement
with his baton and the singing instantly ceased. She saw that he
was the only white man in the boat--the six rowers
were negroes.

"Narcissus ahoy!" he called politely.

What's the idea of all the discord?" demanded Ardita cheerfully.
"Is this the varsity crew from the county nut farm?"

By this time the boat was scraping the side of the yacht and a
great bulking negro in the bow turned round and grasped the
ladder. Thereupon the leader left his position in the stern and
before Ardita had realized his intention he ran up the ladder and
stood breathless before her on the deck.

"The women and children will be spared!" he said briskly. "All
crying babies will be immediately drowned and all males put in
double irons!" Digging her hands excitedly down into the pockets
of her dress Ardita stared at him, speechless with astonishment.
He was a young man with a scornful mouth and the bright blue eyes
of a healthy baby set in a dark sensitive face. His hair was
pitch black, damp and curly--the hair of a Grecian statue gone
brunette. He was trimly built, trimly dressed, and graceful as an
agile quarter-back.

"Well, I'll be a son of a gun!" she said dazedly.

They eyed each other coolly.

"Do you surrender the ship?"

"Is this an outburst of wit? " demanded Ardita. "Are you an
idiot--or just being initiated to some fraternity?"

"I asked you if you surrendered the ship."

"I thought the country was dry," said Ardita disdainfully. "Have
you been drinking finger-nail enamel? You better get off this
yacht!"

"What?" the young man's voice expressed incredulity.

"Get off the yacht! You heard me!"

He looked at her for a moment as if considering what she had
said.

"No" said his scornful mouth slowly; "No, I won't get off the
yacht. You can get off if you wish."

Going to the rail be gave a curt command and immediately the crew
of the rowboat scrambled up the ladder and ranged themselves in
line before him, a coal-black and burly darky at one end and a
miniature mulatto of four feet nine at to other. They seemed to
be uniformly dressed in some sort of blue costume ornamented with
dust, mud, and tatters; over the shoulder of each was slung a
small, heavy-looking white sack, and under their arms they
carried large black cases apparently containing musical
instruments.

"'Ten-SHUN!" commanded the young man, snapping his own heels
together crisply. "Right DRISS! Front! Step out here, Babe!"

The smallest Negro took a quick step forward and saluted.

"Take command, go down below, catch the crew and tie 'em up--all
except the engineer. Bring him up to me. Oh, and pile those bags
by the rail there."

"Yas-suh!"

Babe saluted again and wheeling about motioned for the five others
to gather about him. Then after a short whispered consultation
they all filed noiselessly down the companionway.

"Now," said the young man cheerfully to Ardita, who had witnessed
this last scene in withering silence, "if you will swear on your
honor as a flapper--which probably isn't worth much--that you'll
keep that spoiled little mouth of yours tight shut for
forty-eight hours, you can row yourself ashore in our
rowboat."

"Otherwise what?"

"Otherwise you're going to sea in a ship."

With a little sigh as for a crisis well passed, the young man
sank into the settee Ardita had lately vacated and stretched his
arms lazily. The corners of his mouth relaxed appreciatively as
he looked round at the rich striped awning, the polished brass,
and the luxurious fittings of the deck. His eye felt on the book,
and then on the exhausted lemon.

"Hm," he said, "Stonewall Jackson claimed that lemon-juice
cleared his head. Your head feel pretty clear?"

Ardita disdained to answer.

"Because inside of five minutes you'll have to make a clear
decision whether it's go or stay."

He picked up the book and opened it curiously.

"The Revolt of the Angels. Sounds pretty good. French, eh?" He
stared at her with new interest "You French?"

"No."

"What's your name?"

"Farnam."

"Farnam what?"

"Ardita Farnam."

"Well Ardita, no use standing up there and chewing out the
insides of your mouth. You ought to break those nervous habits
while you're young. Come over here and sit down."

Ardita took a carved jade case from her pocket, extracted a
cigarette and lit it with a conscious coolness, though she knew
her hand was trembling a little; then she crossed over with her
supple, swinging walk, and sitting down in the other settee blew
a mouthful of smoke at the awning.

"You can't get me off this yacht," she raid steadily; "and you
haven't got very much sense if you think you'll get far with it.
My uncle'll have wirelesses zigzagging all over this ocean by
half past six."

"Hm."

She looked quickly at his face, caught anxiety stamped there
plainly in the faintest depression of the mouth's corners.

"It's all the same to me," she said, shrugging her shoulders.
"'Tisn't my yacht. I don't mind going for a coupla hours' cruise.
I'll even lend you that book so you'll have something to read on
the revenue boat that takes you up to Sing-Sing."

He laughed scornfully.

"If that's advice you needn't bother. This is part of a plan
arranged before I ever knew this yacht existed. If it hadn't been
this one it'd have been the next one we passed anchored along
the coast."

"Who are you?" demanded Ardita suddenly. "And what are you?"

"You've decided not to go ashore?"

"I never even faintly considered it."

"We're generally known," he said "all seven of us, as Curtis
Carlyle and his Six Black Buddies late of the Winter Garden and
the Midnight Frolic."

"You're singers?"

"We were until to-day. At present, due to those white bags you
see there we're fugitives from justice and if the reward offered
for our capture hasn't by this time reached twenty thousand
dollars I miss my guess."

"What's in the bags?" asked Ardita curiously.

"Well," he said "for the present we'll call it--mud--Florida
mud."



III


Within ten minutes after Curtis Carlyle's interview with a very
frightened engineer the yacht Narcissus was under way, steaming
south through a balmy tropical twilight. The little mulatto,
Babe, who seems to have Carlyle's implicit confidence, took full
command of the situation. Mr. Farnam's valet and the chef, the
only members of the crew on board except the engineer, having
shown fight, were now reconsidering, strapped securely to their
bunks below. Trombone Mose, the biggest negro, was set busy with
a can of paint obliterating the name Narcissus from the bow, and
substituting the name Hula Hula, and the others congregated aft
and became intently involved in a game of craps.

Having given order for a meal to be prepared and served on deck
at seven-thirty, Carlyle rejoined Ardita, and, sinking back into
his settee, half closed his eyes and fell into a state of
profound abstraction.

Ardita scrutinized him carefully--and classed him immedialely as
a romantic figure. He gave the effect of towering self-confidence
erected on a slight foundation--just under the surface of each
of his decisions she discerned a hesitancy that was in decided
contrast to the arrogant curl of his lips.

"He's not like me," she thought "There's a difference somewhere."
Being a supreme egotist Ardita frequently thought about
herself; never having had her egotism disputed she did it
entirely naturally and with no detraction from her unquestioned
charm.  Though she was nineteen she gave the effect of a
high-spirited precocious child, and in the present glow of her
youth and beauty all the men and women she had known were but
driftwood on the ripples of her temperament. She had met other
egotists--in fact she found that selfish people bored her rather
less than unselfish people--but as yet there had not been one she
had not eventually defeated and brought to her feet.

But though she recognized an egotist in the settee, she felt none
of that usual shutting of doors in her mind which meant clearing
ship for action; on the contrary her instinct told her that this
man was somehow completely pregnable and quite defenseless. When
Ardita defied convention--and of late it had been her chief
amusement--it was from an intense desire to be herself, and she
felt that this man, on the contrary, was preoccupied with his own
defiance.

She was much more interested in him than she was in her own
situation, which affected her as the prospect of a matinee might
affect a ten-year-old child. She had implicit confidence in her
ability to take care of herself under any and all circumstances.

The night deepened. A pale new moon smiled misty-eyed upon the
sea, and as the shore faded dimly out and dark clouds were blown
like leaves along the far horizon a great haze of moonshine
suddenly bathed the yacht and spread an avenue of glittering mail
in her swift path. From time to time there was the bright flare
of a match as one of them lighted a cigarette, but except for
the low under-tone of the throbbing engines and the even wash of
the waves about the stern the yacht was quiet as a dream boat
star-bound through the heavens. Round them bowed the smell of the
night sea, bringing with it an infinite languor.

Carlyle broke the silence at last.

"Lucky girl," he sighed "I've always wanted to be rich--and buy
all this beauty."

Ardita yawned.

"I'd rather be you," she said frankly.

"You would--for about a day. But you do seem to possess a lot of
nerve for a flapper."

"I wish you wouldn't call me that"

"Beg your pardon."

"As to nerve," she continued slowly, "it's my one redeemiug
feature. I'm not afraid of anything in heaven or earth."

"Hm, I am."

"To be afraid," said Ardita, "a person has either to be very
great and strong--or else a coward. I'm neither." She paused for
a moment, and eagerness crept into her tone. "But I want to talk
about you. What on earth have you done--and how did you do it?"

"Why?" he demanded cynically.  "Going to write a movie, about
me?"

"Go on," she urged. "Lie to me by the moonlight. Do a fabulous
story."

A negro appeared, switched on a string of small lights under the
awning, and began setting the wicker table for supper. And while
they ate cold sliced chicken, salad, artichokes and strawberry
jam from the plentiful larder below, Carlyle began to talk,
hesitatingly at first, but eagerly as he saw she was interested.
Ardita scarcely touched her food as she watched his dark young
face--handsome, ironic faintly ineffectual.

He began life as a poor kid in a Tennessee town, he said, so poor
that his people were the only white family in their street. He
never remembered any white children--but there were inevitably a
dozen pickaninnies streaming in his trail, passionate admirers
whom he kept in tow by the vividness of his imagination and the
amount of trouble he was always getting them in and out of. And
it seemed that this association diverted a rather unusual musical
gift into a strange channel.

There had been a colored woman named Belle Pope Calhoun who
played the piano at parties given for white children--nice white
children that would have passed Curtis Carlyle with a sniff. But
the ragged little "poh white" used to sit beside her piano by the
hour and try to get in an alto with one of those kazoos that
boys hum through. Before he was thirteen he was picking up a
living teasing ragtime out of a battered violin in little cafes
round Nashville. Eight years later the ragtime craze hit the
country, and he took six darkies on the Orpheum circuit. Five of
them were boys he had grown up with; the other was the little
mulatto, Babe Divine, who was a wharf nigger round New York, and
long before that a plantation hand in Bermuda, until he stuck an
eight-inch stiletto in his master's back. Almost before Carlyle
realized his good fortune he was on Broadway, with offers of
engagements on all sides, and more money than he had ever dreamed
of.

It was about then that a change began in his whole attitude, a
rather curious, embittering change. It was when he realized that
he was spending the golden years of his life gibbering round a
stage with a lot of black men. His act was good of its
kind--three trombones, three saxaphones, and Carlyle's flute--and
it was his own peculiar sense of rhythm that made all the
difference; but he began to grow strangely sensitive about it,
began to hate the thought of appearing, dreaded it from day to
day.

They were making money--each contract he signed called for
more--but when he went to managers and told them that he wanted
to separate from his sextet and go on as a regular pianist, they
laughed at him aud told him he was crazy--it would he an artistic
suicide. He used to laugh afterward at the phrase "artistic
suicide." They all used it.

Half a dozen times they played at private dances at three
thousand dollars a night, and it seemed as if these crystallized
all his distaste for his mode of livlihood.  They took place in
clubs and houses that he couldn't have gone into in the daytime
After all, he was merely playing to role of the eternal monkey, a
sort of sublimated chorus man. He was sick of the very smell of
the theatre, of powder and rouge and the chatter of the
greenroom, and the patronizing approval of the boxes. He couldn't
put his heart into it any more. The idea of a slow approach to
the luxury of liesure drove him wild. He was, of course,
progressing toward it, but, like a child, eating his ice-cream so
slowly that he couldn't taste it at all.

He wanted to have a lot of money and time and opportunity to read
and play, and the sort of men and women round him that he could
never have--the kind who, if they thought of him at all, would
have considered him rather contemptible; in short he wanted all
those things which he was beginning to lump under the general
head of aristocracy, an aristocracy which it seemed almost any
money could buy except money made as he was making it.  He was
twenty-five then, without family or education or any promise that
he would succeed in a business career.  He began speculating
wildly, and within three weeks he had lost every cent he had
saved.

Then the war came.  He went to Plattsburg, and even there his
profession followed him. A brigadier-general called him up to
headquarters and told him he could serve his country better as a
band leader--so he spent the war entertaining celebrities behind
the line with a headquarters band.  It was not so bad--except
that when the infantry came limping back from the trenches he
wanted to be one of them.  The sweat and mud they wore seemed
only one of those ineffable symbols of aristocracy that were
forever eluding him.

"It was the private dances that did it.  After I came back from
the war the old routine started.  We had an offer from a
syndicate of Florida hotels.  It was only a question of time
then."

He broke off and Ardita looked at him expectantly, but he shook
his head.

"No," he said, "I'm going to tell you about it.  I'm enjoying it
too much, and I'm afraid I'd lose a little of that enjoyment if I
shared it with anyone else.  I want to hang on to those few
breathless, heroic moments when I stood out before them all and
let them know I was more than a damn bobbing, squawking clown."

>From up forward came suddenly the low sound of singing. The
negroes had gathered together on the deck and their voices rose
together in a haunting melody that soared in poignant harmonics
toward the moon. And Ardita listens in enchantment.

    "Oh down---
          oh down,
     Mammy wanna take me down milky way,
     Oh down,
          oh down,
     Pappy say to-morra-a-a-ah
     But mammy say to-day,
     Yes--mammy say to-day!"

Carlyle sighed and was silent for a moment looking up at the
gathered host of stars blinking like arc-lights in the warm sky.
The negroes' song had died away to a plaintive humming and it
seemed as if minute by minute the brightness and the great
silence were increasing until he could almost hear the midnight
toilet of the mermaids as they combed their silver dripping curls
under the moon and gossiped to each other of the fine wrecks
they lived on the green opalescent avenues below.

"You see," said Carlyle softly, "this is the beauty I want.
Beauty has got to be astonishing, astounding--it's got to burst
in on you like a dream, like the exquisite eyes of a girl."

He turned to her, but she was silent.

"You see, don't you, Anita--I mean, Ardita?"

Again she made no answer.  She had been sound asleep for some
time.



IV



In the dense sun-flooded noon of next day a spot in the sea
before them resolved casually into a green-and-gray islet,
apparently composed of a great granite cliff at its northern end
which slanted south through a mile of vivid coppice and grass to
a sandy beach melting lazily into the surf.  When Ardita, reading
in her favorite seat, came to the last page of The Revolt of the
Angels, and slamming the book shut looked up and saw it, she
gave a little cry of delight, and called to Carlyle, who was
standing moodily by the rail.

"Is this it?  Is this where you're going?"

Carlyle shrugged his shoulders carelessly.

"You've got me."  He raised his voice and called up to the acting
skipper: "Oh, Babe, is this your island?"

The mulatto's miniature head appeared from round the corner of
the deck-house.

"Yas-suh!  This yeah's it."

Carlyle joined Ardita.

"Looks sort of sporting, doesn't it?"

"Yes," she agreed; "but it doesn't look big enough to be much of
a hiding-place."

"You still putting your faith in those wirelesses your uncle was
going to have zigzagging round?"

"No," said Ardita frankly.  "I'm all for you.  I'd really like to
see you make a get-away."

He laughed.

"You're our Lady Luck.  Guess we'll have to keep you with us as a
mascot--for the present anyway."

"You couldn't very well ask me to swim back," she said coolly.
"If you do I'm going to start writing dime novels founded on that
interminable history of your life you gave me last night."

He flushed and stiffened slightly.

"I'm very sorry I bored you."

"Oh, you didn't--until just at the end with some story about how
furious you were because you couldn't dance with the ladies you
played music for."

He rose angrily.

"You have got a darn mean little tongue."

"Excuse me," she said melting into laughter, "but I'm not used to
having men regale me with the story of their life
ambitions--especially if they've lived such deathly platonic
lives."

"Why? What do men usually regale you with?"

"Oh, they talk about me," she yawned. "They tell me I'm the
spirit of youth and beauty."

"What do you tell them?"

"Oh, I agree quietly."

"Does every man you meet tell you he loves you?"

Ardita nodded.

"Why shouldn't he? All life is just a progression toward, and
then a recession from, one phrase--'I love you.'"

Carlyle laughed and sat down.

"That's very true. That's--that's not bad. Did you make that up?"

"Yes--or rather I found it out. It doesn't mean anything
especially. It's just clever."

"It's the sort of remark," he said gravely, "that's typical of
your class."

"Oh," she interrupted impatiently, "don't start that lecture on
aristocracy again! I distrust people who can be intense at this
hour in the morning. It's a mild form of insanity--a sort of
breakfast-food jag. Morning's the time to sleep, swim, and be
careless."

Ten minutes later they had swung round in a wide circle as if to
approach the island from the north.

"There's a trick somewhere," commented Ardita thoughtfully. "He
can't mean just to anchor up against this cliff."

They were heading straight in now toward the solid rock, which
must have been well over a hundred feet tall, and not until they
were within fifty yards of it did Ardita see their objective.
Then she clapped her hands in delight. There was a break in the
cliff entirely hidden by a curious overlapping of rock, and
through this break the yacht entered and very slowly traversed a
narrow channel of crystal-clear water between high gray walls.
Then they were riding at anchor in a miniature world of green and
gold, a gilded bay smooth as glass and set round with tiny
palms, the whole resembling the mirror lakes and twig trees that
children set up in sand piles.

"Not so darned bad!" cried Carlyle excitedly.

"I guess that little coon knows his way round this corner of the
Atlantic."

His exuberance was contagious, and Ardita became quite jubilant.

"It's an absolutely sure-fire hiding-place!"

"Lordy, yes! It's the sort of island you read about."

The rowboat was lowered into the golden lake and they pulled to
shore.

"Come on," said Carlyle as they landed in the slushy sand, "we'll
go exploring."

The fringe of palms was in turn ringed in by a round mile of
flat, sandy country. They followed it south and brushing through
a farther rim of tropical vegetation came out on a pearl-gray
virgin beach where Ardita kicked of her brown golf shoes--she
seemed to have permanently abandoned stockings--and went wading.
Then they sauntered back to the yacht, where the indefatigable
Babe had luncheon ready for them. He had posted a lookout on the
high cliff to the north to watch the sea on both sides, though he
doubted if the entrance to the cliff was generally known--he had
never even seen a map on which the island was marked.

"What's its name," asked Ardita--"the island, I mean?"

"No name 'tall," chuckled Babe. "Reckin she jus' island, 'at's
all."

In the late afternoon they sat with their backs against great
boulders on the highest part of the cliff and Carlyle sketched
for her his vague plans. He was sure they were hot after him by
this time. The total proceeds of the coup he had pulled off and
concerning which he still refused to enlighten her, he estimated
as just under a million dollars. He counted on lying up here
several weeks and then setting off southward, keeping well
outside the usual channels of travel rounding the Horn and
heading for Callao, in Peru. The details of coaling and
provisioning he was leaving entirely to Babe who, it seemed, had
sailed these seas in every capacity from cabin-boy aboard a
coffee trader to virtual first mate on a Brazillian pirate craft,
whose skipper had long since been hung.

"If he'd been white he'd have been king of South America long
ago," said Carlyle emphatically. "When it comes to intelligence
he makes Booker T. Washington look like a moron. He's got the
guile of every race and nationality whose blood is in his veins,
and that's half a dozen or I'm a liar. He worships me because I'm
the only man in the world who can play better ragtime than he
can. We used to sit together on the wharfs down on the New York
water-front, he with a bassoon and me with an oboe, and we'd
blend minor keys in African harmonics a thousand years old until
the rats would crawl up the posts and sit round groaning and
squeaking like dogs will in front of a phonograph."

Ardita roared.

"How you can tell 'em!"

Carlyle grinned.

"I swear that's the gos---"

"What you going to do when you get to Callao?" she interrupted.

"Take ship for India. I want to be a rajah. I mean it. My idea is
to go up into Afghanistan somewhere, buy up a palace and a
reputation, and then after about five years appear in England
with a foreign accent and a mysterious past. But India first. Do
you know, they say that all the gold in the world drifts very
gradually back to India. Something fascinating about that to me.
And I want leisure to read--an immense amount."

"How about after that?"

"Then," he answered defiantly, "comes aristocracy. Laugh if you
want to--but at least you'll have to admit that I know what I
want--which I imagine is more than you do."

"On the contrary," contradicted Ardita, reaching in her pocket
for her cigarette case, "when I met you I was in the midst of a
great uproar of all my friends and relatives because I did know
what I wanted."

"What was it?"

"A man."

He started.

"You mean you were engaged?"

"After a fashion. If you hadn't come aboard I had every intention
of slipping ashore yesterday evening--how long ago it seems--and
meeting him in Palm Beach. He's waiting there for me with a
bracelet that once belonged to Catherine of Russia. Now don't
mutter anything about aristocracy," she put in quickly. "I liked
him simply because he had had an imagination and the utter
courage of his convictions."

"But your family disapproved, eh?"

"What there is of it--only a silly uncle and a sillier aunt. It
seems he got into some scandal with a red-haired woman name Mimi
something--it was frightfully exaggerated, he said, and men don't
lie to me--and anyway I didn't care what he'd done; it was the
future that counted. And I'd see to that. When a man's in love
with me he doesn't care for other amusements. I told him to drop
her like a hot cake, and he did."

"I feel rather jealous," said Carlyle, frowning--and then he
laughed. "I guess I'll just keep you along with us until we get
to Callao. Then I'll lend you enough money to get back to the
States. By that time you'll have had a chance to think that
gentleman over a little more."

"Don't talk to me like that!" fired up Ardita. "I won't tolerate
the parental attitude from anybody! Do you understand me?" He
chuckled and then stopped, rather abashed, as her cold anger
seemed to fold him about and chill him.

"I'm sorry," he offered uncertainly.

"Oh, don't apologize! I can't stand men who say 'I'm sorry' in
that manly, reserved tone. Just shut up!"

A pause ensued, a pause which Carlyle found rather awkward, but
which Ardita seemed not to notice at all as she sat contentedly
enjoying her cigarette and gazing out at the shining sea. After a
minute she crawled out on the rock and lay with her face over
the edge looking down. Carlyle, watching her, reflected how it
seemed impossible for her to assume an ungraceful attitude.

"Oh, look," she cried. "There's a lot of sort of ledges down
there. Wide ones of all different heights."

"We'll go swimming to-night!" she said excitedly. "By moonlight."

"Wouldn't you rather go in at the beach on the other end?"

"Not a chance. I like to dive. You can use my uncle's bathing
suit, only it'll fit you like a gunny sack, because he's a very
flabby man. I've got a one-piece that's shocked the natives all
along the Atlantic coast from Biddeford Pool to St. Augustine."

"I suppose you're a shark."

"Yes, I'm pretty good. And I look cute too. A sculptor up at Rye
last summer told me my calves are worth five hundred dollars."

There didn't seem to be any answer to this, so Carlyle was
silent, permitting himself only a discreet interior smile.



V



When the night crept down in shadowy blue and silver they
threaded the shimmering channel in the rowboat and, tying it to a
jutting rock, began climbing the cliff together. The first shelf
was ten feet up, wide, and furnishing a natural diving platform.
There they sat down in the bright moonlight and watched the
faint incessant surge of the waters almost stilled now as the
tide set seaward.

"Are you happy?" he asked suddenly.

She nodded.

"Always happy near the sea. You know," she went on, "I've been
thinking all day that you and I are somewhat alike. We're both
rebels--only for different reasons. Two years ago, when I was
just eighteen and you were---"

"Twenty-five."

"---well, we were both conventional successes. I was an utterly
devastating debutante and you were a prosperous musician just
commissioned in the army---"

"Gentleman by act of Congress," he put in ironically.

"Well, at any rate, we both fitted. If our corners were not
rubbed off they were at least pulled in.  But deep in us both was
something that made us require more for happiness. I didn't know
what I wanted. I went from man to man, restless, impatient,
month by month getting less acquiescent and more dissatisfied. I
used to sit sometimes chewing at the insides of my mouth and
thinking I was going crazy--I had a frightful sense of
transiency. I wanted things now--now--now! Here I
was--beautiful--I am, aren't I?"

"Yes," agreed Carlyle tentatively.

Ardita rose suddenly.

"Wait a second. I want to try this delightful-looking sea."

She walked to the end of the ledge and shot out over the sea,
doubling up in mid-air and then straightening out and entering to
water straight as a blade in a perfect jack-knife dive.

In a minute her voice floated up to him.

"You see, I used to read all day and most of the night. I began
to resent society---"

"Come on up here," he interrupted. "What on earth are you doing?"

"Just floating round on my back. I'll be up in a minute. Let me
tell you. The only thing I enjoyed was shocking people; wearing
something quite impossible and quite charming to a fancy-dress
party, going round with the fastest men in New York, and getting
into some of the most hellish scrapes imaginable."

The sounds of splashing mingled with her words, and then he heard
her hurried breathing as she began climbing up side to the
ledge.

"Go on in!" she called

Obediently he rose and dived.  When he emerged, dripping, and
made the climb he found that she was no longer on the ledge, but
after a frightened he heard her light laughter from another shelf
ten feet up. There he joined her and they both sat quietly for a
moment, their arms clasped round their knees, panting a little
from the climb.

"The family were wild," she said suddenly. "They tried to marry
me off. And then when I'd begun to feel that after all life was
scarcely worth living I found something"--her eyes went skyward
exultantly---"I found something!"

Carlyle waited and her words came with a rush.

"Courage--just that; courage as a rule of life, and something to
cling to always. I began to build up this enormous faith in
myself. I began to see that in all my idols in the past some
manifestation of courage had unconsciously been the thing that
attracted me. I began separating courage from the other things of
life. All sorts of courage--the beaten, bloody prize-fighter
coming up for more--I used to make men take me to prize-fights;
the declasse woman sailing through a nest of cats and looking at
them as if they were mud under her feet; the liking what you like
always; the utter disregard for other people's opinions--just to
live as I liked always and to die in my own way-- Did you bring
up the cigarettes?"

He handed one over and held a match for her gently.

"Still," Ardita continued, "the men kept gathering--old men and
young men, my mental and physical inferiors, most of them, but
all intensely desiring  to have me--to own this rather
magnificent proud tradition I'd built up round me. Do you see?"

"Sort of. You never were beaten and you never apologized."

"Never!"

She sprang to the edge, poised for a moment like a crucified
figure against the sky; then describing a dark parabola plunked
without a slash between two silver ripples twenty feet below.

Her voice floated up to him again.

"And courage to me meant ploughing through that dull gray mist
that comes down on life--not only overriding people and
circumstances but overriding the bleakness of living. A sort of
insistence on the value of life and the worth of transient
things."

She was climbing up now, and at her last words her head, with the
damp yellow hair slicked symmetrically back appeared on his
level.

"All very well," objected Carlyle. "You can call it courage, but
your courage is really built, after all, on a pride of birth. You
were bred to that defiant attitude. On my gray days even courage
is one of the things that's gray and lifeless."

She was sitting near the edge, hugging her knees and gazing
abstractedly at the white moon; he was farther back, crammed like
a grotesque god into a niche in the rock.

"I don't want to sound like Pollyanna," she began, "but you
haven't grasped me yet. My courage is faith--faith in the eternal
resilience of me--that joy'll come back, and hope and
spontaneity. And I feel that till it does I've got to keep my
lips shut and my chin high, and my eyes wide--not necessarily any
silly smiling. Oh, I've been through hell without a whine quite
often--and the female hell is deadlier than the male."

"But supposing," suggested Carlyle" that before joy and hope and
all that came back the curtain was drawn on you for good?"

Ardita rose, and going to the wall climbed with some difficulty
to the next ledge, another ten or fifteen feet above.

"Why," she called back "then I'd have won!"

He edged out till he could see her.

"Better not dive from there! You'll break your back," he said
quickly.

She laughed.

"Not I!"

Slowly she spread her arms and stood there swan-like, radiating a
pride in her young perfection that lit a warm glow in Carlyle's
heart.

"We're going through the black air with our arms wide and our
feet straight out behind like a dolphin's tail, and we're going
to think we'll never hit the silver down there till suddenly
it'll be all warm round us and full of little kissing, caressing
waves."

Then she was in the air, and Carlyle involuntarily held his
breath. He had not realized that the dive was nearly forty feet.
It seemed an eternity before he heard the swift compact sound as
she reached the sea.

And it was with his glad sigh of relief when her light watery
laughter curled up the side of the cliff and into his anxious
ears that he knew he loved her.



VI


Time, having no axe to grind, showered down upon them three days
of afternoons.  When the sun cleared the port-hole of Ardita's
cabin an hour after dawn she rose cheerily, donned her
bathing-suit, and went up on deck.  The negroes would leave their
work when they saw her, and crowd, chuckling and chattering, to
the rail as she floated, an agile minnow, on and under the
surface of the clear water.  Again in the cool of the afternoon
she would swim--and loll and smoke with Carlyle upon the cliff;
or else they would lie on their sides in the sands of the
southern beach, talking little, but watching the day fade
colorfully and tragically into the infinite langour of a tropical
evening.

And with the long, sunny hours Ardita's idea of the episode as
incidental, madcap, a sprig of romance in a desert of reality,
gradually left her.  She dreaded the time when he would strike
off southward; she dreaded all the eventualities that presented
themselves to her; thoughts were suddenly troublesome and
decisions odious.  Had prayers found place in the pagan rituals
of her soul she would have asked of life only to be unmolested
for a while, lazily acquiescent to the ready, naif flow of
Carlyle's ideas, his vivid boyish imagination, and the vein of
monomania that seemed to run crosswise through his temperament
and colored his every action.

But this is not a story of two on an island, nor concerned
primarily with love bred of isolation. It is merely the
presentation of two personalities, and its idyllic setting among
the palms of the Gulf Stream is quite incidental. Most of us are
content to exist and breed and fight for the right to do both,
and the dominant idea, the foredoomed attest to control one's
destiny, is reserved for the fortunate or unfortunate few. To me
the interesting thing about Ardita is the courage that will
tarnish with her beauty and youth.

"Take me with you," she said late one night as they sat lazily in
the grass under the shadowy spreading palms. The negroes had
brought ashore their musical instruments, and the sound of weird
ragtime was drifting softly over on the warm breath of the night.
"I'd love to reappear in ten years, as a fabulously wealthy
high-caste Indian lady," she continued.

Carlyle looked at her quickly.

"You can, you know."

She laughed.

"Is it a proposal of marriage? Extra!  Ardita Farnam becomes
pirate's bride. Society girl kidnapped by ragtime bank robber."

"It wasn't a bank."

"What was it? Why won't you tell me?"

"I don't want to break down your illusions."

"My dear man, I have no illusions about you."

"I mean your illusions about yourself."

She looked up in surprise.

"About myself! What on earth have I got to do with whatever stray
felonies you've committed?"

"That remains to be seen."

She reached over and patted his hand.

"Dear Mr. Curtis Carlyle," she said softly, "are you in love with
me?"

"As if it mattered."

"But it does--because I think I'm in love with
you."

He looked at her ironically.

"Thus swelling your January total to half a dozen," he suggested.
"Suppose I call your bluff and ask you to come to India with
me?"

"Shall I?"

He shrugged his shoulders.

"We can get married in Callao."

"What sort of life can you offer me? I don't mean that unkindly,
but seriously; what would become of me if the people who want
that twenty-thousand-dollar reward ever catch up with you?"

"I thought you weren't afraid."

"I never am--but I won't throw my life away just to show one man
I'm not."

"I wish you'd been poor. Just a little poor girl dreaming over a
fence in a warm cow country."

"Wouldn't it have been nice?"

"I'd have enjoyed astonishing you--watching your eyes open on
things. If you only wanted things! Don't you see?"

"I know--like girls who stare into the windows of
jewelry-stores."

"Yes--and want the big oblong watch that's platinum and has
diamonds all round the edge. Only you'd decide it was too
expensive and choose one of white gold for a hundred dollar. Then
I'd say: 'Expensive? I should say not!' And we'd go into the
store and pretty soon the platinum one would be gleaming on your
wrist."

"That sounds so nice and vulgar--and fun, doesn't it?" murmured
Ardita.

"Doesn't it? Can't you see us travelling round and spending money
right and left, and being worshipped by bell-boys and waiters?
Oh, blessed are the simple rich for they inherit the earth!"

"I honestly wish we were that way."

"I love you, Ardita," he said gently.

Her face lost its childish look for moment and became oddly
grave.

"I love to be with you," she said, "more than with any man I've
ever met. And I like your looks and your dark old hair, and the
way you go over the side of the rail when we come ashore. In
fact, Curtis Carlyle, I like all the things you do when you're
perfectly natural. I think you've got nerve and you know how I
feel about that. Sometimes when you're around I've been tempted
to kiss you suddenly and tell you that you were just an
idealistic boy with a lot of caste nonsense in his head.

Perhaps if I were just a little bit older and a little more bored
I'd go with you. As it is, I think I'll go back and marry--that
other man."

Over across the silver lake the figures of the negroes writhed
and squirmed in the moonlight like acrobats who, having been too
long inactive, must go through their tacks from sheer surplus
energy. In single file they marched, weaving in concentric
circles, now with their heads thrown back, now bent over their
instruments like piping fauns. And from trombone and saxaphone
ceaselessly whined a blended melody, sometimes riotous and
jubilant, sometimes haunting and plaintive as a death-dance from
the Congo's heart.

"Let's dance," cried Ardita. "I can't sit still with that perfect
jazz going on."

Taking her hand he led her out into a broad stretch of hard sandy
soil that the moon flooded with great splendor. They floated out
like drifting moths under the rich hazy light, and as the
fantastic symphony wept and exulted and wavered and despaired
Ardita's last sense of reality dropped away, and she abandoned
her imagination to the dreamy summer scents of tropical flowers
and the infinite starry spaces overhead, feeling that if she
opened her eyes it would be to find herself dancing with a ghost
in a land created by her own fancy.

"This is what I should call an exclusive private dance," he
whispered.

"I feel quite mad--but delightfully mad!"

"We're enchanted.  The shades of unnumbered generations of
cannibals are watching us from high up on the side of the cliff
there."

"And I'll bet the cannibal women are saying that we dance too
close, and that it was immodest of me to come without my
nose-ring."

They both laughed softly--and then their laughter died as over
across the lake they heard the trombones stop in the middle of a
bar, and the saxaphones give a startled moan and fade out.

"What's the matter?" called Carlyle.

After a moment's silence they made out the dark figure of a man
rounding the silver lake at a run. As he came closer they saw it
was Babe in a state of unusual excitement. He drew up before them
and gasped out his news in a breath.

"Ship stan'in' off sho' 'bout half a mile suh. Mose, he uz on
watch, he say look's if she's done ancho'd."

"A ship--what kind of a ship?" demanded Carlyle
anxiously.

Dismay was in his voice, and Ardita's heart gave a sudden wrench
as she saw his whole face suddenly droop.

"He say he don't know, suh."

"Are they landing a boat?"

"No, suh."

"We'll go up," said Carlyle.

They ascended the hill in silence, Ardita's hand still resting in
Carlyle's as it had when they finished dancing. She felt it
clinch nervously from time to time as though he were unaware of
the contact, but though he hurt her she made no attempt to remove
it. It seemed an hour's climb before they reached the top and
crept cautiously across the silhouetted plateau to the edge of
the cliff. After one short look Carlyle involuntarily gave a
little cry. It was a revenue boat with six-inch guns mounted fore
and aft.

"They know!" he said with a short intake of breath. "They know!
They picked up the trail somewhere."

"Are you sure they know about the channel? They may be only
standing by to take a look at the island in the morning. From
where they are they couldn't see the opening in the cliff."

"They could with field-glasses," he said hopelessly. He looked at
his wrist-watch. "It's nearly two now. They won't do anything
until dawn, that's certain. Of course there's always the faint
possibility that they're waiting for some other ship to join; or
for a coaler."

"I suppose we may as well stay right here."

The hour passed and they lay there side by side, very silently,
their chins in their hands like dreaming children. In back of
them squatted the negroes, patient, resigned, acquiescent,
announcing now and then with sonorous snores that not even the
presence of danger could subdue their unconquerable African
craving for sleep.

Just before five o'clock Babe approached Carlyle. There were half
a dozen rifles aboard the Narcissus he said. Had it been decided
to offer no resistance?

A pretty good fight might be made, he thought, if they worked out
some plan.

Carlyle laughed and shook his head.

"That isn't a Spic army out there, Babe. That's a revenue boat.
It'd be like a bow and arrow trying to fight a machine-gun. If
you want to bury those bags somewhere and take a chance on
recovering them later, go on and do it. But it won't work--they'd
dig this island over from one end to the other. It's a lost
battle all round, Babe."

Babe inclined his head silently and turned away, and Carlyle's
voice was husky as he turned to Ardita.

"There's the best friend I ever had. He'd die for me, and be
proud to, if I'd let him."

"You've given up?"

"I've no choice. Of course there's always one way out--the sure
way--but that can wait. I wouldn't miss my trial for
anything--it'll be an interesting experiment in notoriety.  'Miss
Farnam testifies that the pirate's attitude to her was at all
times that of a gentleman.'"

"Don't!" she said. "I'm awfully sorry."

When the color faded from the sky and lustreless blue changed to
leaden gray a commotion was visible on the ship's deck, and they
made out a group of officers clad in white duck, gathered near
the rail. They had field-glasses in their hands and were
attentively examining the islet.

"It's all up," said Carlyle grimly.

"Damn," whispered Ardita. She felt tears gathering in her eyes
"We'll go back to the yacht," he said. "I prefer that to being
hunted out up here like a 'possum."

Leaving the plateau they descended the hill, and reaching the
lake were rowed out to the yacht by the silent negroes. Then,
pale and weary, they sank into the settees and waited.

Half an hour later in the dim gray light the nose of the revenue
boat appeared in the channel and stopped, evidently fearing that
the bay might be too shallow. From the peaceful look of the
yacht, the man and the girl in the settees, and the negroes
lounging curiously against the rail, they evidently judged that
there would be no resistance, for two boats were lowered casually
over the side, one containing an officer and six bluejackets,
and the other, four rowers and in the stern two gray-haired men
in yachting flannels. Ardita and Carlyle stood up, and half
unconsciously started toward each other.

Then he paused and putting his hand suddenly into his pocket he
pulled out a round, glittering object and held it out to her.

"What is it?" she asked wonderingly.

"I'm not positive, but I think from the Russian inscription
inside that it's your promised bracelet."

"Where--where on earth---"

"It came out of one of those bags. You see, Curtis Carlyle and
his Six Black Buddies, in the middle of their performance in the
tea-room of the hotel at Palm Beach, suddenly changed their
instruments for automatics and held up the crowd. I took this
bracelet from a pretty, overrouged woman with red hair."

Ardita frowned and then smiled.

"So that's what you did! You HAVE got nerve!"

He bowed.

"A well-known bourgeois quality," he said.

And then dawn slanted dynamically across the deck and flung the
shadows reeling into gray corners. The dew rose and turned to
golden mist, thin as a dream, enveloping them until they seemed
gossamer relics of the late night, infinitely transient and
already fading. For a moment sea and sky were breathless, and
dawn held a pink hand over the young mouth of life--then from out
in the lake came the complaint of a rowboat and the swish of
oars.

Suddenly against the golden furnace low in the east their two
graceful figures melted into one, and he was kissing her spoiled
young mouth.

"It's a sort of glory," he murmured after a second.

She smiled up at him.

"Happy, are you?"

Her sigh was a benediction--an ecstatic surety that she was youth
and beauty now as much as she would ever know. For another
instant life was radiant and time a phantom and their strength
eternal--then there was a bumping, scraping sound as the rowboat
scraped alongside.

Up the ladder scrambled the two gray-haired men, the officer and
two of the sailors with their hands on their revolvers. Mr.
Farnam folded his arms and stood looking at his niece.

"So," he said nodding his head slowly.

With a sigh her arms unwound from Carlyle's neck, and her eyes,
transfigured and far away, fell upon the boarding party. Her
uncle saw her upper lip slowly swell into that arrogant pout he
knew so well.

"So," he repeated savagely. "So this is your idea of--of romance.
A runaway affair, with a high-seas pirate."

Ardita glanced at him carelessly.

"What an old fool you are!" she said quietly.

"Is that the best you can say for yourself?"

"No," she said as if considering. "No, there's something else.
There's that well-known phrase with which I have ended most of
our conversations for the past few years--'Shut up!'"

And with that she turned, included the two old men, the officer,
and the two sailors in a curt glance of contempt, and walked
proudly down the companionway.

But had she waited an instant longer she would have heard a sound
from her uncle quite unfamiliar in most of their interviews. He
gave vent to a whole-hearted amused chuckle, in which the second
old man joined.

The latter turned briskly to Carlyle, who had been regarding this
scene with an air of cryptic amusement.

"Well Toby," he said genially, "you incurable, hare-brained
romantic chaser of rainbows, did you find that she was the person
you wanted?

Carlyle smiled confidently.

"Why--naturally," he said "I've been perfectly sure ever since I
first heard tell of her wild career. That'd why I had Babe send
up the rocket last night."

"I'm glad you did," said Colonel Moreland gravely. "We've been
keeping pretty close to you in case you should have trouble with
those six strange niggers. And we hoped we'd find you two in some
such compromising position," he sighed. "Well, set a crank to
catch a crank!"

"Your father and I sat up all night hoping for the best--or
perhaps it's the worst. Lord knows you're welcome to her, my boy.
She's run me crazy. Did you give her the Russian bracelet my
detective got from that Mimi woman?"

Carlyle nodded.

"Sh!" he said. "She's coming on deck."

Ardita appeared at the head of the companionway and gave a quick
involuntary glance at Carlyle's wrists. A puzzled look passed
across her face. Back aft the negroes had begun to sing, and the
cool lake, fresh with dawn, echoed serenely to their low voices.

"Ardita," said Carlyle unsteadily.

She swayed a step toward him.

"Ardita," he repeated breathlessly, "I've got to tell you
the--the truth. It was all a plant, Ardita. My name isn't
Carlyle. It's Moreland, Toby Moreland. The story was invented,
Ardita, invented out of thin Florida air."

She stared at him, bewildered, amazement, disbelief, and anger
flowing in quick waves across her face. The three men held their
breaths. Moreland, Senior, took a step toward her; Mr. Farnam's
mouth dropped a little open as he waited, panic-stricken, for the
expected crash.

But it did not come. Ardita's face became suddenly radiant, and
with a little laugh she went swiftly to young Moreland and looked
up at him without a trace of wrath in her gray eyes.

"Will you swear," she said quietly "That it was entirely a
product of your own brain?"

"I swear," said young Moreland eagerly.

She drew his head down and kissed him gently.

"What an imagination!" she said softly and almost enviously. "I
want you to lie to me just as sweetly as you know how for the
rest of my life."

The negroes' voices floated drowsily back, mingled in an air that
she had heard them singing before.

    "Time is a thief;
     Gladness and grief
     Cling to the leaf
         As it yellows---"

"What was in the bags?" she asked softly.

"Florida mud," he answered. "That was one of the two true things
I told you."

"Perhaps I can guess the other one," she said; and reaching up on
her tiptoes she kissed him softly in the illustration.





The Ice Palace




The sunlight dripped over the house like golden paint over an art
jar, and the freckling shadows here and there only intensified
the rigor of the bath of light. The Butterworth and Larkin houses
flanking were entrenched behind great stodgy trees; only the
Happer house took the full sun, and all day long faced the dusty
road-street with a tolerant kindly patience. This was the city of
Tarleton in southernmost Georgia, September afternoon.

Up in her bedroom window Sally Carrol Happer rested her
nineteen-year-old chin on a fifty-two-year-old sill and watched
Clark Darrow's ancient Ford turn the corner. The car was
hot--being partly metallic it retained all the heat it absorbed
or evolved--and Clark Darrow sitting bolt upright at the wheel
wore a pained, strained expression as though he considered
himself a spare part, and rather likely to break. He laboriously
crossed two dust ruts, the wheels squeaking indignantly at the
encounter, and then with a terrifying expression he gave the
steering-gear a final wrench and deposited self and car
approximately in front of the Happer steps. There was a heaving
sound, a death-rattle, followed by a short silence; and then the
air was rent by a startling whistle.

Sally Carrol gazed down sleepily.  She started to yawn, but
finding this quite impossible unless she raised her chin from the
window-sill, changed her mind and continued silently to regard
the car, whose owner sat brilliantly if perfunctorily at
attention as he waited for an answer to his signal. After a
moment the whistle once more split the dusty air.

"Good mawnin'."

With difficulty Clark twisted his tall body round and bent a
distorted glance on the window.

"Tain't mawnin', Sally Carrol."

"Isn't it, sure enough?"

"What you doin'?"

"Eatin' 'n apple."

"Come on go swimmin'--want to?"

"Reckon so."

"How 'bout hurryin' up?"

"Sure enough."

Sally Carrol sighed voluminously and raised herself with profound
inertia from the floor where she had been occupied in
alternately destroyed parts of a green apple and painting paper
dolls for her younger sister. She approached a mirror, regarded
her expression with a pleased and pleasant languor, dabbed two
spots of rouge on her lips and a grain of powder on her nose, and
covered her bobbed corn-colored hair with a rose-littered
sunbonnet. Then she kicked over the painting water, said, "Oh,
damn!"--but let it lay--and left the room.

"How you, Clark?" she inquired a minute later as she slipped
nimbly over the side of the car.

"Mighty fine, Sally Carrol."

"Where we go swimmin'?"

"Out to Walley's Pool. Told Marylyn we'd call by an' get her an'
Joe Ewing."

Clark was dark and lean, and when on foot was rather inclined to
stoop. His eyes were ominous and his expression somewhat petulant
except when startlingly illuminated by one of his frequent
smiles. Clark had "a income"--just enough to keep himself in ease
and his car in gasolene--and he had spent the two years since he
graduated from Georgia Tech in dozing round the lazy streets of
his home town, discussing how he could best invest his capital
for an immediate fortune.

Hanging round he found not at all difficult; a crowd of little
girls had grown up beautifully, the amazing Sally Carrol foremost
among them; and they enjoyed being swum with and danced with and
made love to in the flower-filled summery evenings--and they all
liked Clark immensely. When feminine company palled there were
half a dozen other youths who were always just about to do
something, and meanwhile were quite willing to join him in a few
holes of golf, or a game of billiards, or the consumption of a
quart of "hard yella licker." Every once in a while one of these
contemporaries made a farewell round of calls before going up to
New York or Philadelphia or Pittsburgh to go into business, but
mostly they just stayed round in this languid paradise of dreamy
skies and firefly evenings and noisy nigger street fairs--and
especially of gracious, soft-voiced girls, who were brought up on
memories instead of money.

The Ford having been excited into a sort of restless resentful
life Clark and Sally Carrol rolled and rattled down Valley Avenue
into Jefferson Street, where the dust road became a pavement;
along opiate Millicent Place, where there were half a dozen
prosperous, substantial mansions; and on into the down-town
section.  Driving was perilous here, for it was shopping time;
the population idled casually across the streets and a drove of
low-moaning oxen were being urged along in front of a placid
street-car; even the shops seemed only yawning their doors and
blinking their windows in the sunshine before retiring into a
state of utter and finite coma.

"Sally Carrol," said Clark suddenly, "it a fact that you're
engaged?"

She looked at him quickly.

"Where'd you hear that?"

"Sure enough, you engaged?"

"'At's a nice question!"

"Girl told me you were engaged to a Yankee you met up in
Asheville last summer."

Sally Carrol sighed.

"Never saw such an old town for rumors."

"Don't marry a Yankee, Sally Carrol.  We need you round here."

Sally Carrol was silent a moment.

"Clark," she demanded suddenly, "who on earth shall I marry?"

"I offer my services."

"Honey, you couldn't support a wife," she answered cheerfully.
"Anyway, I know you too well to fall in love with you."

"'At doesn't mean you ought to marry a Yankee," he persisted.

"S'pose I love him?"

He shook his head.

"You couldn't. He'd be a lot different from us, every way."

He broke off as he halted the car in front of a rambling,
dilapidated house. Marylyn Wade and Joe Ewing appeared in the
doorway.

"'Lo Sally Carrol."

"Hi!"

"How you-all?"

"Sally Carrol," demanded Marylyn as they started of again, "you
engaged?"

"Lawdy, where'd all this start? Can't I look at a man 'thout
everybody in town engagin' me to him?"

Clark stared straight in front of him at a bolt on the clattering
wind-shield.

"Sally Carrol," he said with a curious intensity, "don't you
'like us?"

"What?"

"Us down here?"

"Why, Clark, you know I do. I adore all you boys."

"Then why you gettin' engaged to a Yankee?."

"Clark, I don't know. I'm not sure what I'll do, but--well, I
want to go places and see people. I want my mind to grow. I want
to live where things happen on a big scale."

"What you mean?"

"Oh, Clark, I love you, and I love Joe here and Ben Arrot, and
you-all, but you'll--you'll---"

"We'll all be failures?"

"Yes. I don't mean only money failures, but just sort of--of
ineffectual and sad, and--oh, how can I tell you?"

"You mean because we stay here in Tarleton?"

"Yes, Clark; and because you like it and never want to change
things or think or go ahead."

He nodded and she reached over and pressed his hand.

"Clark," she said softly, "I wouldn't change you for the world.
You're sweet the way you are. The things that'll make you fail
I'll love always--the living in the past, the lazy days and
nights you have, and all your carelessness and generosity."

"But you're goin' away?"

"Yes--because I couldn't ever marry you. You've a place in my
heart no one else ever could have, but tied down here I'd get
restless. I'd feel I was--wastin' myself. There's two sides to
me, you see. There's the sleepy old side you love an' there's a
sort of energy--the feeling that makes me do wild things. That's
the part of me that may be useful somewhere, that'll last when
I'm not beautiful any more."

She broke of with characteristic suddenness and sighed, "Oh,
sweet cooky!" as her mood changed.

Half closing her eyes and tipping back her head till it rested on
the seat-back she let the savory breeze fan her eyes and ripple
the fluffy curls of her bobbed hair. They were in the country
now, hurrying between tangled growths of bright-green coppice and
grass and tall trees that sent sprays of foliage to hang a cool
welcome over the road. Here and there they passed a battered
negro cabin, its oldest white-haired inhabitant smoking a corncob
pipe beside the door, and half a dozen scantily clothed
pickaninnies parading tattered dolls on the wild-grown grass in
front. Farther out were lazy cotton-fields where even the workers
seemed intangible shadows lent by the sun to the earth, not for
toil, but to while away some age-old tradition in the golden
September fields. And round the drowsy picturesqueness, over the
trees and shacks and muddy rivers, flowed the heat, never
hostile, only comforting, like a great warm nourishing bosom for
the infant earth.

"Sally Carrol, we're here!"

"Poor chile's soun' asleep."

"Honey, you dead at last outa sheer laziness?"

"Water, Sally Carrol! Cool water waitin' for you!"

Her eyes opened sleepily.

"Hi!" she murmured, smiling.



II


In November Harry Bellamy, tall, broad, and brisk, came down from
his Northern city to spend four days. His intention was to
settle a matter that had been hanging fire since he and Sally
Carrol had met in Asheville, North Carolina, in midsummer. The
settlement took only a quiet afternoon and an evening in front of
a glowing open fire, for Harry Bellamy had everything she
wanted; and, beside, she loved him--loved him with that side of
her she kept especially for loving. Sally Carrol had several
rather clearly defined sides.

On his last afternoon they walked, and she found their steps
tending half-unconsciously toward one of her favorite haunts, the
cemetery. When it came in sight, gray-white and golden-green
under the cheerful late sun, she paused, irresolute, by the iron
gate.

"Are you mournful by nature, Harry?" she asked with a faint
smile.

"Mournful?" Not I."

"Then let's go in here. It depresses some folks, but I like it."

They passed through the gateway and followed a path that led
through a wavy valley of graves--dusty-gray and mouldy for the
fifties; quaintly carved with flowers and jars for the seventies;
ornate and hideous for the nineties, with fat marble cherubs
lying in sodden sleep on stone pillows, and great impossible
growths of nameless granite flowers.

Occasionally they saw a kneeling figure with tributary flowers,
but over most of the graves lay silence and withered leaves with
only the fragrance that their own shadowy memories could waken in
living minds.

They reached the top of a hill where they were fronted by a tall,
round head-stone, freckled with dark spots of damp and half
grown over with vines.

"Margery Lee," she read; "1844-1873.  Wasn't she nice?  She died
when she was twenty-nine.  Dear Margery Lee," she added softly.
"Can't you see her, Harry?"

"Yes, Sally Carrol."

He felt a little hand insert itself into his.

"She was dark, I think; and she always wore her hair with a
ribbon in it, and gorgeous hoop-skirts of Alice blue and old
rose."

"Yes."

"Oh, she was sweet, Harry!  And she was the sort of girl born to
stand on a wide, pillared porch and welcome folks in.  I think
perhaps a lot of men went away to war meanin' to come back to
her; but maybe none of 'em ever did."

He stooped down close to the stone, hunting for any record of
marriage.

"There's nothing here to show."

"Of course not.  How could there be anything there better than
just 'Margery Lee,' and that eloquent date?"

She drew close to him and an unexpected lump came into his throat
as her yellow hair brushed his cheek.

"You see how she was, don't you Harry?"

"I see," he agreed gently. "I see through your precious eyes.
You're beautiful now, so I know she must have been."

Silent and close they stood, and he could feel her shoulders
trembling a little. An ambling breeze swept up the hill and
stirred the brim of her floppidy hat.

"Let's go down there!"

She was pointing to a flat stretch on the other side of the hill
where along the green turf were a thousand grayish-white crosses
stretching in endless, ordered rows like the stacked arms of a
battalion.

"Those are the Confederate dead," said Sally Carrol simply.

They walked along and read the inscriptions, always only a name
and a date, sometimes quite indecipherable.

"The last row is the saddest--see, 'way over there. Every cross
has just a date on it and the word 'Unknown.'"

She looked at him and her eyes brimmed with tears.

"I can't tell you how real it is to me, darling--if you don't
know."

"How you feel about it is beautiful to me."

"No, no, it's not me, it's them--that old time that I've tried to
have live in me. These were just men, unimportant evidently or
they wouldn't have been 'unknown'; but they died for the most
beautiful thing in the world--the dead South. You see," she
continued, her voice still husky, her eyes glistening with tears,
"people have these dreams they fasten onto things, and I've
always grown up with that dream. It was so easy because it was
all dead and there weren't any disillusions comin' to me. I've
tried in a way to live up to those past standards of noblesse
oblige--there's just the last remnants of it, you know, like the
roses of an old garden dying all round us--streaks of strange
courtliness and chivalry in some of these boys an' stories I used
to hear from a Confederate soldier who lived next door, and a
few old darkies. Oh, Harry, there was something, there was
something! I couldn't ever make you understand but it was there."

"I understand," he assured her again quietly.

Sally Carol smiled and dried her eyes on the tip of a
handkerchief protruding from his breast pocket.

"You don't feel depressed, do you, lover?  Even when I cry I'm
happy here, and I get a sort of strength from it."

Hand in hand they turned and walked slowly away. Finding soft
grass she drew him down to a seat beside her with their backs
against the remnants of a low broken wall.

"Wish those three old women would clear out," he complained. "I
want to kiss you, Sally Carrol."

"Me, too."

They waited impatiently for the three bent figures to move off,
and then she kissed him until the sky seemed to fade out and all
her smiles and tears to vanish in an ecstasy of eternal seconds.

Afterward they walked slowly back together, while on the corners
twilight played at somnolent black-and-white checkers with the
end of day.

"You'll be up about mid-January," he said, "and you've got to
stay a month at least. It'll be slick. There's a winter carnival
on, and if you've never really seen snow it'll be like fairy-land
to you. There'll be skating and skiing and tobogganing and
sleigh-riding, and all sorts of torchlight parades on snow-shoes.
They haven't had one for years, so they're gong to make it a
knock-out."

"Will I be cold, Harry?" she asked suddenly.

"You certainly won't. You may freeze your nose, but you won't be
shivery cold. It's hard and dry, you know."

"I guess I'm a summer child. I don't like any cold I've ever
seen."

She broke off and they were both silent for a minute.

"Sally Carol," he said very slowly, "what do you say to--March?"

"I say I love you."

"March?"

"March, Harry."



III


All night in the Pullman it was very cold. She rang for the
porter to ask for another blanket, and when he couldn't give her
one she tried vainly, by squeezing down into the bottom of her
berth and doubling back the bedclothes, to snatch a few hours'
sleep. She wanted to look her best in the morning.

She rose at six and sliding uncomfortably into her clothes
stumbled up to the diner for a cup of coffee. The snow had
filtered into the vestibules and covered the door with a slippery
coating. It was intriguing this cold, it crept in everywhere.
Her breath was quite visible and she blew into the air with a
naive enjoyment. Seated in the diner she stared out the window at
white hills and valleys and scattered pines whose every branch
was a green platter for a cold feast of snow. Sometimes a
solitary farmhouse would fly by, ugly and bleak and lone on the
white waste; and with each one she had an instant of chill
compassion for the souls shut in there waiting for spring.

As she left the diner and swayed back into the Pullman she
experienced a surging rush of energy and wondered if she was
feeling the bracing air of which Harry had spoken. This was the
North, the North--her land now!

     "Then blow, ye winds, heighho!
      A-roving I will go,"

she chanted exultantly to herself.

"What's 'at?" inquired the porter politely.

"I said: 'Brush me off.'"

The long wires of the telegraph poles doubled, two tracks ran up
beside the train--three--four; came a succession of white-roofed
houses, a glimpse of a trolley-car with frosted windows,
streets--more streets--the city.

She stood for a dazed moment in the frosty station before she saw
three fur-bundled figures descending upon her.

"There she is!"

"Oh, Sally Carrol!"

Sally Carrol dropped her bag.

"Hi!"

A faintly familiar icy-cold face kissed her, and then she was in
a group of faces all apparently emitting great clouds of heavy
smoke; she was shaking hands. There were Gordon, a short, eager
man of thirty who looked like an amateur knocked-about model for
Harry, and his wife, Myra, a listless lady with flaxen hair under
a fur automobile cap. Almost immediately Sally Carrol thought of
her as vaguely Scandinavian. A cheerful chauffeur adopted her
bag, and amid ricochets of half-phrases, exclamations and
perfunctory listless "my dears" from Myra, they swept each other
from the station.

Then they were in a sedan bound through a crooked succession of
snowy streets where dozens of little boys were hitching sleds
behind grocery wagons and automobiles.

"Oh," cried Sally Carrol, "I want to do that! Can we Harry?"

"That's for kids. But we might---"

"It looks like such a circus!" she said regretfully.

Home was a rambling frame house set on a white lap of snow, and
there she met a big, gray-haired man of whom she approved, and a
lady who was like an egg, and who kissed her--these were Harry's
parents. There was a breathless indescribable hour crammed full
of self-sentences, hot water, bacon and eggs and confusion; and
after that she was alone with Harry in the library, asking him if
she dared smoke.

It was a large room with a Madonna over the fireplace and rows
upon rows of books in covers of light gold and dark gold and
shiny red. All the chairs had little lace squares where one's head
should rest, the couch was just comfortable, the books looked as
if they had been read--some--and Sally Carrol had an
instantaneous vision of the battered old library at home, with
her father's huge medical books, and the oil-paintings of her
three great-uncles, and the old couch that had been mended up for
forty-five years and was still luxurious to dream in.  This room
struck her as being neither attractive nor particularly
otherwise. It was simply a room with a lot of fairly expensive
things in it that all looked about fifteen years old.

"What do you think of it up here?" demanded Harry eagerly. "Does
it surprise you? Is it what you expected I mean?"

"You are, Harry," she said quietly, and reached out her arms to
him.

But after a brief kiss he seemed to extort enthusiasm from her.

"The town, I mean. Do you like it? Can you feel the pep in the
air?"

"Oh, Harry," she laughed, "you'll have to give me time. You can't
just fling questions at me."

She puffed at her cigarette with a sigh of contentment.

"One thing I want to ask you," he began rather apologetically;
"you Southerners put quite an emphasis on family, and all
that--not that it isn't quite all right, but you'll find it a
little different here. I mean--you'll notice a lot of things
that'll seem to you sort of vulgar display at first, Sally
Carrol; but just remember that this is a three-generation town.
Everybody has a father, and about half of us have grandfathers.
Back of that we don't go."

"Of course," she murmured.

"Our grandfathers, you see, founded the place, and a lot of them
had to take some pretty queer jobs while they were doing the
founding. For instance there's one woman who at present is about
the social model for the town; well, her father was the first
public ash man--things like that."

"Why," said Sally Carol, puzzled, "did you s'pose I was goin' to
make remarks about people?"

"Not at all," interrupted Harry, "and I'm not apologizing for any
one either. It's just that--well, a Southern girl came up here
last summer and said some unfortunate things, and--oh, I just
thought I'd tell you."

Sally Carrol felt suddenly indignant--as though she had been
unjustly spanked--but Harry evidently considered the subject
closed, for he went on with a great surge of enthusiasm.

"It's carnival time, you know. First in ten years. And there's an
ice palace they're building new that's the first they've had
since eighty-five. Built out of blocks of the clearest ice they
could find--on a tremendous scale."

She rose and walking to the window pushed aside the heavy Turkish
portieres and looked out.

"Oh!" she cried suddenly. "There's two little boys makin' a snow
man! Harry, do you reckon I can go out an' help 'em?"

"You dream! Come here and kiss me."

She left the window rather reluctantly.

"I don't guess this is a very kissable climate, is it? I mean, it
makes you so you don't want to sit round, doesn't it?"

"We're not going to. I've got a vacation for the first week
you're here, and there's a dinner-dance to-night."

"Oh, Harry," she confessed, subsiding in a heap, half in his lap,
half in the pillows, "I sure do feel confused. I haven't got an
idea whether I'll like it or not, an' I don't know what people
expect, or anythin'. You'll have to tell me, honey."

"I'll tell you," he said softly, "if you'll just tell me you're
glad to be here."

"Glad--just awful glad!" she whispered, insinuating herself into
his arms in her own peculiar way.  "Where you are is home for me,
Harry."

And as she said this she had the feeling for almost the first
time in her life that she was acting a part.

That night, amid the gleaming candles of a dinner-party, where
the men seemed to do most of the talking while the girls sat in a
haughty and expensive aloofness, even Harry's presence on her
left failed to make her feel at home.

"They're a good-looking crowd, don't you think?" he demanded.
"Just look round. There's Spud Hubbard, tackle at Princeton last
year, and Junie Morton--he and the red-haired fellow next to him
were both Yale hockey captains; Junie was in my class. Why, the
best athletes in the world come from these States round here.
This is a man's country, I tell you. Look at John J. Fishburn!"

"Who's he?" asked Sally Carrol innocently.

"Don't you know?"

"I've heard the name."

"Greatest wheat man in the Northwest, and one of the greatest
financiers in the country."

She turned suddenly to a voice on her right.

"I guess they forget to introduce us. My name's Roger Patton."

"My name is Sally Carrol Happer," she said graciously.

"Yes, I know. Harry told me you were coming."

"You a relative?"

"No, I'm a professor."

"Oh," she laughed.

"At the university.  You're from the South, aren't you?"

"Yes; Tarleton, Georgia."

She liked him immediately--a reddish-brown mustache under watery
blue eyes that had something in them that these other eyes
lacked, some quality of appreciation. They exchanged stray
sentences through dinner, and she made up her mind to see him
again.

After coffee she was introduced to numerous good-looking young
men who danced with conscious precision and seemed to take it for
granted that she wanted to talk about nothing except Harry.

"Heavens," she thought, "They talk as if my being engaged made me
older than they are--as if I'd tell their mothers on them!"

In the South an engaged girl, even a young married woman,
expected the same amount of half-affectionate badinage and
flattery that would be accorded a debutante, but here all that
seemed banned.  One young man after getting well started on the
subject of Sally Carrol's eyes and, how they had allured him ever
since she entered the room, went into a violent convulsion when
he found she was visiting the Bellamys--was Harry's fiancee. He
seemed to feel as though he had made some risque and inexcusable
blunder, became immediately formal and left her at the first
opportunity.

She was rather glad when Roger Patton cut in on her and suggested
that they sit out a while.

"Well," he inquired, blinking cheerily, "how's Carmen from the
South?"

"Mighty fine.  How's--how's Dangerous Dan McGrew? Sorry, but he's
the only Northerner I know much about."

He seemed to enjoy that.

"Of course," he confessed, "as a professor of literature I'm not
supposed to have read Dangerous Dan McGrew."

"Are you a native?"

"No, I'm a Philadelphian. Imported from Harvard to teach French.
But I've been here ten years."

"Nine years, three hundred an' sixty-four days longer than me."

"Like it here?"

"Uh-huh.  Sure do!"

"Really?"

"Well, why not? Don't I look as if I were havin' a good time?"

"I saw you look out the window a minute ago--and shiver."

"Just my imagination," laughed Sally Carroll "I'm used to havin'
everythin' quiet outside an' sometimes I look out an' see a
flurry of snow an' it's just as if somethin' dead was movin'"

He nodded appreciatively.

"Ever been North before?"

"Spent two Julys in Asheville, North Carolina."

"Nice-looking crowd aren't they?" suggested Patton, indicating
the swirling floor.

Sally Carrol started. This had been Harry's remark.

"Sure are! They're--canine."

"What?"

She flushed.

"I'm sorry; that sounded worse than I meant it. You see I always
think of people as feline or canine, irrespective of sex."

"Which are you?"

"I'm feline. So are you. So are most Southern men an' most of
these girls here."

"What's Harry?"

"Harry's canine distinctly. All the men I've to-night seem to be
canine."

"What does canine imply? A certain conscious masculinity as
opposed to subtlety?"

"Reckon so. I never analyzed it--only I just look at people an'
say 'canine' or 'feline' right off. It's right absurd I guess."

"Not at all. I'm interested. I used to have a theory about these
people. I think they're freezing up."

"What?"

"Well, they're growing' like Swedes--Ibsenesque, you know. Very
gradually getting gloomy and melancholy. It's these long winters.
Ever read Ibsen?"

She shook her head.

"Well, you find in his characters a certain brooding rigidity.
They're righteous, narrow, and cheerless, without infinite
possibilities for great sorrow or joy."

"Without smiles or tears?"

"Exactly.  That's my theory.  You see there are thousands of
Swedes up here. They come, I imagine, because the climate is very
much like their own, and there's been a gradual mingling.
There're probably not half a dozen here to-night, but--we've had
four Swedish governors. Am I boring you?"

"I'm mighty interested."

"Your future sister-in-law is half Swedish. Personally I like
her, but my theory is that Swedes react rather badly on us as a
whole. Scandinavians, you know, have the largest suicide rate in
the world."

"Why do you live here if it's so depressing?"

"Oh, it doesn't get me. I'm pretty well cloistered, and I suppose
books mean more than people to me anyway."

"But writers all speak about the South being tragic. You
know--Spanish senoritas, black hair and daggers an' haunting
music."

He shook his head.

"No, the Northern races are the tragic races--they don't indulge
in the cheering luxury of tears."

Sally Carrol thought of her graveyard. She supposed that that was
vaguely what she had meant when she said it didn't depress her.

"The Italians are about the gayest people in the world--but it's
a dull subject," he broke off.  "Anyway, I want to tell you
you're marrying a pretty fine man."

Sally Carrol was moved by an impulse of confidence.

"I know. I'm the sort of person who wants to be taken care of
after a certain point, and I feel sure I will be."

"Shall we dance? You know," he continued as they rose, "it's
encouraging to find a girl who knows what she's marrying for.
Nine-tenths of them think of it as a sort of walking into a
moving-picture sunset."

She laughed and liked him immensely.

Two hours later on the way home she nestled near Harry in the
back seat.

"Oh, Harry," she whispered "it's so co-old!"

"But it's warm in here, daring girl."

"But outside it's cold; and oh, that howling wind!"

She buried her face deep in his fur coat and trembled
involuntarily as his cold lips kissed the tip of her ear.



IV


The first week of her visit passed in a whirl. She had her
promised toboggan-ride at the back of an automobile through a
chill January twilight. Swathed in furs she put in a morning
tobogganing on the country-club hill; even tried skiing, to sail
through the air for a glorious moment and then land in a tangled
laughing bundle on a soft snow-drift. She liked all the winter
sports, except an afternoon spent snow-shoeing over a glaring
plain under pale yellow sunshine, but she soon realized that
these things were for children--that she was being humored and
that the enjoyment round her was only a reflection of her own.

At first the Bellamy family puzzled her. The men were reliable
and she liked them; to Mr. Bellamy especially, with his iron-gray
hair and energetic dignity, she took an immediate fancy, once
she found that he was born in Kentucky; this made of him a link
between the old life and the new. But toward the women she felt a
definite hostility. Myra, her future sister-in-law, seemed the
essence of spiritless conversationality. Her conversation was so
utterly devoid of personality that Sally Carrol, who came from a
country where a certain amount of charm and assurance could be
taken for granted in the women, was inclined to despise her.

"If those women aren't beautiful," she thought, "they're nothing.
They just fade out when you look at them. They're glorified
domestics. Men are the centre of every mixed group."

Lastly there was Mrs. Bellamy, whom Sally Carrol detested. The
first day's impression of an egg had been confirmed--an egg with
a cracked, veiny voice and such an ungracious dumpiness of
carriage that Sally Carrol felt that if she once fell she would
surely scramble. In addition, Mrs. Bellamy seemed to typify the
town in being innately hostile to strangers. She called Sally
Carrol "Sally," and could not be persuaded that the double name
was anything more than a tedious ridiculous nickname. To Sally
Carrol this shortening of her name was presenting her to the
public half clothed. She loved "Sally Carrol"; she loathed
"Sally."  She knew also that Harry's mother disapproved of her
bobbed hair; and she had never dared smoke down-stairs after that
first day when Mrs. Bellamy had come into the library sniffing
violently.

Of all the men she met she preferred Roger Patton, who was a
frequent visitor at the house.  He never again alluded to the
Ibsenesque tendency of the populace, but when he came in one day
and found her curled upon the sofa bent over "Peer Gynt" he
laughed and told her to forget what he'd said--that it was all
rot.

They had been walking homeward between mounds of high-piled snow
and under a sun which Sally Carrol scarcely recognized. They
passed a little girl done up in gray wool until she resembled a
small Teddy bear, and Sally Carrol could not resist a gasp of
maternal appreciation.

"Look! Harry!"

"What?"

"That little girl--did you see her face?"

"Yes, why?"

"It was red as a little strawberry.  Oh, she was cute!"

"Why, your own face is almost as red as that already! Everybody's
healthy here.  We're out in the cold as soon as we're old enough
to walk.  Wonderful climate!"

She looked at him and had to agree.  He was mighty
healthy-looking; so was his brother.  And she had noticed the new
red in her own cheeks that very morning.

Suddenly their glances were caught and held, and they stared for
a moment at the street-corner ahead of them.  A man was standing
there, his knees bent, his eyes gazing upward with a tense
expression as though he were about to make a leap toward the
chilly sky.  And then they both exploded into a shout of
laughter, for coming closer they discovered it had been a
ludicrous momentary illusion produced by the extreme bagginess of
the man's trousers.

"Reckon that's one on us," she laughed.

"He must be Southerner, judging by those trousers," suggested
Harry mischievously.

"Why, Harry!"

Her surprised look must have irritated him.

"Those damn Southerners!"

Sally Carrol's eyes flashed.

"Don't call 'em that."

"I'm sorry, dear," said Harry, malignantly apologetic, "but you
know what I think of them.  They're sort of--sort of
degenerates--not at all like the old Southerners.  They've lived
so long down there with all the colored people that they've
gotten lazy and shiftless."

"Hush your mouth, Harry!" she cried angrily. "They're not! They
may be lazy--anybody would be in that climate--but they're my
best friends, an' I don't want to hear 'em criticised in any such
sweepin' way. Some of 'em are the finest men in the world."

"Oh, I know. They're all right when they come North to college,
but of all the hangdog, ill-dressed, slovenly lot I ever saw, a
bunch of small-town Southerners are the worst!"

Sally Carrol was clinching her gloved hands and biting her lip
furiously.

"Why," continued Harry, if there was one in my class at New
Haven, and we all thought that at last we'd found the true type
of Southern aristocrat, but it turned out that he wasn't an
aristocrat at all--just the son of a Northern carpetbagger, who
owned about all the cotton round Mobile."

"A Southerner wouldn't talk the way you're talking now," she said
evenly.

"They haven't the energy!"

"Or the somethin' else."

"I'm sorry Sally Carrol, but I've heard you say yourself that
you'd never marry---"

"That's quite different. I told you I wouldn't want to tie my
life to any of the boys that are round Tarleton now, but I never
made any sweepin' generalities."

They walked along in silence.

"I probably spread it on a bit thick Sally Carrol. I'm sorry."

She nodded but made no answer.  Five minutes later as they stood
in the hallway she suddenly threw her arms round him.

"Oh, Harry," she cried, her eyes brimming with tears; "let's get
married next week. I'm afraid of having fusses like that. I'm
afraid, Harry. It wouldn't be that way if we were married."

But Harry, being in the wrong, was still irritated.

"That'd be idiotic. We decided on March."

The tears in Sally Carrol's eyes faded; her expression hardened
slightly.

"Very well--I suppose I shouldn't have said that."

Harry melted.

"Dear little nut!" he cried. "Come and kiss me and let's forget."
That very night at the end of a vaudeville performance the
orchestra played "Dixie" and Sally Carrol felt something stronger
and more enduring than her tears and smiles of the day brim up
inside her. She leaned forward gripping the arms of her chair
until her face grew crimson.

"Sort of get you dear?" whispered Harry.

But she did not hear him. To the limited throb of the violins and
the inspiring beat of the kettle-drums her own old ghosts were
marching by and on into the darkness, and as fifes whistled and
sighed in the low encore they seemed so nearly out of sight that
she could have waved good-by.

     "Away, Away,
         Away down South in Dixie!
      Away, away,
         Away down South in Dixie!"



V


It was a particularly cold night. A sudden thaw had nearly
cleared the streets the day before, but now they were traversed
again with a powdery wraith of loose snow that travelled in wavy
lines before the feet of the wind, and filled the lower air with
a fine-particled mist. There was no sky-- only a dark, ominous
tent that draped in the tops of the streets and was in reality a
vast approaching army of snowflakes--while over it all, chilling
away the comfort from the brown-and-green glow of lighted
windows and muffling the steady trot of the horse pulling their
sleigh, interminably washed the north wind. It was a dismal town
after all, she though, dismal.

Sometimes at night it had seemed to her as though no one lived
here--they had all gone long ago--leaving lighted houses to be
covered in time by tombing heaps of sleet. Oh, if there should be
snow on her grave! To be beneath great piles of it all winter
long, where even her headstone would be a light shadow against
light shadows. Her grave--a grave that should be flower-strewn
and washed with sun and rain.

She thought again of those isolated country houses that her train
had passed, and of the life there the long winter through--the
ceaseless glare through the windows, the crust forming on the
soft drifts of snow, finally the slow cheerless melting and the
harsh spring of which Roger Patton had told her. Her spring--to
lose it forever--with its lilacs and the lazy sweetness it
stirred in her heart. She was laying away that spring--afterward
she would lay away that sweetness.

With a gradual insistence the storm broke. Sally Carrol felt a
film of flakes melt quickly on her eyelashes, and Harry reached
over a furry arm and drew down her complicated flannel cap. Then
the small flakes came in skirmish-line, and the horse bent his
neck patiently as a transparency of white appeared momentarily on
his coat.

"Oh, he's cold, Harry," she said quickly.

"Who? The horse? Oh, no, he isn't. He likes it!"

After another ten minutes they turned a corner and came in sight
of their destination. On a tall hill outlined in vivid glaring
green against the wintry sky stood the ice palace. It was three
stories in the air, with battlements and embrasures and narrow
icicled windows, and the innumerable electric lights inside made
a gorgeous transparency of the great central hall. Sally Carrol
clutched Harry's hand under the fur robe.

"It's beautiful!" he cried excitedly. "My golly, it's beautiful,
isn't it! They haven't had one here since eighty-five!"

Somehow the notion of there not having been one since eighty-five
oppressed her. Ice was a ghost, and this mansion of it was
surely peopled by those shades of the eighties, with pale faces
and blurred snow-filled hair.

"Come on, dear," said Harry.

She followed him out of the sleigh and waited while he hitched
the horse. A party of four--Gordon, Myra, Roger Patton, and
another girl-- drew up beside them with a mighty jingle of bells.
There were quite a crowd already, bundled in fur or sheepskin,
shouting and calling to each other as they moved through the
snow, which was now so thick that people could scarcely be
distinguished a few yards away.

"It's a hundred and seventy feet tall," Harry was saying to a
muffled figure beside him as they trudged toward the entrance;
"covers six thousand square yards."

"She caught snatches of conversation: "One main hall"--"walls
twenty to forty inches thick"--"and the ice cave has almost a
mile of--"--"this Canuck who built it---"

They found their way inside, and dazed by the magic of the great
crystal walls Sally Carrol found herself repeating over and over
two lines from "Kubla Khan":

     "It was a miracle of rare device,
      A sunny pleasure-dome with caves of ice!"

In the great glittering cavern with the dark shut out she took a
seat on a wooded bench and the evening's oppression lifted. Harry
was right--it was beautiful; and her gaze travelled the smooth
surface of the walls, the blocks for which had been selected for
their purity and dearness to obtain this opalescent, translucent
effect.

"Look! Here we go--oh, boy! " cried Harry.

A band in a far corner struck up "Hail, Hail, the Gang's All
Here!" which echoed over to them in wild muddled acoustics, and
then the lights suddenly went out; silence seemed to flow down
the icy sides and sweep over them. Sally Carrol could still see
her white breath in the darkness, and a dim row of pale faces
over on the other side.

The music eased to a sighing complaint, and from outside drifted
in the full-throated remnant chant of the marching clubs. It grew
louder like some paean of a viking tribe traversing an ancient
wild; it swelled--they were coming nearer; then a row of torches
appeared, and another and another, and keeping time with their
moccasined feet a long column of gray-mackinawed figures swept
in, snow-shoes slung at their shoulders, torches soaring and
flickering as their voice rose along the great walls.

The gray column ended and another followed, the light streaming
luridly this time over red toboggan caps and flaming crimson
mackinaws, and as they entered they took up the refrain; then
came a long platoon of blue and white, of green, of white, of
brown and yellow.

"Those white ones are the Wacouta Club," whispered Harry eagerly.
"Those are the men you've met round at dances."

The volume of the voices grew; the great cavern was a
phantasmagoria of torches waving in great banks of fire, of
colors and the rhythm of soft-leather steps. The leading column
turned and halted, platoon deploys in front of platoon until the
whole procession made a solid flag of flame, and then from
thousands of voices burst a mighty shout that filled the air like
a crash of thunder, and sent the torches wavering. It was
magnificent, it was tremendous! To Sally Carol it was the North
offering sacrifice on some mighty altar to the gray pagan God of
Snow. As the shout died the band struck up again and there came
more singing, and then long reverberating cheers by each club.
She sat very quiet listening while the staccato cries rent the
stillness; and then she started, for there was a volley of
explosion, and great clouds of smoke went up here and there
through the cavern--the flash-light photographers at work--and
the council was over. With the band at their head the clubs
formed in column once more, took up their chant, and began to
march out.

"Come on!" shouted Harry. "We want to see the labyrinths
down-stairs before they turn the lights off!"

They all rose and started toward the chute--Harry and Sally
Carrol in the lead, her little mitten buried in his big fur
gantlet. At the bottom of the chute was a long empty room of ice,
with the ceiling so low that they had to stoop--and their hands
were parted. Before she realized what he intended Harry Harry had
darted down one of the half-dozen glittering passages that
opened into the room and was only a vague receding blot against
the green shimmer.

"Harry!" she called.

"Come on!" he cried back.

She looked round the empty chamber; the rest of the party had
evidently decided to go home, were already outside somewhere in
the blundering snow. She hesitated and then darted in after
Harry.

"Harry!" she shouted.

She had reached a turning-point thirty feet down; she heard a
faint muffled answer far to the left, and with a touch of panic
fled toward it. She passed another turning, two more yawning
alleys.

"Harry!"

No answer. She started to run straight forward, and then turned
like lightning and sped back the way she had come, enveloped in a
sudden icy terror.

She reached a turn--was it here?--took the left and came to what
should have been the outlet into the long, low room, but it was
only another glittering passage with darkness at the end. She
called again, but the walls gave back a flat, lifeless echo with
no reverberations. Retracing her steps she turned another corner,
this time following a wide passage. It was like the green lane
between the parted water of the Red Sea, like a damp vault
connecting empty tombs.

She slipped a little now as she walked, for ice had formed on the
bottom of her overshoes; she had to run her gloves along the
half-slippery, half-sticky walls to keep her balance.

"Harry!"

Still no answer. The sound she made bounced mockingly down to the
end of the passage.

Then on an instant the lights went out, and she was in complete
darkness. She gave a small, frightened cry, and sank down into a
cold little heap on the ice. She felt her left knee do something
as she fell, but she scarcely noticed it as some deep terror far
greater than any fear of being lost settled upon her. She was
alone with this presence that came out of the North, the dreary
loneliness that rose from ice-bound whalers in the Arctic seas,
from smokeless, trackless wastes where were strewn the whitened
bones of adventure. It was an icy breath of death; it was rolling
down low across the land to clutch at her.

With a furious, despairing energy she rose again and started
blindly down the darkness. She must get out. She might be lost in
here for days, freeze to death and lie embedded in the ice like
corpses she had read of, kept perfectly preserved until the
melting of a glacier. Harry probably thought she had left with
the others--he had gone by now; no one would know until next day.
She reached pitifully for the wall. Forty inches thick, they had
said--forty inches thick!

On both sides of her along the walls she felt things creeping,
damp souls that haunted this palace, this town, this North.

"Oh, send somebody--send somebody!" she cried aloud.

Clark Darrow--he would understand; or Joe Ewing; she couldn't be
left here to wander forever--to be frozen, heart, body, and soul.
This her-- this Sally Carrol! Why, she was a happy thing. She
was a happy little girl. She liked warmth and summer and Dixie.
These things were foreign--foreign.

"You're not crying," something said aloud. "You'll never cry any
more. Your tears would just freeze; all tears freeze up here!"

She sprawled full length on the ice.

"Oh, God!" she faltered.

A long single file of minutes went by, and with a great weariness
she felt her eyes dosing. Then some one seemed to sit down near
her and take her face in warm, soft hands. She looked up
gratefully.

"Why it's Margery Lee" she crooned softly to herself. "I knew
you'd come." It really was Margery Lee, and she was just as Sally
Carrol had known she would be, with a young, white brow, and
wide welcoming eyes, and a hoop-skirt of some soft material that
was quite comforting to rest on.

"Margery Lee."

It was getting darker now and darker--all those tombstones ought
to be repainted sure enough, only that would spoil 'em, of
course. Still, you ought to be able to see 'em.

Then after a succession of moments that went fast and then slow,
but seemed to be ultimately resolving themselves into a multitude
of blurred rays converging toward a pale-yellow sun, she heard a
great cracking noise break her new-found stillness.

It was the sun, it was a light; a torch, and a torch beyond that,
and another one, and voices; a face took flesh below the torch,
heavy arms raised her and she felt something on her cheek--it
felt wet. Some one had seized her and was rubbing her face with
snow. How ridiculous--with snow!

"Sally Carrol! Sally Carrol!"

It was Dangerous Dan McGrew; and two other faces she didn't know.
"Child, child! We've been looking for you two hours! Harry's
half-crazy!"

Things came rushing back into place--the singing, the torches,
the great shout of the marching clubs. She squirmed in Patton's
arms and gave a long low cry.

"Oh, I want to get out of here! I'm going back home. Take me
home"---her voice rose to a scream that sent a chill to Harry's
heart as he came racing down the next passage--"to-morrow!" she
cried with delirious, unstrained passion--"To-morrow! To-morrow!
To-morrow!"



VI


The wealth of golden sunlight poured a quite enervating yet oddly
comforting heat over the house where day long it faced the dusty
stretch of road. Two birds were making a great to-do in a cool
spot found among the branches of a tree next door, and down the
street a colored woman was announcing herself melodiously as a
purveyor of strawberries. It was April afternoon.

Sally Carrol Happer, resting her chin on her arm, and her arm on
an old window-seat, gazed sleepily down over the spangled dust
whence the heat waves were rising for the first time this spring.
She was watching a very ancient Ford turn a perilous corner and
rattle and groan to a jolting stop at the end of the walk. See
made no sound and in a minute a strident familiar whistle rent
the air. Sally Carrol smiled and blinked.

"Good mawnin'."

A head appeared tortuously from under the car-top below.

"Tain't mawnin', Sally Carrol."

"Sure enough!" she said in affected surprise. "I guess maybe
not."

"What you doin'?"

"Eatin' a green peach. 'Spect to die any minute."

Clark twisted himself a last impossible notch to get a view of
her face.

"Water's warm as a kettla steam, Sally Carol. Wanta go swimmin'?"

"Hate to move," sighed Sally Carol lazily, "but I reckon so."





Head and Shoulders




In 1915 Horace Tarbox was thirteen years old. In that year he
took the examinations for entrance to Princeton University and
received the Grade A--excellent--in Caesar, Cicero, Vergil,
Xenophon, Homer, Algebra, Plane Geometry, Solid Geometry, and
Chemistry.

Two years later while George M. Cohan was composing "Over There,"
Horace was leading the sophomore class by several lengths and
digging out theses on "The Syllogism as an Obsolete Scholastic
Form," and during the battle of Chateau-Thierry he was sitting at
his desk deciding whether or not to wait until his seventeenth
birthday before beginning his series of essays on "The Pragmatic
Bias of the New Realists."

After a while some newsboy told him that the war was over, and he
was glad, because it meant that Peat Brothers, publishers, would
get out their new edition of "Spinoza's Improvement of the
Understanding." Wars were all very well in their way, made young
men self-reliant or something but Horace felt that he could never
forgive the President for allowing a brass band to play under
his window the night of the false armistice, causing him to leave
three important sentences out of his thesis on "German
Idealism."

The next year he went up to Yale to take his degree as Master of
Arts.

He was seventeen then, tall and slender, with near-sighted gray
eyes and an air of keeping himself utterly detached from the mere
words he let drop.

"I never feel as though I'm talking to him," expostulated
Professor Dillinger to a sympathetic colleague. "He makes me feel
as though I were talking to his representative. I always expect
him to say: 'Well, I'll ask myself and find out.'"

And then, just as nonchalantly as though Horace Tarbox had been
Mr. Beef the butcher or Mr. Hat the haberdasher, life reached in,
seized him,  handled him, stretched him, and unrolled him like a
piece of Irish lace on a Saturday-afternoon bargain-counter.

To move in the literary fashion I should say that this was all
because when way back in colonial days the hardy pioneers had
come to a bald place in Connecticut and asked of each other,
"Now, what shall we build here?" the hardiest one among 'em had
answered: "Let's build a town where theatrical managers can try
out musical comedies!" How afterward they founded Yale College
there, to try the musical comedies on, is a story every one
knows. At any rate one December, "Home James" opened at the
Shubert, and all the students encored Marcia Meadow, who sang a
song about the Blundering Blimp in the first act and did a shaky,
shivery, celebrated dance in the last.

Marcia was nineteen. She didn't have wings, but audiences agreed
generally that she didn't need them. She was a blonde by natural
pigment, and she wore no paint on the streets at high noon.
Outside of that she was no better than most women.

It was Charlie Moon who promised her five thousand Pall Malls if
she would pay a call on Horace Tarbox, prodigy extraordinary.
Charlie was a senior in Sheffield, and he and Horace were first
cousins. They liked and pitied each other.

Horace had been particularly busy that night. The failure of the
Frenchman Laurier to appreciate the significance of the new
realists was preying on his mind. In fact, his only reaction to a
low, clear-cut rap at his study was to make him speculate as to
whether any rap would have actual existence without an ear there
to hear it. He fancied he was verging more and more toward
pragmatism. But at that moment, though he did not know it, he was
verging with astounding rapidity toward something quite
different.

The rap sounded--three seconds leaked by--the rap sounded.

"Come in," muttered Horace automatically.

He heard the door open and then close, but, bent over his book in
the big armchair before the fire, he did not look up.

"Leave it on the bed in the other room," he said absently.

"Leave what on the bed in the other room?"

Marcia Meadow had to talk her songs, but her speaking voice was
like byplay on a harp.

"The laundry."

"I can't."

Horace stirred impatiently in his chair.

"Why can't you?"

"Why, because I haven't got it."

"Hm!" he replied testily. "Suppose you go back and get it."

Across the fire from Horace was another easychair. He was
accustomed to change to it in the course of an evening by way of
exercise and variety. One chair he called Berkeley, the other he
called Hume. He suddenly heard a sound as of a rustling,
diaphanous form sinking into Hume. He glanced up.

"Well," said Marcia with the sweet smile she used in Act Two
("Oh, so the Duke liked my dancing!") "Well, Omar Khayyam, here I
am beside you singing in the wilderness."

Horace stared at her dazedly. The momentary suspicion came to him
that she existed there only as a phantom of his imagination.
Women didn't come into men's rooms and sink into men's Humes.
Women brought laundry and took your seat in the street-car and
married you later on when you were old enough to know fetters.

This woman had clearly materialized out of Hume. The very froth
of her brown gauzy dress was art emanation from Hume's leather
arm there! If he looked long enough he would see Hume right
through her and then be would be alone again in the room. He
passed his fist across his eyes. He really must take up those
trapeze exercises again.

"For Pete's sake, don't look so critical!" objected the emanation
pleasantly. "I feel as if you were going to wish me away with
that patent dome of yours. And then there wouldn't be anything
left of me except my shadow in your eyes."

Horace coughed. Coughing was one of his two gestures. When he
talked you forgot he had a body at all. It was like hearing a
phonograph record by a singer who had been dead a long time.

"What do you want?" he asked.

"I want them letters," whined Marcia melodramatically--"them
letters of mine you bought from my grandsire in 1881."

Horace considered.

"I haven't got your letters," he said evenly. "I am only
seventeen years old. My father was not born until March 3, 1879.
You evidently have me confused with some one else."

"You're only seventeen?" repeated March suspiciously.

"Only seventeen."

"I knew a girl," said Marcia reminiscently, "who went on the
ten-twenty-thirty when she was sixteen. She was so stuck on
herself that she could never say 'sixteen' without putting the
'only' before it. We got to calling her 'Only Jessie.' And she's
just where she was when she started--only worse. 'Only' is a bad
habit, Omar--it sounds like an alibi."

"My name is not Omar."

"I know," agreed Marcia, nodding--"your name's Horace. I just
call you Omar because you remind me of a smoked cigarette."

"And I haven't your letters. I doubt if I've ever met your
grandfather. In fact, I think it very improbable that you
yourself were alive in 1881."

Marcia stared at him in wonder.

"Me--1881? Why sure! I was second-line stuff when the Florodora
Sextette was still in the convent. I was the original nurse to
Mrs. Sol Smith's Juliette. Why, Omar, I was a canteen singer
during the War of 1812."

Horace's mind made a sudden successful leap, and he grinned.

"Did Charlie Moon put you up to this?"

Marcia regarded him inscrutably.

"Who's Charlie Moon? "

"Small--wide nostrils--big ears."

She grew several inches and sniffed.

"I'm not in the habit of noticing my friends' nostrils.

"Then it was Charlie?"

Marcia bit her lip--and then yawned.  "Oh, let's change the
subject, Omar. I'll pull a snore in this chair in a minute."

"Yes," replied Horace gravely, "Hume has often been considered
soporific---"

"Who's your friend--and will he die?"

Then of a sudden Horace Tarbox rose slenderly and began to pace
the room with his hands in his pockets. This was his other
gesture.

"I don't care for this," he said as if he were talking to
himself--"at all. Not that I mind your being here--I don't.
You're quite a pretty little thing, but I don't like Charlie
Moon's sending you up here. Am I a laboratory experiment on which
the janitors as well as the chemists can make experiments? Is my
intellectual development humorous in any way? Do I look like the
pictures of the little Boston boy in the comic magazines? Has
that callow ass, Moon, with his eternal tales about his week in
Paris, any right to---"

"No," interrupted Marcia emphatically.  "And you're a sweet boy.
Come here and kiss me."

Horace stopped quickly in front of her.

"Why do you want me to kiss you?" he asked intently, "Do you just
go round kissing people?"

"Why, yes," admitted Marcia, unruffled. "'At's all life is. Just
going round kissing people."

"Well," replied Horace emphatically, "I must say your ideas are
horribly garbled! In the first place life isn't just that, and in
the second place. I won't kiss you. It might get to be a habit
and I can't get rid of habits. This year I've got in the habit of
lolling in bed until seven-thirty---"

Marcia nodded understandingly.

"Do you ever have any fun?" she asked.

"What do you mean by fun?"

"See here," said Marcia sternly, "I like you, Omar, but I wish
you'd talk as if you had a line on what you were saying. You
sound as if you were gargling a lot of words in your mouth and
lost a bet every time you spilled a few. I asked you if you ever
had any fun."

Horace shook his head.

"Later, perhaps," he answered. "You see I'm a plan. I'm an
experiment. I don't say that I don't get tired of it sometimes--I
do. Yet--oh, I can't explain! But what you and Charlie Moon call
fun wouldn't be fun to me."

"Please explain."

Horace stared at her, started to speak and then, changing his
mind, resumed his walk. After an unsuccessful attempt to
determine whether or not he was looking at her Marcia smiled at
him.

"Please explain."

Horace turned.

"If I do, will you promise to tell Charlie Moon that I wasn't
in?"

"Uh-uh."

"Very well, then. Here's my history: I was a 'why' child. I
wanted to see the wheels go round. My father was a young
economics professor at Princeton. He brought me up on the system
of answering every question I asked him to the best of his
ability. My response to that gave him the idea of making an
experiment in precocity. To aid in the massacre I had ear
trouble--seven operations between the age of nine and twelve. Of
course this kept me apart from other boys and made me ripe for
forcing. Anyway, while my generation was laboring through Uncle
Remus I was honestly enjoying Catullus in the original.

"I passed off my college examinations when I was thirteen because
I couldn't help it. My chief associates were professors, and I
took a tremendous pride in knowing that I had a fine
intelligence, for though I was unusually gifted I was not
abnormal in other ways. When I was sixteen I got tired of being a
freak; I decided that some one had made a bad mistake. Still as
I'd gone that far I concluded to finish it up by taking my degree
of Master of Arts. My chief interest in life is the study of
modern philosophy. I am a realist of the School of Anton
Laurier--with Bergsonian trimmings--and I'll be eighteen years
old in two months. That's all."

"Whew!" exclaimed Marcia. "That's enough! You do a neat job with
the parts of speech."

"Satisfied?"

"No, you haven't kissed me."

"It's not in my programme," demurred Horace. "Understand that I
don't pretend to be above physical things. They have their place,
but---"

"Oh, don't be so darned reasonable!"

"I can't help it."

"I hate these slot-machine people."

"I assure you I---" began Horace.

"Oh shut up!"

"My own rationality---"

"I didn't say anything about your nationality. You're Amuricun,
ar'n't you?"

"Yes."

"Well, that's O.K. with me.  I got a notion I want to see you do
something that isn't in your highbrow programme. I want to see if
a what-ch-call-em with Brazilian trimmings--that thing you said
you were--can be a little human."

Horace shook his head again.

"I won't kiss you."

"My life is blighted," muttered Marcia tragically. "I'm a beaten
woman. I'll go through life without ever having a kiss with
Brazilian trimmings." She sighed. "Anyways, Omar, will you come
and see my show?"

"What show?"

"I'm a wicked actress from 'Home James'!"

"Light opera?"

"Yes--at a stretch. One of the characters is a Brazilian
rice-planter. That might interest you."

"I saw 'The Bohemian Girl' once," reflected Horace aloud. "I
enjoyed it--to some extent---"

"Then you'll come?"

"Well, I'm--I'm---"

"Oh, I know--you've got to run down to Brazil for the week-end."

"Not at all. I'd be delighted to come---"

Marcia clapped her hands.

"Goodyforyou! I'll mail you a ticket--Thursday night?"

"Why, I---"

"Good! Thursday night it is."

She stood up and walking close to him laid both hands on his
shoulders.

"I like you, Omar.  I'm sorry I tried to kid you. I thought you'd
be sort of frozen, but you're a nice boy."

He eyed her sardonically.

"I'm several thousand generations older than you are."

"You carry your age well."

They shook hands gravely.

"My name's Marcia Meadow," she said emphatically. "'Member it--
Marcia Meadow. And I won't tell Charlie Moon you were in."

An instant later as she was skimming down the last flight of
stairs three at a time she heard a voice call over the upper
banister: "Oh, say---"

She stopped and looked up--made out a vague form leaning over.

"Oh, say!" called the prodigy again. "Can you hear me?"

"Here's your connection Omar."

"I hope I haven't given you the impression that I consider
kissing intrinsically irrational."

"Impression? Why, you didn't even give me the kiss! Never
fret--so long.

Two doors near her opened curiously at the sound of a feminine
voice. A tentative cough sounded from above. Gathering her
skirts, Marcia dived wildly down the last flight, and was
swallowed up in the murky Connecticut air outside.

Up-stairs Horace paced the floor of his study. From time to time
he glanced toward Berkeley waiting there in suave dark-red
reputability, an open book lying suggestively on his cushions.
And then he found that his circuit of the floor was bringing him
each time nearer to Hume. There was something about Hume that was
strangely and inexpressibly different. The diaphanous form still
seemed hovering near, and had Horace sat there he would have
felt as if he were sitting on a lady's lap. And though Horace
couldn't have named the quality of difference, there was such a
quality--quite intangible to the speculative mind, but real,
nevertheless. Hume was radiating something that in all the two
hundred years of his influence he had never radiated before.

Hume was radiating attar of roses.



II


On Thursday night Horace Tarbox sat in an aisle seat in the fifth
row and witnessed "Home James." Oddly enough he found that he
was enjoying himself. The cynical students near him were annoyed
at his audible appreciation of time-honored jokes in the
Hammerstein tradition. But Horace was waiting with anxiety for
Marcia Meadow singing her song about a Jazz-bound Blundering
Blimp. When she did appear, radiant under a floppity flower-faced
hat, a warm glow settled over him, and when the song was over he
did not join in the storm of applause. He felt somewhat numb.

In the intermission after the second act an usher materialized
beside him, demanded to know if he were Mr. Tarbox, and then
handed him a note written in a round adolescent band. Horace read
it in some confusion, while the usher lingered with withering
patience in the aisle.

"Dear 0mar: After the show I always grow an awful hunger. If you
want to satisfy it for me in the Taft Grill just communicate your
answer to the big-timber guide that brought this and oblige.
                        Your friend,
                                                 Marcia Meadow."

"Tell her,"--he coughed--"tell her that it will be quite all
right. I'll meet her in front of the theatre."

The big-timber guide smiled arrogantly.

"I giss she meant for you to come roun' t' the stage door."

"Where--where is it?"

"Ou'side. Tunayulef. Down ee alley."

"What?"

"Ou'side. Turn to y' left! Down ee alley!"

The arrogant person withdrew. A freshman behind Horace snickered.

Then half an hour later, sitting in the Taft Grill opposite the
hair that was yellow by natural pigment, the prodigy was saying
an odd thing.

"Do you have to do that dance in the last act?" he was asking
earnestly--"I mean, would they dismiss you if you refused to do it?"

Marcia grinned.

"It's fun to do it. I like to do it."

And then Horace came out with a FAUX PAS.

"I should think you'd detest it," he remarked succinctly. "The
people behind me were making remarks about your bosom."

Marcia blushed fiery red.

"I can't help that," she said quickly. "The dance to me is only
a sort of acrobatic stunt. Lord, it's hard enough to do! I rub
liniment into my shoulders for an hour every night."

"Do you have--fun while you're on the stage?"

"Uh-huh--sure! I got in the habit of having people look at me,
Omar, and I like it."

"Hm!" Horace sank into a brownish study.

"How's the Brazilian trimmings?"

"Hm!" repeated Horace, and then after a pause: "Where does the
play go from here?"

"New York."

"For how long?"

"All depends.  Winter--maybe."

"Oh!"

"Coming up to lay eyes on me, Omar, or aren't you int'rested?
Not as nice here, is it, as it was up in your room?  I wish we
was there now."

"I feel idiotic in this place," confessed Horace, looking round
him nervously.

"Too bad!  We got along pretty well."

At this he looked suddenly so melancholy that she changed her
tone, and reaching over patted his hand.

"Ever take an actress out to supper before?"

"No," said Horace miserably, "and I never will again. I don't
know why I came to-night. Here under all these lights and with
all these people laughing and chattering I feel completely out
of my sphere. I don't know what to talk to you about."

"We'll talk about me. We talked about you last time."

"Very well."

"Well, my name really is Meadow, but my first name isn't Marcia--
it's Veronica. I'm nineteen. Question--how did the girl make
her leap to the footlights? Answer--she was born in Passaic, New
Jersey, and up to a year ago she got the right to breathe by
pushing Nabiscoes in Marcel's tea-room in Trenton. She started
going with a guy named Robbins, a singer in the Trent House
cabaret, and he got her to try a song and dance with him one
evening. In a month we were filling the supper-room every night.
Then we went to New York with meet-my-friend letters thick as a
pile of napkins.

"In two days we landed a job at Divinerries', and I learned to
shimmy from a kid at the Palais Royal. We stayed at Divinerries'
six months until one night Peter Boyce Wendell, the columnist,
ate his milk-toast there. Next morning a poem about Marvellous
Marcia came out in his newspaper, and within two days I had
three vaudeville offers and a chance at the Midnight Frolic. I
wrote Wendell a thank-you letter, and he printed it in his
column--said that the style was like Carlyle's, only more
rugged and that I ought to quit dancing and do North American
literature. This got me a coupla more vaudeville offers and a
chance as an ingenue in a regular show. I took it--and here I
am, Omar."

When she finished they sat for a moment in silence she draping
the last skeins of a Welsh rabbit on her fork and waiting for
him to speak.

"Let's get out of here," he said suddenly.

Marcia's eyes hardened.

"What's the idea? Am I making you sick?"

"No, but I don't like it here. I don't like to be sitting here
with you."

Without another word Marcia signalled for the waiter.

"What's the check?" she demanded briskly "My part--the rabbit
and the ginger ale."

Horace watched blankly as the waiter figured it.

"See here," he began, "I intended to pay for yours too. You're
my guest."

With a half-sigh Marcia rose from the table and walked from the
room. Horace, his face a document in bewilderment, laid a bill
down and followed her out, up the stairs and into the lobby. He
overtook her in front of the elevator and they faced each other.

"See here," he repeated "You're my guest. Have I said something to
offend you?"

After an instant of wonder Marcia's eyes softened.

"You're a rude fella!" she said slowly. "Don't you know you're
rude?"

"I can't help it," said Horace with a directness she found quite
disarming. "You know I like you."

"You said you didn't like being with me."

"I didn't like it."

"Why not?" Fire blazed suddenly from the gray forests of his
eyes.

"Because I didn't. I've formed the habit of liking you. I've
been thinking of nothing much else for two days."

"Well, if you---"

"Wait a minute," he interrupted. "I've got something to say. It's
this: in six weeks I'll be eighteen years old. When I'm
eighteen years old I'm coming up to New York to see you. Is
there some place in New York where we can go and not have a lot
of people in the room?"

"Sure!" smiled Marcia. "You can come up to my 'partment. Sleep
on the couch if you want to."

"I can't sleep on couches," he said shortly. "But I want to talk
to you."

"Why, sure," repeated Marcia. "in my 'partment."

In his excitement Horace put his hands in his pockets.

"All right--just so I can see you alone. I want to talk to you
as we talked up in my room."

"Honey boy," cried Marcia, laughing, "is it that you want to kiss
me?"

"Yes," Horace almost shouted. "I'll kiss you if you want me to."

The elevator man was looking at them reproachfully. Marcia edged
toward the grated door.

"I'll drop you a post-card," she said.

Horace's eyes were quite wild.

"Send me a post-card! I'll come up any time after January first.
I'll be eighteen then."

And as she stepped into the elevator he coughed enigmatically,
yet with a vague challenge, at the calling, and walked quickly
away.



III


He was there again. She saw him when she took her first glance
at the restless Manhattan audience--down in the front row with
his head bent a bit forward and his gray eyes fixed on her. And
she knew that to him they were alone together in a world where
the high-rouged row of ballet faces and the massed whines of the
violins were as imperceivable as powder on a marble Venus. An
instinctive defiance rose within her.

"Silly boy!" she said to herself hurriedly, and she didn't take
her encore.

"What do they expect for a hundred a week--perpetual motion?"
she grumbled to herself in the wings.

"What's the trouble? Marcia?"

"Guy I don't like down in front."

During the last act as she waited for her specialty she had an
odd attack of stage fright. She had never sent Horace the
promised post-card. Last night she had pretended not to see him--
had hurried from the theatre immediately after her dance to
pass a sleepless night in her apartment, thinking--as she had
so often in the last month--of his pale, rather intent face, his
slim, boyish fore, the merciless, unworldly abstraction that
made him charming to her.

And now that he had come she felt vaguely sorry--as though an
unwonted responsibility was being forced on her.

"Infant prodigy!" she said aloud.

"What?" demanded the negro comedian standing beside her.

"Nothing--just talking about myself."

On the stage she felt better. This was her dance--and she
always felt that the way she did it wasn't suggestive any more
than to some men every pretty girl is suggestive. She made it
a stunt.

     "Uptown, downtown, jelly on a spoon,
      After sundown shiver by the moon."

He was not watching her now. She saw that clearly. He was looking
very deliberately at a castle on the back drop, wearing that
expression he had worn in the Taft Grill. A wave of exasperation
swept over her--he was criticising her.

     "That's the vibration that thrills me,
      Funny how affection fi-lls me
            Uptown, downtown---"

Unconquerable revulsion seized her. She was suddenly and horribly
conscious of her audience as she had never been since her first
appearance. Was that a leer on a pallid face in the front row, a
droop of disgust on one young girl's mouth? These shoulders of
hers--these shoulders shaking--were they hers? Were they real?
Surely shoulders weren't made for this!

     "Then--you'll see at a glance
     "I'll need some funeral ushers with St. Vitus dance
     At the end of the world I'll---"

The bassoon and two cellos crashed into a final chord. She paused
and poised a moment on her toes with every muscle tense, her
young face looking out dully at the audience in what one young
girl afterward called "such a curious, puzzled look," and then
without bowing rushed from the stage. Into the dressing-room she
sped, kicked out of one dress and into another, and caught a taxi
outside.

Her apartment was very warm--small, it was, with a row of
professional pictures and sets of Kipling and O. Henry which she
had bought once from a blue-eyed agent and read occasionally. And
there were several chairs which matched, but were none of them
comfortable, and a pink-shaded lamp with blackbirds painted on it
and an atmosphere of other stifled pink throughout. There were
nice things in it--nice things unrelentingly hostile to each
other, offspring of a vicarious, impatient taste acting in stray
moments. The worst was typified by a great picture framed in oak
bark of Passaic as seen from the Erie Railroad--altogether a
frantic, oddly extravagant, oddly penurious attempt to make a
cheerful room. Marcia knew it was a failure.

Into this room came the prodigy and took her two hands awkwardly.

"I followed you this time," he said.

"Oh!"

"I want you to marry me," he said.

Her arms went out to him. She kissed his mouth with a sort of
passionate wholesomeness.

"There!"

"I love you," he said.

She kissed him again and then with a little sigh flung herself
into an armchair and half lay there, shaken with absurd laughter.

"Why, you infant prodigy!" she cried.

"Very well, call me that if you want to. I once told you that I
was ten thousand years older than you--I am."

She laughed again.

"I don't like to be disapproved of."

"No one's ever going to disapprove of you again."

"Omar," she asked, "why do you want to marry me?"

The prodigy rose and put his hands in his pockets.

"Because I love you, Marcia Meadow."

And then she stopped calling him Omar.

"Dear boy," she said, "you know I sort of love you. There's
something about you--I can't tell what--that just puts my heart
through the wringer every time I'm round you. But honey--" She
paused.

"But what?"

"But lots of things. But you're only just eighteen, and I'm
nearly twenty."

"Nonsense!" he interrupted. "Put it this way--that I'm in my
nineteenth year and you're nineteen. That makes us pretty
close--without counting that other ten thousand years I
mentioned."

Marcia laughed.

"But there are some more 'buts.' Your people---

"My people!" exclaimed the prodigy ferociously. "My people tried
to make a monstrosity out of me." His face grew quite crimson at
the enormity of what he was going to say. "My people can go way
back and sit down!"

"My heavens!" cried Marcia in alarm. "All that? On tacks, I
suppose."

"Tacks--yes," he agreed wildly--"on anything. The more I think of
how they allowed me to become a little dried-up mummy---"

"What makes you thank you're that?" asked Marcia quietly--"me?"

"Yes. Every person I've met on the streets since I met you has
made me jealous because they knew what love was before I did. I
used to call it the 'sex impulse.' Heavens!"

"There's more 'buts,'" said Marcia

"What are they?"

"How could we live?"

"I'll make a living."

"You're in college."

"Do you think I care anything about taking a Master of Arts
degree?"

"You want to be Master of Me, hey?"

"Yes! What? I mean, no!"

Marcia laughed, and crossing swiftly over sat in his lap. He put
his arm round her wildly and implanted the vestige of a kiss
somewhere near her neck.

"There's something white about you," mused Marcia "but it doesn't
sound very logical."

"Oh, don't be so darned reasonable!"

"I can't help it," said Marcia.

"I hate these slot-machine people!"

"But we---"

"Oh, shut up!"

And as Marcia couldn't talk through her ears she had to.



IV


Horace and Marcia were married early in February. The sensation
in academic circles both at Yale and Princeton was tremendous.
Horace Tarbox, who at fourteen had been played up in the Sunday
magazines sections of metropolitan newspapers, was throwing over
his career, his chance of being a world authority on American
philosophy, by marrying a chorus girl--they made Marcia a chorus
girl. But like all modern stories it was a four-and-a-half-day
wonder.

They took a flat in Harlem. After two weeks' search, during which
his idea of the value of academic knowledge faded unmercifully,
Horace took a position as clerk with a South American export
company--some one had told him that exporting was the coming
thing. Marcia was to stay in her show for a few months--anyway
until he got on his feet. He was getting a hundred and
twenty-five to start with, and though of course they told him it
was only a question of months until he would be earning double
that, Marcia refused even to consider giving up the hundred and
fifty a week that she was getting at the time.

"We'll call ourselves Head and Shoulders, dear," she said softly,
"and the shoulders'll have to keep shaking a little longer until
the old head gets started."

"I hate it," he objected gloomily.

"Well," she replied emphatically, "Your salary wouldn't keep us
in a tenement. Don't think I want to be public--I don't. I want
to be yours. But I'd be a half-wit to sit in one room and count
the sunflowers on the wall-paper while I waited for you. When you
pull down three hundred a month I'll quit."

And much as it hurt his pride, Horace had to admit that hers was
the wiser course.

March mellowed into April. May read a gorgeous riot act to the
parks and waters of Manhatten, and they were very happy. Horace,
who had no habits whatsoever--he had never had time to form
any--proved the most adaptable of husbands, and as Marcia
entirely lacked opinions on the subjects that engrossed him there
were very few jottings and bumping. Their minds moved in
different spheres. Marcia acted as practical factotum, and Horace
lived either in his old world of abstract ideas or in a sort of
triumphantly earthy worship and adoration of his wife. She was a
continual source of astonishment to him--the freshness and
originality of her mind, her dynamic, clear-headed energy, and
her unfailing good humor.

And Marcia's co-workers in the nine-o'clock show, whither she had
transferred her talents, were impressed with her tremendous
pride in her husband's mental powers. Horace they knew only as a
very slim, tight-lipped, and immature-looking young man, who
waited every night to take her home.

"Horace," said Marcia one evening when she met him as usual at
eleven, "you looked like a ghost standing there against the
street lights. You losing weight?"

He shook his head vaguely.

"I don't know. They raised me to a hundred and thirty-five
dollars to-day, and---"

"I don't care," said Marcia severely. "You're killing yourself
working at night. You read those big books on economy---"

"Economics," corrected Horace.

"Well, you read 'em every night long after I'm asleep. And you're
getting all stooped over like you were before we were married."

"But, Marcia, I've got to---"

"No, you haven't dear. I guess I'm running this shop for the
present, and I won't let my fella ruin his health and eyes. You
got to get some exercise."

"I do. Every morning I---"

"Oh, I know! But those dumb-bells of yours wouldn't give a
consumptive two degrees of fever. I mean real exercise. You've
got to join a gymnasium. 'Member you told me you were such a
trick gymnast once that they tried to get you out for the team in
college and they couldn't because you had a standing date with
Herb Spencer?"

"I used to enjoy it," mused Horace, "but it would take up too
much time now."

"All right," said Marcia. "I'll make a bargain with you. You join
a gym and I'll read one of those books from the brown row of
'em."

"'Pepys' Diary'? Why, that ought to be enjoyable. He's very
light."

"Not for me--he isn't. It'll be like digesting plate glass. But
you been telling me how much it'd broaden my lookout. Well, you
go to a gym three nights a week and I'll take one big dose of
Sammy."

Horace hesitated.

"Well---"

"Come on, now! You do some giant swings for me and I'll chase
some culture for you."

So Horace finally consented, and all through a baking summer he
spent three and sometimes four evenings a week experimenting on
the trapeze in Skipper's Gymnasium. And in August he admitted to
Marcia that it made him capable of more mental work during the
day.

"MENS SANA IN CORPORE SANO," he said.

"Don't believe in it," replied Marcia. "I tried one of those
patent medicines once and they're all bunk. You stick to
gymnastics."

One night in early September while he was going through one of
his contortions on the rings in the nearly deserted room he was
addressed by a meditative fat man whom he had noticed watching
him for several nights.

"Say, lad, do that stunt you were doin' last night."

Horace grinned at him from his perch.

"I invented it," he said. "I got the idea from the fourth
proposition of Euclid."

"What circus he with?"

"He's dead."

"Well, he must of broke his neck doin' that stunt. I set here
last night thinkin' sure you was goin' to break yours."

"Like this!" said Horace, and swinging onto the trapeze he did
his stunt.

"Don't it kill your neck an' shoulder muscles?"

"It did at first, but inside of a week I wrote the QUOD ERAT
DEMONSTRANDUM on it."

"Hm!"

Horace swung idly on the trapeze.

"Ever think of takin' it up professionally?" asked the fat man.

"Not I."

"Good money in it if you're willin' to do stunts like 'at an' can
get away with it."

"Here's another," chirped Horace eagerly, and the fat man's mouth
dropped suddenly agape as he watched this pink-jerseyed
Prometheus again defy the gods and Isaac Newton.

The night following this encounter Horace got home from work to
find a rather pale Marcia stretched out on the sofa waiting for
him.

"I fainted twice to-day," she began without preliminaries.

"What?"

"Yep. You see baby's due in four months now. Doctor says I ought
to have quit dancing two weeks ago."

Horace sat down and thought it over.

"I'm glad of course," he said pensively--"I mean glad that we're
going to have a baby. But this means a lot of expense."

"I've got two hundred and fifty in the bank," said Marcia
hopefully, "and two weeks' pay coming."

Horace computed quickly.

"Inducing my salary, that'll give us nearly fourteen hundred for
the next six months."

Marcia looked blue.

"That all? Course I can get a job singing somewhere this month.
And I can go to work again in March."

"Of course nothing!" said Horace gruffly. "You'll stay right
here. Let's see now--there'll be doctor's bills and a nurse,
besides the maid: We've got to have some more money."

"Well," said Marcia wearily, "I don't know where it's coming
from. It's up to the old head now. Shoulders is out of business."

Horace rose and pulled on his coat.

"Where are you going?"

"I've got an idea," he answered. "I'll be right back."

Ten minutes later as he headed down the street toward Skipper's
Gymnasium he felt a placid wonder, quite unmixed with humor, at
what he was going to do. How he would have gaped at himself a
year before! How every one would have gaped! But when you opened
your door at the rap of life you let in many things.

The gymnasium was brightly lit, and when his eyes became
accustomed to the glare he found the meditative fat man seated on
a pile of canvas mats smoking a big cigar.

"Say," began Horace directly, "were you in earnest last night
when you said I could make money on my trapeze stunts?"

"Why, yes," said the fat man in surprise.

"Well, I've been thinking it over, and I believe I'd like to try
it. I could work at night and on Saturday afternoons--and
regularly if the pay is high enough."

The fat men looked at his watch.

"Well," he said, "Charlie Paulson's the man to see. He'll book
you inside of four days, once he sees you work out. He won't be
in now, but I'll get hold of him for to-morrow night."

The fat man was as good as his word. Charlie Paulson arrived next
night and put in a wondrous hour watching the prodigy swap
through the air in amazing parabolas, and on the night following
he brought two age men with him who looked as though they had
been born smoking black cigars and talking about money in low,
passionate voices. Then on the succeeding Saturday Horace
Tarbox's torso made its first professional appearance in a
gymnastic exhibition at the Coleman Street Gardens. But though
the audience numbered nearly five thousand people, Horace felt no
nervousness. From his childhood he had read papers to
audiences--learned that trick of detaching himself.

"Marcia," he said cheerfully later that same night, "I think
we're out of the woods. Paulson thinks he can get me an opening
at the Hippodrome, and that means an all-winter engagement. The
Hippodrome you know, is a big---"

"Yes, I believe I've heard of it," interrupted Marcia, "but I
want to know about this stunt you're doing. It isn't any
spectacular suicide, is it?"

"It's nothing," said Horace quietly. "But if you can think of an
nicer way of a man killing himself than taking a risk for you,
why that's the way I want to die."

Marcia reached up and wound both arms tightly round his neck.

"Kiss me," she whispered, "and call me 'dear heart.' I love to
hear you say 'dear heart.' And bring me a book to read to-morrow.
No more Sam Pepys, but something trick and trashy. I've been
wild for something to do all day. I felt like writing letters,
but I didn't have anybody to write to."

"Write to me," said Horace. "I'll read them."

"I wish I could," breathed Marcia. "If I knew words enough I
could write you the longest love-letter in the world--and never
get tired."

But after two more months Marcia grew very tired indeed, and for
a row of nights it was a very anxious, weary-looking young
athlete who walked out before the Hippodrome crowd. Then there
were two days when his place was taken by a young man who wore
pale blue instead of white, and got very little applause. But
after the two days Horace appeared again, and those who sat close
to the stage remarked an expression of beatific happiness on
that young acrobat's face even when he was twisting breathlessly
in the air an the middle of his amazing and original shoulder
swing. After that performance he laughed at the elevator man and
dashed up the stairs to the flat five steps at a time--and then
tiptoed very carefully into a quiet room.

"Marcia," he whispered.

"Hello!" She smiled up at him wanly. "Horace, there's something I
want you to do. Look in my top bureau drawer and you'll find a
big stack of paper. It's a book--sort of--Horace. I wrote it down
in these last three months while I've been laid up. I wish you'd
take it to that Peter Boyce Wendell who put my letter in his
paper.  He could tell you whether it'd be a good book. I wrote it
just the way I talk, just the way I wrote that letter to him.
It's just a story about a lot of things that happened to me. Will
you take it to him, Horace?"

"Yes, darling."

He leaned over the bed until his head was beside her on the
pillow, and began stroking back her yellow hair.

"Dearest Marcia," he said softly.

"No," she murmured, "call me what I told you to call me."

"Dear heart," he whispered passionately--"dearest heart."

"What'll we call her?"

They rested a minute in happy, drowsy content, while Horace
considered.

"We'll call her Marcia Hume Tarbox," he said at length.

"Why the Hume?"

"Because he's the fellow who first introduced us."

"That so?" she murmured, sleepily surprised. "I thought his name
was Moon."

Her eyes dosed, and after a moment the slow lengthening surge of
the bedclothes over her breast showed that she was asleep.

Horace tiptoed over to the bureau and opening the top drawer
found a heap of closely scrawled, lead-smeared pages. He looked
at the first sheet:

                    SANDRA PEPYS, SYNCOPATED
                        BY MARCIA TARBOX

He smiled. So Samuel Pepys had made an impression on her after
all. He turned a page and began to read. His smile deepened--he
read on. Half an hour passed and he became aware that Marcia had
waked and was watching him from the bed.

"Honey," came in a whisper.

"What Marcia?"

"Do you like it?"

Horace coughed.

"I seem to be reading on. It's bright."

"Take it to Peter Boyce Wendell. Tell him you got the highest
marks in Princeton once and that you ought to know when a book's
good. Tell him this one's a world beater."

"All right, Marcia," Horace said gently.

Her eyes closed again and Horace crossing over kissed her
forehead--stood there for a moment with a look of tender pity.
Then he left the room.

All that night the sprawly writing on the pages, the constant
mistakes in spelling and grammar, and the weird punctuation
danced before his eyes. He woke several times in the night, each
time full of a welling chaotic sympathy for this desire of
Marcia's soul to express itself in words. To him there was
something infinitely pathetic about it, and for the first time in
months he began to turn over in his mind his own half-forgotten
dreams.

He had meant to write a series of books, to popularize the new
realism as Schopenhauer had popularized pessimism and William
James pragmatism.

But life hadn't come that way. Life took hold of people and
forced them into flying rings. He laughed to think of that rap at
his door, the diaphanous shadow in Hume, Marcia's threatened
kiss.

"And it's still me," he said aloud in wonder as he lay awake in
the darkness. "I'm the man who sat in Berkeley with temerity to
wonder if that rap would have had actual existence had my ear not
been there to hear it. I'm still that man. I could be
electrocuted for the crimes he committed.

"Poor gauzy souls trying to express ourselves in something
tangible. Marcia with her written book; I with my unwritten ones.
Trying to choose our mediums and then taking what we get-- and
being glad."



V


"Sandra Pepys, Syncopated," with an introduction by Peter Boyce
Wendell the columnist, appeared serially in JORDAN'S MAGAZINE,
and came out in book form in March. From its first published
instalment it attracted attention far and wide. A trite enough
subject--a girl from a small New Jersey town coming to New York
to go on the stage--treated simply, with a peculiar vividness of
phrasing and a haunting undertone of sadness in the very
inadequacy of its vocabulary, it made an irresistible appeal.

Peter Boyce Wendell, who happened at that time to be advocating
the enrichment of the American language by the immediate adoption
of expressive vernacular words, stood as its sponsor and
thundered his indorsement over the placid bromides of the
conventional reviewers.

Marcia received three hundred dollars an instalment for the
serial publication, which came at an opportune time, for though
Horace's monthly salary at the Hippodrome was now more than
Marcia's had ever been, young Marcia was emitting shrill cries
which they interpreted as a demand for country air. So early April
found them installed in a bungalow in Westchester County, with a
place for a lawn, a place for a garage, and a place for
everything, including a sound-proof impregnable study, in which
Marcia faithfully promised Mr. Jordan she would shut herself up
when her daughter's demands began to be abated, and compose
immortally illiterate literature.

"It's not half bad," thought Horace one night as he was on his
way from the station to his house. He was considering several
prospects that had opened up, a four months' vaudeville offer in
five figures, a chance to go back to Princeton in charge of all
gymnasium work. Odd! He had once intended to go back there in
charge of all philosophic work, and now he had not even been
stirred by the arrival in New York of Anton Laurier, his old
idol.

The gravel crunched raucously under his heel. He saw the lights
of his sitting-room gleaming and noticed a big car standing in
the drive. Probably Mr. Jordan again, come to persuade Marcia to
settle down' to work.

She had heard the sound of his approach and her form was
silhouetted against the lighted door as she came out to meet him.
"There's some Frenchman here," she whispered nervously. "I
can't pronounce his name, but he sounds awful deep. You'll have
to jaw with him."

"What Frenchman?"

"You can't prove it by me. He drove up an hour ago with Mr.
Jordan, and said he wanted to meet Sandra Pepys, and all that sort
of thing."

Two men rose from chairs as they went inside.

"Hello Tarbox," said Jordan. "I've just been bringing together
two celebrities. I've brought M'sieur Laurier out with me.
M'sieur Laurier, let me present Mr. Tarbox, Mrs. Tarbox's
husband."

"Not Anton Laurier!" exclaimed Horace.

"But, yes. I must come. I have to come. I have read the book of
Madame, and I have been charmed"--he fumbled in his pocket--"ah
I have read of you too. In this newspaper which I read to-day it
has your name."

He finally produced a clipping from a magazine.

"Read it!" he said eagerly. "It has about you too."

Horace's eye skipped down the page.

"A distinct contribution to American dialect literature," it
said. "No attempt at literary tone; the book derives its very
quality from this fact, as did 'Huckleberry Finn.'"

Horace's eyes caught a passage lower down; he became suddenly
aghast--read on hurriedly:

"Marcia Tarbox's connection with the stage is not only as a
spectator but as the wife of a performer. She was married last
year to Horace Tarbox, who every evening delights the children at
the Hippodrome with his wondrous flying performance. It is said
that the young couple have dubbed themselves Head and Shoulders,
referring doubtless to the fact that Mrs. Tarbox supplies the
literary and mental qualities, while the supple and agile
shoulder of her husband contribute their share to the family
fortunes.

"Mrs. Tarbox seems to merit that much-abused title--'prodigy.'
Only twenty---"

Horace stopped reading, and with a very odd expression in his
eyes gazed intently at Anton Laurier.

"I want to advise you--" he began hoarsely.

"What?"

"About raps. Don't answer them! Let them alone--have a padded
door."




The Cut-Glass Bowl




There was a rough stone age and a smooth stone age and a bronze
age, and many years afterward a cut-glass age. In the cut-glass
age, when young ladies had persuaded young men with long, curly
mustaches to marry them, they sat down several months afterward
and wrote thank-you notes for all sorts of cut-glass
presents--punch-bowls, finger-bowls, dinner-glasses,
wine-glasses, ice-cream dishes, bonbon dishes, decanters, and
vases--for, though cut glass was nothing new in the nineties, it
was then especially busy reflecting the dazzling light of fashion
from the Back Bay to the fastnesses of the Middle West.

After the wedding the punch-bowls were arranged in the sideboard
with the big bowl in the centre; the glasses were set up in the
china-closet; the candlesticks were put at both ends of
things--and then the struggle for existence began. The bonbon
dish lost its little handle and became a pin-tray upstairs; a
promenading cat knocked the little bowl off the sideboard, and
the hired girl chipped the middle-sized one with the sugar-dish;
then the wine-glasses succumbed to leg fractures, and even the
dinner-glasses disappeared one by one like the ten little
niggers, the last one ending up, scarred and maimed as a
tooth-brush holder among other shabby genteels on the bathroom
shelf. But by the time all this had happened the cut-glass age
was over, anyway.

It was well past its first glory on the day the curious Mrs.
Roger Fairboalt came to see the beautiful Mrs. Harold Piper.

"My dear," said the curious Mrs. Roger Fairboalt, "I LOVE your
house. I think it's QUITE artistic."

"I'm SO glad," said the beautiful Mrs. Harold Piper, lights
appearing in her young, dark eyes; "and you MUST come often. I'm
almost ALWAYS alone in the afternoon."

Mrs. Fairboalt would have liked to remark that she didn't believe
this at all and couldn't see how she'd be expected to--it was
all over town that Mr. Freddy Gedney had been dropping in on Mrs.
Piper five afternoons a week for the past six months. Mrs.
Fairboalt was at that ripe age where she distrusted all beautiful
women---

"I love the dining-room MOST," she said, "all that MARVELLOUS
china, and that HUGE cut-glass bowl."

Mrs. Piper laughed, so prettily that Mrs. Fairboalt's lingering
reservations about the Freddy Gedney story quite vanished.

"Oh, that big bowl!" Mrs. Piper's mouth forming the words was a
vivid rose petal. "There's a story about that bowl---"

"Oh---"

"You remember young Carleton Canby? Well, he was very attentive
at one time, and the night I told him I was going to marry
Harold, seven years ago in ninety-two, he drew himself way up and
said: 'Evylyn, I'm going to give a present that's as hard as you
are and as beautiful and as empty and as easy to see through.'
He frightened me a little--his eyes were so black. I thought he
was going to deed me a haunted house or something that would
explode when you opened it. That bowl came, and of course it's
beautiful. Its diameter or circumference or something is two and
a half feet--or perhaps it's three and a half. Anyway, the
sideboard is really too small for it; it sticks way out."

"My DEAR, wasn't that ODD! And he left town about then didn't
he?" Mrs. Fairboalt was scribbling italicized notes on her
memory--"hard, beautiful, empty, and easy to see through."

"Yes, he went West--or South--or somewhere," answered Mrs. Piper,
radiating that divine vagueness that helps to lift beauty out of
time.

Mrs. Fairboalt drew on her gloves, approving the effect of
largeness given by the open sweep from the spacious music-room
through the library, disclosing a part of the dining-room beyond.
It was really the nicest smaller house in town, and Mrs. Piper
had talked of moving to a larger one on Devereaux Avenue. Harold
Piper must be COINING money.

As she turned into the sidewalk under the gathering autumn dusk
she assumed that disapproving, faintly unpleasant expression that
almost all successful women of forty wear on the street.

If _I_ were Harold Piper, she thought, I'd spend a LITTLE less
time on business and a little more time at home. Some FRIEND
should speak to him.

But if Mrs. Fairboalt had considered it a successful afternoon
she would have named it a triumph had she waited two minutes
longer. For while she was still a black receding figure a hundred
yards down the street, a very good-looking distraught young man
turned up the walk to the Piper house. Mrs. Piper answered the
door-bell herself, and with a rather dismayed expression led him
quickly into the library.

"I had to see you," he began wildly; "your note played the devil
with me. Did Harold frighten you into this?"

She shook her head.

"I'm through, Fred," she said slowly, and her lips had never
looked to him so much like tearings from a rose. "He came home
last night sick with it. Jessie Piper's sense of duty was to much
for her, so she went down to his office and told him. He was hurt
and--oh, I can't help seeing it his way, Fred. He says we've been
club gossip all summer and he didn't know it, and now he
understands snatches of conversation he's caught and veiled hints
people have dropped about me. He's mighty angry, Fred, and he
loves me and I love him-- rather."

Gedney nodded slowly and half closed his eyes.

"Yes," he said "yes, my trouble's like yours. I can see other
people's points of view too plainly." His gray eyes met her dark
ones frankly. "The blessed thing's over. My God, Evylyn, I've
been sitting down at the office all day looking at the outside of
your letter, and looking at it and looking at it---"

"You've got to go, Fred," she said steadily, and the slight
emphasis of hurry in her voice was a new thrust for him. "I gave
him my word of honor I wouldn't see you. I know just how far I
can go with Harold, and being here with you this evening is one
of the things I can't do."

They were still standing, and as she spoke she made a little
movement toward the door. Gedney looked at her miserably, trying,
here at the end, to treasure up a last picture of her--and then
suddenly both of them were stiffened into marble at the sound of
steps on the walk outside. Instantly her arm reached out grasping
the lapel of his coat --half urged, half swung him through the
big door into the dark dining-room.

"I'll make him go up-stairs," she whispered close to his ear;
"don't move till you hear him on the stairs. Then go out the
front way."

Then he was alone listening as she greeted her husband in the
hall.

Harold Piper was thirty-six, nine years older than his wife. He
was handsome--with marginal notes: these being eyes that were too
close together, and a certain woodenness when his face was in
repose. His attitude toward this Gedney matter was typical of all
his attitudes. He had told Evylyn that he considered the subject
closed and would never reproach her nor allude to it in any
form; and he told himself that this was rather a big way of
looking at it--that she was not a little impressed. Yet, like all
men who are preoccupied with their own broadness, he was
exceptionally narrow.

He greeted Evylyn with emphasized cordiality this evening.

"You'll have to hurry and dress, Harold," she said eagerly;
"we're going to the Bronsons'."

He nodded.

"It doesn't take me long to dress, dear," and, his words trailing
off, he walked on into the library. Evylyn's heart clattered
loudly.

"Harold---" she began, with a little catch in her voice, and
followed him in. He was lighting a cigarette. "You'll have to
hurry, Harold," she finished, standing in the doorway.

"Why?" he asked a trifle impatiently; "you're not dressed
yourself yet, Evie."

He stretched out in a Morris chair and unfolded a newspaper. With
a sinking sensation Evylyn saw that this meant at least ten
minutes--and Gedney was standing breathless in the next room.
Supposing Harold decided that before be went upstairs he wanted a
drink from the decanter on the sideboard. Then it occurred to
her to forestall this contingency by bringing him the decanter
and a glass. She dreaded calling his attention to the dining-room
in any way, but she couldn't risk the other chance.

But at the same moment Harold rose and, throwing his paper down,
came toward her.

"Evie, dear," he said, bending and putting his arms about her, "I
hope you're not thinking about last night---" She moved close to
him, trembling. "I know," he continued, "it was just an
imprudent friendship on your part. We all make mistakes."

Evylyn hardly heard him. She was wondering if by sheer clinging
to him she could draw him out and up the stairs. She thought of
playing sick, asking to be carried up--unfortunately she knew he
would lay her on the couch and bring her whiskey.

Suddenly her nervous tension moved up a last impossible notch.
She had heard a very faint but quite unmistakable creak from the
floor of the dining room. Fred was trying to get out the back
way.

Then her heart took a flying leap as a hollow ringing note like a
gong echoed and re-echoed through the house. Gedney's arm had
struck the big cut-glass bowl.

"What's that!" cried Harold. "Who's there?"

She clung to him but he broke away, and the room seemed to crash
about her ears. She heard the pantry-door swing open, a scuffle,
the rattle of a tin pan, and in wild despair she rushed into the
kitchen and pulled up the gas. Her husband's arm slowly unwound
from Gedney's neck, and he stood there very still, first in
amazement, then with pain dawning in his face.

"My golly!" he said in bewilderment, and then repeated: "My
GOLLY!"

He turned as if to jump again at Gedney, stopped, his muscles
visibly relaxed, and he gave a bitter little laugh.

"You people--you people---" Evylyn's arms were around him and her
eyes were pleading with him frantically, but he pushed her away
and sank dazed into a kitchen chair, his face like porcelain.
"You've been doing things to me, Evylyn. Why, you little devil!
You little DEVIL!"

She had never felt so sorry for him; she had never loved him so
much.

"It wasn't her fault," said Gedney rather humbly. "I just came."
But Piper shook his head, and his expression when he stared up
was as if some physical accident had jarred his mind into a
temporary inability to function. His eyes, grown suddenly
pitiful, struck a deep, unsounded chord in Evylyn--and
simultaneously a furious anger surged in her. She felt her
eyelids burning; she stamped her foot violently; her hands
scurried nervously over the table as if searching for a weapon,
and then she flung herself wildly at Gedney.

"Get out!" she screamed, dark eves blazing, little fists beating
helplessly on his outstretched arm. "You did this! Get out of
here--get out--get OUT! GET OUT!"



II


Concerning Mrs. Harold Piper at thirty-five, opinion was
divided--women said she was still handsome; men said she was
pretty no longer. And this was probably because the qualities in
her beauty that women had feared and men had followed had
vanished. Her eyes were still as large and as dark and as sad,
but the mystery had departed; their sadness was no longer
eternal, only human, and she had developed a habit, when she was
startled or annoyed, of twitching her brows together and blinking
several times. Her mouth also had lost: the red had receded and
the faint down-turning of its corners when she smiled, that had
added to the sadness of the eyes and been vaguely mocking and
beautiful, was quite gone. When she smiled now the corners of her
lips turned up. Back in the days when she revelled in her own
beauty Evylyn had enjoyed that smile of hers--she had accentuated
it. When she stopped accentuating it, it faded out and the last
of her mystery with it.

Evylyn had ceased accentuating her smile within a month after the
Freddy Gedney affair. Externally things had gone an very much as
they had before. But in those few minutes during which she had
discovered how much she loved her husband, Evylyn had realized how
indelibly she had hurt him. For a month she struggled against
aching silences, wild reproaches and accusations--she pled with
him, made quiet, pitiful little love to him, and he laughed at
her bitterly--and then she, too, slipped gradually into silence
and a shadowy, impenetrable barrier dropped between them. The
surge of love that had risen in her she lavished on Donald, her
little boy, realizing him almost wonderingly as a part of her
life.

The next year a piling up of mutual interests and
responsibilities and some stray flicker from the past brought
husband and wife together again--but after a rather pathetic
flood of passion Evylyn realized that her great opportunity was
gone. There simply wasn't anything left. She might have been
youth and love for both--but that time of silence had slowly
dried up the springs of affection and her own desire to drink
again of them was dead.

She began for the first time to seek women friends, to prefer
books she had read before, to sew a little where she could watch
her two children to whom she was devoted. She worried about
little things--if she saw crumbs on the dinner-table her mind
drifted off the conversation: she was receding gradually into
middle age.

Her thirty-fifth birthday had been an exceptionally busy one, for
they were entertaining on short notice that night, as she stood
in her bedroom window in the late afternoon she discovered that
she was quite tired. Ten years before she would have lain down
and slept, but now she had a feeling that things needed watching:
maids were cleaning down-stairs, bric-a-brac was all over the
floor, and there were sure to be grocery-men that had to be
talked to imperatively--and then there was a letter to write
Donald, who was fourteen and in his first year away at school.

She had nearly decided to lie down, nevertheless, when she heard
a sudden familiar signal from little Julie down-stairs. She
compressed her lips, her brows twitched together, and she
blinked.

"Julie!" she called.

"Ah-h-h-ow!" prolonged Julie plaintively. Then the voice of
Hilda, the second maid, floated up the stairs.

"She cut herself a little, Mis' Piper."

Evylyn flew to her sewing-basket, rummaged until she found a torn
handkerchief, and hurried downstairs. In a moment Julie was
crying in her arms as she searched for the cut, faint,
disparaging evidences of which appeared on Julie's dress.

"My THU-umb!" explained Julie. "Oh-h-h-h, t'urts."

"It was the bowl here, the he one," said Hilda apologetically.
"It was waitin' on the floor while I polished the sideboard, and
Julie come along an' went to foolin' with it. She yust scratch
herself."

Evylyn frowned heavily at Hilda, and twisting Julie decisively in
her lap, began tearing strips of the handkerchief.

"Now--let's see it, dear."

Julie held it up and Evelyn pounced.

"There!"

Julie surveyed her swathed thumb doubtfully. She crooked it; it
waggled. A pleased, interested look appeared in her tear-stained
face. She sniffled and waggled it again.

"You PRECIOUS!" cried Evylyn and kissed her, but before she left
the room she levelled another frown at Hilda. Careless! Servants
all that way nowadays. If she could get a good Irishwoman-- but
you couldn't any more--and these Swedes---

At five o'clock Harold arrived and, coming up to her room,
threatened in a suspiciously jovial tone to kiss her thirty-five
times for her birthday. Evylyn resisted.

"You've been drinking," she said shortly, and then added
qualitatively, "a little. You know I loathe the smell of it."

"Evie," he said after a pause, seating himself in a chair by the
window, "I can tell you something now. I guess you've known
things haven't beep going quite right down-town."

She was standing at the window combing her hair, but at these
words she turned and looked at him.

"How do you mean? You've always said there was room for more than
one wholesale hardware house in town." Her voice expressed some
alarm.

"There WAS," said Harold significantly, "but this Clarence Ahearn
is a smart man."

"I was surprised when you said he was coming to dinner."

"Evie," he went on, with another slap at his knee, "after January
first 'The Clarence Ahearn Company' becomes 'The Ahearn, Piper
Company'--and 'Piper Brothers' as a company ceases to
exist."

Evylyn was startled. The sound of his name in second place was
somehow hostile to her; still he appeared jubilant.

"I don't understand, Harold."

"Well, Evie, Ahearn has been fooling around with Marx. If those
two had combined we'd have been the little fellow, struggling
along, picking up smaller orders, hanging back on risks. It's a
question of capital, Evie, and 'Ahearn and Marx' would have had
the business just like 'Ahearn and Piper' is going to now." He
paused and coughed and a little cloud of whiskey floated up to
her nostrils. "Tell you the truth, Evie, I've suspected that
Ahearn's wife had something to do with it. Ambitious little lady,
I'm told. Guess she knew the Marxes couldn't help her much
here."

"Is she--common?" asked Evie.

"Never met her, I'm sure--but I don't doubt it. Clarence Ahearn's
name's been up at the Country Club five months--no action
taken." He waved his hand disparagingly. "Ahearn and I had lunch
together to-day and just about clinched it, so I thought it'd be
nice to have him and his wife up to-night--just have nine, mostly
family. After all, it's a big thing for me, and of course we'll
have to see something of them, Evie."

"Yes," said Evie thoughtfully, "I suppose we will."

Evylyn was not disturbed over the social end of it--but the idea
of "Piper Brothers" becoming "The Ahearn, Piper Company" startled
her. It seemed like going down in the world.

Half an hour later, as she began to dress for dinner, she heard
his voice from down-stairs.

"Oh, Evie, come down!"

She went out into the hall and called over the banister:

"What is it?"

"I want you to help me make some of that punch before dinner. "

Hurriedly rehooking her dress, she descended the stairs and found
him grouping the essentials on the dining-room table. She went
to the sideboard and, lifting one of the bowls, carried it
over.

"Oh, no," he protested, "let's use the big one. There'll be
Ahearn and his wife and you and I and Milton, that's five, and
Tom and Jessie, that's seven: and your sister and Joe Ambler,
that's nine. You don't know how quick that stuff goes when YOU
make it."

"We'll use this bowl," she insisted. "It'll hold plenty. You know
how Tom is."

Tom Lowrie, husband to Jessie, Harold's first cousin, was rather
inclined to finish anything in a liquid way that he began.

Harold shook his head.

"Don't be foolish. That one holds only about three quarts and
there's nine of us, and the servants'll want some--and it isn't
strong punch. It's  so much more cheerful to have a lot, Evie; we
don't have to drink all of it."

"I say the small one."

Again he shook his head obstinately.

"No; be reasonable."

"I AM reasonable," she said shortly. "I don't want any drunken
men in the house."

"Who said you did?"

"Then use the small bowl."

"Now, Evie---"

He grasped the smaller bowl to lift it back. Instantly her hands
were on it, holding it down. There was a momentary struggle, and
then, with a little exasperated grunt, he raised his side,
slipped it from her fingers, and carried it to the sideboard.

She looked at him and tried to make her expression contemptuous,
but he only laughed. Acknowledging her defeat but disclaiming all
future interest in the punch, she left the room.



III


At seven-thirty, her cheeks glowing and her high-piled hair
gleaming with a suspicion of brilliantine, Evylyn descended the
stairs. Mrs. Ahearn, a little woman concealing a slight
nervousness under red hair and an extreme Empire gown, greeted
her volubly. Evelyn disliked her on the spot, but the husband she
rather approved of. He had keen blue eyes and a natural gift of
pleasing people that might have made him, socially, had he not so
obviously committed the blunder of marrying too early in his
career.

"I'm glad to know Piper's wife," he said simply. "It looks as
though your husband and I are going to see a lot of each other in
the future."

She bowed, smiled graciously, and turned to greet the others:
Milton Piper, Harold's quiet, unassertive younger brother; the
two Lowries, Jessie and Tom; Irene, her own unmarried sister; and
finally Joe Ambler, a confirmed bachelor and Irene's perennial
beau.

Harold led the way into dinner.

"We're having a punch evening," he announced jovially--Evylyn saw
that he had already sampled his concoction--"so there won't be
any cocktails except the punch. It's m' wife's greatest
achievement, Mrs. Ahearn; she'll give you the recipe if you want
it; but owing to a slight"--he caught his wife's eye and paused
--"to a slight indisposition; I'm responsible for this batch.
Here's how!"

All through dinner there was punch, and Evylyn, noticing that
Ahearn and Milton Piper and all the women were shaking their
heads negatively at the maid, knew she bad been right about the
bowl; it was still half full. She resolved to caution Harold
directly afterward, but when the women left the table Mrs. Ahearn
cornered her, and she found herself talking cities and
dressmakers with a polite show of interest.

"We've moved around a lot," chattered Mrs. Ahearn, her red head
nodding violently. "Oh, yes, we've never stayed so long in a town
before--but I do hope we're here for good. I like it here; don't
you?"

"Well, you see, I've always lived here, so, naturally---"

"Oh, that's true," said Mrs. Ahearn and laughed. Clarence always
used to tell me he had to have a wife he could come home to and
say: "Well, we're going to Chicago to-morrow to live, so pack
up."

I got so I never expected to live ANYwhere." She laughed her
little laugh again; Evylyn suspected that it was her society
laugh.

"Your husband is a very able man, I imagine."

"Oh, yes," Mrs. Ahearn assured her eagerly. "He's brainy,
Clarence is. Ideas and enthusiasm, you know. Finds out what he
wants and then goes and gets it."

Evylyn nodded. She was wondering if the men were still drinking
punch back in the dining-room. Mrs. Ahearn's history kept
unfolding jerkily, but Evylyn had ceased to listen. The first
odor of massed cigars began to drift in. It wasn't really a large
house, she reflected; on an evening like this the library
sometimes grew blue with smoke, and next day one had to leave the
windows open for hours to air the heavy staleness out of the
curtains. Perhaps this partnership might . . . she began to
speculate on a new house . . .

Mrs. Ahearn's voice drifted in on her:

"I really would like the recipe if you have it written down
somewhere---"

Then there was a sound of chairs in the dining-room and the men
strolled in. Evylyn saw at once that her worst fears were
realized. Harold's face was flushed and his words ran together at
the ends of sentences, while Tom Lowrie lurched when he walked
and narrowly missed Irene's lap when he tried to sink onto the
couch beside her. He sat there blinking dazedly at the company.
Evylyn found herself blinking back at him, but she saw no humor in
it. Joe Ambler was smiling contentedly and purring on his cigar.
Only Ahearn and Milton Piper seemed unaffected.

"It's a pretty fine town, Ahearn," said Ambler, "you'll find
that."

"I've found it so," said Ahearn pleasantly.

"You find it more, Ahearn," said Harold, nodding emphatically "'f
I've an'thin' do 'th it."

He soared into a eulogy of the city, and Evylyn wondered
uncomfortably if it bored every one as it bored her. Apparently
not. They were all listening attentively. Evylyn broke in at the
first gap.

"Where've you been living, Mr. Ahearn?" she asked interestedly.
Then she remembered that Mrs. Ahearn had told her, but it didn't
matter. Harold mustn't talk so much. He was such an ASS when he'd
been drinking. But he plopped directly back in.

"Tell you, Ahearn. Firs' you wanna get a house up here on the
hill. Get Stearne house or Ridgeway house. Wanna have it so
people say: 'There's Ahearn house.' Solid, you know, tha's effec'
it gives."

Evylyn flushed. This didn't sound right at all. Still Ahearn
didn't seem to notice anything amiss, only nodded gravely.

"Have you been looking---" But her words trailed off unheard as
Harold's voice boomed on.

"Get house--tha's start. Then you get know people. Snobbish town
first toward outsider, but not long--after know you. People like
you"--he indicated Ahearn and his wife with a sweeping
gesture--"all right. Cordial as an'thin' once get by first
barrer-bar- barrer--" He swallowed, and then said "barrier,"
repeated it masterfully.

Evylyn looked appealingly at her brother-in-law, but before he
could intercede a thick mumble had come crowding out of Tom
Lowrie, hindered by the dead cigar which he gripped firmly with
his teeth.

"Huma uma ho huma ahdy um---"

"What?" demanded Harold earnestly.

Resignedly and with difficulty Tom removed the cigar--that is, he
removed part of it, and then blew the remainder with a WHUT
sound across the room, where it landed liquidly and limply in
Mrs. Ahearn's lap.

"Beg pardon," he mumbled, and rose with the vague intention of
going after it. Milton's hand on his coat collapsed him in time,
and Mrs. Ahearn not ungracefully flounced the tobacco from her
skirt to the floor, never once looking at it.

"I was sayin'," continued Tom thickly, "'fore 'at happened,"--he
waved his hand apologetically toward Mrs. Ahearn--"I was sayin' I
heard all truth that Country Club matter."

Milton leaned and whispered something to him.

"Lemme 'lone," he said petulantly; "know what I'm doin'.  'Ats
what they came for."

Evylyn sat there in a panic, trying to make her mouth form words.
She saw her sister's sardonic expression and Mrs. Ahearn's face
turning a vivid red. Ahearn was looking down at his watch-chain,
fingering it.

"I heard who's been keepin' y' out, an' he's not a bit better'n
you. I can fix whole damn thing up. Would've before, but I didn't
know you. Harol' tol' me you felt bad about the thing---"

Milton Piper rose suddenly and awkwardly to his feet. In a second
every one was standing tensely and Milton was saying something
very hurriedly about having to go early, and the Ahearns were
listening with eager intentness. Then Mrs. Ahearn swallowed and
turned with a forced smile toward Jessie. Evylyn saw Tom lurch
forward and put his hand on Ahearns shoulder--and suddenly she
was listening to a new, anxious voice at her elbow, and, turning,
found Hilda, the second maid.

"Please, Mis' Piper, I tank Yulie got her hand poisoned. It's all
swole up and her cheeks is hot and she's moanin' an'
groanin'---"

"Julie is?" Evylyn asked sharply. The party suddenly receded. She
turned quickly, sought with her eyes for Mrs. Ahearn, slipped
toward her.

"If you'll excuse me, Mrs.--" She had momentarily forgotten the
name, but she went right on:  "My little girl's been taken sick.
I'll be down when I can." She turned and ran quickly up the
stairs, retaining a confused picture of rays of cigar smoke and a
loud discussion in the centre of the room that seemed to be
developing into an argument.

Switching on the light in the nursery, she found Julie tossing
feverishly and giving out odd little cries. She put her hand
against the cheeks. They were burning. With an exclamation she
followed the arm down under the cover until she found the hand.
Hilda was right. The whole thumb was swollen to the wrist and in
the centre was a little inflamed sore. Blood-poisoning! her mind
cried in terror. The bandage had come off the cut and she'd
gotten something in it. She'd cut it at three o'clock--it was now
nearly eleven. Eight hours. Blood-poisoning couldn't possibly
develop so soon.

She rushed to the 'phone.

Doctor Martin across the street was out. Doctor Foulke, their
family physician, didn't answer. She racked her brains and in
desperation called her throat specialist, and bit her lip
furiously while he looked up the numbers of two physicians.
During that interminable moment she thought she heard loud voices
down-stairs--but she seemed to be in another world now. After
fifteen minutes she located a physician who sounded angry and
sulky at being called out of bed. She ran back to the nursery
and, looking at the hand, found it was somewhat more
swollen.

"Oh, God!" she cried, and kneeling beside the bed began smoothing
back Julie's hair over and over. With a vague idea of getting
some hot water, she rose and stared toward the door, but the lace
of her dress caught in the bed-rail and she fell forward on her
hands and knees. She struggled up and jerked frantically at the
lace. The bed moved and Julie groaned. Then more quietly but with
suddenly fumbling fingers she found the pleat in front, tore the
whole pannier completely off, and
rushed from the room.

Out in the hall she heard a single loud, insistent voice, but as
she reached the head of the stairs it ceased and an outer door
banged.

The music-room came into view. Only Harold and Milton were there,
the former leaning against a chair, his face very pale, his
collar open, and his mouth moving loosely.

"What's the matter?"

Milton looked at her anxiously.

"There was a little trouble---"

Then Harold saw her and, straightening up with an effort, began
to speak.

"Sult m'own cousin m'own house. God damn common nouveau rish.
'Sult m'own cousin---"

"Tom had trouble with Ahearn and Harold interfered," said Milton.
"My Lord Milton," cried Evylyn, "couldn't you have done
something?"

"I tried; I---"

"Julie's sick," she interrupted; "she's poisoned herself. Get him
to bed if you can."

Harold looked up.

"Julie sick?"

Paying no attention, Evylyn brushed by through the dining-room,
catching sight, with a burst of horror, of the big punch-bowl
still on the table, the liquid from melted ice in its bottom. She
heard steps on the front stairs--it was Milton helping Harold
up--and then a mumble: "Why, Julie's a'righ'."

"Don't let him go into the nursery!" she shouted.

The hours blurred into a nightmare. The doctor arrived just
before midnight and within a half-hour had lanced the wound. He
left at two after giving her the addresses of two nurses to call
up and promising to return at half past six. It was
blood-poisoning.

At four, leaving Hilda by the bedside, she went to her room, and
slipping with a shudder out of her evening dress, kicked it into a
corner. She put on a house dress and returned to the nursery
while Hilda went to make coffee.

Not until noon could she bring herself to look into Harold's
room, but when she did it was to find him awake and staring very
miserably at the ceiling. He turned blood-shot hollow eyes upon
her. For a minute she hated him, couldn't speak. A husky voice
came from the bed.

"What time is it?"

"Noon."

"I made a damn fool---"

"It doesn't matter," she said sharply. "Julie's got
blood-poisoning. They may"--she choked over the words--"they
think she'll have to lose her hand."

"What?"

"She cut herself on that--that bowl."

"Last night?"

"Oh, what does it matter?" see cried; "she's got blood-poisoning.
Can't you hear?" He looked at her bewildered--sat half-way up
in bed.

"I'll get dressed," he said.

Her anger subsided and a great wave of weariness and pity for him
rolled over her. After all, it was his trouble, too."

"Yes," she answered listlessly, "I suppose you'd better."



IV


If Evylyn's beauty had hesitated an her early thirties it came to
an abrupt decision just afterward and completely left her. A
tentative outlay of wrinkles on her face suddenly deepened and
flesh collected rapidly on her legs and hips and arms. Her
mannerism of drawing her brows together had become an
expression--it was habitual when she was reading or speaking and
even while she slept. She was forty-six.

As in most families whose fortunes have gone down rather than up,
she and Harold had drifted into a colorless antagonism. In
repose they looked at each other with the toleration they might
have felt for broken old chairs; Evylyn worried a little when he
was sick and did her best to be cheerful under the wearying
depression of living with a disappointed man.

Family bridge was over for the evening and she sighed with
relief. She had made more mistakes than usual this evening and
she didn't care. Irene shouldn't have made that remark about the
infantry being particularly dangerous. There had been no letter
for three weeks now, and, while this was nothing out of the
ordinary, it never failed to make her nervous; naturally she
hadn't known how many clubs were out.

Harold had gone up-stairs, so she stepped out on the porch for a
breath of fresh air. There was a bright glamour of moonlight
diffusing on the sidewalks and lawns, and with a little half
yawn, half laugh, she remembered one long moonlight affair of her
youth. It was astonishing to think that life had once been the
sum of her current love-affairs. It was now the sum of her
current problems.

There was the problem of Julie--Julie was thirteen, and lately
she was growing more and more sensitive about her deformity and
preferred to stay always in her room reading. A few years before
she had been frightened at the idea of going to school, and
Evylyn could not bring herself to send her, so she grew up in her
mother's shadow, a pitiful little figure with the artificial
hand that she made no attempt to use but kept forlornly in her
pocket. Lately she had been taking lessons in using it because
Evylyn had feared she would cease to lift the arm altogether, but
after the lessons, unless she made a move with it in listless
obedience to her mother, the little hand would creep back to the
pocket of her dress. For a while her dresses were made without
pockets, but Julie had moped around the house so miserably at a
loss all one month that Evylyn weakened and never tried the
experiment again.

The problem of Donald had been different from the start.  She had
attempted vainly to keep him near her as she had tried to teach
Julie to lean less on her--lately the problem of Donald had been
snatched out of her hands; his division had been abroad for three
months.

She yawned again--life was a thing for youth.  What a happy youth
she must have had!  She remembered her pony, Bijou, and the trip
to Europe with her mother when she was eighteen---

"Very, very complicated," she said aloud and severely to the
moon, and, stepping inside, was about to close the door when she
heard a noise in the library and started.

It was Martha, the middle-aged servant: they kept only one now.

"Why, Martha!" she said in surprise.

Martha turned quickly.

"Oh, I thought you was up-stairs.  I was jist---"

"Is anything the matter?"

Martha hesitated.

"No; I---"  She stood there fidgeting.  "It was a letter, Mrs.
Piper, that I put somewhere.

"A letter?  Your own letter?" asked Evylyn.

"No, it was to you. 'Twas this afternoon, Mrs. Piper, in the last
mail. The postman give it to me and then the back door-bell
rang. I had it in my hand, so I must have stuck it somewhere. I
thought I'd just slip in now and find it."

"What sort of a letter?  From Mr. Donald?"

"No, it was an advertisement, maybe, or a business letter. It was
a long narrow one, I remember."

They began a search through the music-room, looking on trays and
mantelpieces, and then through the library, feeling on the tops
of rows of books. Martha paused in despair.

"I can't think where. I went straight to the kitchen. The
dining-room, maybe." She started hopefully for the dining-room,
but turned suddenly at the sound of a gasp behind her. Evylyn had
sat down heavily in a Morris chair, her brows drawn very close
together eyes blanking furiously.

"Are you sick?"

For a minute there was no answer. Evylyn sat there very still and
Martha could see the very quick rise and fall of her bosom.

"Are you sick?" she repeated.

"No," said Evylyn slowly, "but I know where the letter is. Go
'way, Martha. I know."

Wonderingly, Martha withdrew, and still Evylyn sat there, only
the muscles around her eyes moving --contracting and relaxing and
contracting again. She knew now where the letter was--she knew
as well as if she had put it there herself. And she felt
instinctively and unquestionably what the letter was. It was long
and narrow like an advertisement, but up in the corner in large
letters it said "War Department" and, in smaller letters below,
"Official Business." She knew it lay there in the big bowl with
her name in ink on the outside and her soul's death within.

Rising uncertainly, she walked toward the dining-room, feeling
her way along the bookcases and through the doorway. After a
moment she found the light and switched it on.

There was the bowl, reflecting the electric light in crimson
squares edged with black and yellow squares edged with blue,
ponderous and glittering, grotesquely and triumphantly ominous.
She took a step forward and paused again; another step and she
would see over the top and into the inside--another step and she
would see an edge of white--another step--her hands fell on the
rough, cold surface--

In a moment she was tearing it open, fumbling with an obstinate
fold, holding it before her while the typewritten page glared out
and struck at her. Then it fluttered like a bird to the floor.
The house that had seemed whirring, buzzing a moment since, was
suddenly very quiet; a breath of air crept in through the open
front door carrying the noise of a passing motor; she heard faint
sounds from upstairs and then a grinding racket in the pipe
behind the bookcases-her husband turning of a water-
tap---

And in that instant it was as if this were not, after all,
Donald's hour except in so far as he was a marker in the
insidious contest that had gone on in sudden surges and long,
listless interludes between Evylyn and this cold, malignant thing
of beauty, a gift of enmity from a man whose face she had long
since forgotten.  With its massive, brooding passivity it lay
there in the centre of her house as it had lain for years,
throwing out the ice-like beams of a thousand eyes, perverse
glitterings merging each into each, never aging, never changing.

Evylyn sat down on the edge of the table and stared at it
fascinated. It seemed to be smiling now, a very cruel smile, as
if to say:

"You see, this time I didn't have to hurt you directly. I didn't
bother. You know it was I who took your son away. You know how
cold I am and how hard and how beautiful, because once you were
just as cold and hard and beautiful."

The bowl seemed suddenly to turn itself over and then to distend
and swell until it became a great canopy that glittered and
trembled over the room, over the house, and, as the walls melted
slowly into mist, Evylyn saw that it was still moving out, out
and far away from her, shutting off far horizons and suns and
moons and stars except as inky blots seen faintly through it. And
under it walked all the people, and the light that came through
to them was refracted and twisted until shadow seamed light and
light seemed shadow--until the whole panoply of the world became
changed and distorted under the twinkling heaven of
the bowl.

Then there came a far-away, booming voice like a low, clear bell.
It came from the centre of the bowl and down the great sides to
the ground and then bounced toward her eagerly.

"You see, I am fate," it shouted, "and stronger than your puny
plans; and I am how-things-turn-out and I am different from your
little dreams, and I am the flight of time and the end of beauty
and unfulfilled desire; all the accidents and imperceptions and
the little minutes that shape the crucial hours are mine. I am
the exception that proves no rules, the limits of your control,
the condiment in the dish of life."

The booming sound stopped; the echoes rolled away over the wide
land to the edge of the bowl that bounded the world and up the
great sides and back to the centre where they hummed for a moment
and died. Then the great walls began slowly to bear down upon
her, growing smaller and smaller, coming closer and closer as if
to crush her; and as she clinched her hands and waited for the
swift bruise of the cold glass, the bowl gave a sudden wrench and
turned over--and lay there on the side-board, shining and
inscrutable, reflecting in a hundred prisms, myriad, many-colored
glints and gleams and crossings and interlaces of light.

The cold wind blew in again through to front door, and with a
desperate, frantic energy Evylyn stretched both her arms around
the bowl. She must be quick--she must be strong. She tightened
her arms until they ached, tauted the thin strips of muscle under
her soft flesh, and with a mighty effort raised it and held it.
She felt the wind blow cold on her back where her dress had come
apart from the strain of her effort, and as she felt it she
turned toward it and staggered under the great weight out through
the library and on toward the front door.  She must be
quick--she must be strong. The blood in her arms throbbed dully
and her knees kept giving way under her, but the feel of the cool
glass was good.

Out the front door she tottered and over to the stone steps, and
there, summoning every fibre of her soul and body for a last
effort, swung herself half around--for a second, as she tried to
loose her hold, her numb fingers clung to the rough surface, and
in that second she slipped and, losing balance, toppled forward
with a despairing cry, her arms still around the bowl . . . down
. . .

Over the way lights went on; far down the block the crash was
heard, and pedestrians rushed up wonderingly; up-stairs a tired
man awoke from the edge of sleep and a little girl whimpered in a
haunted doze. And all over the moonlit sidewalk around the
still, black form, hundreds of prisms and cubes and splinters of
glass reflected the light in little gleams of blue, and black
edged with yellow, and yellow, and crimson edged with black.





Bernice Bobs Her Hair




After dark on Saturday night one could stand on the first tee of
the golf-course and see the country-club windows as a yellow
expanse over a very black and wavy ocean. The waves of this
ocean, so to speak, were the heads of many curious caddies, a few
of the more ingenious chauffeurs, the golf professional's deaf
sister--and there were usually several stray, diffident waves who
might have rolled inside had they so desired. This was the
gallery.

The balcony was inside. It consisted of the circle of wicker
chairs that lined the wall of the combination clubroom and
ballroom. At these Saturday-night dances it was largely feminine;
a great babel of middle-aged ladies with sharp eyes and icy
hearts behind lorgnettes and large bosoms. The main function of
the balcony was critical, it occasionally showed grudging
admiration, but never approval, for it is well known among ladies
over thirty-five that when the younger set dance in the
summer-time it is with the very worst intentions in the world,
and if they are not bombarded with stony eyes stray couples will
dance weird barbaric interludes in the corners, and the more
popular, more dangerous, girls will sometimes be kissed in the
parked limousines of unsuspecting dowagers.

But, after all, this critical circle is not close enough to the
stage to see the actors' faces and catch the subtler byplay. It
can only frown and lean, ask questions and make satisfactory
deductions from its set of postulates, such as the one which
states that every young man with a large income leads the life of
a hunted partridge. It never really appreciates the drama of the
shifting, semi-cruel world of adolescence. No; boxes,
orchestra-circle, principals, and chorus be represented by the
medley of faces and voices that sway to the plaintive African
rhythm of Dyer's dance orchestra.

>From sixteen-year-old Otis Ormonde, who has two more years at
Hill School, to G. Reece Stoddard, over whose bureau at home
hangs a Harvard law diploma; from little Madeleine Hogue, whose
hair still feels strange and uncomfortable on top of her head, to
Bessie MacRae, who has been the life of the party a little too
long--more than ten years--the medley is not only the centre of
the stage but contains the only people capable of getting an
unobstructed view of it.

With a flourish and a bang the music stops. The couples exchange
artificial, effortless smiles, facetiously repeat "LA-de-DA-DA
dum-DUM," and then the clatter of young feminine voices soars
over the burst of clapping.

A few disappointed stags caught in midfloor as they bad been
about to cut in subsided listlessly back to the walls, because
this was not like the riotous Christmas dances--these summer
hops were considered just pleasantly warm and exciting, where
even the younger marrieds rose and performed ancient waltzes and
terrifying fox trots to the tolerant amusement of their younger
brothers and sisters.

Warren McIntyre, who casually attended Yale, being one of the
unfortunate stags, felt in his dinner-coat pocket for a cigarette
and strolled out onto the wide, semidark veranda, where couples
were scattered at tables, filling the lantern-hung night with
vague words and hazy laughter. He nodded here and there at the
less absorbed and as he passed each couple some half-forgotten
fragment of a story played in his mind, for it was not a large
city and every one was Who's Who to every one else's past. There,
for example, were Jim Strain and Ethel Demorest, who had been
privately engaged for three years. Every one knew that as soon as
Jim managed to hold a job for more than two months she would
marry him. Yet how bored they both looked, and how wearily Ethel
regarded Jim sometimes, as if she wondered why she had trained
the vines of her affection on such a wind-shaken poplar.

Warren was nineteen and rather pitying with those of his friends
who hadn't gone East to college. But, like most boys, he bragged
tremendously about the girls of his city when he was away from
it. There was Genevieve Ormonde, who regularly made the rounds of
dances, house-parties, and football games at Princeton, Yale,
Williams, and Cornell; there was black-eyed Roberta Dillon, who
was quite as famous to her own generation as Hiram Johnson or Ty
Cobb; and, of course, there was Marjorie Harvey, who besides
having a fairylike face and a dazzling, bewildering tongue was
already justly celebrated for having turned five cart-wheels in
succession during the last pump-and-slipper dance at New Haven.

Warren, who had grown up across the street from Marjorie, had
long been "crazy about her." Sometimes she seemed to reciprocate
his feeling with a faint gratitude, but she had tried him by her
infallible test and informed him gravely that she did not love
him. Her test was that when she was away from him she forgot him
and had affairs with other boys. Warren found this discouraging,
especially as Marjorie had been making little trips all summer,
and for the first two or three days after each arrival home he
saw great heaps of mail on the Harveys' hall table addressed to
her in various masculine handwritings. To make matters worse, all
during the month of August she had been visited by her cousin
Bernice from Eau Claire, and it seemed impossible to see her
alone. It was always necessary to hunt round and find some one to
take care of Bernice. As August waned this was becoming more and
more difficult.

Much as Warren worshipped Marjorie he had to admit that Cousin
Bernice was sorta dopeless. She was pretty, with dark hair and
high color, but she was no fun on a party. Every Saturday night
he danced a long arduous duty dance with her to please Marjorie,
but he had never been anything but bored in her company.

"Warren"---a soft voice at his elbow broke in upon his thoughts,
and he turned to see Marjorie, flushed and radiant as usual. She
laid a hand on his shoulder and a glow settled almost
imperceptibly over him.

"Warren," she whispered "do something for me--dance with Bernice.
She's been stuck with little Otis Ormonde for almost an
hour."

Warren's glow faded.

"Why--sure," he answered half-heartedly.

"You don't mind, do you? I'll see that you don't get stuck."

"'Sall right."

Marjorie smiled--that smile that was thanks enough.

"You're an angel, and I'm obliged loads."

With a sigh the angel glanced round the veranda, but Bernice and
Otis were not in sight. He wandered back inside, and there in
front of the women's dressing-room he found Otis in the centre of
a group of young men who were convulsed with laughter. Otis was
brandishing a piece of timber he had picked up, and discoursing
volubly.

"She's gone in to fix her hair," he announced wildly. "I'm
waiting to dance another hour with her."

Their laughter was renewed.

"Why don't some of you cut in?" cried Otis resentfully. "She
likes more variety."

"Why, Otis," suggested a friend "you've just barely got used to
her."

"Why the two-by-four, Otis?" inquired Warren, smiling.

"The two-by-four? Oh, this? This is a club. When she comes out
I'll hit her on the head and knock her in again."

Warren collapsed on a settee and howled with glee.

"Never mind, Otis," he articulated finally. "I'm relieving you
this time."

Otis simulated a sudden fainting attack and handed the stick to
Warren.

"If you need it, old man," he said hoarsely.

No matter how beautiful or brilliant a girl may be, the
reputation of not being frequently cut in on makes her position
at a dance unfortunate. Perhaps boys prefer her company to that
of the butterflies with whom they dance a dozen times an but,
youth in this jazz-nourished generation is temperamentally
restless, and the idea of fox-trotting more than one full fox
trot with the same girl is distasteful, not to say odious. When
it comes to several dances and the intermissions between she can
be quite sure that a young man, once relieved, will never tread
on her wayward toes again.

Warren danced the next full dance with Bernice, and finally,
thankful for the intermission, he led her to a table on the
veranda. There was a moment's silence while she did unimpressive
things with her fan.

"It's hotter here than in Eau Claire," she said.

Warren stifled a sigh and nodded. It might be for all he knew or
cared. He wondered idly whether she was a poor conversationalist
because she got no a